title,author_names
Kokuritsu Kokkai Toshokan shozō Meijiki kankō tosho maikuro-ban shūsei,Kokuritsu Kokkai Toshokan (Japan)
Maniac Magee,Jerry Spinelli
Wild sports of the West,W. H. (William Hamilton) Maxwell
Drop Shot,Harlan Coben
Quidditch Through the Ages,J. K. Rowling
Playing for Pizza,John Grisham
The boy's own book,"Clarke, William"
Eyeshield 21,"Riichiro Inagaki, Yusuke Murata"
The sports and pastimes of the people of England,Joseph Strutt
Classification,Library of Congress. Classification Division.
Born to Run,Christopher McDougall
The economics of sports,"Michael Leeds, Michael A. Leeds, Peter von Allmen"
Stink and the ultimate thumb-wrestling smackdown,"Megan McDonald, Peter H. Reynolds, Barbara Rosenblat"
Research Methods for Sports Studies,Ian Jones
"The Adirondack, or, Life in the woods",Joel Tyler Headley
Big Nate Strikes Again,Lincoln Peirce
The power of one,Bryce Courtenay
Sports Illustrated,Editors of Sports Illustrated
走ることについて語るときに僕の語ること,村上春樹
Miracle on the 17th Green,"James Patterson, Peter De Jonge"
The Contender,Robert Lipsyte
Subordinate Legislation,Scotland. Parliament.
The mechanics of athletics,Geoffrey H. G. Dyson
Stadia,"Geraint John, Rod Sheard, ROD SHEARD"
My system,Jørgen Peter Müller
How Tom beat Captain Najork and his hired sportsmen,"Russell Hoban, Quentin Blake, Quentin Blake"
Sports tourism,Mike Weed
Ferguson Career Coach,Shelly Field
Sport policy,"Nils Asle Bergsgard, Barrie Houlihan, Per Mangset, Svein Ingve Nodland, Hilmar Rommetvedt"
American sports,Benjamin G. Rader
Sport in society,Jay J. Coakley
Softball,"Marian E. Kneer, Charles L McCord"
Global Corruption Report,Transparency International
Advanced theory and practice in sport marketing,Eric C. Schwarz
La maratona più pazza del mondo!,Elisabetta Dami
Textbook of anatomy and physiology,Catherine Parker Anthony
Pure Sport,John Kremer
A Colour Atlas of Arthropods in Clinical Medicine,"Wallace Peters, Herbert Michael Gilles, Geoffrey Pasvol, Laura Nabarro"
Ali,"Jonathan Eig, Noelia González Barrancos"
The sports and pastimes of the people of England,Joseph Strutt
Molecular Exercise Physiology,Henning Wackerhage
Detroit,David Lee Poremba
Introduction to sports biomechanics,Roger Bartlett
Sports Marketing,Matthew D. Shank
Strategic sport marketing,"David Shilbury, David Shilbury, Shayne Quick, Hans Westerbeek"
Review of the research program of the Partnership for a New Generation of Vehicles,"National Research Council (U.S.). Standing Committee to Review the Research Program of the Partnership for a New Generation of Vehicles., Standing Committee to Review the Research Program of the Partnership for a New Generation of Vehicles, National Research Council (US), Standing Committee to Review the Research Programs of the Partnership for a New Generation of Vehicles, Board on Energy and Environmental Systems, National Research Council (U.S.) Transportation Research Board"
Ghosts of Everest,"Jochen Hemmleb, Larry A. Johnson, Eric R. Simonson, William E. Nothdurft"
Fair Play in Sport,Sigmund Loland
Sport facility operations management,Eric C. Schwarz
Psychology in sports coaching,Adam R. Nicholls
"Sport, Culture and Society",Grant Jarvie
Entertainment and sports law,Gordon I. Kirke
Managing Sport Organizations,"Daniel Covell, Sharianne Walker"
Functional anatomy for sport and exercise,Clare E. Milner
Archery,"Wayne C. McKinney, Michael W McKinney"
"Introduction to physical education, fitness, and sport",Daryl Siedentop
Franklin Plays Hockey (A Franklin TV Storybook),"Sharon Jennings, Paulette Bourgeois, P. , Clark, B. (Based On Books by) , Jennings, S. (Tv Tie-In) Bourgeois, Brenda Clark, John Lei, Mark Koren, Jelena Sisic"
Physiology of sport and exercise,"Jack H. Wilmore, David Costill, W. Larry Kenney"
Athletic Shorts,"Chris Crutcher, Bryce Lee"
Essentials of Performance Analysis in Sport,"Mike Hughes, Ian Franks"
Skadaor inom idrotten,"Lars Peterson, Per Renstrom"
Psychological factors in competitive sport,Don Davies
Hapkido,Marc Tedeschi
Making sense of sports,Ellis Cashmore
Sport Consumer Behaviour,"Daniel C. Funk, Kostas Alexandris, Heath McDonald"
Swimming,"Betty J. Vickers, Betty J. Wickers, William J. Vincent, Betty Vcickers"
Sport and the Media,Matthew Nicholson
Managing people in sport organizations,"Tracy Taylor, Alison Doherty, Peter McGraw"
Career Information Center,Visual Education Center
Golf,"Virginia Lindblad Nance, Virginia Nance, Elwood Davis, Virginia L Nance, Kay E McMahon, Elwood C Davis"
Sport Industry Research and Analysis,"David A. Tobar, Jacquelyn Cuneen"
This sporting life,David Storey
The arena of masculinity,Brian Pronger
Acquisition and Performance of Sports Skills,Terry McMorris
The playground problem,Margaret McNamara
Plato's thought,G. M. A. Grube
Sponsorship,Guy Masterman
Walker's manly exercises,Donald Walker
Sports,Tim Hammond
Philosophy in sport made science in earnest,John Ayrton Paris
Sports law in Denmark,Jens Evald
Talent Development,"Dave Collins, Aine MacNamara"
Sport psychology,"Arnold D. LeUnes, Arnold D. Le Unes, Jack R. Nation, Arnold Leunes, Jack Nation"
Analytic Methods in Sports,Thomas A. Severini
Playing with Friends,Rebecca Rissman
American Boy's Handy Book,Daniel Carter Beard
Positive Pedagogy for Sport Coaching,Richard Light
The American boys handy book,Daniel Carter Beard
The best of the Appalachian Trail,"Victoria Logue, Frank Logue, Leonard M. Adkins"
Sports in Society,Jay J. Coakley
Teach Yourself to Swim,Pete Andersen
Chʻing-tao shih chih,Qingdao Shi shi zhi ban gong shi
The boxing register,"James B. Roberts, Alexander G. Skutt"
Sports Marketing,Matthew D. Shank
Exercise and Sport Pharmacology,Mark D. Mamrack
Positive Youth Development Through Sport,Nicholas L. Holt
Spanning the World,Len Berman
Math on the Job,Richard Wunderlich
The rules book,Eric Twiname
"Foundations of physical education, exercise science, and sport",Deborah A. Wuest
Managing major sports events,Milena M. Parent
Qualitative Research in Sport Management,James Skinner
Business of Sports,Mark Conrad
Whale Talk,Chris Crutcher
The encyclopedia of sports,Frank G. Menke
Rules of the Game,Diagram Group.
Consuming sport,Garry Crawford
Managing sports organizations,"Daniel Covell, Sharianne Walker, Julie Siciliano, Peter W. Hess"
Essai sur l'éphébie attique,Albert Dumont
Sport Public Relations And Communication,James Skinner
Comparative elite sport development,Barrie Houlihan
Reflective Practice in the Sport and Exercise Sciences,Zoe Knowles
Sport and social capital,"Matthew Nicholson, Russell Hoye"
The book of archery,George Agar Hansard
Canine Sports Medicine and Rehabilitation,"Chris Zink, Janet B. Van Dyke"
Stories For Boys,"Richard Harding Davis, Rebecca Harding Davis, C. Belmont Davis"
Sport Tourism Development,"James Higham, Tom Hinch"
The diary of Master William Silence,Dodgson Hamilton Madden
Teaching physical education for learning,"Judith Rink, Judith E. Rink"
We might as well win,Johan Bruyneel
Who invented basketball?,"Suzanne Slade, Cary Pillo"
The boys of summer,Roger Kahn
Biomechanics of Human Motion,Emeric Arus
Sports Finance and Management,"Jason A. Winfree, Mark S. Rosentraub, Brian M. Mills"
Qualitative Research Methods in Sport Exercise and Health,"Andrew C. Sparkes, Brett Smith"
"Mathematics in Games, Sports, and Gambling",Ronald J. Gould
The book of American pastimes,Charles A. Peverelly
America's Cup,Simon Shaw
Shooting action sports,Todd Grossman
The runner,Cynthia Voigt
Routledge Handbook Of Ergonomics In Sport And Exercise,Youlian Hong
Sport and exercise science,Dean Sewell
The soccer goalkeeper,"Joe Luxbacher, Joseph A. Luxbacher, Gene Klein"
Handbook of sport psychology,Gershon Tenenbaum
Practical applications in sports nutrition,Heather Hedrick Fink
A history and philosophy of sport and physical education,"Robert A. Mechikoff, Steven G Estes"
The Ultimate Canadian Sports Trivia Book,Edward Zawadzki
Sport in Contemporary Society,D. Stanley Eitzen
Rah-rah Ruby!,Christianne C. Jones
Playing on the periphery,Tara Brabazon
"Physique, fitness, and performance",Thomas Battinelli
Lacrosse,W. George Beers
Watching sport,Stephen Mumford
"Equity and difference in physical education, youth sport and health",Fiona Dowling
The global politics of sport,Lincoln Allison
Inclusion and exclusion through youth sport,Symeon Dagkas
Mixed methods research in the movement sciences,"Oleguer Camerino, Teresa M. Anguera"
Goalkeeper goof,Cari Meister
International perspectives on the management of sport,"Milena M. Parent, Trevor Slack"
"Four centuries of sport in America, 1490-1890",Herbert Manchester
Financial management in the sport industry,Matthew T. Brown
Sports nutrition,"Judy A. Driskell, Constance Kies"
Routledge Handbook of Sports Technology and Engineering,"Franz Konstantin Fuss, Aleksandar Subic, Martin Strangwood, Rabindra Mehta"
Embodied Confidence,Sara Vatore
The Dream Job,Melvin Helitzer
Mexico,R. Conrad Stein
Sports in Society,Jay J. Coakley
Sports Publicity,Joe Favorito
Older yet Faster,"Keith Bateman, Heidi Jones, Ainsley Knott, An Van De Borre"
Handbook of the London 2012 Olympic and Paralympic Games : Volume Two,"Vassil Girginov, Boria Majumdar"
"Research Process in Sport, Exercise and Health","Scott Fleming, Sheldon Hanton, Rich Neil, Kylie Wilson"
Group Dynamics in Exercise and Sport Psychology,"Mark R. Beauchamp, Mark A. Eys"
The emigrant and sportsman in Canada,John J. Rowan
Sport Policy and Governance,Neil King
A hard road to glory,Arthur Ashe
Managing Sport and Leisure Facilities,Philip Sayers
Sports Media,Bradley Schultz
Sports (Ferguson's Careers in Focus),"Ferguson Publishing, J.G. Ferguson Publishing Company"
The Sport Psychologist's Handbook,Joaquin Dosil
Spectacles of death in ancient Rome,Donald G. Kyle
Sports Law,"Mark James, Simon Gardiner, M Phil"
The Sociology of Sports Coaching,"Robyn L. Jones, Paul Potrac"
Routledge Handbook of Sport and Legacy,"Holt, Richard"
Sport and physical education in Germany,"Roland Naul, Ken Hardman"
Freddy and the perilous adventure,"Walter R. Brooks, Kurt Wiese"
Science and Soccer,"A. Mark Williams, Barry Drust, Mark A. Williams, Paul Ford"
Social capital and sport governance in Europe,"Margaret M. Groeneveld, Barrie Houlihan, Fabien Ohl"
"Event management in sport, recreation and tourism","Cheryl Mallen, Lorne James Adams"
Sports psychology for dummies,Leif H. Smith
To hate like this is to be happy forever,Will Blythe
TIPS for Running Pain-Free,Erik Vranesh
Top of the World,Steve Jenkins
Sport and Society,Barrie Houlihan
Three cheers for Errol!,Babette Cole
Casketball capers,Peter Bently
Contemporary Sport Management,"Paul M. Pedersen, Lucie Thibault"
Bailey goes camping,Kevin Henkes
Applied exercise & sport physiology with labs,Terry J. Housh
The complete idiot's guide to weight training,"Deidre Johnson-Cane, Jonathon Cane, Joe Glickman, Jonathan Cane, Deidre Johnson Cane"
"Nutrition for Health, Fitness and Sport",Melvin H. Williams
Sport Marketing,"Bernard J. Mullin, Stephen Hardy, Sutton, William A."
Talent identification and development in sport,"Joseph Baker, Jörg Schorer, Steve Cobley"
You gotta have balls,Brandon Steiner
We begin our ascent,Joe Mungo Reed
Sports law,"Ray Yasser, James McCurdy, C. Peter Goplerud, Maureen Weston"
Science and Skiing,E. Muller
Sport Funding and Finance,Bob Stewart
The Class of Football,Adam Schefter
Big Nate - Game On!,Lincoln Peirce
Dare Me,Megan E. Abbott
Endure,Alex Hutchinson
Sports in America,James A. Michener
Global Sport Business,Hans Westerbeek
Total fitness in 30 minutes a week,Laurence Englemohr Morehouse
Midfielder's moment,Grant Farred
Children learn physical skills,Liselott Diem
"Million Dollar Kick, The",Dan Gutman
A bibliography of biomechanics literature,James G. Hay
Sport and Physical Education,Tim Chandler
Representing the sporting past in museums and halls of fame,Murray G. Phillips
The psychology of strength and conditioning,"David Tod, David Lavallee"
"Sports governance, development and corporate responsibility",Barbara Segaert
Lay-ups and long shots,"Joseph Bruchac, David Lubar, Terry Trueman"
Global sport marketing,Michel Desbordes
Ultimate fighting and embodiment,Dale C. Spencer
Coping and emotion in sport,Joanne Thatcher
"Attachment in sport, exercise and wellness",Sam Carr
Sport tourism destinations,James Higham
Sports Nutrition,Ronald J. Maughan
Coaching children in sport,Ian Stafford
"Nutrition and metabolism in sports, exercise and health",Jie Kang
Leistungsphysiologie,Josef Tomasits
"Body composition in sport, exercise, and health","Arthur Stewart, Laura Sutton"
Sports and Christianity,"Nick J. Watson, Andrew Parker"
"Ethics, knowledge and truth in sports research",Graham McFee
"Integrating exercise, sports, movement, and mind",Kate F. Hays
Sports law and regulation,"Matthew J. Mitten, Timothy Davis, Rodney K. Smith, Robert C. Berry"
Night games,Anna Krien
Sport histories,"Eric Dunning, Dominic Malcolm, Ivan Waddington"
Biomechanics of sport,Christopher L. Vaughan
What great coaches do differently,Rob Haworth
12 myths that could wreck your golf game,"Tom W. Wishon, Tom Grundner, Tom Wishon"
Fundamental Biomechanics of Sport and Exercise,James Watkins
The Joyville Sweat Sox,Linda Fausnet
American sports,Pamela Grundy
Complete Manual for Young Sportsmen,"Frank Forester, Nick Lyons"
Athletes' Careers Across Cultures,"Natalia B. Stambulova, Tatiana V. Ryba"
Doing Real World Research in Sports Studies,"Andy Smith, Ken Green, Ivan Waddington"
"Sport, Animals, and Society","James Gillett, Michelle Gilbert"
Mental Skills for Athletes,Elizabeth L. Shoenfelt
The illustrated sports record book,"Zander Hollander, David Schulz"
The Psychology Of Concentration In Sport Performers,Aidan P. Moran
Sports Architecture,Rod Sheard
"Ethics, Money & Sport",Adrian Walsh
Child Development Through Sports,James H. Humphrey
You're the Scaredy-Cat,Mercer Mayer
Scott and Sebright,Henry Hall Dixon
SOL Still Our Lions,"Gary Evans, Taylor Plimpton"
Careers for sports nuts & other athletic types,"William Ray Heitzmann, Wm. Ray Heitzmann"
Role conflict of teacher-coach,Charles Pierre Urbanus
The gay games,Caroline Symons
Encoding the Olympics,"Luo Qing, Giuseppe Richeri"
Routledge Companion to Sport and Exercise Psychology,"Athanasios Papaioannou, Dieter Hackfort"
Dispute Resolution in Sport,David McArdle
Complexity and Control in Team Sports,Felix Lebed
Sport Governance,"Russell Hoye, Graham Cuskelly"
Data Analysis in Sport,"Peter O'Donoghue, Lucy Holmes"
Digital Media Sport,"Brett Hutchins, David Rowe"
Performance Analysis of Sport IX,"Derek M. Peters, Peter O'Donoghue"
Psychology of Sub-Culture in Sport and Physical Activity,"Robert J. Schinke, Kerry R. McGannon"
"Routledge Handbook of Sport, Gender and Sexuality","Jennifer Hargreaves, Anderson, Eric"
Sport and Nationalism in China,"Zhouxiang Lu, Fan Hong"
Sports and Identity,"Barry Brummett, Andrew Ishak"
Fly fishing made easy,"Michael Rutter, Dave Card"
Snowmobile Snocross,Darice Bailer
Introduction to Exercise Science,"Terry J. Housh, Dona J. Housh"
Meg Mackintosh and the Mystery at the Soccer Match,Lucinda Landon
Soccer in South Asia,Paul Dimeo
Perspectives in Exercise Science and Sports Medicine,Carl V. Gisolfi
Sport and exercise psychology,Andrew M. Lane
The complete book of the Winter Olympics,"David Wallechinsky, Jaime Loucky"
Skateboarding,"Doug Badillo, Steve Badillo, Doug Werner"
The Field,Douglas Booth
Ethics of Sports Medicine,"Claudio Tamburrini, Torbjörn Tännsjö"
Sports Math,Roland B. Minton
Relationship Marketing in Sports,"Andre Buhler, Gerd Nufer"
Sport and Film,Seán Crosson
"Sport, leisure and culture in the postmodern city","Peter Bramham, Stephen Wagg"
Pain and injury in sport,"Sigmund Loland, Ivan Waddington"
Ethics and sport,"M. J. McNamee, S. J. Parry"
Sport ethics,"Angela Lumpkin, Sharon Kay Stoll, Jennifer Marie Beller"
Administration of physical education and sport programs,Larry Horine
Volunteers in sport,Geoff Nichols
Sport,Frank Kew
Foundations of athletic training,"Marcia K. Anderson, Susan J. Hall, Malissa Martin"
Sociological realism,Andrea Maccarini
Professional practice in sport psychology,"Sheldon Hanton, Stephen D. Mellalieu"
"Sport, dance, and embodied identities","Noel Dyck, Eduardo P. Archetti"
Sport and Postcolonialism,"Mike Cronin, John Bale"
Routledge Handbook of Sport and Corporate Social Responsibility,Geoff Walters
Ultimate Sports,Donald R. Gallo
Cutting It Close,Riley Scammahorn
The road headed west,Leon McCarron
"Body, mind, and sport",John Douillard
Archery,"Kathleen Haywood, Kathleen M., Ph.D. Haywood, Catherine F. Lewis"
Foundational Description of the Art of Fencing,"Joachim Meyer, Rebecca Garber, Michael Chidester, Chris VanSlambrouck"
Sport and Exercise Psychology,"Ellis Cashmore, Ernest Cashmore"
Sports economics,Rodney D. Fort
The sports event management and marketing playbook,"Frank Supovitz, Joe Goldblatt"
Mega-events and modernity,Maurice Roche
Football for dummies,"Howie Long, John Czarnecki"
Foundations of sport and exercise psychology,Robert S. Weinberg
Farewell to sport,Paul Gallico
Management for athletic/sport administration,"Francis J. Bridges, Francis Bridges, Libby L. Roquemore"
Sports media,Andrew C. Billings
Teaching and learning team sports and games,"Jean-Francis Gréhaigne, Jean-Francis Grehaigne, Jean-Francois Richard, Linda L. Griffin"
Participation in sport,Matthew Nicholson
Research Methods For Sport Management,James Skinner
Mental toughness in sport,"Daniel Gucciardi, Sandy Gordon"
Sociology of North American sport,D. Stanley Eitzen
Mountaineering in Scotland,"W. H. Murray, W.H. Murray"
The Fade-Away,George Jansen
The Match,Bruce Schoenfeld
Front runner,Felix Francis
Home Team Advantage,"Brooke De Lench, Brooke C. De Lench"
Amelia Bedelia Shapes Up!,"Herman Parish, Lynne Avril"
Sport And Exercise Nutrition,Susan A. Lanham-New
Cycle of lies,Juliet Macur
Routledge Handbook Of Sport Policy,Ling-Mei Ko
Parenting in Youth Sport,"Nicholas L. Holt, Camilla J. Knight"
"Sporting body, sporting mind","John Syer, Christopher Connolly, Syer"
Karate,"Hidetaka Nishiyama, Richard C Brown, Richard C. Brown"
A political history of the Olympic Games,David B. Kanin
Atlas,"Teddy Atlas, Peter Alson"
Hockey the NHL Way,"Sean Rossiter, Paul Carson"
Anatomi och rörelselära inom idrotten,Rolf Wirhed
The jocks,Leonard Shecter
Rebound,Eric Walters
A wider social role for sport,Fred Coalter
Human Muscle Fatigue,Craig Williams
"Race, sport, and the American dream",Earl Smith
Sport and British politics since 1960,John F. Coghlan
American game mammals and birds,"Phillips, John C."
Sleep out,Carol Carrick
A manual for tumbling and apparatus stunts,"Otto E. Ryser, James Rollar Brown"
The story of sport in England,Neil Wigglesworth
Young people's involvement in sport,"Shaun Ogle, John Kremer, Karen Trew"
Soccer vs. the State,Gabriel Kuhn
Fly Away,Nora Rock
Human resource management in the sport and leisure industry,Chris Wolsey
Sports fundraising,David J. Kelley
Single case research methods in sport and exercise psychology,Jamie Barker
Cycling science,Max Glaskin
Managing high performance sport,"Popi Sotiriadou, Veerle de Bosscher"
Managing sport,"David Hassan, Jim Lusted"
Sports marketing,Michael J. Fetchko
"Who Sir? Me, Sir? (Handi-read)",K. M. Peyton
Encyclopedia of international sports studies,"Roger Bartlett, Chris Gratton, Christer Rolf"
Nutritional ergogenic aids,"Ira Wolinsky, Judy A. Driskell"
Sport fans,Daniel L. Wann
Sports in world history,David G. McComb
With God on their side,"Tara Magdalinski, Timothy John Lindsay Chandler"
Sports! sports! sports!,"Lee Bennett Hopkins, Brian Floca"
The wild sports of India,Henry Shakespear
Racquetball,"Philip E. Allsen, Pete Witbeck"
The science and engineering of sport surfaces,"Sharon Dixon, P. Fleming, Iain James"
The world's zaniest sports,Tim O'Shei
New Dynamics of Winning,Denis Waitley
Guangxi tong zhi,Guangxi Zhuangzu Zizhiqu di fang zhi bian zuan wei yuan hui
Sport Branding Insights,"Constantino Stavros, Aaron C. T. Smith"
Sport and Mediatization,Kirsten Frandsen
Football in Fiction,Lee McGowan
Routledge Handbook of Elite Sport Performance,"Dave Collins, Andrew Cruickshank, Geir Jordet"
Sport and Violence,"Dominique Bodin, Luc Robène"
Sport Participation and Olympic Legacies,Spencer Harris
"Sport, Recovery, and Performance","Michael Kellmann, Jürgen Beckmann"
Football Psychology,"Erkut Konter, Jürgen Beckmann, Todd Loughead"
Feminist Applied Sport Psychology,Leeja Carter
Hosting the Olympic Games,"Marie Delaplace, Pierre-Olaf Schut"
Stress Well-Being and Performance in Sport,"Rachel Arnold, David Fletcher"
Sport Globalisation and Identity,"Jim O'Brien, Russell Holden, Xavier Ginesta"
Populism in Sport Leisure and Popular Culture,"Alan Tomlinson, Bryan C. Clift"
Football Fandom and Consumption,Oliver Brooks
Philosophy of Football,Steffen Borge
Sociology of Football in a Global Context,Jamie Cleland
"Safeguarding, Child Protection and Abuse in Sport","Melanie Lang, Mike Hartill"
Digital Sport Marketing,"Alan Seymour, Paul Blakey"
Exercising Female,"Jacky Forsyth, Claire-Marie Roberts"
Putin's Olympics,"Robert W. Orttung, Sufian N. Zhemukhov"
Routledge Handbook of Sport for Development and Peace,"Holly Collison, Simon C. Darnell, Richard Giulianotti, P. David Howe"
Football Club Management,Ian Lawrence
Sports Technology and Engineering,Qi Luo
"Science of Football with Max Axiom, Super Scientist","Nikole Brooks Bethea, Caio Cacau, Space Goat Space Goat Productions"
"Science of Hockey with Max Axiom, Super Scientist","Blake A. Hoena, Caio Cacau, Space Goat Space Goat Productions"
Performance and Professional Wrestling,"Broderick Chow, Eero J. Laine, Claire Warden"
Managing Sport Development,"Emma Sherry, Nico Schulenkorf, Pamm Phillips"
How Football Began,Tony Collins
Sport Business in the United States,"Brenda G. Pitts, James J. Zhang"
Sport in Socialist Yugoslavia,"Dario Brentin, Dejan Zec"
Routledge Handbook of Athlete Welfare,Melanie Lang
Online Research Methods in Sport Studies,"Jamie Cleland, Kevin Dixon, Daniel Kilvington"
Sport and Identity in Ancient Greece,Zinon Papakonstantinou
"Sport, Physical Education, and Social Justice","Nick J. Watson, Grant Jarvie, Andrew Parker"
Feelings in Sport,"Montse C. Ruiz, Claudio Robazza"
"Referees, Match Officials and Abuse","Tom Webb, Mike Rayner, Jamie Cleland, Jimmy O'Gorman"
Sports and games,Harold Keith
Psychoanalytic Perspectives on Intense Involvement in Sports,"Philip Blumberg, Irwin Hirsch, Robert Watson"
Sport Migration and Gender in the Neoliberal Age,"Niko Besnier, Domenica Gisella Calabrò, Daniel Guiness"
Improving Your NCAA® Bracket with Statistics,Tom Adams
"Sport, Statehood and Transition in Europe","Ekain Rojo-Labaien, Joel Rookwood, Álvaro Rodríguez Díaz"
Psychology of Sports Injury,"Adam Gledhill, Dale Forsdyke"
Convergent Wrestling,"CarrieLynn D. Reinhard, Christopher J. Olson"
Handbook of Statistical Methods and Analyses in Sports,"Jim Albert, Mark E. Glickman, Tim B. Swartz, Ruud H. Koning"
Gender Verification and the Making of the Female Body in Sport,Sonja Erikainen
"Sport, Psychology and Christianity","Brian Hemmings, Nick J. Watson, Andrew Parker"
Sociocultural Examinations of Sports Concussions,"Matt Ventresca, Mary G. McDonald"
Visualizing Baseball,Jim Albert
Foundations of Sport Development,Chris Mackintosh
"Sport, Race and Ethnicity","Katie Liston, Paddy Dolan"
"Boxing, Masculinity and Identity",Kath Woodward
"Festivals, games, and amusements",Horace Smith
Managing performance stress,David Pargman
Sport psychology,"Cox, Richard H."
Sneak Peek @ Sneakers,Kerrily Sapet
The Lake counties,W. G. Collingwood
The arousal-performance relationship,Vicki Ebbeck
[Key links literacy,Jill Eggleton
Baseball Field Guide,"Dan Formosa, Paul Hamburger"
Routledge Handbook of Global Sport,"John Nauright, Sarah Zipp"
Sport for Development,Fred Coalter
Politics of Sport,"Paul Gilchrist, Russell Holden"
Organisational Performance Management in Sport,Ian O'Boyle
Politics of the Male Body in Global Sport,Hans Bonde
"Gender, Media, Sport","Susanna Hedenborg, Gertrud Pfister"
Strength Training for Soccer,Bram Swinnen
Learning in Sports Coaching,"Lee Nelson, Ryan Groom, Paul Potrac"
Sports Media History,John Carvalho
Quitters Never Win,"Michael Bisping, Anthony Evans"
Collective Bargaining in Professional Sports,Scott Bukstein
Growth Following Adversity in Sport,"Ross Wadey, Melissa Day, Karen Howells"
Routledge Handbook of Sport Governance,"David Shilbury, Lesley Ferkins"
Developing and Sustaining Sport Psychology Programs,Charles A. Maher
Developing Sport for Women and Girls,"Emma Sherry, Katie Rowe"
World Cup,Tyler Dean Omoth
Super Bowl,Tyler Dean Omoth
Association Football,"Graham Curry, Eric Dunning"
Mental Health and Well-being Interventions in Sport,"Gerard Leavey, Gavin Breslin"
Self-Talk in Sport,"Alexander T. Latinjak, Antonis Hatzigeorgiadis"
"Sport, War and the British",Peter Donaldson
"Sport, Welfare and Social Policy in the European Union","Stefano Martelli, Alberto Testa, Nicola R. Porro"
Applied Sport Exercise and Performance Psychology,"David Tod, Martin Eubank"
Advances in Rugby Coaching,Richard Light
The Sports Playbook,"Joshua A. Gordon, Gary T. Furlong, Ken Pendleton"
The Making of Sporting Cultures,John Hughson
Sporting Performances,Shannon L. Walsh
Reflections on Process Sociology and Sport,Joseph Maguire
Sports Marketing and the Psychology of Marketing Communication,"Chris Riley, Lynn R. Kahle"
"Routledge Handbook of Sport, Race and Ethnicity","John Nauright, David K. Wiggins"
Statistical Modelling and Sports Business Analytics,"Vanessa Ratten, Ted Hayduk"
Sport and the Home Front,Matthew Taylor
Routledge History of American Sport,"Linda J. Borish, David K. Wiggins, Gerald R. Gems"
Mega Events and Globalization,"Richard Gruneau, John Horne"
Ethnographies in Sport and Exercise Research,"Gyozo Molnar, Laura Purdy"
Foundations of Managing Sporting Events,"Kevin D. Tennent, Alex Gillett"
Sport in the City,"Michael P. Sam, John Hughson"
Fantasy Sport Industry,"Andrew C. Billings, Brody J. Ruihley"
Really Useful Physical Education Book,"Gary Stidder, Sid Hayes"
Sports Chaplaincy,"Andrew Parker, Nick Watson, John B. White"
Leadership in Sports Coaching,"Paul Cummins, Ian O'Boyle, Tony Cassidy"
Leadership in Sport,"Ian O'Boyle, Duncan Murray, Paul Cummins"
Socio-Cultural Mobility and Mega-Events,Rodanthi Tzanelli
Deleuze and the Physically Active Body,Pirkko Markula
Routledge Handbook of Sport and Politics,"John Kelly undifferentiated, Jung Woo Lee, Alan Bairner"
Ethics and Governance in Sport,"Yves Vanden Auweele, Elaine Cook, Jim Parry"
Studying Football,"Ellis Cashmore, Kevin Dixon"
"Forty Years of Sport and Social Change, 1968-2008","Russell Field, Bruce Kidd"
Advances in Coach Education and Development,"Wayne Allison, Andrew Abraham, Andy Cale"
Psychology of Sports Coaching,"Richard Thelwell, Chris Harwood, Iain Greenlees"
Introduction to Performance Analysis of Sport,Peter O'Donoghue
Sport,Colin McGinn
Defining Sport Communication,Andrew C. Billings
"Sport - Race, Ethnicity and Identity",Daryl Adair
"Psychology of Perfectionism in Sport, Dance and Exercise",Andrew Hill
"Talent Development, Existential Philosophy and Sport",Kenneth Aggerholm
Sport Past and Present in South Africa,"Scarlett Cornelissen, Albert Grundlingh"
Critical Introduction to Sport Psychology,"Aidan P. Moran, John Toner"
Health and Elite Sport,"Joe Baker, Parissa Safai, Jessica Fraser-Thomas"
Cool Sports Facts,"Kathryn Clay, Abby Czeskleba, Sandy Bridget Donovan, Angie Peterson Kaelberer"
Asia and the Future of Football,Ben Weinberg
Sport and the Pandemic,"Paul M. Pedersen, Brody J. Ruihley, Bo Li"
Crisis and Disaster Management for Sport,"Richard Shipway, Lee Miles, Richard Gordon"
Performing under Pressure,Josephine Perry
Into Touch,Nigel McCrery
Sport Business Analytics,"C. Keith Harrison, Scott Bukstein"
Neymar,Luca Caioli
Sport Volunteering,"Russell Hoye, Graham Cuskelly, Chris Auld, Pam Kappelides, Katie Misener"
Biochemistry for Sport and Exercise Metabolism,"Donald MacLaren, James Morton"
Exciting Entertainment Inventions,Ryan Jacobson
Emotion in Sports,Yunus Tuncel
Global Perspectives on Sport and Physical Cultures,"Annette R. Hofmann, Gerald R. Gems, Maureen Smith"
Understanding Sport Management,"Trish Bradbury, Ian O'Boyle"
How to Become a Sport and Exercise Psychologist,"Martin Eubank, David Tod"
Organizational Psychology of Sport,Christopher R. D. Wagstaff
Philosophy and Nature Sports,Kevin Krein
Routledge International Handbook of Walking,"C. Michael Hall, Yael Ram, Noam Shoval"
Science of Figure Skating,"Jason D. Vescovi, Jaci L. VanHeest"
More Than Cricket and Football,"Joel Nathan Rosen, Maureen M. Smith, Roberta J. Park, Jack Lule"
Play,Colleen Corcoran
Babe Ruth Sports,Retro Comic Reprints
Eating disorders in sport,Ron A. Thompson
"A Season of Loss, a Lifetime of Forgiveness",John Manasso
Sports publicity,Joseph Favorito
The 1940 Tokyo Games: The Missing Olympics,Sandra Collins
Examining Physical Education,Kirk Bizley
On the move,"Jennifer Fenton, Bryna Kopelow, Claudia Viviani"
CRC Desk Reference on Sports Nutrition,Mark Kern
Welcome to the Terrordome,Dave Zirin
Nutrition for fitness and sport,"Melvin H. Williams, Williams"
The race game,Douglas Booth
The Sports Gene,David Epstein
Mathletics,Wayne L. Winston
Fit or Fat,Covert Bailey
Lesson plans for classroom teachers,Robert P. Pangrazi
Sport,"Norman S. Barrett, David Salariya"
Fatigue in Sport and Exercise,Shaun Phillips
Contesting 'Race' and Sport,Kevin Hylton
Sport Cyberpsychology,Olivia A. Hurley
Rethinking gender and youth sport,Ian Wellard
Paterno legacy,Jay Paterno
Brazil's Dance with the devil,Dave Zirin
Slot Machine,"Chris Lynch, Chris Lynch"
The Babe,"Ritter, Lawrence S., Hank Aaron"
The World of Physical Culture in Sport and Exercise,Brett Smith
Sport Management Cultures,Vassil Girginov
Sports Coaching,Laura Purdy
Sierra South,"Thomas Winnett, Jason Winnett, Kathy Morey, Lyn Haber"
"Sports, games, and play",Jeffrey H. Goldstein
Jabari jumps,Gaia Cornwall
Sports Biomechanics,Roger Bartlett
Principles and practice of sport management,"Carol A. Barr, Mary A. Hums"
Fair Play,"Robert L. Simon, Cesar R. Torres, Peter F. Hager"
Berlin 1936,Oliver Hilmes
Walking in the Bavarian Alps,"Grant Bourne, Sabine Kroner Bourne"
Sport and Body Politics in Japan,Wolfram Manzenreiter
"Social Theory, Sport, Leisure",Ken Roberts
Game sense,Richard Light
Three on three,Eric Walters
Selective trout,"Doug Swisher, Carl Richards"
"Nutrition for Sport, Exercise, and Health","Marie Spano, Laura Kruskall, D. Travis Thomas"
Young people's voices in physical education and youth sport,"Mary O'Sullivan, Ann MacPhail, Bailey, Richard"
101 Youth Netball Drills Age 1216,Anna Sheryn
100 Things Michigan State Fans Should Know & Do Before They Die,Michael Emmerich
Organizational Behaviour in Sport,James Skinner
LeBron James,Adrian Almonte
Soccer/Football Performance Center : Self Teaching Method,Alex Von Ludwig
Why I Stand,"Jonathan Isaac, Paulo Lara"
Krav maga for beginners,"Darren Levine, John Whitman"
Road swing,Steve Rushin
Coaching kids to play soccer,"Jim San Marco, Kurt Aschermann, Tony DiCicco"
This Day in Philadelphia Sports,"Kevin Reavy, Brian Startare, Charlie Manuel"
Statistics for sport and exercise studies,Peter O'Donoghue
You Wouldn't Want to Be a Greek Athlete,Michael Ford
Sport psychology,Mark H. Anshel
Localizing global sport for development,Iain Lindsey
Sports Illustrated Kids Stars of Sports,"Matt Chandler, Cheryl Kim, Lisa A. Crayton"
Sport and the law,Edward Grayson
Ocean Cruising on a Budget,"Anne Hammick, Philip Ouvry"
Facing the Giants,Eric Wilson
The ultimate book of the horse and rider,Judith Draper
Wayne Gretzky,Matt Doeden
Playing Through,Curtis Gillespie
Agrarian revolution and economic progress,Rainer Schickele
Sports marketing,Sam Fullerton
Nazi games,David Clay Large
Weight training,"Thomas R. Baechle, Roger W. Earle"
Team psychology in sports,Stewart Cotterill
Sport and Spectacle in the Ancient World,Donald G. Kyle
In Pursuit of Excellence,Terry Orlick
Icebreaker,Hannah Grace
Games and Sporting Events in History,"Annette R. Hofmann, Gerald R. Gems, Maureen Smith"
Boys of Everest,Clint Willis
Sport first aid,Melinda J. Flegel
Sport and Environmental Sustainability,"Greg Dingle, Cheryl Mallen"
Sports on the Couch,Ricardo A. Rubinstein
Foundations of Sport & Exercise Psychology,"Daniel Gould, Robert S. Weinberg"
The world sport psychology sourcebook,John H. Salmela
Strategic Sport Development,"Rosemary Leach, Stephen Robson, Kirstie Simpson, Lee Tucker"
Clemson,"Sam Blackman, Bob Bradley, Chuck Kriese"
"Horses, Hitches and Rocky Trails",Joe Back
Sport stars,"David Lawrence Andrews, Steven J. Jackson"
History of Sports Coaching in Britain,"Dave Day, Tegan Carpenter"
"Sexualities, Spaces and Leisure Studies","Jayne Caudwell, Kath Browne"
Wallace & Gromit,Ian Rimmer
Social media in sport marketing,Timothy Newman
Luka Doncic,Adrian Almonte
Benoit,"Greg Oliver, Heath McCoy, Steven Johnson, Heath McCoy, Irv Muchnick"
Sport Brands,"Patrick Bouchet, Dieter Hillairet, Guillaume Bodet"
Advances in applied sport psychology,"Stephen D. Mellalieu, Sheldon Hanton"
The big fix,Brett Forrest
Summer Ball,Mike Lupica
Olympic Education,"Roland Naul, Deanna Binder, Ian Culpan, Antonin Rychtecky"
Data Analytics in Football,"Daniel Memmert, Dominik Raabe"
Rising above,Gregory Zuckerman
G.O.A.T. - Serena Williams,Tami Charles
"Sport, technology and the body",Tara Magdalinski
Sports in American history,Gerald R. Gems
What were they thinking?,Kyle Garlett
Wild sports of the West of Ireland,W. H. (William Hamilton) Maxwell
The dancer prepares,"James Penrod, James W Penrod, Janice Gudde Plastino"
The Nazi Olympics,Richard D. Mandell
Sports and the law,"Paul C. Weiler, Gary R. Roberts"
Treatment of injuries to athletes,Don H. O'Donoghue
Skateboarding in the X Games,Christopher Blomquist
How to rock climb!,John Long
The games presidents play,John Sayle Watterson
The junior illustrated encyclopedia of sports,Willard Mullin
Psychology and the superior athlete,Miroslav Vanek
Efficiency of human movement,Marion Ruth Broer
Peyton Manning,Matt Doeden
Extreme Sports,Joe Tomlinson
"Whose game is it, anyway?",Richard D. Ginsburg
Foul play,"Rick Walton, Ann Walton"
"Sport and the English, 1918-1939",Mike Huggins
The History of the British Lions,"Clem Thomas, Greg Thomas"
Laggan Lard Butts,Eric Walters
Legends,"Diane C. Simmons, Jim Goodhue, Frank Holmes, Phil Livingston, Diane Simmons, Diana Ciarloni, Guenther, Kim., Larry Thorton"
Past imperative,Dave Duncan
Center field shot,"Walker, James R., James R. Walker, Robert V. Bellamy"
Fields in vision,Garry Whannel
Science for Exercise and Sport,Craig Williams
The biomechanics of sports techniques,James G. Hay
The sports answer book,Bill Mazer
Golf by design,"Robert Trent Jones, Tom Watson"
Flashing steel,"Masayuki Shimabukuro, Leonard Pellman, Shihan Shimabukuro"
Coming on strong,Susan K. Cahn
How to be an ancient Greek athlete,Jacqueline Morley
The mental game of baseball,"H. A. Dorfman, Karl Kuehl"
Mindset for Winning,John D. Curtis
Nutritional assessment of athletes,"Judy A. Driskell, Ira Wolinsky"
Everest,"Roberto Mantovani, Kurt Diemberger"
A Companion To Sport And Spectacle In Greek And Roman Antiquity,Donald G. Kyle
Managing Public Sport and Leisure Services,Leigh Robinson
The masters athlete,"Joseph J. Baker, Joe Baker, Sean Horton"
Take a seat,Dominic Gill
"Judgment, decision-making and success in sport",Michael Bar-Eli
Sport across Asia,"Katrin Bromber, Birgit Krawietz, Joseph Maguire"
Sport and its female fans,"Kim Toffoletti, Peter Mewett"
Key concepts in sports studies,"Stephen Wagg, Belinda Wheaton, Helen Pussard, Andrew Thornton, Paul Norcross"
The sub,"P. J. Petersen, Meredith Johnson"
Sport and the military,Tony Mason
Strength and conditioning for team sports,Paul Gamble
The Psychology Of Sport Injury And Rehabilitation,Monna Arvinen-Barrow
Sports page,Stanley Woodward
Introduction to exercise science,"Terry J. Housh, Dona J. Housh, Glen Johnson"
Chinatown Jeet Kune Do,"Tim Tackett, Bob Bremer"
"Sport, sexualities and queer/theory",Jayne Caudwell
Mindgames,Roland Lazenby
Routledge handbook of qualitative research in sport and exercise,"Brett Smith, Andrew Sparkes"
Coaches and Fitness Professionals (Ferguson's Careers in Focus),"Facts on File, Inc., Ferguson Publishing"
"Sport, difference and belonging",James Rosbrook-Thompson
Bart Starr,David Claerbaut
Developing and Supporting Athlete Wellbeing,"Natalie Campbell, Abbe Brady, Alison Tincknell-Smith"
Behavioural Sports Economics,"Hannah Josepha Rachel Altman, Morris Altman, Benno Torgler"
Plug Ugly Ball,John Everett
"Sport, Literature, Society","Alexis Tadié, J. A. Mangan, Supriya Chaudhuri"
Restoring Trust in Sport,Catherine Ordway
Families Sport Leisure and Social Justice,"Dawn E. Trussell, Ruth Jeanes"
Motivation and Self-Regulation in Sport and Exercise,"Chris Englert, Ian Taylor"
Women and Sport in Asia,"Maryam Koushkie Jahromi, Maria Luisa M. Guinto, Rosa López de D'Amico"
Sports Coaching in Europe,Dave Day
Sports Agents and Labour Markets,"Giambattista Rossi, Anna Semens, Jean Francois Brochard"
Teaching Tactical Creativity in Sport,Daniel Memmert
Endurance Running,"William Bridel, Jim Denison, Pirkko Markula"
Sports Videogames,"Mia Consalvo, Konstantin Mitgutsch, Abe Stein"
Routledge Handbook of Football Marketing,"Nicolas Chanavat, Michel Desbordes, Nicolas Lorgnier"
"Community Based Research in Sport, Exercise and Health Science","Robert J. Schinke, Kerry McGannon, Brett Smith"
Human Factors and Ergonomics in Sport,"Paul M. Salmon, Adam Hulme, Scott McLean, Clare Dallat, Neil Mansfield"
Routledge Handbook of the Sociology of Sport,Richard Giulianotti
Sport in Films,"Emma Poulton, Martin Roderick"
China's Quest for Sporting Mega-Events,Marcus P. Chu
Intangibles,Joan Ryan
Recovery and Well-Being in Sport and Exercise,"Michael Kellmann, Jürgen Beckmann"
Sport and Brexit,Jacob Kornbeck
International Sport Business Management,"James J. Zhang, Brenda G. Pitts"
Creative Nonfiction in Sport and Exercise Research,Francesca Cavallerio
Psychology of Sport and Performance Injury,"Monna Arvinen-Barrow, Damien Clement"
Sport in Aotearoa/New Zealand,"Damion Sturm, Roslyn Kerr"
Power and Politics in World Athletics,Jörg Krieger
Urban Marathons,Jonas Larsen
Athletic Development,"Caroline Heaney, Nichola Kentzer, Ben Oakley"
Amateurism in Sport,Lincoln Allison
Community Sport Coaching,"Ben Ives, Paul Potrac, Laura Gale, Lee Nelson"
Strategic Sport Communication,"W. Timothy Coombs, Jennifer L. Harker"
Ethics of Sports Fandom,Adam Kadlac
Mental Impact of Sports Injury,Carly D. McKay
Sports Rehabilitation Therapists' Guidebook,"Konstantinos Papadopoulos, Mark Richardson"
Examining Sports Development,Mike Collins
Good Governance in Sport,"Arnout Geeraert, Frank van Eekeren"
Sport and Development in Emerging Nations,"Tinaz, Brendon Knott"
"Christianity, Race, and Sport",Jeffrey Scholes
Sport Governance and Operations,"James J. Zhang, Ui-Suk Kim"
Home Advantage in Sport,"Miguel A. Gomez, Richard POLLARD, Carlos Lago-Peñas"
Lifestyle Sports and Identities,"Tyler Dupont, Becky Beal"
Embedded Multi-Level Leadership in Elite Sport,"Svein S. Andersen, Per Øystein Hansen, Barrie Houlihan"
Routledge Handbook of Sport History,"Murray G. Phillips, Douglas Booth, Carly Adams"
Community Sport and Social Inclusion,"Marc Theeboom, Hebe Schaillée, Rudi Roose, Sara Willems, Lieve Bradt"
Social Capital and Sport Organisations,Richard Tacon
Sports Economics for Non-Economists,Wray Vamplew
The ethics and practice of applied sport psychology,Robert M. Nideffer
Sport Psychology,"Ellis Cashmore, Ernest Cashmore"
Sport examined,"Paul Beashel, John Taylor"
Reuters,Reuters
The magic of Lewis Carroll,"Fisher, John"
Science and sport,Vaughan Thomas
English sports and recreations,Lilly C. Stone
A long-term study of the influence of Rugby Sports Centre on the sporting life of the town,Barbara Knapp
Passion and Addiction in Sports and Exercise,"Attila Szabo, Zsolt Demetrovics"
Sport Marketing in a Global Environment,"Ruth M. Crabtree, James J. Zhang"
Gender Diversity and Sport,"Gemma Witcomb, Elizabeth Peel"
Sport Broadcasting for Managers,"Hunter Fujak, Stephen Frawley"
Psychology of Closed Self-Paced Motor Tasks in Sports,"Ronnie Lidor, Gal Ziv"
Training the Body,"David Torevell, Clive Palmer, Paul Rowan"
The Book of Baseball Records,Seymour Siwoff
Routledge Handbook of Sport in the Middle East,"Danyel Reiche, Paul Brannagan"
Greatest Sports Moments,"Nel Yomtov, Matt Doeden, Blake A. Hoena, Brandon Terrell"
Last Hurrah,"jeffery Coffey, Steve Wray"
A sociological perspective of sport,Wilbert Marcellus Leonard
And Nobody Got Hurt 2!,Len Berman
East Plays West,"Stephen Wagg, David Andrews"
Applied biomedical engineering mechanics,Dhanjoo N. Ghista
"Sport Management, Innovation and the COVID-19 Crisis","Meltem Ince Yenilmez, Gözde Ersöz"
Sport and Physical Activity in Catastrophic Environments,"Jack Black, Jim Cherrington"
Sport and Protest in the Black Atlantic,"Michael J. Gennaro, Brian M. McGowan"
Sport and Crime,Peter Millward
First Sports Source,Tyler Omoth
Shot-Maker's Code,Paul Byrne
The life of a sportsman,Nimrod
To the Edge,"Johnson, Kirk"
Rural sports,William B. Daniel
Is sport art?,Steven Paul Guthrie
Code of the samurai,"Daidōji, Yūzan, Thomas Cleary"
Six-guns by Keith,Elmer Keith
Beyond the Boys of Summer,Roger Kahn
"Pencil, paper and stars","Alastair Buchan, Alastair Buchan"
Leveraging Brands in Sport Business,"Mark P. Pritchard, Jeffrey L. Stinson"
Sport,Richard Giulianotti
Sport Governance,"Ian O'Boyle, Trish Bradbury"
Stalin Versus Marx,Klaus Mehnert
Extreme Downhill Ski Racing,Virginia Loh-Hagan
Britain's Olympic Women,Jean Williams
Routledge Handbook of Sport in Asia,"Fan Hong, Lu Zhouxiang"
Sport Development,Kevin Hylton
The Science of Motorsport,David P. Ferguson
The Game Changer,Alistair Gray
Routledge International Handbook of Sport Psychology,"Kerry R. McGannon, Brett Smith"
The Game of Our Lives,Peter Gzowski
Routledge Handbook of Sports Marketing,Simon Chadwick
Sports Science Research and Technology Support,"Jan Cabri, Pedro Pezarat Correia, João Barreiros"
"Sport, Bodily Culture and Classical Antiquity in Modern Greece","Eleni Fournaraki, Zinon Papakonstantinou"
Enduring Color Line in U. S. Athletics,"Krystal Beamon, Chris M. Messer"
Sport and National Identities,"Paddy Dolan, John Connolly"
Bodily Democracy,"Henning Eichberg, Mike J. McNamee"
"Heritage, Sport and Tourism","Sean Gammon, Gregory Ramshaw"
Issp Manual of Sports Psychiatry,Ira D. Glick
Routledge Handbook of the Philosophy of Sport,"Mike McNamee, William J. Morgan"
Outdoor Adventure and Social Theory,"Elizabeth C. J. Pike, Simon Beames"
"Sport, Leisure and Social Relations (RLE Sports Studies)","John Horne, David Jary, Alan Tomlinson"
Joe Louis,Marcy S. Sacks
Religion and Sports in American Culture,"Jeffrey Scholes, Raphael Sassower"
Sport and South Asian Diasporas,"Stanley Thangaraj, Daniel Burdsey, Rajinder Dudrah"
Impact and Evaluation of Major Sporting Events,Holger Preuss
"Sport, Coaching and Intellectual Disability","Sandra Dowling, Roy McConkey, David Hassan"
Researching Embodied Sport,Ian Wellard
Routledge Handbook of Sport Expertise,"Joe Baker, Damian Farrow"
Philosophy and the Martial Arts,"Graham Priest, Damon Young"
Biomechanical Evaluation of Movement in Sport and Exercise,"Carl Payton, Roger Bartlett, Adrian Burden, Carl J. Payton"
Women and Sport in Latin America,"Rosa Lopez De D'Amico, Tansin Benn, Gertrud Pfister"
Making Sport History,Pascal Delheye
Touch in Sports Coaching and Physical Education,Heather Piper
'Critical Support' for Sport,Bruce Kidd
Beyond Sport for Development and Peace,Tess Kay
Extreme Cliff Diving,Virginia Loh-Hagan
Sports and Fitness,Virginia Loh-Hagan
What Kind of Sports Pro Are You?,Brooke Rowe
Starting a Sport,Harold Rober
Extreme MotoGP,Virginia Loh-Hagan
Sports law in Japan,Takuya Yamazaki
Contemporary Research in Sports Economics,"Oliver Budzinski, Arne Feddersen"
Sports Engineering and Computer Science,Qi Luo
Methodology in Sports History,"Wray Vamplew, Dave Day"
Golf Tourism,"Simon Hudson, Louise Hudson"
Ryan Bow Mixed Martial Arts,Ryan Bow
Financing sport,"Dennis Ramsay Howard, Dennis R., Ph.D. Howard, John L. Crompton"
Emergency navigation,"Burch, David, David Burch"
Forever champions,Richard Brignall
Your Performing Edge,JoAnn Dahlkoetter
The game before the game,"Lynn Marriott, Pia Nilsson, Ron Sirak"
"Food, Nutrition and Sports Performance II",R. J. Maughan
Arete,Stephen G. Miller
Reading Rainbow Readers,Chronicle Books
The Goal and the Glory,Josh Davis
Sport Tourism,Heather J. Gibson
All Sorts of Sports,Susan Hogenkamp
Motivation in coaching a team sport,Chris Voelz
Athletics of the ancient world,E. Norman Gardiner
"Sport, masculinities and the body",Ian Wellard
Athletics of the ancient world,Edward Norman Gardiner
Clinical sports medicine,"Brukner, Peter D.R.C.O.G., Peter Brukner, Karim Khan"
"Sport, Identity and Inclusion in Europe",Ilse Hartmann-Tews
Sport in Museums,"Moore, Kevin, John Hughson, Christian Wacker"
Wrestleville,"Vinny Berry, Jon-Paul LeBlanc"
Interactive Sports Technologies,"Veronika Tzankova, Michael Filimowicz"
"The stronger women get, the more men love football",Mariah Burton Nelson
Fly fishing strategy,"Doug Swisher, Carl Richards"
Physical education and sport in a changing society,William Hardin Freeman
"Social Innovation, Entrepreneurship, and Sport for Development and Peace","Mitchell McSweeney, Per G. Svensson, Lyndsay Hayhurst, Parissa Safai"
Religion and Sport in North America,"Jeffrey Scholes, Randall Balmer"
"Digital Wellness, Health and Fitness Influencers",Stefan Lawrence
Digital Business Models in Sport,"Mateusz Tomanek, Wojciech Cieslinski, Micha Polasik"
Learner-Oriented Teaching and Assessment in Youth Sport,"Cláudio Farias, Isabel Mesquita"
"Fostering the Mental Health of Athletes, Coaches, and Staff",Charles A. Maher
Football and Risk,Jan Andre Lee Ludvigsen
Game-Based Pedagogy in Physical Education and Sports,"Jeroen Koekoek, Ivo Dokman, Wytse Walinga"
Return of the Grasshopper,"Bernard Suits, Christopher C. Yorke, Francisco Javier López ías"
Indigenous Sport and Nation Building,Eivind Å. Skille
Routledge Handbook of Gender Politics in Sport and Physical Activity,"Győző Molnár, Rachael Bullingham"
International Sport Business,"Hans Westerbeek, Adam Karg"
Fighting Identity,Amit Singh
Building Consulting Skills for Sport and Performance Psychology,"Sarah L. Castillo, Chelsea Butters Wooding, Douglas A. Barba, Stiliani ""Ani"" Chroni"
Bouldering Colorado,Bob Horan
Sport in the Iberian Peninsula,"Jerónimo García-Fernández, Moisés Grimaldi-Puyana, Gonzalo A. Bravo"
Routledge Handbook of Sport and Covid-19,"Stephen Frawley, Nico Schulenkorf"
Hockey's Wickedest Goals!,Matt Doeden
Sport and the law,Deborah Healey
Can't Knock the Hustle,Matt Sullivan
Quarter Horse Kids,Jill Thomas
Make money with your captain's license,"David G. Brown, David G. Brown"
International Encyclopedia of Women and Sports,Karen Christensen
Eating for endurance,Ellen Coleman
Tax information for sponsors of contests and sporting events,United States. Internal Revenue Service.
Hoops!,"Angus G. Garber, Greg Garber"
Complex Cases in Sport Psychology,John E. Coumbe-Lilley
The Revolt of the Black Athlete,Harry Edwards
Sports Analytics,"Ambikesh Jayal, Allistair McRobert, Giles Oatley, Peter O'Donoghue"
Mentales Training,Jan Mayer
Leading teams,Paolo Guenzi
The roots of football hooliganism,Eric Dunning
Gilles Villeneuve,"Gerald Donaldson, Donaldson"
Sociology of North American Sport,"George H. Sage, D. Stanley Eitzen"
If I were a major-league baseball player,"Eric Braun, Sharon Harmer"
100 Things Packers Fans Should Know & Do Before They Die,Rob Reischel
Sport Management and the Natural Environment,Michael E. Pfahl
The Lonesome Trials of Johnny Riles,Gregory Hill
Physical education and sport,Angela Lumpkin
Anxiety in sports,"Dieter Hackfort, Charles D. Spielberger"
Results of the early modern Olympics,"Bill Mallon, Ture Widlund, Ian Buchanan, Ture Widlung, Anthony Th Bijkerk"
Leitfaden zur medizinischen Trainingsberatung,"Haber, Paul"
Sporting nationalisms,"Mike Cronin, David Mayall"
Introduction to sports biomechanics,Roger Bartlett
Games People Play,Robert Ellis
Men In Sports,Brandt Aymar
The Golem's Mighty Swing,James Sturm
When Baseball Went To War,Todd Anton
How to Dance with a Partner,Andrew Weitzen
Sports law in Spain,Juan de Dios Crespo Pérez
Climb Like a Mzungu,David Flinn
Strategic Management in Sport,Danny O'Brien
Routledge Handbook of the Business of Women's Sport,"Nancy Lough, Andrea N. Geurin"
"Corruption, Mafia Power and Italian Soccer","Alberto Testa, Anna Sergi"
Sport Policy in China,"Jinming Zheng, Shushu Chen, Tien-Chin Tan, Barrie Houlihan"
"Soccer, Culture and Society in Spain",Mariann Vaczi
From Exploitation Back to Empowerment,Joseph N. Cooper
Kinetic Beauty,Jason Holt
High Performance Disability Sport Coaching,"Geoffery Z. Kohe, Derek M. Peters"
ESPN and the Changing Sports Media Landscape,"Greg G. Armfield, John McGuire, Adam Earnheardt"
Managing and Developing Community Sport,"Rob Wilson, Chris Platts"
Dreams and Deception,Isabel Ann Dwornik
Media and the Coming Out of Gay Male Athletes in American Team Sports,"Andrew C. Billings, Leigh Moscowitz"
Sports Discourse,Tony Schirato
Unthinkable,Scott Rigsby
Silly Sports,Jill L. Donahue
Strong inside,Andrew Maraniss
Upside Down,Lia Riley
"Sport, Media and Mega-Events","Lawrence A. Wenner, Andrew C. Billings"
Sports Development,Kevin Hylton
Handbook of offshore cruising,Jim Howard
Sports Law,"Matthew J. Mitten, Timothy Davis, Rodney K. Smith, Kenneth L. Shropshire, Barbara Osborne"
The Future of Football,Jon Garland
Masculinities,Eduardo P. Archetti
The Vegetarian Sports Nutrition Guide,Lisa Dorfman
Black Baseball in Living Color,"Jay Caldwell, Graig Kreindler"
Good Sports Use Teamwork,"Breann Rumsch, Mike Petrik, Mark Mallman"
"Good Sports, Win or Lose","Breann Rumsch, Mike Petrik, Mark Mallman"
Seams and Dreams,Walter Beede
Losers take all,David Klass
True Believers,Joe Queenan
Playing by the Rules,"Arnold Palmer, Steve Eubanks"
"Masculinities, gender relations, and sport","Jim McKay, Jim McKay, Michael A. Messner, Donald F. Sabo"
Exercise Physiology,Charles O. Dotson
Swimming studies,Leanne Shapton
Baltimore Orioles,Jeff Seidel
Home and away,Dave Bidini
Hey Rube,Hunter S. Thompson
Positive behavior management in physical activity settings,"Barry Wayne Lavay, Barry W. Lavay, Ron French, Hester L. Henderson"
Sports Geek,Rob Minto
"Mud, sweat, and beers","Tony Collins, Tony Collins, Wray Vamplew"
Soccer empire,Laurent Dubois
Bloomsbury Companion to the Philosophy of Sport,Cesar R. Torres
Sport and Canadian diplomacy,Donald Macintosh
Sport for Development and Peace,Simon Darnell
Routledge Handbook of Sport and New Media,"Andrew C. Billings, Marie Hardin"
Floodlights and Touchlines,Rob Steen
Olympic Media,"Andrew Billings, Andrew C. Billings"
Strategic sport communication,"Paul M. Pedersen, Kimberly S. Miloch, Pamela C. Laucella"
Mathletics,John D. Barrow
Walking in the Dolomites,"Gillian Price, Gillian Price"
Marketing the Sports Organisation,Alain Ferrand
A Companion To American Sport History,Steven A. Riess
"Sport in industrial America, 1850-1920",Steven A. Riess
The Olympic games,"Kristine Toohey, K. Toohey, A. J. Veal"
Globalization and sport,"Toby Miller, Geoffrey A Lawrence, Jim McKay, David Rowe"
Law for recreation and sport managers,"Doyice Cotten, Doyice J. Cotten, John Wolohan"
Keep your eye on the ball,"Robert G. Watts, A. Terry Bahill"
Routledge Handbook of Sports Event Management,"Milena M. Parent, Jean-Loup Chappelet"
Clinical Sports Psychiatry,"David A. Baron, Steven H. Baron, Claudia L. Reardon"
Stakeholder Analysis and Sport Organisations,"Anna-Maria Strittmatter, Josef Fahlén, Barrie Houlihan"
Transforming Sport and Physical Cultures Through Feminist Knowledges,"Simone Fullagar, Emma Rich, Adele Pavlidis, Cathy van Ingen"
Soccer,Joe Luxbacher
Softball,"Diane L. Potter, Gretchen A. Brockmeyer"
The mentalathlete,"Kay Porter, Judy Foster"
Routledge Handbook of Drugs and Sport,"Verner Moller, Ivan Waddington"
Sport and Health,"Daniel Parnell, Peter Krustrup"
Nutrition for sport and exercise,Hayley Daries
Shakespeare an archer,William Lowes Rushton
Immortality in sports,Wib Leonard
"Sports Events, Society and Culture","Katherine Dashper, Thomas Fletcher, Nicola McCullough"
Rory McIlroy,Frank Worrall
Team Spudz and the Silver Dollar,"Mark Michelson, Brenda Michelson"
Statistical reasoning in sports,Josh Tabor
Sport and Modernity,Richard Gruneau
Laboratory and Field Exercises in Sport and Exercise Biomechanics,James Watkins
Critical Geographies of Sport,Natalie Koch
Science of Climbing and Mountaineering,"Ludovic Seifert, Peter Wolf, Andreas Schweizer"
Sport in Korea,"Dae Hee Kwak, Yong Jae Ko, Inkyu Kang, Mark Rosentraub"
International Cases in the Business of Sport,"Simon Chadwick, Dave Arthur, John Beech"
The Perfection Point,John Brenkus
Losing Is Not an Option,Rich Wallace
Eating Disorders in Athletes,Joaquin Dosil
"Big Nate, thunka, thunka, thunka",Lincoln Peirce
The Captain Class,Sam Walker
The $40 million slaves,William C. Rhoden
Nike culture,"Goldman, Robert, Robert Goldman - undifferentiated, Stephen Papson"
Use of Applied Technology in Team Sport,"José Pino-Ortega, Markel Rico-González"
Routledge Handbook of Clinical Sport Psychology,"Donald R. Marks, Andrew T. Wolanin, Kendahl M. Shortway"
Fair and foul,D. Stanley Eitzen
Who's Who in Canadian Sport,Bob Ferguson
The Changing Room,David Storey
Canada learns to play,Alan Metcalfe
Jock,"Donald F. Sabo, Ross Runfola, Russ Runfola"
An outside chance,Thomas McGuane
Late innings,Roger Angell
The ultimate athlete,George Burr Leonard
Training your colt to ride and drive,"Marilyn Carlson Childs, Marilyn C. Childs, Rick M. Wallen"
Can I play?,Ontario. Task Force on Equal Opportunity in Athletics.
Climbing anchors,"John Long, Bob Gaines"
Physical activity and human well-being =,"International Congress of Physical Activity Sciences (1976 Québec, Québec)"
Sports and recreational activities,Dale Mood
The sociology of sport as an academic specialty,John W. Loy
Basic skills in sports for men and women,David Alvin Armbruster
Sport and physical recreation for the disabled,Disabled Living Foundation.
Best Easy Day Hikes Oregon's North Coast,Lizann Dunegan
Cincinnati On Field And Court,Kevin Grace
The world's greatest football players,Matt Doeden
The world's greatest soccer players,Matt Doeden
The world's greatest basketball players,Matt Doeden
"Cal Ripken, Jr",Matt Doeden
A field guide to the tracks and signs of Southern and East African wildlife,"Chris Stuart, Tilde Stuart"
Steroids and Your Muscles,Albert Spring
Dat,"Dat Nguyen, Rusty Burson"
Funny Fingers,Mark Shulman
Training,Harald Mellerowicz
"Introduction to careers in health, physical education, and sport","Patricia A. Floyd, Allen."
"Supermen, heroes, and gods",Walter Umminger
Violence at sports events,Brian Wingate
Lua,"Richard Kekumuikawaiokeola Paglinawan, Sally-jo Keala-o-anuenue Bowman, Tamara Leiokanoe Moan, Moses Elwood Kalauokalani, Jerry Walker"
Team-By-Team Encyclopedia of Major League Baseball,"Dennis Purdy, Tony La Russa"
Underdog,Eric Walters
Illustrated sporting books,J. Herbert Slater
Tom Blake,"Gary Lynch, Malcolm Gault-Williams, William K. Hoopes"
Medieval games,John Marshall Carter
Mountain bike racing,"Tim Gould, Simon Burney"
Kathy Whitworth's little book of golf wisdom,"Kathy Whitworth, Jay Golden"
Mia,Laurence Yep
Learning to Win,Pamela Grundy
Sea glass,Laurence Yep
The Answer Book of Sports,Bill Mazer
The Dent dictionary of measurement,"Michael Darton, Mike Darton"
Costa Rica,"Kimberly Parsons, Ken Olsen, Dena Marchant, Steve Scharosch, Hazel Scharosch"
Then Landry said to Staubach,"Walt Garrison, Mark Stallard"
The Life of Reilly,Rick Reilly
Trivial Pursuit,Ian Austin
Nutrition for sport,Steve Wootton
The madness in sports,Arnold R. Beisser
Tactics,"Rodney Pattisson, Rodney Pattison, Timothy Davison, Tim Hore"
"Games, contests and relays",Seward Charle Staley
Around the World with the Harlem Globetrotters,"Dave Zinkoff, Edgar G. Williams"
Sport and migration,"Joseph Maguire, Mark Falcous, Mark Falcous"
Stocking stumpers,Jack Kreismer
The best American sports writing 2006,"Michael Lewis, Glenn Stout"
Design for sport,"Anxo Cereijo Roibás, Emmanuel Stamatakis, Ken Black"
The Best of Sports Illustrated,Sports Illustrated.
"Hook, Line & Seeker",Jim Arnosky
Optimal strategies in sports economics and management,Sergiy Butenko
Handbook on international sports law,"James A. R. Nafziger, Stephen F. Ross"
Critical essays in sport management,Andy Gillentine
Exploring The Social Impacts Of Events,Greg Richards
The One Year Sports Devotions For Kids,Jeremy Jones
"Sport, recreation and tourism event management","Cheryl Mallen, Lorne James Adams"
Psychoneuroendocrinology of sport and exercise,Felix Ehrlenspiel
Shane Victorino,Alan Maimon
Bowling,"Fred Borden, John Ackerman"
Exercise and sport in diabetes,Dinesh Nagi
The sports management toolkit,Paul Emery
The bike bag book,"Tom Cuthbertson, Rick Morrall"
Helena the Horseriding Fairy,Daisy Meadows
The Nordic world,"Henrik Meinander, J. A. Mangan"
Candlestick Park,Ted Atlas
Gemma the Gymnastics Fairy,Daisy Meadows
Xin wen jian bao Zhongguo,"Zhong yang dian shi tai (Beijing, China). Xin ying zhi zuo zhong xin. Ying shi zi liao bu"
Consumer behavior knowledge for effective sports and event marketing,Lynn R. Kahle
Gaming the world,Andrei S. Markovits
The great book of Cleveland sports lists,Greg Brinda
Social History Of Tennis In Britain,Robert J. Lake
"Sport, physical recreation, and the law",Hazel Hartley
K2,"Roberto Mantovani, Kurt Diemberger"
Inside sports,"Jay J. Coakley, Peter Donnelly"
The Playbook,"Kwame Alexander, Thai Neave"
Weird Throwing And Kicking Sports,S. B. Watson
British manly exercises,Donald Walker
Lookouts,"Ira Spring, Byron Fish"
Political football,Barry Flynn
Applied sport psychology,Brian Hemmings
Human factors methods and sports science,"Paul Salmon, Adam Gibbon, Neville Anthony Stanton"
Crossing the line,"Larry Moffi, Jonathan Kronstadt"
The kids' guide to money in sports,"Suzanne Slade, McConnell, Robert L."
Tourism and Cricket,"Tom Baum, Richard Butler"
Few and chosen,"Monte Irvin, Phil Pepe"
Inspiring stories of sportsmanship,Brad Herzog
The last-place sports poems of Jeremy Bloom,Gordon Korman
"Football Fans, Rivalry and Cooperation","Christian Brandt, Fabian Hertel, Sean Huddleston"
Routledge Handbook of Sport and Sustainable Development,"Brian P. McCullough, Timothy Kellison, E. Nicole Melton"
Modelling and Simulation in Sport and Exercise,"Arnold Baca, Jürgen Perl"
"Sport, Exercise, and Performance Psychology","J. Gualberto Cremades, Angus Mugford"
Football in Turkey,"Müge Demir, Ahmet Talimciler"
Sport Development and Environmental Sustainability,"Rob Millington, Simon C. Darnell"
"Sport, Education and Corporatisation","Geoffery Z. Kohe, Holly Collison"
International Sport Marketing,"Michel Desbordes, André Richelieu"
Sport Entrepreneurship and Innovation,"Vanessa Ratten, João J. Ferreira"
Psychological Aspects of Sport-Related Concussions,"Gordon A. Bloom, Jeffrey G. Caron"
Seven Practices of Mentally Superior Athletes,Raphael Wald
Winning with Data in the Business of Sports,Fiona Green
Global Sport Economy,"Michel Desbordes, Pascal Aymar, Christopher Hautbois"
Emerging Technologies in Sport,Cheryl Mallen
Sport History,Gerald R. Gems
Global Sport Business,"Brenda G. Pitts, James J. Zhang"
Bildatlas zum Sport im alten Ägypten,"Wolfgang Decker, Michael Herb"
Early Development of Football,Graham Curry
Globalized Sport Management in Diverse Cultural Contexts,"James J. Zhang, Brenda G. Pitts"
"Women, Sport and Exercise in the Asia-Pacific Region","Gyozo Molnar, Sara N. Amin, Yoko Kanemasu"
Phenomenology and the Extreme Sport Experience,"Eric Brymer, Robert Schweitzer"
Elite Soccer Referees,Tom Webb
"Sport, Culture and Ideology (RLE Sports Studies)",Jennifer Hargreaves
"Communication, Sport and Disability",Michael S. Jeffress
Routledge Handbook of Theory in Sport Management,"George B. Cunningham, Janet S. Fink, Alison Doherty"
Skateboarding,Kara-Jane Lombard
Elite Sport and Sport-For-All,"Bailey, Richard, Margaret Talbot"
Seeking the Senses in Physical Culture,Andrew C. Sparkes
"Sport, Ethics and Leadership","Jack Bowen, Ronald S. Katz, Jeffrey R. Mitchell, Donald J. Polden, Richard Walden"
Black Sportsmen (Routledge Revivals),E. Cashmore
International Sports Volunteering,"Angela M. Benson, Nicholas Wise"
Routledge Handbook of Sport and the Environment,"Brian P. McCullough, Timothy B. Kellison"
Playing As If the World Mattered,Gabriel Kuhn
Contemporary Advances in Sport Psychology,"Stephen D. Mellalieu, Sheldon Hanton"
Routledge International Handbook of Golf Science,"Martin Toms, Sasho MacKenzie, Sam Robertson, Marc Lochbaum, Kieran Kingston"
"Sport, Medicine and Health",Dominic Malcolm
Body Ecology and Emersive Leisure,"Bernard Andrieu, Jim Parry, Alessandro Porrovecchio, Olivier Sirost"
Mindfulness and Acceptance in Sport,"Kristoffer Henriksen, Jakob Hansen, Carsten Hvid Larsen"
Changing the Game,"Jim Host, Eric A. Moyen"
Sports Research with Analytical Solution Using SPSS,J. P. Verma
Monsters of River and Rock,Adrian Smith
Baseball : Teach Your Kid to Hit...So They Don't Quit!,"Kevin Gallagher, Ceej Rowland"
Routledge Handbook of Sport and Exercise Systems Genetics,"J. Timothy Lightfoot, Monica J. Hubal, Stephen M. Roth"
Gymnastics,Morgan Hughes
Athlete Activism,Rory Magrath
Working with Volunteers in Sport,"Graham Cuskelly, Russell Hoye, Chris Auld"
Barnstorming,Jonathan Carroll
Clinical Microbiology Procedures Handbook,Amy L. Leber
Running Cultures,John Bale
There Are No Hopsitals in Russia,"Santino DeFranco, Katherine Ressman"
Saving Face,Linden McNeilly
Los juegos regionales más antiguos,Enrique Montesinos
"Sex, Gender, and Sexuality in Sport",Vikki Krane
Beyond the dream,Ira Berkow
Bruce Nash & Allan Zullo's sports hall of shame,"Bruce M. Nash, Bruce Nash, Allan Zullos, Allan Zullo"
Games,Jessie Hubbell Bancroft
The complete idiot's guide to golf,"Michelle McGann, Matthew Rudy"
Amateur Sports Integrity Act,"United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation."
Life And Sport In China,Oliver George Ready
Science and Soccer,Tom Reilly
Old sporting,Hugh McCausland
The superstars series,Randal C. Hill
The search for the perfect swing,"A. J. Cochran, John Stobbs"
"Man, sport and existence",Howard S. Slusher
Skill in sport,Barbara Knapp
Nihon ga Kankoku ni yabureru hi,Hirosue Nakano
Football,Christina Earley
Sid!,"Sid Hartman, Patrick Reusse"
Real World Gunfight Training,Michael Ochsner
Our Stories Are Our Survival,Lawrence Bamblett
Just a Kid from Maine,"Matt Mulligan, Stephanie Mulligan, Rick Parker"
Field of schemes,"Joanna Cagan, Neil Demause, Neil De Mause"
Amazing Sports from Around the World,"Douglas McLaughlin, Michelle Griffis"
Prospects,Kenneth Jedding
Florence Griffith Joyner,"Emma E. Haldy, Jeff Bane"
Choose a Career Adventure at the Super Bowl,K. C. Kelley
Choose a Career Adventure at the Olympics,K. C. Kelley
Paddle your own canoe,"Gary McGuffin, Joanie McGuffin"
Coach Gaither Story,"Ted Edlich, Barry Brown, Dave Russo"
How did sports begin?,R. Brasch
Golf,"Nick Faldo, Vivien Saunders"
Breaking the surface,Greg Louganis
Aston Martin and Lagonda,"Chris Harvey, Chris Harvey"
Sports law,Gordon I. Kirke
Whitewater rafting,Shane McFee
Girls only!,Beverly Lewis
The New York times guide to spectator sports,Leonard Koppett
American Anglo-Saxon domination of the 1896 Olympic Games,Rebecca L. Trunzo
"Interaction among personality, anxiety, situational criticality, and athletic performance",Jørn Ravnholt Petersen
Jews and baseball,"Burton Alan Boxerman, Burton A. Boxerman, Benita W. Boxerman"
Before the glory,"Billy Staples, Bill Staples, Rich Herschlag"
The dome of silence,"Sandra Kirby, Sandra Kirby, Lorraine Greaves, Olena Hankinsky"
Dwight Howard,Malcolm J. Harasymiw
Sports Matters,John Bloom
Sports in Literature,McGraw-Hill
The great American sports book,George Gipe
The Negro in sports,Edwin Bancroft Henderson
Sports illustrated training with weights,"Robert B. Parker, John R. Marsh"
Conditioning for outdoor fitness,"David Musnick, Mark Pierce, Mark, A.T.C. Pierce, David Musnick"
"Football Fans, Activism and Social Change",Dino Numerato
Straight from the Hart,Bruce Hart
Sports Participation and Cultural Identity in the Experience of Young People,Vegneskumar Maniam
"Sport, Community Regeneration, Governance and Development",Rory Shand
Re-Designing Youth Sport,John McCarthy
English Premier League,Richard Elliott
Sport and Peace-Building in Divided Societies,"John Sugden, Alan Tomlinson"
Transgender Athletes in Competitive Sport,"Anderson, Eric, Ann Travers"
Repairing the Athlete's Image,"Joseph R. Blaney, Lance R. Lippert, Scott J. Smith"
"Writing and Publishing Research in Kinesiology, Health, and Sport Science","Timothy Baghurst, Jason DeFreitas"
"British Asians, Exclusion and the Football Industry",Daniel Kilvington
Peer Guide to Applied Sport Psychology for Consultants in Training,"Mark Aoyagi, Artur Poczwardowski, Jamie L. Shapiro"
Women in Sport Leadership,"Sarah Leberman, Laura J. Burton"
Sport and Militarism,Michael L. Butterworth
National Games and National Identity in China,"Liu Li, Fan Hong"
Ethics of Sports Technologies and Human Enhancement,"Thomas H. Murray, Voo Teck Chuan"
Harlem Globetrotters,Robbie Butler
Endocrinology of Physical Activity and Sport,"Naama Constantini, Anthony C Hackney"
The Race Against the Stasi,Herbie Sykes
Sports safety,Elizabeth Lang
Science and Football VIII,"Jens Bangsbo, Anne-Marie Elbe"
Infield Outsider,"D. L. Sloat, Erin Abramowicz"
Stanley Cup,Shane Frederick
World Series,Shane Frederick
NBA Finals,Tyler Dean Omoth
WNBA Finals,Tyler Dean Omoth
Athlete Learning in Elite Sport,Natalie Barker-Ruchti
The Olympics,Moira Butterfield
Outdoor style,"Penny Swift, Janek Szymanowski"
Rethinking Sports and Integration,Sine Agergaard
The Baseball Glove,David Jenemann
I Was There!,Eric Mirlis
Coaching defensive linemen,"John Levra, James Peterson"
Managing Elite Sport Systems,"Svein S. Andersen, Barrie Houlihan"
From an Idea to Nike,Lowey Bundy Sichol
Rethinking Olympic Legacy,Vassil Girginov
Sports criminology,Nic Groombridge
Inclusive Masculinities in Contemporary Football,Rory Magrath
Shakespeare the Truth other Greats : The Common Denominator,William (Billy) McIntyre
Pragmatism and the Philosophy of Sport,"John Kaag, Douglas Anderson, Dick Lally, Richard Lally"
Tactical Decision-Making in Sport,"David Cooper, Barrie Gordon"
Sports Stars,Sports Stars LLC
Handbook of Sport Neuroscience and Psychophysiology,Roland Carlstedt
International Sports Betting,"Jean-Patrick Villeneuve, Martial Pasquier"
Care in Sport Coaching,"Colum Cronin, Kathleen Armour"
Feminization of Sports Fandom,Stacey Pope
Discourse of Sport,"David Caldwell, John Walsh, Elaine W. Vine, Jon Jureidini"
"International Olympic Committee, Law, and Accountability",Ryan Gauthier
Sport and English National Identity in a 'Disunited Kingdom',"Tom Gibbons, Dominic Malcolm"
Athlete Apperception Technique,"Petah M. Gibbs, Mark B. Andersen, Daryl B. Marchant"
Perspectives on Athlete-Centred Coaching,Shane Pill
Mountaineering Tourism,"Ghazali Musa, Anna Thompson- Carr, James Higham"
"Sport, Leisure and Social Justice","Jonathan Long, Thomas Fletcher, Beccy Watson"
Contemporary Sport Marketing,"James J. Zhang, Brenda G. Pitts"
Breakaway,Andrew Conte
Zen and Confucius in the Art of Swordsmanship,Reinhard Kammer
Science of Basketball,Alexandru Radu
Excelling in Sport Psychology,"Alison Pope-Rhodius, Sean Fitzpatrick, Sara C. Robinson"
Global Football Industry,"James J. Zhang, Brenda G. Pitts"
Positive Psychology in Sport and Physical Activity,"Abbe Brady, Bridget Grenville-Cleave"
On Sport and the Philosophy of Sport,Graham McFee
Psychology of Doping in Sport,"Vassilis Barkoukis, Lambros Lazuras, Haralambos Tsorbatzoudis"
Complex Sport Analytics,Felix Lebed
Sport in the African World,"John Nauright, Mahfoud Amara"
Christianity and the Transformation of Physical Education and Sport in China,"Huijie Zhang, Fan Hong, Fuhua Huang"
Inclusion and Exclusion in Competitive Sport,Seema Patel
Critical Issues in Global Sport Management,"Nico Schulenkorf, Stephen Frawley"
Researching Difference in Sport and Physical Activity,"Richard Medcalf, Chris Mackintosh"
Leveraging Disability Sport Events,"Laura Misener, Gayle McPherson, David McGillivray, David Legg"
Game-Day Gangsters,Curtis Fogel
Sport Law,"Linda Sharp, Anita Moorman, Cathryn Claussen"
Track and field athletics for coach and contestant,Harry Lovering Gill
Routledge Handbook of International Sport Business,"Mark Dodds, Kevin C. Heisey, Aila Ahonen"
Applied Exercise Psychology,"Selen Razon, Michael L. Sachs"
Role of the Professional Football Manager,Seamus Kelly
Nutrition and the Female Athlete,Katherine A. Beals
Female Tradition in Physical Education,"David Kirk, Patricia Vertinsky"
Interpersonal Coordination and Performance in Social Systems,"Pedro Passos, Keith Davids, Chow Jia Chow Jia Yi"
Sport and the Female Disabled Body,Elisabet Apelmo
Performance Analysis in Team Sports,"Pedro Passos, Duarte Araujo, Ricardo Duarte, Anna Volossovitch"
Routledge International Handbook of Outdoor Studies,"Barbara Humberstone, Heather Prince, Karla A. Henderson"
Desert Disaster,Axel Lewis
Match-Fixing in Sport,"Stacey Steele, Hayden Opie"
Mentoring in Physical Education and Sports Coaching,Fiona C. Chambers
Aesthetics Poetics and Rhetoric of Soccer,"Ridvan Askin, Catherine Diederich, Aline Bieri"
Great Expectations,Christopher B. Doob
"Figurational Research in Sport, Leisure and Health","Dominic Malcolm, Philippa Velija"
"Mummies, Myths, and Mysteries","Dan Gutman, Jim Paillot"
"Football, Corruption and Lies","John Sugden, Alan Tomlinson"
Sport in Scandinavia and the Nordic Countries,"Ken Green, Thorsteinn Sigurjonsson, Eivind Asrum Skille"
Sport in Islam and in Muslim Communities,"Alberto Testa, Mahfoud Amara"
Post-Olympism,"John Bale, Mette Krogh Christensen"
Ball Game Math,"Katie Marsico, Intuitive"
Sporting Blood,"Carlos Acevedo, Thomas Hauser"
Evie's Field Day,Claire Noland
Spooky Sports Day,"A. B. Saddlewick, Sarah Horne"
Women Sport Fans,Kim Toffoletti
Football Biomechanics,"Hiroyuki Nunome, Ewald Hennig, Neal Smith"
Transforming Sport,"Thomas F. Carter, Daniel Burdsey, Mark Doidge"
Doing a Research Project in Sport Performance Analysis,"Peter O'Donoghue, Lucy Holmes, Gemma Robinson"
Marathon Quest,Martin Parnell
Game Plan,Karen L. Wall
Fathering through sport and leisure,Tess Kay
Getting set for golf,Carl Lohren
Riding,"Kate Delano-Condax Decker, Condax Decker"
Survival of the fittest,Mike Stroud
Sports and recreation for the disabled,"Michael J. Paciorek, Jeffrey A. Jones, Jeffery A. Jones"
Easy Strength Omnibook,Dan John
Staying Fit with Sports!,Katie Kawa
Fundamentals of kayak navigation,"Burch, David, David Burch"
Tennis,"Charles Applewhaite, Bill Moss"
Death and Resurrection of Baseball,William R. Douglas
Treestand strategies,"Gene Wensel, Barry Wensel"
Sport and play in American life,"Stephen K. Figler, Gail Whitaker"
Soccer Fundamentals for Players and Coaches,Wiel Coerver
Sports injuries,Vivian Grisogono
Sports and psychological influences,Hugo H. Bronsen
Coaching football,"Tom Flores, Bob O'Connor"
English literature of the 19th & 20th centuries,Maggs Bros.
Sports! Have Fun and Stay Healthy,Connor Meeks
Fundamentals of sports law,Walter T. Champion
Sports law in a nutshell,Walter T. Champion
Sports and the law in Canada,John Barnes
Timocrate,Thomas Corneille
Physical Education & the Study of Sport,"Bob Davis, R.J. Davis, J.V. Roscoe, D.A. Roscoe"
The secrets of martial arts,Christopher L. Harbo
World Wrestling Insanity,James Guttman
Epee Fencing,Imre Vass
No-fall snowboarding,"Danny Martin, Matt Diehl"
Wenger,Jasper Rees
The New Zealanders,Maurice Shadbolt
Himalayan Quest,"Ed Viesturs, Peter Potterfield"
Values in Sport,C. Tamburrini
The best Boston sports arguments,"Jim Caple, Steve Buckley"
Midnight in the Garden of Evel Knievel,Giles Smith
"Sports cards, collecting, trading, and playing",Margo McLoone
Annika Sorenstam,Dax Riner
Working in Sport,James Masters
Native Athletes in Action,Vincent Schilling
Impact zone,"Bobby Clampett, Andy Brumer"
Environments for Outdoor Play,Theresa Casey
Organizational Management Administration for Athletic Programs,Thomas M. Kinder
"Sport, policy, and development",Daniel Bloyce
The gymnasium of the horse,Gustav Steinbrecht
Karate warrior,"Austin St. John, Steve Rowe"
Functional Anatomy for Sport and Exercise,Clare Milner
SPSS for Sport and Exercise Studies,Nikos Ntoumanis
Sport & Tourism,Mike E. Weed
"Encyclopedia of Physical Education, Fitness, and Sports",Thomas K. Cureton
Sport and PE,Barry Hodgson
Developing Elite Sports Performers,Farrow/Baker/Ma
The games of California and Stanford,Jack F. Sheehan
Hiking trails of New Brunswick,"Marianne Eiselt, H.A. Eiselt"
"Slam Dunk, Vol. 4","Takehiko Inoue, Various"
Basketball in the Pac-10 Conference,Jeremy Harrow
The Sporting World of Modern South (Sport and Society),Patrick B. Miller
Competition and the ultimate athletic experience,Rick Osbourne
Triathloning for Ordinary Mortals,Steven Jonas
No Baloney (Signed),"Frank Maloney, Kevin Brennan"
Sports injuries,"Malcolm Read, Malcolm T. F. Read, Paul Wade"
Bowling For Beginners,Don Nace
The veterinary care of the horse,"Sue Devereux, Liz Morrison"
The Grasshopper,Bernard Suits
An analysis of American sportswomen in two Negro newspapers,Linda D. Williams
Developing sport skills,Ree K. Spaeth Arnold
The art of coarse rugby,"Michael Green, Michael Green"
Henry Chaplin,Edith Vane-Tempest-Stewart
"Slides as a nonverbal, visual instrument for measuring meaning perceived in physical activity",Jill Doreen Barrett
Attitudes of sports leaders toward the professional preparation scheme for sports coaches in Egypt,Nazek Mostafa Sinbel
"Criterion salience, self-esteem and group affiliation",Martin James Lee
The use of sports to promote the American way of life during the Cold War,Russ Crawford
U.S. participation in the 1980 summer Olympic games,United States. Congress. House. Committee on Foreign Affairs
Physical activities for college women,Maryhelen Vannier
Greek athletic sports and festivals,Edward Norman Gardiner
"Attitudes about, and preferences for, physical risk and vertigo risk among participants in selected sports",David Alan Niemand
Culture and sport,Paula Rogers Lupcho
Jeet Kune Do,"Larry Hartsell, Tim Tackett"
Just let the kids play,"Bob Bigelow, Bob Bigelow, Tom Moroney, Linda Hall"
Junior soccer,"Adam Ward, Adam Ward, Trevor Lewin"
Selling the five rings,"Robert Knight Barney, Robert K Barney, Stephen R Wenn, Scott G Martyn"
The psychology of enhancing human performance,"Frank L. Gardner, Frank Gardner, Zella E. Moore"
British and American sporting authors,A. Henry Higginson
Maine to Montauk,"Brad Burns, John Rice"
Never Never Quit,Mike Shields
Run with It,"Joe Drake, Patricia Snyder"
Law in sport and physical activity,Annie Clement
Beyond Boycotts,"Philippe Vonnard, Nicola Sbetti, Grégory Quin"
Modern Dry-Fly Code,"Vincent C. Marinaro, Rachel Gualco"
Cleveland Stadium,"Jim Toman, James A. Toman, Gregory G. Deegan"
Air Ball,John R. Gerdy
Black Belt,"John McGee, Burt Anderson, Aaron Banks"
Playing from the heart,"Roger Crawford, Michael Bowker"
Tennis Confidential,Jennifer Huebner
Psychology of Recruiting,Stephen Brennan
Score with Track and Field Math,Stuart A. P. Murray
Fencing or the Science of Arms,"Salvator Fabris, A. F. Johnson, Michael Chidester, Jan van Halbeeck"
FUNDaFIELD,"Melissa Sherman Pearl, David A. Sherman"
"Oh, the Mountains You'll Ski","Chutes, Debra Federline"
Traveling Indoor Climber's Logbook,Kristen Pizzuti
Baseball,Christina Earley
Positions in Lacrosse,Emmett Martin
Making Choices on My Team,Diane Lindsey Reeves
Snowboarding,"Jim Fitzpatrick, Thomas Sawyer"
Stand up for Sportsmanship,Frank Murphy
In the zone with South Africa's sports heroes,Michael Cooper
Green Belt Guide Instructional Guide 2nd Edition,"Kee Hwang, H. C. Hwang"
Daddy Bought Me a Bow & Some Arrows,"Deb Hamel, Christy Frazier, Alena Karabach, Laura Whiteley"
Anfield Man,Peter Abrahams
Mind gym,"Gary Mack, David Casstevens"
East of Ireland Walks,Lenny Antonelli
Body Composition,Henry C. Lukaski
Psychosocial Health and Well-Being in High-Level Athletes,Nick Galli
Peak performance,Charles A. Garfield
Sport Tourism,"Chris Cooper, C. Michael Hall, Brent W. Ritchie, Daryl Adair"
How to KILL the Ball,Shauger
The third best Hull,"Dennis Hull, Robert Thompson"
Aikido,"Gōzō Shioda, Yasuhisa Shioda"
Coykendall's second sporting collectibles price guide,Ralf W. Coykendall
Cool sites,Lisa Trumbauer
This Sporting Life,David Storey
The evolution of English sport,Neil Wigglesworth
How Lance Does It,Brad Kearns
Diving and snorkeling guide to Texas,"Barbara Dunn, Stephan Myers, Janet R. Edwards"
"Bioethics, Genetics and Sport","Silvia Camporesi, Mike McNamee"
Sport Development in Action,Alec Astle
Sixguns,Elmer Keith
First Tracks,Catherine O'Connell
The End of Greek Athletics in Late Antiquity,Sofie Remijsen
Republicans buy sneakers too,Clay Travis
The Yankees,"Sullivan, George, George Sullivan, John Powers (undifferentiated)"
Sport,Eric Dunning
How we can save sports,Ken Reed
The Torrance-Clendennin episode and the Melville letters,Clarence D. Levey
Exploring Wisconsin trout streams,"Stephen M. Born, Jeff Mayers, Andy Morton, Bill Sonzogni"
Sports injuries,Vivian Grisogono
A Purpose Ridden,Ryan Correy
Wrestling in Britain,Benjamin Litherland
No Slam Dunk,"Cheryl Cooky, Michael A. Messner"
SportsWorld,Robert Lipsyte
Sport in Latin America,"Gonzalo Bravo, Charles Parrish"
"Girls, Gender and Physical Education","Kimberly L. Oliver, David Kirk"
The Politics of the Olympics,"Alan Bairner, Gyozo Molnar"
Super Sports Numbers,Nick Kleist
Head in the Game,Brandon Sneed
Scandals in College Sports,"Shaun R. Harper, Jamel K. Donnor"
Global Perspectives on Sports and Christianity,"Afe Adogame, Nick J. Watson, Andrew Parker"
Understanding International Sport Organisations,Lincoln Allison
Sport and Architecture,Benjamin S. Flowers
Extreme Athletes,Charlotte Guillain
"Sports, Peacebuilding and Ethics",Linda M. Johnston
Career opportunities in the sports industry,Shelly Field
Muslim women and sport,"Tansin Benn, Gertrud Pfister, H. A. Jawad"
Through a blue lens,"Barney Stein, Dennis D'Agostino, Bonnie Crosby"
The great book of Seattle sports lists,Mike Gastineau
Nutrition for sport and exercise,"Marie Dunford, Andy Doyle"
"Scientific evidence for musculoskeletal, bariatric, and sports nutrition",Ingrid Kohlstadt
The complete hunter,"Doug Painter, Philip Bourjaily, W. Tarrant, Thomas McIntyre, Bob Robb, J. B. Robinson"
Sports development,"Peter Bramham, Kevin Hylton"
Things that make white people uncomfortable,"Michael Bennett, Michael Bennett, Dave Zirin"
Sport Education in Physical Education,Dawn Penney
The new aerobics,Kenneth H. Cooper
Here to Stay,Sara Farizan
Complete guide to sports injuries,H. Winter Griffith
Anshan Shi zhih,Anshan Shi shi zhi ban gong shi
Sports Strategist,"Irving Rein, Ben Shields, Adam Grossman"
A Significant Other,Matt Rendell
International sports economics comparisons,Rodney D. Fort
10 for 66 and all that,Arthur Mailey
Ethics of sport and athletics,Robert C. Schneider
Sport Operations Management and Development,Mark Piekarz
Sporting rhetoric,Barry Brummett
"Global Practices and Training in Applied Sport, Exercise, and Performance Psychology","J. Gualberto Cremades, Lauren S. Tashman"
Python for Accounting & Business - Volume 1,Shivam Arora
Varsity Dad Dilemma,Lex Martin
Running Repairs,Paula Coates
Adventure sport physiology,Nick Draper
Storm tactics handbook,"Lin Pardey, Larry Pardey, Larry."
Jim Thorpe's bright path,"Joseph Bruchac, S. D. Nelson"
The Sportscaster's Notebook,Troy Kirby
Diplomatic Games,Andrew L. Johns
I Came As a Shadow,"John Thompson, Jesse Washington"
Dry suit diving,"Steven M. Barsky, Dick Long, Bob Stinton, Steven Barsky"
Everton greats,"Jon Berman, Malcolm Dome, John Berman"
Ted & me,Dan Gutman
Game of shadows,"Mark Fainaru-Wada, Lance Williams, Lance Williams"
The Art of Pickleball,Gale Leach
Physical rehabilitation of the injured athlete,"James R. Andrews, Gary L. Harrelson, Kevin E. Wilk"
Encyclopedia of sports management and marketing,"Linda E. Swayne, Mark Dodds"
"Introduction to physical education, exercise science, and sport studies",Angela Lumpkin
Reed's general engineering knowledge for marine engineers,"Leslie Jackson, Thomas D. Morton"
Evangelical Youth Culture,Ibrahim Abraham
Research methods for sports performance analysis,Peter O'Donoghue
The Braves,"Bob Klapisch, Pete Van Wieren"
Never Foul A Jump Shooter,Daniel Yost
The seventh game,"Barry M. Levenson, Barry Levenson"
Think like a champion,"Mike Shanahan, Adam Schefter"
When Revelation Comes,"Jim Hartsell, Michael Bamberger, James Sitar"
Lunchtime rules,Vicki Steggall
Why teams win,Saul L. Miller
"Thinking body, dancing mind",Al Chung-liang Huang
Wheelmen,Reed Albergotti
The Game of Their Lives,Geoffrey Douglas
Training for Trouble,Franklin W. Dixon
Wrestling Sturbridge,Rich Wallace
Paterno,Joe Posnanski
Baseball,David Louis Dreier
The Red Smith reader,Red Smith
What makes Olga run?,Bruce Grierson
"More than beards, bellies, and biceps","Bob Gordon, Robert Gordon, Tom Burgoyne"
Warrior girls,Michael Y. Sokolove
The Superstar Story of the Harlem Globetrotters,Larry Dobrow
The Agony of Victory,Steve Friedman
Black Belt Tae Kwon Do,Yeon Hwan Park
Applied sport psychology,Jean M. Williams
Surf's up,Louise Southerden
Coach's challenge,"Mike Gottfried, Mike Gottfried, Ron Benson"
Arnheim's Principles of Athletic Training,"William E. Prentice, Daniel D. Arnheim"
Jim Walden's tales from the Washington State Cougars sideline,"Jim Walden, Dave Boling"
Winning Ruby Heart,Jennifer Lohmann
The pursuit of sporting excellence,David Hemery
Blowing the Whistle,Garry Whannel
Sporting days and sporting ways,"Nevill, Ralph"
Fightin' Words,"Joe Cox, Ryan Clark, Denny Crum, Joe B. Hall"
The Victorians and sport,Mike Huggins
Cam Jansen and the Sports Day Mysteries,David A. Adler
A Funny Old Life,Des Sleightholme
Sports economics,Lawrence Hadley
The economics of Adam Smith,Samuel Hollander
Physiology of fitness,Brian J. Sharkey
Ultimate Comeback,"Erik Kramer, William Croyle"
"In Motion, At Rest",Grant Farred
Moo Duk Kwan History,United States Soo Bahk Do Moo Duk Kwan Federation
Soo Bahk Do & Tang Soo Do,United States Soo Bahk Do Moo Duk Kwan Federation
The Encyclopedia of Underground Strength & Conditioning,Zach Even - Esh
Moo Duk Kwan® White Belt Instructional Guide Soo Bahk Do® & Tang Soo Do,United States Soo Bahk Do Moo Duk Kwan Federation
Offside,Andrei S. Markovits
Arete,"Miller, Stephen G."
Onward to the Olympics,Stephen R. Wenn
Basketball,Christina Earley
Sports and city marketing in European cities,"Berg, Leo van den., Erik Braun, Alexander H. J. Otgaar, Leo Van Den Berg"
Baseball in Blue and Gray,George B. Kirsch
Encyclopedia of world sport,"Karen Christensen, David Levinson"
Encyclopedia of ethnicity and sports in the United States,"George B. Kirsch, Claire Elaine Nolte"
Foul Play,Mike Rowbottom
Management of physical education and sport,"Bucher, Charles Augustus"
The Tribune book of open-air sports,"Hall, Henry"
Ballplayer,"Chipper Jones, Carroll Rogers Walton"
Golf's Sacred Journey,David L. Cook
Michael Jordan and the new global capitalism,Walter LaFeber
Why Would Anyone Do That?,Stephen C. Poulson
Sunday Silence,Ray Paulick
The social significance of sport,Barry D. McPherson
New Jack Jocks,Larry Platt
Rugby,"Tony Biscombe, Peter Drewett"
Black And Honolulu Blue,Keith Dorney
Silent Gesture,"Tommie Smith, Tommie Smith, David Steele"
Precision pool,"Gerry Kanov, Shari J. Stauch"
Dominican Baseball,Alan Klein
Sport psychologie,F. C. Bakker
The mechanics of sports injuries,Cynthia Tucker
The Sports 100,Brad Herzog
Becoming a personal trainer for dummies,"Melyssa St. Michael, Linda Formichelli"
Raising the stakes,T. L. Taylor
New Baseball Bible,"Dan Schlossberg, Jay Johnstone, Alan Schwarz"
The highest stand,Tonie Campbell
Showdown,Lesley Ward
Sport 2.0,Andy Miah
The business of sports agents,Kenneth L. Shropshire
Team building through physical challenges,Donald R. Glover
Golf,"DeDe Owens, Linda K. Bunker, Dede Owens"
Basketball skills & drills,"Jerry Krause, Jerry Krause, Don Meyer, Jerry Meyer"
Sport competition anxiety test,Rainer Martens
"Sports, Exercise, and Fitness",Mary Beth Allen
Sports,Chris Oxlade
"What's My Name, Fool? Sports and Resistance in the United States",Dave Zirin
The victor's crown,David Stone Potter
Rain Forest Rampage,Axel Lewis
Spirit Foul,"Zack Smith, Ross Usinger, Chris Pierson, Brenna Fisher"
The Phoenix dictionary of games,J. B. Pick
"Sport, Physical Culture, and the Moving Body","Joshua I. Newman, Holly Thorpe, David Lawrence Andrews, Mary Louise Adams"
Mystery Horse at Oak Lane Stable,Kerri Lukasavitz
Rules for Youth Soccer,Keith Kurtz
"Sport, Education and Social Policy","Gudrun Doll-Tepper, Katrin Koenen, Bailey, Richard"
Sporting Capital,Nicholas F. Rowe
Clinical sports nutrition,"Louise Burke, Vicki Deakin"
Football and Migration,"Richard Elliott, Harris, John"
Aspects of sport governance,"Kluka, Schilling, Stier, Darlene Kukla"
Routledge handbook of talent identification and development in sport,"Joseph Baker, Jörg Schorer, Nick Wattie"
Sports!,Neil Leifer
"Sports in African History, Politics, and Identity Formation","Michael J. Gennaro, Saheed Aderinto, Michael John Gennaro"
The sociology of sports,Tim Delaney
In the ghost country,"Peter Hillary, John E. Elder, John Elder"
It's How You Play the Game,Brian Kilmeade
It's Not About the Bra,"Brandi Chastain, Gloria Averbuch"
Jewish jocks,"Franklin Foier, Marc Tracy"
Open Net,George Plimpton
Satchel Paige,James Sturm
Kids & sports,"Eric Small, Linda Spear"
Parenting young athletes the Ripken way,"Ripken, Cal, Cal Ripken, Rick Wolff"
Leading with the Heart,Donald T. Phillips
Football champ,Tim Green
Good Sports,Jack Prelutsky
1941 -- The Greatest Year In Sports,Mike Vaccaro
Dispatches from the Sporting Life,Mordecai Richler
Golf Rx,"Vijay Vad, Dave Allen"
Scéal na hiomána,Liam Ó Caithnia
Brain and body in sport and exercise,"Boris Blumenstein, Michael Bar-Eli, Gershon Tenenbaum"
And Nobody Got Hurt!,Len Berman
My Turf,William Nack
Fútbol a sol y sombra,Eduardo Galeano
Little girls in pretty boxes,"Ryan, Joan, Ryan, Joan"
The murder of Sonny Liston,Shaun Assael
The Groundhopper Guide to Soccer in England,Paul Gerald
Shut up Legs!,Jens Voigt
Sport und Rekord,Maria Kloeren
A strategy for British sport,Don Anthony
Sport and ethnic groups in Canada,Gerald Redmond
The Dickson baseball dictionary,Paul Dickson
"Hunan Sheng zhi, 1978-2002",Hunan Sheng di fang zhi bian zuan wei yuan hui
Passing game,Murray Greenberg
"Can We Have Our Balls Back, Please?",Julian Norridge
Fathers Playing Catch with Sons,Donald Hall
Sport and place,John Bale
"Sport, a cultural history",Richard D. Mandell
König Pferd,Monique Dossenbach
Sports law,Raymond L. Yasser
"Women, sport & performance",Christine L. Wells
Like Other Girls,Britta Lundin
"Sport, power, and culture",John Hargreaves undifferentiated
From ritual to record,Allen Guttmann
It's a girl's game too,"Alice Siegel, Margo McLoone, Lisa Campbell Ernst"
"Nobody asked me, but ..","Jimmy Cannon, Jack Cannon, Tom Cannon"
Ty Cobb,Charles Leerhsen
100 years of the U.S. Open,"John Delery, Angus G. Garber, John  Golf, Delery"
The official world encyclopedia of sports and games,Diagram Group.
Sports and drug abuse,United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on Labor and Human Resources. Subcommittee on Alcoholism and Drug Abuse.
The best Minnesota sports arguments,Bob Sansevere
Saved,Jack Falla
Game Day,Thomas Boswell
The sport lawyer's guide to legal periodicals,"Glenn M. Wong, T. Jesse Wilde"
Great Canadian sports stories,Trent Frayne
Introduction to biomechanic analysis of sport,John W. Northrip
Stacey Jones,"Stacey Jones, John Matheson"
Sport in Canada,Don Morrow
Pay Up and Play the Game,Wray Vamplew
Climb!,"Jeff Achey, Dudley Chelton, Bob Godfrey"
Rip off the big game,Paul Hoch
Danny Harf,Christopher D. Goranson
Medals for the 1980 U.S. summer Olympic team,"United States. Congress. House. Committee on Banking, Finance, and Urban Affairs. Subcommittee on Consumer Affairs."
"Cycling, shooting, and show jumping",Jason Page
Myron Cope,Myron Cope
Your world: let's visit an oil company,"Billy N. Pope, Billy Packer, Roland Lazenby"
Basic skills in sports,David Alvin Armbruster
Sport in society,Peter C. McIntosh
Wilma,Wilma Rudolph
Fundamentals of athletic training,National Athletic Trainers Association.
The F. A. guide to training and coaching,Allen Wade
Famous American athletes of to-day,Charles Haven Ladd Johnston
The athletic revolution,"Scott, Jack"
Injuries in sport,David Sutherland Muckle
Intramural sports,Harris F. Beeman
Miami of Ohio-- the cradle of coaches,Bob Kurz
Tony Hawk's Pro Skater 3,Doug Walsh
Backcountry camping,Bill Riviere
The best of pro baseball,Matt Doeden
Lance Armstrong,Matt Doeden
Eli Manning,Matt Doeden
School Sport Psychology,Charles A. Maher
Raelene,"Raelene Boyle, Garry Linnell"
The sports scholarships insider's guide,Dion Wheeler
The Iron Circle,"Dominiquie Vandenberg, Rick Rever"
"Sporting anecdotes, original and selected","Egan, Pierce"
"Sporting anecdotes, original and select","Egan, Pierce"
"Pierce Egan's book of sports, and mirror of life","Egan, Pierce"
The complete New York Yankees,"Derek Gentile, Stats Inc."
Examining Sports Development,Michael Collins
Notre Dame golden moments,"Walters, John, John Walters"
Existential psychology and sport,Mark Nesti
"Boomerangs, blades, and basketballs",Jayne Creighton
Sports Firsts,Patrick Clark
Football Injuries,Muir Gray
Athletic Recruiting and Scholarship Guide,Wayne Mazzoni
Training Theory,"Dick, Frank W."
Kūno kultūra ir sportas Lietuvoje,Antanas Vaupšas
The female athlete,Carl E. Klafs
Mountain biking in New Jersey,"Christopher Mac Kinnon, Christopher MacKinnon"
Motocross in the X Games,Christopher Blomquist
Sport: mirror of American life,Robert H. Boyle
Sport and Modern Social Theorists,Richard Giulianotti
Chicago's Soldier Field,Paul Michael Peterson
American sports (1785-1835),Jennie Holliman
Contesting identities,Aaron Baker
Game-Day Gigglers,Sam Schultz
Cricketing Cultures in Conflict,Boria Majumdar
"Duty, honor, victory",Gary L. Bloomfield
Barranca,José Aldo Guzmán
"Moderation stated in a sermon preached before the Right Honourable the Lord Mayor and aldermen of the City of London, at Guild-hall chappel, Octob. 22, 1682","John Evans, Jim Sheard, Wally Armstrong"
Toughest Men in Sports,Mike Chapman
A century of sports,Will Grimsley
All that remains,Bruce Brooks
Sport's golden age,Allison Danzig
History of American physical education and sport,Paula D. Welch
Hiking Joshua Tree National Park,"Cunningham, Bill, Bill Cunningham, Polly Cunningham"
The speed merchants,Michael Keyser
Visual athletics,"Kay Porter, Judy Foster"
Scientific basis of athletic conditioning,"Jensen, Clayne R."
Sponsorship,Steve Sleight
"The role of ego-involvement, objective outcome, and perceived performance in the determination of causal attributions",Kevin S. Spink
The American girl's home book of work and play,Helen Stuart Campbell
Sport: A Wider Social Role?,Fred Coalter
The Olympic Games,"Barry J. Hugman, Peter Arnold"
Garry Sobers,"Sobers, Garfield Sir., Gary Sobers"
Sport and the sociological imagination,"North American Society for the Sociology of Sport. Conference, Nancy Theberge, Donnelly, Peter"
Social aspects of sport,Eldon E. Snyder
Not till the fat lady sings,Les Krantz
Information sources in sport and leisure,Michele Shoebridge
"Soccer coach's guide to practices, drills & skill training","Robert Lauffer, Butch Lauffer, Sandy Davie"
Recreation and the law,"Bird, Stephen"
Modern Sports Officiating,"Richard Clegg, William A. Thompson"
Climbing California's High Sierra,"John Moynier, Claude Fiddler"
Sporting lives,"Parkinson, Michael, Michael Parkinson"
Olympic judo,"Nicolas Soames, Roy Inman"
The Penn State Football Encyclopedia,"Lou Prato, Mike Finn, Chad Leistikow"
Sport for the fun of it,"Tunis, John Roberts"
Athletics and the law,Herb Appenzeller
Diving and snorkeling guide to the Bahamas,"Steve Blount, Lisa Walker"
Hustle,Michael Y. Sokolove
Directory of Graduate Programs in Applied Sport Psychology,Michael L. Sachs
Middle school phyusical education,"Gary Berg Spindt, Gary B. Spindt, William H. Monti, Betty F. Hennessy, Christine Holyoak, Herman Weinberg"
Lacrosse Legends of the First Americans,Thomas Vennum
Recreation and the law,Valerie Collins
Sport in Britain,Great Britain. Central Office of Information. Reference Division.
Arthur makes the team,Stephen Krensky
"Sport, Politics and the Working Class",Stephen G. Jones
Making sense of sports,Ernest Cashmore
Man and movement,Harold M. Barrow
Sports and Competitive Behavior,Vicky W. Holibrook
Table tennis,"Gordon Steggall, Gordon Steggal, Peter Hirst"
Sports from A to Z,Bobbie Kalman
"Leadership for recreation, parks, and leisure services","Christopher R. Edginton, Christopher Edington, Susan Hudson, Kathleen K. Scholl"
Clinical manual of substance abuse,Jean Kinney
Sports Outreach,Steve Connor
Sport Psychology for Youth Coaches,Frank L. Smoll
The physiological basis of physical education and athletics,Edward L. Fox
Simple foods for the pack,"Claudia Axcell, Diana Cooke, Vikki Kath"
How to cheat in sports,Scott Ostler
"Sins of New York as ""exposed"" by the Police gazette",Edward Van Every
Sportsmassage,"Jack Meagher, Pat Boughton"
Camp-fire verse,Williams Haynes
Sports physiology,Edward L. Fox
Sport as a career,John J. Jackson
Management competency development in sport and physical education,Earle F. Zeigler
"Long Days, Late Nights",Frank Keating
Mass!,"Kennedy, Robert, Robert Kennedy"
Harlem Globetrotters,George Vecsey
2008 ESPN sports almanac,"Gerry Brown, Mike Morrison"
Beyond basic fly tying,"Jon Rounds, Marvin Nolte"
Home and away,Scott Simon
The Britannica guide to basketball,Adam Augustyn
Gold minds,Audrius Barzdukas
"Guinness sports record book, 1990-91","David A. Boehm, Jim Benagh, Cyd Smith"
2004 ESPN sports almanac,"Gerry Brown, Mike Morrison"
New England Golf Guide 2008,"John Dicocco, Mark T. Williams"
A guide for games,D. Cyril Joynson
Matty in the goal,Stuart Murray
Zoe the Skating Fairy,Daisy Meadows
Scottish sporting legends,Robert Philip
Current therapy in sports medicine--2,"Joseph S. Torg, R. Peter Welsh, Roy J. Shephard"
This or that sports debate,Michelle Schaub
Getting ahead,Lori Hile
The best American sports writing 2005,"Glenn Stout, Mike Lupica"
Probleme der Langzeitausdauer im Sport,Siegfried Israel
Leading Cases In Sports Law,Jack Anderson
Snowshoeing In The Canadian Rockies,Andrew Nugara
The Rose Bowl,Michelle L. Turner
Funktionelle Anatomie,Hans-Joachim Appell
The regulation of sport in the European Union,"Barbara Bogusz, Adam Jan Cygan, Erika M. Szyszczak"
The encyclopaedia of athletics,Melvyn Francis Watman
Blazing trails,"John Mackey, John Mackey, Thom Loverro"
God's game plan,Fellowship of Christian Athletes
Sport in the socio-cultural process,Mabel Marie Hart
"The best American sports writing, 1992",Thomas McGuane
Extreme landscapes of leisure,Patrick Laviolette
Sports question and answer book,Bill Adler Sr
The paralympic athlete,Yves Vanlandewijck
Notational analysis of sport,M. Hughes
The Tour de France companion,"Bob Roll, Dan Koeppel"
Key themes in youth sport,Ken Green
The sporting life and other trifles,"Lynd, Robert"
Gladiators,"Eric Payson, Mia Fineman, Mark Holborn"
Sports and society,Scott Witmer
Sports for the handicapped,George T. Stafford
Mexican American baseball in Los Angeles,Francisco E. Balderrama
The Lost Lemon mine,"Dan Riley, James B. Butler, Roland Maw"
The complete guide to North American freshwater game fishing,"Henry Waszczuk, Henry Waszczuk, Italo Labignan"
Where Cleveland played,Morris Eckhouse
Francesca the Football Fairy,Daisy Meadows
Sports economics,Roger D. Blair
What it means to be a Wolverine,"Kevin Allen, Art Regner, Nate Brown"
50 great moments in Pittsburgh sports,David M. Shribman
Korrika,Teresa del Valle
Man-to-Man,Bill Swan
Cross Training Manual,Gordon Thiessen
Sports quotes,"Bob Abel, Michael Valenti"
Sports marketing agreements,Ian S. Blackshaw
Best American Sports Writing 2011,Jane Leavy
Beyond the Mountain,Steve House
Soccer,Suzanne Bazemore
The problem of pleasure,Dominic Erdozain
"Athletic injuries, prevention, diagnosis and treatment","Thorndike, Augustus"
"Sport, theory, and social problems","Anderson, Eric"
Sport in contemporary society,D. Stanley Eitzen
Sports,Tim Delaney
Strong cigars and lovely women,John Lardner
Law of professional and amateur sports,Gary A. Uberstine
Walks & rambles on Cape Cod and the islands,"Ned Friary, Glenda Bendure"
Sport in classic times,"Butler, Alfred Joshua"
Basic issues in sports ethics,Tommy Boone
al-Riyāḍah al-jamāhīrīyah,Muḥammad Riḍā Ṭulbah
Taking freshwater game fish,"Todd Swainbank, Eric Seidler"
The Great Book Of Chicago Sports Lists,Ed Sherman
Sidelined,Trevor Kew
The Duke of Havana,"Steve Fainaru, Ray Sanchez"
The Best American Sports Writing 2002,"Glenn Stout, Rick Reilly"
Sports quotations,Andrew J. Maikovich
Women and exercise,"Mona M. Shangold, Gabe Mirkin"
The Jew in American sports,Harold Uriel Ribalow
Curve ball,John Danakas
First editions of the works of esteemed authors and book illustrators of the XIX th century,Maggs Bros
Sport in the sociocultural process,"Susan Birrell, Mabel Marie Hart, Marie Hart"
Foundations of sport management,Andy Gillentine
The complete guide to paintball,"Steve Davidson, Pete Robinson, Rob Rubin, Stew Smith, Jerry Braun"
Sports,Timothy J. Curry
Out of bounds,"Aaron Baker, Todd Boyd"
American sports poems,"R. Rozanne Knudson, May Swenson, R. R. Knudson"
Transatlantic sport,"Carlos Pestana Barros, Stefan Szymanski"
Hiking Great Smoky Mountains,"Rodney Albright, Priscilla Albright"
Youth culture and sport,Michael D. Giardina
Handbook of sports and media,Jennings Bryant
The U.S. Women's Soccer Team,Clemente A. Lisi
No Fear,
Bless you boys,"Sparky Anderson, Dan Ewald"
Sport et santé,"Université sportive d'été (26th 2008 Strasbourg, France)"
McGoorty,"Byrne, Robert, Danny McGoorty, Robert Byrne"
Gujarātanā ramatavīro,Jagadīśa Binīvāle
100 hikes in the North Cascades,"Ira Spring, Harvey Manning"
Kapap combat concepts,"Avi Nardia, Albert Timen"
Tai Chi for every body,"Eva Koskuba, Karel Koskuba"
International Handbook On The Economics Of Mega Sporting Events,Wolfgang Maennig
"Harley-Davidson racing, 1934-1986",Allan Girdler
Reading sport,"Susan Birrell, Mary G. McDonald"
Kids in sports,Kirsten Hall
The History of the Mayan Ball League,Matthew Hanlon
Samantha the Swimming Fairy,Daisy Meadows
International Encyclopaedia of Laws,Roger Blanpain
Game of my life,"Rick Scoppe, Rick Scoppe, Charlie Bennett"
Onward Christian athletes,Tom Krattenmaker
Sports,David G. McComb
Sport and travel in India and Central America,A. G. Bagot
I Catores,Otto Senoner
Fish flies,"Terry Hellekson, Wanda Prunty"
Fool hen blues,"E. Donnall Thomas, E. Thomas, Donnall E. Thomas"
God and the Goalposts,Ori Z. Soltes
Sports of Santa Cruz County,Geoffrey Dunn
Sport and social exclusion in global society,"R. F. J. Spaaij, Ruth Jeanes, Jonathan Magee"
Sports officials and officiating,Clare MacMahon
Townsend,Missy Tipton Green
SIGHTLINES,Simon Inglis
Better Great Than Never,Lindsay Dare Shoop
Mediale Verwertung von Sportveranstaltungen,Jessica Sänger
Los Angeles sports memories,Doug Krikorian
When Mexicans Could Play Ball,Ignacio M. García
Ultimate Hidden Pictures,Tony 'Anthony' Tallarico
Ultimate Guide to Wilderness Living,"John McPherson, Geri McPherson"
Old Boston boys and the games they played,James D'Wolf Lovett
Lords of the Ring,Doug Moe
A cross-cultural analysis of achievement motivation in sport and the classroom,Joan Lynne Duda
English sports and pastimes,Christina Hole
Shakespeare as an angler,Henry Nicholson Ellacombe
How Fantasy Sports Explains the World,"A. J. Mass, Matthew Berry"
Life Cycles,Julian Sayarer
Sports Through the Lens of Economic History,"Richard Pomfret, John K. Wilson"
Meaning and Spirituality in Sport and Exercise,"Noora J. Ronkainen, Mark S. Nesti"
Sales and Revenue Generation in Sport Business,"David J. Shonk, James F. Weiner"
Parenting the Pure Athlete,Britt Lee
Hooked,Kevin Markham
Art of Casting a Fly,"Paul Argentini, Vera C. Argentini"
Study Skills for Sports Studies,Tara Magdalinski
Lawrence Grassi,"Elio Costa, Gabriele Scardellato"
Bodies Built for Game,Natalie Diaz
Alabama,Mari Kesselring
Native Hoops,Wade Davies
The boxing champion,Roch Carrier
Sport and Tourism,Mike Weed
Hey Rube,Hunter S. Thompson
Sports and Modernity in Late Imperial Ethiopia,Katrin Bromber
Sport and Sustainable Development,"Stavros Triantafyllidis, Cheryl Mallen"
Make the Leap Think Better Workbook,"Bryan Green, Nadine Denten"
Micky-San Part I,Ferguson
Stathead Sports Classroom Collection,"Eric Braun, Hans Hetrick, Michael Bradley"
Baseball Story,Ted Orr
Go Fore It!,"Christopher Everett, Kimberly Everett"
Parcells,Carlo DeVito
"Zur Ökonomik Von Sport, Entertainment und Medien","Oliver Budzinski, Justus Haucap, Annika Stöhr, Dirk Wentzel"
Onderzoeksmethoden Voor Sportstudies,Chris Gratton
Baseball in Occupied Japan,Takeshi Tanikawa
Martial Arts Extraordinaire Biography Book : 50 Years of Martial Arts Excellence,Jessie Bowen
Handbook of Sports and Media,"Arthur A. Raney, Jennings Bryant"
Raised a Warrior,Susie Petruccelli
An almanac of twelve sports,"Nicholson, William Sir"
Sweat,Sarah Kivel
Duke,Carlos Acevedo
Big Snooze,Cornelius Peter
No Te Puedes Rendir Pedrito Simplemente No Puedes,"Tasche Laine, Valdez, Peter, 3rd, Mei Mei Leonard, Araceli Romero"
QWERTYUIOP,Rafael Sánchez Ferlosio
Fan in Chief,Nicholas Evan Sarantakes
Football Thesaurus,"Jesse Goldberg-Strassler, Kevin Harlan"
In Pursuit of Excellence. Be Strong--Be True,Thomas L. Renner
Unheralded,Brent Melloy
When the Forgotten Borough Reigned,Jeff Ingber
Sleepiest Football Fan,"Luke Holizna, Josh DeAugustine, Hannah Hoang, Hien Nguyen"
Game Changer SK-11,"Richard Kendrick, Wendy Strain"
Fit At Any Age : ,Susan Niebergall
Social issues in sport,Mike Sleap
"Sport, Gender and Development","Lyndsay M. C. Hayhurst, Holly Thorpe, Megan Chawansky"
Football FAQ,Dave Thompson
Unmasked,Turia Pitt
Goose and Tomtom,David Rabe
European Heroes,Richard Holt
Legislación deportiva,Spain.
"Sport, Rules and Values",Graham Mcfee
The best St. Louis sports arguments,Bryan Burwell
Sports Culture,Ellis Cashmore
The Uses of Sport,Marcus Free
Athletics and football,"Shearman, Montague Sir"
Official languages in the Canadian sport system,Canada. Office of the Commissioner of Official Languages.
Don'T Step On The Foul Line,George Sullivan
Peak Performance,David R. Kauss
The American dream and the national game,Leverett T. Smith
Psychology in Practice,Barbara Woods
Great names in sports,Martin Buskin
The field book,W. H. (William Hamilton) Maxwell
Intramural-recreational sports,Pat Mueller
"Fun, health, fitness","Gitter, Wolfgang."
Seabiscuit,"Brainerd Kellogg Beckwith, B. K. Beckwith, Howard Brodie, Grantland Rice"
The backpacker's handbook,Hugh McManners
Clifford's Sports Day (Clifford the Big Red Dog),Norman Bridwell
Games and sports in Shakespeare,Paul G. Brewster
It's Not Over 'til it's Over,Al Silverman
Life-time sports for the college student,Eugene R. Fox
"Physical education activities, sports, and games",Louis Edgar Means
The sports and pastimes of the people of England from the earliest period,Joseph Strutt
"Les sports au Québec, 1879-1975",Ghislaine Houle
Notre Dame from Rockne to Parseghian,Francis Wallace
"A history of Yale athletics, 1840-1888",Richard M. Hurd
Child in sport and physical activity,"National Conference on the Child in Sport and Physical Activity Queen's University, Kingston, Ont. 1973."
History of Photography,Peter Turner
The dictionary of sports,Parke Cummings
The trainer's bible,S. E. Bilik
Official Rules of Sports & Games,Reginald Moore
Standard nomenclature of athletic injuries,"American Medical Association. Committee on the Medical Aspects of Sports. Subcommittee on Classification of Sports Injuries., American Medical Association. Committee on the Medical Aspects of Sports. Subcommittee on Classification of Sports Injuries"
NFL's greatest,"Phil Barber, DK Publishing, National Football League., Steve Sabol"
Pretty good for a girl,Leslie Heywood
Olympia,Ulrich Sinn
Peak Performance...and More,Robert N. Singer
Sport science,Peter J. Brancazio
"Play, games, and sport",Kathleen Blake
Idiots Revisited,Ian Browne
Fast Pitch,"Tim Martin, James Creighton"
5 Angles,"Phil Elmore, Corey Freeman, Delo, Frank, Jr."
MVP Hands Catching Drills Manual,"Bill Thierfelder, John Thierfelder"
Winning Ingredient,Kelly Swan Taylor
Secrets of a Champion Student-Athlete,Obadele Thompson
Sail the World?,David Rich
Driveway Hoops,"Jonathan Halpert, Sari Kopitnikoff, Andrea Ptak"
Winners and Losers,"Gajendra K. Verma, Douglas S. Darby"
Slater the Skater,"Cynthia Lamb, Joshua Pilote, Dorothy Lawyer"
Paul Runyans Book for Senior Golfers,"Paul Runyan, Rachel Gualco"
Peter the Skier,"Cynthia Lamb, Joshua Pilote, Dorothy Lawyer"
"Rise Resolute, Little Hearts",Gina Meyer
Sport and Adventure Tourism,Simon Hudson
Pure Sport,"John Kremer, John Kremer"
Leave no trace,Will Harmon
Seventy-Five,"Mfundishi Jhutyms Salim, Shirley Ann Burbank, Bernice Devotice (Mann) Stephens-Miller, Dave Heeren"
They Lurk in the Murk,Gage Peters
First Sports Source,"Tyler Omoth, Tracy Maurer, Danielle S. Hammelef"
MVP Hands,"Bill Thierfelder, John Thierfelder"
The Driftwood Legacy,"Phil Livingston, Jim Morris"
History of Sport in Britain 1880-1914 V4,Martin Polley
The break dance kids,Lillian Morrison
Bless.ed One,James Roth
Golden Gladiator,Michael Lynch
Against All Odds : The Donnie Hixon Story,"Stan Byrdy, Donnie Hixon"
Soccer,Dylan Joseph
Opportunities in sports and fitness careers,"William Ray Heitzmann, Wm. Ray Heitzmann"
Opportunities in sports and athletics,William Ray Heitzmann
We Are Not Born Failures,Moises Linares
Time to Fight,"Dana-Susan Crews, Bill Crews"
Miracle of Their Own,Keith Gave
Tigers and Their Den,John McCollister
High School Basketball on Maryland's Eastern Shore,Mitchell Northam
Office Olympics,Tom Hay
Story of the Masters,David Barrett
Football feuds,"Ken Rappoport, Barry Wilner"
Reining,"Al Dunning, Pat Close"
Pediatric sports medicine for primary care,"Richard B. Birrer, Bernard Griesemer, Mary B Cataletto"
Mental Toughness Training for Teenage Athletes,Sandy Bain
Political Expression in Sport,Abanazir
Dynamite on the Diamond,Donald B. Lucas
Porter the Longboarder,"Cynthia Lamb, Joshua Pilote, Dorothy Lawyer"
New Game Plan a Transitional Guide to Life after Sports,"Destiny Price, Jada Pollard, Kayla Hunter, Renita Price"
Sport Under Communism,James Riordan
Pioneers of Minnesota Motocross,Bob Chase
The Accidental Hero,John Stivers
Supersports,Helen Greathead
The Baby Blitz,Lex Martin
Behind-The-Scenes Pro Sports Careers,Danielle S. Hammelef
Sport of Rock Climbing,Anna DiGilio
Sport of Caving,Anna DiGilio
I Can See for Miles,Hollie Stuart
World Cup Soccer Drills,Chest Dugger
A Game of Brawl,Bill Felber
Dynamics of strength training and conditioning,"Gary T. Moran, George McGlynn"
Taking the Crazy Out of Youth Sports,Rick Keltner
Waffle Story,Natalie Kerrigan
George Weah,"Sieh, Rodney, 1st"
Age of Palmer,Patrick Hand
Hustle and Have Fun! a Coach's Guide to Winning over Players and Parents,Greg Gutterman
Strive for Excellence,Melisa Torres
Hang The Banner,"Joey Diovisalvi, Kolby Tullier, Steve Steinberg, Butch Harmon"
Legendary Maestros,"Sultan Zeshan, Desirée A. Ross"
Top Game,Gordon Ryan
Don Gambril-A Coach with a Heart,Burt Kanner
Bone games,Rob Schultheis
Little Brown Jug,"Ken Magee, Jon M. Stevens, Glenn E. &quot;Shemy&quot; Schembechler III"
Introduction to kinesiology,"Michael G. Wade, John A. W. Baker"
Barrel racing,"Sharon Camarillo, Darrell Arnold, Randy Witte"
The perceptions of sport management students toward the marketability of professional athletes,Dina Gentile
A descriptive analysis of sports commissions in the United States,Barry Lee Pennell
A comparison of former scholastic athletes and nonathletes on self-concept and selected life adjustment correlates,Robert Jeffrey Higgins
The effects of crowding and observation of athletic events on spectator tendency toward aggressive behavior,Joseph X. Lennon
Sport club participation,Denise A. Denomme
An analysis of the positivistic and naturalistic paradigms for inquiry,Kimberley Klint
The identification of role strain and coping responses among intercollegiate baseball and softball non-starters,Themy-Jo Adachi
A confirmatory factor analysis of the Precompetitive stress inventory,Gregory Edward Bonner Petersen
"An organizational approach to the study of productivity, efficiency, and satisfaction of AAA high-school basketball teams",Marc-Andre Gilbert
"Competition, exercise, provocation, and verbal comments",David Laurence Miller
Sex differences in sport involvement,Lorna Jeanne Hightower
Sports as finite provinces of meaning,K. Gail Whitaker
Sport sponsorship in Canada,Robert P. Copeland
The incidence of secondary amenorrhea in athletes and non-athletes,Sue Gray Fisher
"The "" peak experience"" as it relates to sport",Virginia Anne Martens
Sport as an aesthetic experience,Jean Louis Poirot
"Collegiate soccer players' perceptions of sport psychology, sport psychologists and sport psychological services",Nicholas Clive Francis
A semantic differential study of group attitudes toward selected concepts in sport,Carl Vincent Flowers
Psychometric assessment of the Carolina Sport Confidence Inventory,Luis Gabriel Manzo
Baseball ballerina,Kathryn Cristaldi
Authentic letters from Upper Canada,T. W. Magrath
A bibliography of strength and basic muscle function in sport and industry,John Atha
Old Pink 'un days,"Booth, J. B."
Conceptual model for games teaching with focus on personal integration,Arlene Fay McGinn
The best of England,Horace Annesley Vachell
"The role of ego-involvement, objective outcome, and perceived performance in the determination of causal attributions",Kevin Stirling Spink
Sixgun Cartridges and Loads,Elmer Keith
HISTORY OF AUSTRALIAN CRICKET,"CHRIS HARTE, Chris Harte, Bernard Whimpress"
Great World Cup moments,Michael Hurley
All things being equal,"Lenny Moore, Lenny Moore, Jeffrey Jay Ellish"
Old English sports,Frederick William Hackwood
Self-efficacy in sport,"Deborah L Feltz, Deborah L. Feltz, Sandra Short, Philip Sullivan"
Fantastic Football Poems,John Foster
Fair play,Rudolf Kircher
Greatest athletes of the 20th century,"Tim Crothers, John Garrity"
Snowboard Duel,Jake Maddox
Mint Condition,Dave Jamieson
Boot Camp,"Eric Walters, Jerome Williams"
Becoming native in a foreign land,Gillian Poulter
Slam Dunk Shoes,Jake Maddox
Skate Park Challenge,Jake Maddox
Motocross Double-Cross,Jake Maddox
How the weather was,Roger Kahn
Issues in recreation and leisure,"Donald J. McLean, Donald J. McLean, Daniel G. Yoder"
Sukūru ranburu,Jin Kobayashi
Break point,"Vince Spadea, V. Spadea, D Markowitx"
Sport and society in Victorian Ireland,Tom Hunt
Sports facilities,Greater London and South East Sports Council.
Palio and ponte,William Heywood
Histoire de la locomotion terrestre,"Dollfus, Charles."
Edexcel Sport Examined,John Taylor
Bread of heaven,"Ieuan Evans, Ieuan Evans, Peter Jackson"
Analysis techniques of ground reaction force vectors for cutting maneuvers,Howard Philip Davis
Hosting the Olympic Games,John Rennie Short
Sports Fans 2.0,David M. Sutera
Stadium Century,"Lewis, Robert W."
Handbook of Sports Studies,"Jay J. Coakley, Eric Dunning"
Sex Testing,Lindsay Pieper
"Sport, Culture and Nation",Kausik Bandyopadhyay
Behind the Silver Fern,"Johnson, Tony, Lynn McConnell"
They Will Have Their Game,Kenneth Cohen
I Wore Babe Ruth's Hat,David W. Zang
Sidelined,Simon Henderson
Richie,"Ian Heads, Norman Tasker"
Declaration of Independents,Keith Mills
"AthleticEnhancement, Human Nature and Ethics","Jan Tolleneer, Sigrid Sterckx, Pieter Bonte"
Sports Performance Measurement and Analytics,Lorena Martin
Pick-Up Games,Deborah Crisfield
Battle-Tested Teammate,Blake Williams
12 Athletes with Disabilities,Joanne Mattern
Hockey Records,Anthony K. Hewson
Fishing the Canadian Rockies,Joey Ambrosi
Build Your Swing,Jim McLean
Rebel with a Cause,"Danny Tarkanian, Christina Debusk, Rodney Miles"
"Animation, Sport and Culture",P. Wells
Sport and Moral Conflict,William J. Morgan
Before Social Media,Susan E. Hamen
Handbook of Ratings,"Alexander Karminsky, Andrey Polozov"
Surveilling and Securing the Olympics,Vida Bajc
Hiking Rocky Mountain National Park,"Erik Stensland, Janna Nyswander, Jerry Dorris, Shawn Wignall"
What Are the Paralympic Games?,"Gail Herman, Who HQ, Andrew Thomson"
The Single Plane Golf Swing,"Todd Graves, Tim O'Connor"
Sports in Higher Education,Gary Sailes
What It Takes to Be a Pro Football Player,Joanne Mattern
The Constraints-Led Approach,Ian Renshaw
What It Takes to Be a Pro Hockey Player,Kaitlyn Duling
What It Takes to Be a Pro Lacrosse Player,Kaitlyn Duling
What It Takes to Be a Pro Basketball Player,Joanne Mattern
The Science of Golf Putting,"Gonçalo Dias, Micael S. Couceiro"
21st Century Jocks,E. Anderson
God's girls in sports,Holly Page
Amusements and sports in American life,"Weaver, Robert B."
Harry Redknapp,Les Roopanarine
The Fit Shall Inherit the Earth,Erik W. Dailey
Stamford Sports,Stamford Historical Society
Tennis Science,"Bruce Elliott, Machar Reid, Miguel Crespo"
Sports Ethics for Sports Management Professionals,"Patrick K. Thornton, Walter T. Champion Jr., Lawrence S. Ruddell"
Sport Leadership in the 21st Century,"Laura J. Burton, Gregory M. Kane, John F. Borland"
Football and Management,S. Soderman
Warnings against Myself,David Stevenson
"Sport, Protest and Globalisation","Jon Dart, Stephen Wagg"
"Sports, sin and subversion",Evan X. Hyde
Baseball's Best Rookies,Russ Cohen
Little Evil,"Jens Pulver, Erich Krauss"
"Charlie Chaplin's Comic Capers, Series 1, No. 315","Stuart Wallace Carothers, Warren & Ramsey, Elzie Crisler Segar"
Sports Girls,"Fiona Watt, Vicky Arrowsmith, Lorraine Beurton-Sharp"
Sports Law,"David Thorpe, Antonio Buti, Chris Davies, Saul Fridman, Paul Jonson"
A brief theology of sport,Lincoln Harvey
Sport Finance,"Gil Fried, Timothy DeSchriver, Michael Mondello"
What It Takes to Be a Pro Baseball Player,Joanne Mattern
12 Astounding Athletic Feats,Samantha S. Bell
Computer Vision in Sports,"Thomas B. Moeslund, Thomas, Graham, Adrian Hilton"
Soccer Records,Paul D. Bowker
Football Records,Anthony K. Hewson
Girl and the Game,M. Ann Hall
"Science of Basketball with Max Axiom, Super Scientist","Nikole Brooks Bethea, Maurizio Campidelli"
Pierre Bourdieu and Physical Culture,"lisahunter, Wayne Smith, Elke Emerald"
"Race, Gender and Sport","Aarti Ratna, Samaya F. Samie"
Reversing Urban Decline,Mark S. Rosentraub
Fix Is In,Brian Tuohy
Routledge Handbook of Tennis,"Stephen Wagg, Carol Osborne, Robert J. Lake"
Sport and Politics,Alan Bairner
Learning to Mentor in Sports Coaching,Fiona C. Chambers
Elite Youth Cycling,Alfred Nimmerichter
Core Four,Phil Pepe
Torn,"Joy Werner, Doug Werner"
Football wit,Aubrey Malone
Lakota Hoops,Alan Klein
On the Job in the Game,"Jessica Cohn, Lauren Scheuer"
Wilson Puck,Peter Simeti
Best American Sports Writing 2013,"Glenn Stout, J. R. Moehringer"
Small Book of Hip Checks,Erica Rand
Sidelined,Julie DiCaro
Smokey,Thomas J. Mattingly
Abounding Joy,"Ian McDonald, Clem Seecharan"
In Pursuit of Excellence,Terry Orlick
New Perspectives on Sport Volunteerism,"Berit Skirstad, Alison Doherty, Vassil Girginov"
Ohio State Buckeyes Fans' Bucket List,Zack Meisel
Breaking Barriers,Hans Hetrick
Sport and Contested Identities,"David Hassan, Ciaran Acton"
"Physical Culture, Ethnography and the Body","Michael D. Giardina, Michele K. Donnelly"
Sport in Iceland,Vidar Halldorsson
"Sport, Events, Tourism and Regeneration","Nicholas Wise, Harris, John"
Fastest Men on Earth,Neil Duncanson
Impact of Technology on Sport II,"Franz Konstantin Fuss, Aleksandar Subic, Sadayuki Ujihashi"
"Life, Liberty, and the Pursuit of United",Gary B. France
Sport scuba diving in depth,"Griffiths, Tom, Tom Griffiths"
Fair play,Robert L. Simon
Advances in the Economics of Sport,Gerald W. Scully
The economics of leisure and sport,Andrew Cooke
"Sport, Culture and Society",Grant Jarvie
Shift,Walter Beede
Generation Zero,Hal Phillips
Heidelberg,"Robert Gaines, Andrew Heidelberg"
Sports Set Me Free,Jeanna Stallkamp
A risky prescription,Sandy Stiefer
Good sports,Rick Wolff
Olympic gold,Philippa Perry
The classical rider,Sylvia Loch
Sports Illustrated Great Baseball Writing,Editors of Sports Illustrated
Super 7,"Al ""Bubba"" Baker"
Delmar the Dinky and the Olympics,Patricia Danna
HowExpert Guide to Triathlons,"HowExpert, Max Stoneking"
Coach,Barnes Hauptfuhrer
Sports Illustrated 50 Years of Great Writing,Editors of Sports Illustrated
Win Isn't Always on the Scoreboard,Jaden Mickey
GOLF Magazine's Big Book of Basics,GOLF Magazine
Morse Code,Brendan Buckley
"Sports Performance--Analysis, Skills, Conditions, Training, and Human Factors",Jerry B. Holtz
Golf,"Dick Beach, Bob Ford"
Drover and the zebras,Bill Granger
Just do it,Donald R. Katz
Chui!,"Lou Hallamore, Bruce Woods"
Children and Sport,Vivian Grisogono
Precipice of Life,"Bo Parfet, Kathy Sparrow, Greg Voisen"
Psychology in contemporary sport,Bryant J. Cratty
Total Shotmaking,Fred Couples
All about flies,"Chuck Tryon, Sharon Tryon, Chuck  Figuring Out Flies Tryon"
The sociology of sport,"Conrad C. Vogler, Stephen E. Schwartz"
What to do and how to do it,Daniel Carter Beard
Canoe racing,"Peter Heed, Dick Mansfield"
"Managing physical education, fitness, and sports programs",Jim H. Railey
Sport and society,Hilmi Ibrahim
Verbandsmacht und einstweiliger Rechtsschutz,Fritz Nicklisch
The Life of Senna,Tom Rubython
Sports technology,Ron Fridell
Selecting the dressage horse,"Dirk Willem Rosie, Anky van Grunsven"
"Fishing Maryland, Delaware, and Washington, D.C","Martin Freed, Ruta Vaskys"
How to coach youth baseball,"Beverly Carroll, Kevin O'Brien, Fran O'Brien"
The Folkboat Story,Dieter Loibner
Encyclopedia of modern bodybuilding,"Arnold Schwarzenegger, Bill Dobbins"
Careers in pro sports,Cordner Nelson
Career Transitions in Sport,Paul Wylleman
Athletic scholarships,David Lahey
El Arte de La Guerra / The Art of War,"Stephen F. Kaufman, Sun Tzu"
Beginning qigong,"Steven Kuei, Stephen Comee"
Sites of Sport,P. Vertinsky
When the game is on the line,"Richard B. Horrow, Lary Bloom"
Native Americans in Sports,"C. Richard King - undifferentiated, C. Richard King"
Willie John,"Willie John McBride, BILLS, MCBRIDE"
"Sport, Health and Drugs",I. Waddington
The Making of a Gymnast,Hawthorn
Crash Course (Hover Car Racer),Matthew Reilly
Detroit,David  Lee  Poremba
The Sports Funding Guide,Nicola Eastwood
The Boston book of sports,Mathew R. Sgan
"Law, sport activity, and risk management",Robert W. Koehler
Make the big time where you are,Frosty Westering
L'enseignement des jeux sportifs collectifs,Claude Bayer
Jacques Villeneuve,"Gianni Giansanti, Jacques Villeneuve"
Inline Skating (Extreme Sports),Steve Glidewell
All the good in sports,Mike Sandrolini
"Sweet Charlie, Dike, Cazzie, and Bobby Joe",Taylor H. A. Bell
Sports science,Libby Mooney
"Sport, physical activity and T.V. role models",Dennis Hrycaiko
The education of a tennis player,Rod Laver
More Than Just a Game,Kathryn Jay
Professional sports & the law,Lionel S. Sobel
Diversity in Sport Organizations,George B. Cunningham
The Coach's Guide to Real Winning,John L. Shannon
Sports Science Handbook,Simon P.R. Jenkins
Team Sports Marketing,Kirk Wakefield
Biomechanical Evaluation of Movement in Sport and Exercise,Carl Payton: Ro
Group Dynamics in Exercise and Sport Psychology,Mark Beauchamp:
Imaging of Sports Injuries,"L. A. Williams, Williams, Arnold."
Complete Index to Sports Illustrated,Fred Bayoff
Peak performance,Donna Shryer
Seventy Years of BBC Sport,John Inverdale
A question of sport,Hazel Lewthwaite
Ballparks,"Marc Sandalow, Jim Sutton"
Simplify Your Riding,Wendy Murdoch
The joy of sports,"Novak, Michael."
Racing Crew,"Malcolm McKeag, Bill Edgerton"
"Deadly, unna?",Phillip Gwynne
Sport,Tim Harris
A Game of Polo with a Headless Goat,Emma Levine
Jack Arute's tales from the Indy 500,"Jack Arute, Jenna Fryer"
Careers in sport,Chris Middleton
Entertainment and sports law,Graham Henderson
DiMaggio,"Morris Engelberg, Marv Schneider"
The new encyclopedia of knots,Derek E. Avery
From Surtees to Sassoon,"Darton, F. J. Harvey"
Vince Carter,Mark Stewart
Sports For Life,Robin Roberts
The relationship of self concept to physical skill and athletic participation,Bradley Marvin Black
The art of coarse golf,"Michael Green, Michael Green"
Moral development levels of athletes in sport specific and general social situations,Elizabeth Ray Hall
They also saw a game,Donald Scott Andrews
An investigation of sports marketing contingency competencies,Peter Smolianov
"Expressed values of varsity football players, intramural football players, and nonfootball players",Martin James Lee
A cross-cultural analysis of achievement motivation in sport and the classroom,Joan L. Duda
A developmental analysis of competitive orientation in team sports and individual sports,Thomas A. Crawford
Beyond positivist sport pedagogy,Euichang Choi
The sportsman in Canada,Frederic Tolfrey
Television coverage of sport,Roy Peters
Health and sports program,Canada. Task Force on Program Review.
Bing bai Hancheng,Yu Zhao
Sport marketing across the spectrum,Sport Marketing Association. Conference
English sports and pastimes,"Hole, Christina"
"Put me in, coach",Laurie A. Richter
The Berkshire Hills,Federal Writers' Project of the Works Progress Administration of Massachusetts.
Soccer training,"Hans Studener, H. Studener, W. Wolf"
The coach's guide to game-winning softball drills,"Michele Smith, Michele Smith, Lawrence Hsieh"
Recueil des sentences du TAS,Court of Arbitration for Sport.
Aesthetics of sport,Nancy Gayle Wulk
Building a bridge between athletics and academics,John R. Kilbourne
Adolescent motives for participating in the 1993 Summer National Youth Sports Program at Washington State University,Tracy L. Thomas
Motivation and sport involvement,Peter Donnelly
Quest for excitement,"Norbert Elias, Eric Dunning"
A hard road toglory,Arthur Ashe
The effects of coping skills on physiological and cognitive adaptation to a high risk activity,Debra Anne Lewis
The young folk's cyclopædia of games and sports,John Denison Champlin
The Guv'nor tapes,"Peter Gerrard, Peter Gerrard, Lenny McLean"
Traumatologie du sport,R. G. Danowski
Field of schemes,"Neil DeMause, Neil deMause, Joanna Cagan"
Öffentliche Förderung des Sports,Mathias Langer
"Hunting, racing, coaching & boxing ballads",George Algernon Fothergill
Media relations in sport,"William Nichols, William Nichols, Patrick Moynahan, Allan Hall, Janis Taylor"
The best Philadelphia sports arguments,Eric Karabell
The best Bay Area sports arguments,Cam Inman
Bridge of Pain,Dimitry Salchev
Black Spruce Stream,"Brad Burns, Luther Hall"
150 Years of the Braves,"Bradsher Hayes, Tiffany Drawdy, Gerald Shaw, Joe Chatman"
Girls Can!,Ashleigh Abney
On the Hunt,Sommer Willis
. . . And Then God Created Golf,"James R Bolley, Honor Books"
The Golfer's Zoo,"Shane Bacon, James Sitar"
Coaching T-Ball,Jerry Baseball
Unconquerable,Boris Starling
Leaving Eastern Parkway,Matthew Daub
Eat to win,"Haas, Robert"
"Try Again, Tommy",A. L. Guion
Tribal Identities,J. A. Mangan
Making European Masculinities,J. A. Mangan
Brand Fans,"Aaron C. T. Smith, Constantino Stavros, Kate Westberg"
Complete aikido,"Roy Suenaka, Christopher Watson"
Cubs Fan's Guide to Happiness,"Ellis, George"
Cheerleader Girl Roxy's Story,"Kara Douglass Thom, Pamela Seatter, Susan Brooke, Jodi Norgaard"
Runner Girl Ella's Story,"Kara Douglass Thom, Pamela Seatter, Susan Brooke, Jodi Norgaard"
Swimmer Girl Suzi's Story,"Kara Douglass Thom, Pamela Seatter, Susan Brooke, Jodi Norgaard"
Sports,John R. Gerdy
The Cultural Politics of the Paralympic Movement,"Howe, David"
Chess Openings,Sasha Ivanov
Fremdwörter in der Italienischen Sportsprache,Gesine Seymer
Cultural Sport Psychology and Elite Sport in Singapore,Nicholas de Cruz
And Monkeys Threw Crap at Me,Gayne C. Young
Marco and I Want to Play Ball,"Jo Meserve Mach, Vera Lynne Stroup-Rentier, Mary Birdsell"
Williams,"Virginia Williams, Pamela Cockerill"
OE Wants It to Be Friday,"Jo Meserve Mach, Vera Lynne Stroup-Rentier, Mary Birdsell"
How He Played the Game,John Riley
Gabby Makes a Big Move,"Aisha Ward, Gabby Mallory, Lisa Irving, Christina Rudenko"
Sport in Society,Richard E. Lapchick
Sad Love,M. J. Fields
Surf Soup,Donna Kay Lau
Female Athletes,"Lena Koya, Laura La Bella"
Adaptive Sports and the Paralympic Games,Barbara Gottfried
Summer Olympics,Anna DiGilio
The Everyday Athlete,Art Trapotsis
Dream Jobs in Sports Equipment Design,Tracy Brown Hamilton
Dream Jobs in Sports Personnel,Carla Mooney
Blind Side,Kandi Steiner
Sports Rules,Elizabeth Moore
Dream Jobs in Sports Retail,Alison Downs
Are Some Sports Too Dangerous for Kids?,Amy B. Rogers
Dream Job As a Sports Statistician,Marty Gitlin
Mujeres en Los Deportes (Women in Sports),Katie Kawa
Joe Louis' How to Box,Joe Louis
"Donegal, Sligo and Leitrim",Adrian Hendroff
Winter Olympics,Anna DiGilio
Sports Stats and Stories,"Shane Frederick, Eric Braun"
Paralympics,Anna DiGilio
Dream Job As a Sports Agent,Mary-Lane Kamberg
Nine under Par,Tim Miller
Grammar All-Stars,"Doris Fisher, D. L. Gibbs, Scott Angle"
"My Dad, the Football Coach","Heath Hover, Ashley Hover, Kenny Kiernan"
Lacrosse,Cathleen Small
Willis and the Magic Stick,"Rod Allison, Trisha Mason Waters, Denver City Lax"
Battle-Tested Leader,Blake Williams
Winner Takes All,"Hans Hetrick, Martin Gitlin, Mary E. Schulte"
Evaluation in Sport and Leisure,"Andrew Adams, Kevin Harris"
Kids' Guide to Sports Ethics,"Christopher Forest, McConnell, Robert L."
Laugh in the Face of Adversity,"Gavin Johns, Buddy Bell, Rosie Wilson, Lucy Scripts"
IN DEFENSE OF...,J. P. Prag
AS/A2 PE/Sport Studies,N. Wiggens-James
Action Shooting: Cowboy Style,John Taffin
Country and the Club,"David Pinkowski, Steam Bell Publishing"
Edge,Theta
Mount Whitney,"Thompson, Doug., Doug Thompson, Elisabeth Newbold"
Think Like a Champion Mental Toughness,Chris Nwani
Adventures of a Landlocked Diver,Roger Roth
Big-bore handguns,John Taffin
Touchdown,"Gerald Gems, Gertrud Pfister"
Camping British Columbia and Yukon,Jayne Seagrave
Teamball,Barnes Hauptfuhrer
My First Duck Hunt,"Beverly King, Bex Sutton, Nadara Merrill"
Sport of Scuba Diving,Anna DiGilio
Picturing the Workers' Olympics and the Spartakiads,Przemys&#322;aw Stro&#380;ek
Fly Patterns of British Columbia,Arthur James Lingren
Rogers Park Golf Course,"Lionel Ballard, Ersula K. Odom"
Better at the Broken Places,Jeffrey Pickering
Hidden Secrets and Treasures of Having Fun on and Around the Ski Slopes,Herbert K. Naito
Sports Card Collector 101,Beto Salinas
Avalanche Dreams,Louis Dawson
Catch a FLORIDA KEYS Grand Slam,Thompson Smith
Siya Kolisi,Jeremy Daniel
Stadiums,"Virginia Loh-Hagan, Tamara Ryan"
Teammate Tuesdays Volume V,Lance Loya
Kayak Isle Royale,Juniper Lauren Ross
Kerry Way,Donal Nolan
You Are More Than Your Score,Dan Shenk
Beara and Sheep's Head Peninsulas,Adrian Hendroff
Story of Thomond Park,"Charlie Mulqueen, Brendan O'Dowd"
GAA and Revolution in Ireland 1913-1923,Gearóid Ó Tuathaigh
Skydiving,Anna DiGilio
Flies for trout,"Dick Stewart, Farrow Allen"
Hidden Mathematics of Sport,"Rob Eastaway, John Haigh"
Sport Media Vectors,"Fazal Rizvi, Laurel Walzak, Danica Vidotto, Francesco Collura"
Athlete Activism,Gary Wiener
LIPSTICK FOOTBALL,Diana Weynand
Domer Dishes,"Lisa Kelly, Kay Clark-Uhles, James Ketara"
"Junga the Dancing Yeti in Yeti, Set, Go!",Stephen Tako
Double Dog Dare,Tracy Solheim
Everyone plays sports,Amy Popalis
Power Games,John Peter Sugden
In the red,Jade Gurss
Plná bedna šampaňského,Ota Pavel
The sweet spot in time,John Jerome
Winning isn't normal,Keith F. Bell
Sunday's heroes,"Richard Whittingham, Pat Summerall"
Training Essentials for Ultrarunning- Second Edition,"Jason Koop, J. I. m. Rutberg, Corrine Malcolm"
An encyclopaedia of rural sports,"Blaine, Delabere P."
The sporting dictionary and rural repository of general information upon every subject appertaining to the sports of the field,"Taplin, William"
Playing the Field,Charles C. Euchner
Out of Play,Michael A. Messner
Hey Nineteen : ,Dana Alioto
New Steel,Chris Bystriansky
Play On,"Becky Zimmerman, Nancy Lohr, Veronica Scott, Oboh Moses"
Ski Bum,"Colin Clancy, Van Velzer Press"
Outdoorsman's Handbook,Clyde Ormond
Lucidity in Sports,"Stephanie Cunha, Lisa Lucchesi"
Striding Rough Ice,Gary Wright
HowExpert Guide to Scuba Diving,HowExpert
Sports injuries of the ankle and foot,Richard A. Marder
World Racing History,Jeffrey Berger
How to Create Fun for Children with Disabilities on the Ski Slopes,Herbert K. Naito
Capturing the moment,Barton Silverman
Teenage Hotrodders : Volume One,Retro Comic Reprints
Sports,Allen Guttmann
Running Cultures,John Bale
Sports geography,John Bale
Team handball,"Reita E. Clanton, Mary Phyl Dwight"
Elympics,X. J. Kennedy
Visual perception and Action in Sport,"Williams, A. M."
Social Psychology of Sport,Albert V. Carron
Norwich,Karen Crouse
Thoroughbred cycles,Mark Cramer
Tough Luck,R. D. Rosen
Why Michael Couldn't Hit,Harold L. Klawans
Mastering the art of free throw shooting,Adam Filippi
Hockey Strong,Todd Smith
Following Through,Herbert Warren Wind
Elmer Keith's Big Game Hunting,Elmer Keith
Game Changers,João Medeiros
Swing the Clubhead,Ernest Jones
Higher Love,Kit DesLauriers
The Best Sports Writing of Pat Jordan,Pat Jordan
Sports nutrition,"Ron J. Maughan, Louise Burke"
My Weird School Fast Facts,Dan Gutman
Ice 'n' go,Jenny Moshak
Beast,Jade Gurss
Rough Weather Seamanship for Sail and Power,Roger Marshall
Trends in communication,"Raymond Boyle, Deirdre Kevin"
Extreme Motorsports,Jeff Mapua
The Aboriginal Soccer Tribe,John Maynard
100 Things Syracuse Fans Should Know & Do Before They Die,Scott Pitoniak
The Anthropology of Sport,Niko Besnier
Kern County Sports Chronicles : ,Bryce Martin
100 Things Iowa State Fans Should Know & Do Before They Die,"Alex Halsted, Dylan Montz"
Rat,Jan Cheripko
Oregon Sports Stories : ,Bob Robinson
Dear Frank,W. Nikola-Lisa
Sports and Exercise Nutrition,William D. McArdle
Sport law,Linda A. Sharp
The girlfriend's guide to football,"Teena Dickerson, Chuck Brown"
The best Wisconsin sports arguments,Andy Kendeigh
Modern sport,"Boria Majumdar, Fan, Hong"
The athletic trainer's guide to psychosocial intervention and referral,"James Mensch, Gary M. Miller"
"Sport, the third millennium","Fernand Landry, Marc Landry"
Branded,Jason W. Lee
Sport and American society,George Harvey Sage
Diogenes discovers us,John Terence McGovern
Conshohocken and West Conshohocken sports,Jack Coll
Sedom ṿa-ʻAmorah 2,Shaʼul Aizenberg
Rowing,Niels H. Secher
Muye Dobo Tongji,"Chŏngjo King of Korea, Tŏng-mu Yi, Muye Dobo Tongji, Yi Duk-Moo, Park Je-Ga"
LIFE in sports,Richard Whittingham
Athletes at risk,"David Lamar Cook, Ray Tricker, David L. Cook"
Sport and sportsmen,Charles Stretton
Ready notes to accompany Foundations of physical education and sport,"Deborah A. Wuest, Charles A Bucher, Charles Bucher"
Clothesline Clues to Sports People Play,"Kathryn Heling, Deborah Hembrook"
Basketball,"Pat Head Summitt, Debby Jennings, Pat Summitt"
Sports law,Simon Gardiner
Post-Olympism?,John Bale
The 1900 Olympic Games,Bill Mallon
Sports (Around the World),Margaret C. Hall
Jackie Robinson,Joseph Dorinson
Sports management and administration,David C. Watt
Sport bibliography,
Embodied nation,Simon Creak
This book has balls,Michael Rapaport
Beyond Broadway Joe,Bob Lederer
Two Ton,Joseph Monninger
Boost!,Michael Bar-Eli
Reputational challenges in sport,"Andrew C. Billings, W. Timothy Coombs, Kenon A. Brown"
The Corpus Almanac's Canadian sports annual,
Classic Dolomite climbs,"Anette Köhler, Anette Kohler, Norbert Memmel"
Silver Spoon,Bennie Fowler
Hit the Dirt (Extreme Sports),Craig Robert Carey
Riding through,"Debbie McDonald, Nancy Jaffer"
The Caddie Was a Reindeer,Steve Rushin
Sports and Games of the 18th and 19th Centuries,Robert Crego
Dolphins and whales,"Maurizio Würtz, Maurizio Wurtz, Nadia Repetto"
The Sportsmen Of Changi,Kevin Blackburn
Tom Brady,Adrian Almonte
Trust the Grind,Jeremy Bhandari
More than a game,Con Houlihan
Sport,"Richard I. Cashman, Michael McKernan"
Hunger for More in Life,J. D. Tremblay
Level 3 Collection,"Melisa Torres, Daniel Ramos"
The ULTIMATE SOCCER DICTIONARY of American Terms,"John C. Harves, Neil E. Gillespie"
Academy II,T. Z Layton
The Dallas Cowboys encyclopedia,"Jim Donovan, Ken Sins, Frank Coffey"
"Mathematics in games, sports, and gambling",Ronald Gould
Sports-Based Health Interventions,"David Conrad, Alan White"
"Economics, management, and optimization in sports","Sergiy Butenko, Panos M. Pardalos"
Directory of graduate programs in applied sprot psychology,"Kevin L. Burke, Michael L. Sachs, Cassandra P. Smisson"
Legendary Major Leaguers,"Sultan Zeshan, Lorin Chasar"
Legendary Equestrians,"Sultan Zeshan, Lorin Chasar"
Jockey Young'Uns,"Sultan Zeshan, Lorin Chasar"
Dopingprävention,Karl-Heinrich Bette
Teammate Tuesdays Volume IV,Lance Loya
Journey to Discovering the Baller Within,The Ballers Magazine
Angels in the Ozarks,J. B. Hogan
Teammate Tuesdays Volume VI,Lance Loya
Jobs in Sports,A. W. Buckey
Book of Buckets,Ace Dynamo
Teammate Tuesdays,Lance Loya
Teammate Tuesdays Volume II,Lance Loya
Teammate Tuesdays Volume III,Lance Loya
WE Gear,Lance Loya
Writing lives in sport,"John Bale, Mette Krogh Christensen, Gertrud Pfister"
Chin Music,"Jack McKenna, Cynthia Gurin, James Raymond"
Rooting for the Home Team,Daniel A. Nathan
The Administrative Side of Coaching,Richard Leonard
Dark Trade,Donald McRae
Fanatic,Jim Gorant
Basic Athletic Training,"Kenneth E. Wright, William R. Whitehill"
To the Edge,Kirk Johnson
Wild river,P. J. Petersen
Tribal,Diane Roberts
Sports Science,Jim Wiese
Standing Eight,Adam Pitluk
Leisure and entertainment in America,Donna R. Braden
The brave athlete,Simon Marshall
Sundays will never be the same,Darrell Waltrip
Breaking the line,Samuel G. Freedman
Trizophrenia: inside the minds of a triathlete,Jef Mallett
Live to ride,Wayne Johnson
Broken,Fred M. Kray
Themes for educational gymnastics,"Williams, Jean, Jean Williams"
The art and science of sails,Tom Whidden
Conditioning for sport,N. J. Whitehead
Sports law,Michael J. Beloff
Sporting Injuries,"Peter Dornan, Richard J. Dunn"
Chess Endgame,Gregory Galaev
Sports injury handbook,Allan M. Levy
"Bulls, Bears, and Basketball",Chuck Thoele
The best American sports writing 2003,"Glenn Stout, H. G. Bissinger"
Below Zero (Extreme Sports),Craig Robert Carey
Sports Technology,Chris Edmundson
Things We Do,"Rachelle Kreisman, Tim Haggerty"
Jobs if You Like Sports,Charlotte Guillain
Soccer Diaries,Michael J. Agovino
From Jack Johnson to LeBron James,Chris Lamb
Water exercises,"Tomihiro Shimizu, Noriko Tachikawa"
Yolt,Gavin Class
Spiral,Lindsey Undlin
"Sports in Africa, Past and Present","Todd Cleveland, Tarminder Kaur, Gerard Akindes"
Looks Like We're Running,Dustin Riedesel
Secretariat and Man o' War,Charles Justice
Forbidden Golf From Communist Poland to PGA Pro,Jerry Chykowski
Pickleball Pals,"Anne Margaret Gunning, Baginda Adriansyah"
Dwayne's Big Decision,Jackson Jeffrey
Straightening the crooked horse,"Gabriele Rachen-Schoneich, Klaus Schoneich"
Juguemos,"Joshua Lawrence Patel Deutsch, Afzal Khan"
Small Town Boxer,Michael Suski
Swish,"Bill Martin Jr., Michael Sampson, Michael Chesworth"
"Game 7, 1986",Ron Darling
Kids Love Sports Crafts,"Joanna Ponto, Michele C. Hollow"
Stillpower,Garret Kramer
Sport sociology,"Peter Craig, Paul A. Beedie"
Physiologie du sport,Hugues Monod
The eight,Susan Saint Sing
The Spartan Sports Encyclopedia,Jack Seibold
Sports Sabotage,"Franklin W. Dixon, Scott Burroughs"
Facing the extreme,"Ruth Anne Kocour, Michael Hodgson"
Undefeated,"Bob Griese, Brian Griese, Jim Denney"
The Domino Diaries,Brin-Jonathan Butler
Running with the champ,Tim Shanahan
Busted!,Thomas J. Riccio
Game Changer,Margaret Peterson Haddix
Raw,Colin Cowherd
How bad do you want it?,Matt Fitzgerald
Warrior Girls,Michael Sokolove
Pongwiffy Back On Track,Kaye Umansky
Ready notes to accompany Exercise physiology,"Scott K. Powers, Edward T. Howley"
Going the distance,"George Thomas, Jeff Welsch"
Spinning the Globe,Ben Green
Body Politic,David Shields
101 ways to be a terrific sports parent,"Joel Fish, Susan Magee"
Bad sports,Dave Zirin
Great Detroit sports debates,"Drew Sharp, Terry Foster"
Pool player's edge,"Gerry Kanov, Shari Stauch"
Teaching sport concepts and skills,"Mitchell, Stephen A., Stephen A. Mitchell, Judith L., Ph.D. Oslin, Linda L. Griffin"
We Play Sports!,Leonard Atlantic
Youth basketball drills,"Burrall Paye, Patrick Paye"
Athletics and academe,Wilford S. Bailey
"Games, Sports and Cultures",Noel Dyck
Rugby Revealed,"Gavin Hickie, Eilidh Donaldson"
Qualitative methods in sports studies,"David Lawrence Andrews, Daniel S. Mason, Michael L. Silk"
The Essentials of Performance Analysis,Mike Hughes
Sport In American Culture,Joyce Duncan
Brooks,Doug Wilson
My Life As a Motorcycle List,Bob Chase
Running Toward Life,John Trent
One Shot Tennis by the Numbers,"William Crutchfield, George Henry"
The anthropology of sport and human movement,"Robert R. Sands, Alan Moore"
Claire Wants a Boxing Name,"Jo Meserve Mach, Vera Lynne Stroup-Rentier, Mary Birdsell"
Reclaiming the Game,"William G. Bowen, Sarah A. Levin"
Adapted physical activity,Robert D. Steadward
In Black and White,Kenneth L. Shropshire
Ride,Justin Reichman
Safe at home,Paula Bott
Social Sciences In Sport,Joseph Maguire
Locals Only,Pete Birle
The athlete's guide to making weight,Michele A. Macedonio
Motivated Amateur's Guide to Winter Camping,Aaron Linsdau
Hike the Course,Barbara Ann Cochran
Human resource management in sport and recreation,P. Chelladurai
Wrestling with Angels,John Hanrahan
Sandbox Stories,"Marty Leum, Kenny Kiernan"
Shattering the glass,"Pamela Grundy, Susan Shackelford"
Member Manual,United States Soo Bahk Do Moo Duk Kwan Federation
Mental Toughness for Athletes,A. J. Kikumoto
Greek athletics and the genesis of sport,David Sansone
Sports law and policy in the European Union,Richard Parrish
The struggle for Canadian sport,Bruce Kidd
The phenomenon,Rick Ankiel
The rites of men,Varda Burstyn
Sport in Asian Society,J. A. Mangan
Europe at play,L. H. Weir
The Green Lane to Nowhere,"Byron Rogers, Rob Bagchi, Paul Rogerson"
Representing sport,Rod Brookes
Sports and Games of the Ancients,Steve Craig
Most valuable,Amar'e Stoudemire
Sports Training Principles,"Dick, Frank W."
The arena,Rafi Kohan
The business of sports,"Brad R. Humphreys, Dennis Ramsay Howard"
Learning experiences in sport psychology,Glyn C. Roberts
Surfing (To the Limit),Paul Mason
"Schott's Sporting, Gaming and Idling Miscellany",Ben Schott
Encyclopedia of British sport,"Richard William Cox, Wray Vamplew, Grant Jarvie"
Sports Law,Mark James
Agents of opportunity,Kenneth L. Shropshire
Applied anatomy and biomechanics in sport,"J. Bloomfield, Timothy R. Ackland, Elliott, Bruce Ph.D., John Bloomfield, Timothy R. Ackland, Bruce C. Elliott"
Foundations of physical education and sport,Deborah A. Wuest
Olympia,Ernst Curtius
The English in the middle ages,J. Frederick Hodgetts
Adventures of Little Marco and His Soccer Ball Buddy,"Vincent Marcotrigiano, Ariane Elsammak"
Food for Fitness,Anita Bean
Every shot must have a purpose,"Pia Nilsson, Lynn Marriott, Ron Sirak"
Roberto & me,Dan Gutman
Home Team,Michael N. Danielson
Sports in Chicago (Sport and Society),Elliott J. Gorn
Arc marine,"Dawn J. Wright, Dawn J. Wright, Michael J. Blongewicz, Patrick N. Halpin, Joe Breman"
For Cubs Fans Only,Rich Wolfe
Dougal Haston,"Connor, Jeff., Jeff Connor, Jeff Connor"
Guinness Book of Sports Records,Norris Dewar McWhirter
Guinness sports record book,"Norris Dewar McWhirter, Alan Ross McWhirter"
Rock 'n Fire,Mark Stallard
Globalizing Sport,Barbara J. Keys
Procedures for structuring and scheduling sports tournaments,Francis M. Rokosz
Slaying the Badger,Richard Moore
Tennis training,"Mark Kovacs, W. Britt Chandler, T. Jeff Chandler"
Sports Pages,Arnold Adoff
Splash!,Dinah Johnson
MVP Machine,"Travis Sawchik, Ben Lindbergh"
Precision heart rate training,Edmund R. Burke
Foundations of sport and exercise psychology,"Robert S. Weinberg, Daniel Gould"
Applied sport management skills,Robert N. Lussier
Genealogy of Male Body Building,Dimitris Liokaftos
I Like Sports ... What Jobs Are There?,"Steve Martin, Tom Woolley"
Playing Games,Randolph Feezell
Understanding sport organizations,Trevor Slack
The Sport and Fitness Sector,Ben Oakley
"Sport in Britain, 1945-2000 / Richard Holt and Tony Mason","Richard Arthur Holt, Richard Holt, Tony Mason"
NASCAR for dummies,"Martin, Mark, Mark Martin"
Administration of physical education and athletics,Reuben B. Frost
Understanding psychological preparation for sport,Lew Hardy
Sport,Richard Giulianotti
Sports Ethics,Jan Boxill
Sportsex,Toby Miller
Sports and the courts,Herb Appenzeller
Football's second season,"Tom Lemming, Taylor Bell"
Riding with George,Philip G. Smucker
Sports in American Life,Richard O. Davies
Art of the Rapier,Ken Mondschein
Planning for sport,Sue Burgess
Qualitative analysis of human movement,"Duane V. Knudson, Craig S. Morrison"
Softball Coaching Bible,"Jacquie Joseph, National Fastpitch Coaches Association"
Hockey Dreams,Gil Conrad
Souled Out?,Shaun Powell
The New American Sport History,S W. Pope
"Athletes, Celebrities Personal Moments",Walt Brown
Burden of Over-Representation,Grant Farred
Eternal Present of Sport,Daniel A. Grano
Transnational and Comparative Research in Sport,Ian Henry
"Persuasion and Communication in Sport, Exercise, and Physical Activity","Ben Jackson, James Dimmock, Josh Compton"
To Show What an Indian Can Do,John Bloom
"Sport, men, and the gender order","Michael A. Messner, Donald F. Sabo, Don F. Sabo"
Training distance runners,"Martin, David E., David E. Martin, Peter N. Coe"
The athletic snowball,Charles B. Corbin
Skiing out of your mind,"Leonard A. Loudis, W. Charles Lobitz, Kenneth M. Dinger"
Her story in sport,Reet Howell
City games,Steven A. Riess
Power and ideology in American sport,George Harvey Sage
Psychology of officiating,"Robert S. Weinberg, Peggy A. Richardson"
Sport speed,"George B. Dintiman, Robert D. Ward"
Rookie coaches softball guide,"American Coaching Effectiveness Program, American Coaching Effectiveness Program., American Sport Education Program."
Pacing,Kevin Thompson
"Psychology of motor behavior and sport, 1977",NASPSPA (Organization)
Dream Jobs in Sports Psychology,Jessica Shaw
Shapes in sports,Rebecca Rissman
Take your bike!,"Rich Freeman, Susan J. Freeman"
There's nothing new in sports,Hal Butler
Olympic Records,Karen Price
Doubling Back,Linda Cracknell
Not just a soccer game,Magid Shihade
Would You Believe...the Losers Were Killed in Mayan Football? (Would You Believe),Richard Platt
They Played What?! The Weird History of Sports & Recreation (Weird History),Richard Platt
Octogenarian Odyssey : ,Robert D. Fletcher
The Sinful Seven,"Jason Kirk, Alex Kirshner, Richard Johnson"
Golf Mindset,"Leon Edward, IQMindBrainLibrary"
Gilded Hoofprints,"Sultan Zeshan, Stephen Finley"
Young Athletes' Ultimate Guide to Mental Toughness,"Chad Metcalf, Clay Buchholz"
It's Fun to Run,Brigitte Cutshall
Tied to Greatness,Serena Brown Travis
Smash Hit,David Curcio
Developing successful sport sponsorship plans,David K. Stotlar
"Tu Palabra, Pedrito, Es Tu Palabra","Peter Valdez, Tasche Laine, Kris Wyatt Reguera"
Triple Play,"Jack McKenna, Cynthia Gurin"
A Diver Like Me,"Sanaa Chege, Nils Britwum"
"Competition, Fairness and Equality in Sport and Society",Verner Møller
Onside or Offside? Women's Sport and Transgender Inclusion,"Helen Parker, Beth Hands, Elizabeth Rose"
Level 4 & 5 Collection,Melisa Torres
A Sport Loving Society,J. A. Mangan
Ivan Lendl's power tennis,"Ivan Lendl, Eugene Scott"
An elusive victory,Aubrey L. Haines
Rodger McPhail,"Ian Alcock, Rodger McPhail"
Funny Shaped Balls,Jonathan Swan
Sport Stars,"David Lawrence Andrews, Steven J. Jackson"
Primitive and pioneer sports for recreation today,Bernard Sterling Mason
Fame to infamy,David C. Ogden
"The Hiking Trails of Florida's National Forests, Parks, and Preserves","Johnny Molloy, Sandra Friend"
Bid,Rod McGeoch
Learning fencing,"Bernhard Barth, Berndt Barth, Katrin Barth"
Issues and values in sport and leisure cultures,"Marc Keech, Graham McFee"
"The Good, the Bad, & the Ugly : Philadelphia Flyers",Adam Kimelman
What It Takes to Be a Pro Soccer Player,Kaitlyn Duling
The die-hard fan's guide to Longhorn football,"Geoff Ketchum, Regnery Publishing, Jeff Ketchcum"
The game planners,Donald Macintosh
"Kick, pass, and run",Leonard P. Kessler
Paralyzed,Jeff Rud
Just for Christmas night,Lisa Marie Perry
Explorers of the infinite,Maria Coffey
The batboy,Mike Lupica
The Dynamic Path,James M. Citrin
Decide to win,"David Swindley, David Swindley, Rex Johnson"
An Incomplete and Inaccurate History of Sport,Kenny Mayne
I Am Duran,Roberto Duran
The best of The show,"Bill Scheft, Rick Reilly, Bob Costas"
The Pipes fitness test & prescription,Thomas V. Pipes
O'Brien pocket history of Gaelic sports,Eamonn Sweeney
Lest we forget,Brendan Fullam
The Bus,"Jerome Bettis, Gene Wojciechowski"
80/20 running,Matt Fitzgerald
Fathers & sons & sports,"Buzz Bissinger, Mike Lupica"
Carry the Rock,Jay Jennings
Benchwarmer,Josh Wilker
The Great Book Of Denver Sports Lists,Joe Williams
The Sports Book,DK Publishing
More Than A Champion,Jan Philipp Reemtsma
Yellow Sports Bra,"Jamie Graham Duprey, Joe Puckett, Cosette Puckett"
Powerless yet Unstoppable,David Consiglio
"Football, Life, Jesus",Randall Alligood
Buster's Boys,"Thomas, James G., Jr."
Bold Exploitation,Tom Hansen
Across the Summer Skies,"Jack McKenna, Cynthia Gurin"
Celebrate '98,Dave Hooker
Don't Ask What I Shot,Catherine M. Lewis
A Purpose Worth Fighting For,Billy Huard
"Players, Teams, and Stadium Ghosts",Bob Hunter
Comeback,Melisa Torres
"Runner's world, run less, run faster","William James Pierce, Bill Pierce, Scott Murr, Ray Moss"
Sly the sleuth and the sports mysteries,Donna Jo Napoli
Golfing with God,Roland Merullo
Sportsworld,Robert Lipsyte
The Toon,Roger Hutchinson
"""Daily Telegraph"" Sport Yearbook",David Welch
The Missing Mitt,"Franklin W. Dixon, Scott Burroughs"
EVERYTHING THEY HAD,David Halberstam
"Marxism, Cultural Studies and Sport (Routledge Critical Studies in Sportá)",Ben Carrington
Sport and society in modern France,Richard Arthur Holt
Les champions juifs dans l'histoire,Philippe Assoulen
Contemporary athletics and ancient Greek ideals,Daniel A. Dombrowski
Sandlot seasons,Rob Ruck
Men with balls,Drew Magary
Grasping the ring,Gene A. Budig
Xizang Zizhiqu zhi,Xizang ZIzhiqu di fang zhi bian zuan wei yuan hui
The anthropology of sport,"Kendall Blanchard, Alyce Taylor Cheska"
The law of sports,"John C. Weistart, Cym H. Lowell"
The Complete Game,Ron Darling
W.G.Grace,Simon Rae
Red and Me,"Russell, Bill"
Muscular Christianity,Clifford Putney
Fit for America,Harvey Green
Sport and recreation in ancient Greece,Waldo E. Sweet
Sportanatomie,Jürgen Weineck
Sociologie du sport,Raymond Thomas
Sport and politics in Canada,Donald Macintosh
Sport in Greece and Rome,Harold Arthur Harris
Mental toughness training for sports,James E. Loehr
A behavioural analysis of sport,"Dickinson, John"
Seasons of shame,Robert C. Yeager
The politics of race and international sport,Richard Edward Lapchick
Psychology of sport,Dorcas Susan Butt
The physiological basis of physical education and athletics,Donald K. Mathews
The encyclopaedia of athletics,Mel Watman
Canada at the Olympics,Henry Hall Roxborough
Early American sport,"Henderson, Robert W."
Athletics of the ancient world,E. Norman Gardiner
Histoire de la locomotion terrestre,Charles Dollfus
"Sports illusion, sports reality",Leonard Koppett
Technic of team sports for women,Margaret Hinkel Meyer
Psychology and sport behavior,Anne Marie Bird
Crónica de los años locos,Víctor Soliño
Athletic massage,Rich Phaigh
Sports Fan's Ultimate Book of Sports Comparisons,Diagram Group.
Sports and pastimes through the ages,Peter Moss
Pittsburgh Sports,Randy Roberts
Sports (What Can I Do Now),Ferguson.
Legal Concepts In Sport,Linda Jean Carpenter
Rehabilitation of athletic injuries,Joseph S. Torg
Gameplan,"John Riggins, Jack Winter"
Boardsailing made easy,"Chip Winans, Mimi Greenwood, John Furlow"
Training im Sportspiel,Internationales Berliner Sportspiel-Symposion (4th 1981)
A canoeing and kayaking guide to West Virginia,"Davidson, Paul, Charlie Walbridge, Ward Eister"
Heartbeat,"Annabel Lund, Mark Kelley, Howard Simons, Clark Mishler"
Lem Banker's book of sports betting,"Lem Banker, Klein (undifferentiated)"
Show Me a Hero,Jeanne Schinto
Modern judo,"Peter Seisenbacher, George Kerr"
Athens to Athens,"David Miller, David Miller"
Sports writer's eye,"David Miller, David Miller"
El hombre deportivo,Santiago Coca
Golf,"Bob Gwyn, Gwyn, Frank Ormond"
Legends and reality of the AK,"Valerii N. Shilin, Charlie Cutshaw, Valery Shilin"
Education et hygiène du corps à travers l'histoire,Association interuniversitaire de l'Est. Colloque
Legends of the field,Steve Wulf
Nunca más campeón mundial?,"Seminario Uruguay: Nunca Más Campeón Mundial? Fútbol, Deportes y Política en Uruguay (1990 Montevideo, Uruguay)"
The comprehensive guide to careers in sports,Glenn M. Wong
Nutrition and fitness for athletes,"International Conference on Nutrition and Fitness (2nd 1992 Athens, Greece), Artemis P. Simopoulos, Konstantinos N. Pavlou"
The illustrated book of basic boating,"Christopher Caswell, Christoper Caswell, Reginald Bragonier"
The heart of the order,Thomas Boswell
"Body, Sport and Society in Norden",Niels Kayser Nielsen
Sport and physical activity,"AIESEP World Conference (1990 Loughborough University of Technology), T. Williams, L. Almond"
A young softball player's guide to fielding and defense,"Don Oster, Jacque Hunter"
Luring largemouth bass,"Don Oster, Creative Publishing international, The Outdoor Editors of CPi"
"Esporte, lazer e estilos de vida",Marco Paulo Stigger
One Last Read,Ray Didinger
Sports and athletics,Joseph C. Mihalich
Everyone is an athlete,Philip Maffetone
Uri minjok ŭi nori munhwa,Wan-muk Cho
Gender and leisure,Cara Aitchison
50 years of the Formula One world championship,"Bruce Jones, Carlton Books"
101 Pitching Drills,Bob Bennett
Hang Gliding,Heidi Zeigler
Fenômeno esportivo no início de um novo milênio,"Congresso Científico Latino-Americano da FIEP/UNIMEP (1st 2000 Piracicaba, Brazil)"
Boys of '86,"Tony McDonald, Danny Francis"
Vail,"Peter W. Seibert, Jean Claude Killy"
Dr. Breath,Carl Stough
"Seminar on Sport, Work, and Well-Being","Seminar on Sport, Work, and Well-Being (1983 Vierumäki, Finland)"
Athletics for life,"Kenneth Forsythe, K., M.D. Forsythe, Neil Feineman"
On the attack,"Matthew Maynard, Mathew Maynard, Paul Rees"
Handbook of climbing,"Allen Fyffe, Iain Peter"
Match Fixing,G. Rajaraman
Cuba,Raymond Pointu
Sportmotorische Lernprozesse und Persönlichkeitsentwicklung im Breitensport,Wissenschaftliches Symposium zum Hochschulsport (3rd 1980 Universität Bremen)
Fenway saved,"Bill Nowlin, Mike Ross, Jim Prime"
Glaciers!,"Strong, Michael., Michael Strong, Eckehard Doerry"
The best of the blues,"Bob MacCallum, Robert MacCallum"
Readings in sports psychology,H. T. A. Whiting
Le droit du sport,Jean-Pierre Karaquillo
Mad for the road,"Esler Crawford, Alan Tyndall"
6 of the best,"Blyth Tait, Kate Green"
Basketball In America,Bob Batchelor
Good Sports,Peter Kell
Great racing partnerships,"Tanner, Michael, Michael Tanner"
Memories of a ballplayer,"Bill Werber, C. Paul Rogers"
Sport and society,John T. Talamini
Ultimate,"Irv Kalb, Irving Kalb, Tom Kennedy"
Sports and games in Alberta before 1900,J. E. Reid
Istoria sportului românesc în date,Nicolae Postolache
Sports health,William Southmayd
SShA--sport i obshchestvo,Roman Kiselev
Getting it right,Mel Welch
Making a match,Mel Welch
Black champions challenge American sports,Wally Jones
Ancient traditions and current trends in physical activity and sport,"ICSSPE International Symposium (1997 Berlin, Germany)"
Biomechanics of sports and kinanthropometry =,"International Congress of Physical Activity Sciences (1976 Québec, Québec), Fernand Landry"
Sociology of sport,"International Congress of Physical Activity Sciences (1976 Québec, Québec), Fernand Landry"
Exercise physiology,"International Congress of Physical Activity Sciences (1976 Québec, Québec), Fernand Landry"
"Motor learning, sport psychology, pedagogy and didactics of physical activity =","International Congress of Physical Activity Sciences (1976 Québec, Québec), Fernand Landry"
More Weird Moments in Sports,Bruce Weber
Sports and recreational activities for menand women,"Dale Mood, Frank F. Musker"
Only the pure in heart survive,"Ed Temple, Lou Temple, B' Lou Carter"
The weekend athlete's way to a pain-free Monday,Hyman Jampol
"Seventeen sports cars, 1919-1930","Peter Hull, Nigel Arnold-Foster"
United States Olympic Committee Reform Act of 2003,"United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation."
Sports medicine,"International Congress of Physical Activity Sciences (1976 Québec, Québec), Fernand Landry"
"Philosophy, theology, and history of sport and of physical activity =","International Congress of Physical Activity Sciences (1976 Québec, Québec), Fernand Landry"
Zapomniani piewcy sportu,Wojciech Lipoński
The Economic Theory of Professional Team Sports,Stefan Kesenne
Soviet sport today,"Tarasov, Nikolaĭ."
"Sport, culture, and society",John W. Loy
The Foot Book,Harry F. Hlavac
Volleyball for boys and girls,Bill Gutman
Sports action; eight short stories,Robert Vitarelli
Ready-to-Use Old-Fashioned Sports Illustrations,Carol Belanger Grafton
Walking into Colorado's past,"Ben Fogelberg, Steve Grinstead"
The omnibus of sport,Grantland Rice
Best aikido,"Kisshōmaru Ueshiba, Kisshomaru Ueshiba, Moriteru Ueshiba"
Through clouds and sunshine,Edward A. Coray
Champions remembered,Ray Fitzgerald
Northern sil lum #7,"Kwon, Wing Lam., Kwon Lam, Ted Mancuso"
Neurologic Athletic Head and Spine Injuries,Robert C. Cantu
Goofballs!,Mark Ziegler
The politics of South African cricket,Jon Gemmell
The science of hitting a home run,Jim Whiting
Superfit,"Royce Gracie, James Strom, Kid Peligro"
Lacrosse for fun!,Sandra Will
Melody Moth,Stephen Cosgrove
Sports & recreational facilities,Roger Yee
Sport and medicine,Peter N. Sperryn
The best of pro basketball,Matt Doeden
Game's Up,"Tomlinson, Alan."
The best Pittsburgh sports arguments,John Mehno
The Playground/el Parque,Jacqueline Laks Gorman
The hockey compendium,"Jeff Z. Klein, Jeff Klein, Carl-Eric Reif"
Offsides,Erik E. Esckilsen
All about darts,"I. L. Brackin, Ivan Brackin, William Fitzgerald"
Stu Thomsen's Book of BMX,"Stu Thomsen, Bob Hadley"
The physiological basis of athletic records,Ernst Jokl
Summit routes,"Scott Stephenson, Brian Bongiovanni"
Jackie Robinson and the Integration of Baseball (Turning Points in History),Scott Simon
The Quarter Circle 81,"Frank Ferguson, C. Robert Ferguson"
The 30 greatest sports conspiracy theories of all time,Elliott Kalb
Climbing self rescue,"Molly Loomis, Andy Tyson"
"Community, Sport and Leisure",Tim Delaney
Becoming a complete martial artist,"Tristan Sutrisno, Marc MacYoung, Tris Sutrisno"
Wakeboarding!,Chris Hayhurst
John Nosler,"John Nosler, Gary Lewis"
Sport Psychology,Matt Jarvis
The march to madness,"Eddie Einhorn, and Ron Rapoport"
The sportsman's cyclopaedia,Thomas Burgeland Johnson
Chapman,"Gregory O. Jones, Dave Kelley"
"The new American guide to athletics, sports & recreation",Craig T. Norback
"Spiel, Spiele, Spielen","Sportwissenschaftlicher Hochschultag (5th 1982 Tübingen, Germany)"
NBA's greatest,"John Hareas, DK Publishing, John Havlicek"
Psych yourself to better tennis,Walter A. Luszki
"Frisch, frei, stark und treu",Horst Ueberhorst
The competence factor,Bradford Angier
Sports Success Book,Karl Morrow Woods
Champ,Marcia Thornton Jones
Sportstättenatlas,North Rhine-Westphalia (Germany). Kultusministerium.
Self-defense & assault prevention for girls & women,"Bruce Tegner, Alice Greenfield McGrath"
The New York urban athlete,"Jane Goldman, Laetitia Kennedy"
Tri Power,"Paul Frediani, William Smith"
Lacrosse,"David Pietramala, David G. Pietramala, Neil A. Grauer"
Australian football,"Andrew McLeod, Andrew Mcleod, Trevor D. Jaques"
Fancourt,Andy Capostagno
Athletic fund-raising,Joseph C. Smith
"This Sporting Life (Avon Books, 21394)",David Storey
The Competitive Edge,James Lee Anderson
Caving,"Lane Larson, Peggy Larson"
How we play the game,Richard Lipsky
One hundred--not out,Henry Hall Roxborough
Sporting verse,Adam Lindsay Gordon
"Games, sport, and power",Gregory Prentice Stone
"Helden, Götter, Übermenschen",Walter Umminger
Backyard basketball superstar,"Monica Klein, Nola Langner"
Experimente in der Sportpsychologie,Meinhart Volkamer
Careers in the sports industry,Barbara Fenten
EEVeTeC,Rob Roy McGregor
Il tempo libero dei giovani,"Convegno su tempo libero e partecipazione politica dei giovani (1979? Milan, Italy)"
Winning,"Dick, Frank W."
The directory of athletic scholarships,"Green, Barry"
Gymnastics for girls,"Ryan, Frank"
Raising the bar,"Artemis A. W. Joukowsky, Artemis Joukowsky II, Larry Rothstein, Christopher Reeve"
Les Bases psycho-pédagogiques de l'éducation corporelle,Georges Rioux
Sports jokes,Hugh Moore
Sporting anecdotes,James Glass Bertram
Catalogue of the Carnegie historical collection of books on physical education,City of Leeds and Carnegie College. Library.
Pushing forward,Randy Snow
"Women in physical education and sports at Centre College, 1854-1978",Kitty Rogers Baird
"U.S. national forest campground guide, southwestern region","Fred Dow, Suzanne Dow"
Go basics,Peter Shotwell
Sport business in the global marketplace,Hans Westerbeek
Gardens of earthly delight,Patricia Corbin
The Big Red,Richard A. Blackburn
The boys' book of survival,"Campbell, Guy., Guy Campbell"
The Complete idiot's guide to pro wrestling,Lou Albano
Exercise and sport biology,International Symposium on Sport Biology (1979 Suomen urheiluopisto)
"""It's unlucky to be behind at the end of the game"" and other great sports retorts",Dick Crouser
"The offbeat angler / by Christopher Arelt, Sebastian O'Kelly","Christopher Arelt, Sebastian O'Kelly"
Go girl,"Natalie Cook, Robert Drane"
La Lex sportiva,Franck Latty
Native American sports and games,Rob Staeger
S is for score!: a sports alphabet,Laura Purdie Salas
Sport and the law,Neville Cox
101 sports jokes,Sam Schultz
How Boston played,Stephen Hardy
Love that dirty water,"Charles D. Burgess, Chuck Burgess, Bill Nowlin"
Boxing's Most Wanted,"David L. Hudson, Mike Fitzgerald"
Pod flagom SKDA,K. P. Zharov
Sports word problems starring decimals and percents,Rebecca Wingard-Nelson
The perfect moment,Carolyn E. Thomas
Sport,Paul Kohn
Scottish Highland games,David Pirie Webster
Relax & win,Bud Winter
Mega deportes,"Henri Garcia, Various"
Czechoslovak sport 1945-1955,Armour Milne
An Insight to Sports,Wayne F. Martin
Sport and society,N. I. Ponomarev
Codice del turismo,Italy
The business of sports,"Foster, George, George Foster, Stephen A. Greyser, Bill Walsh"
The cyclist's body book,"Frank Westell, Simon Martin"
Diagnostic picture tests in injury in sport,J. G. P. Williams
American football,"Peter Rowe, Miles Aiken"
Sportspiele,Internationales Berliner Sportspiel-Symposion (7th 1987)
The concise encyclopedia of sports,Keith Warren Jennison
Sports,Hanns Reich
Stretching the limits,Lee Torrey
The Eton book of the river,L. S. R. Byrne
Play ball!,"Frank W. Jobe, Moynes"
Super season II,"Don Pierson, Jonathan Daniel"
Physical activities for college women,Maryhelen Vannier
International sports law,James A. R. Nafziger
Sport in Poland,Stefan Sieniarski
A guide to salmon flies,"John Buckland, Arthur Oglesby"
The living image,T. R. Henn
Avery Brundage Collection 1908-1975,Maynard J. Brichford
Hiking Anza-Borrego Desert State Park,"Cunningham, Bill, Bill Cunningham, Polly Cunningham"
Bunnies and their sports,Nancy L. Carlson
Hiking Mojave National Preserve,"Cunningham, Bill, Bill Cunningham, Polly Cunningham"
Scholastic encyclopedia of sports in the United States,"Osborn, Kevin"
Justice served,"Bob Burke, Kenny Arthur Franks, Kenny A. Franks, Eric Dabney"
The fighting weapons of Korean martial arts,"In Hyuk Suh, in Hyuk Suh, Jane Hallander"
Hope in suffering,Elliot Johnson
Sport and recreation in Britain,Great Britain. Central Office of Information. Reference Division.
Golfers,"Susan McKinley Carpenter, Susan M. Carpenter, Florence Peterson Kendall"
The basketball pass cut catch guide,"Sidney Goldstein, Sidney Goldenstein, Sidney  Basketball Player's Bible Goldstein"
Ice hockey made simple,"P. J. Harari, Dave Ominsky"
Twenty names in sport,Toni Williamson
The six-day bicycle races,"Peter Nye, Jeff Groman, Mark Tyson"
Scientific foundations of coaching,Russell R. Pate
The Bird era,"Bob Schron, Kevin Stevens"
Sports and pastimes of the Middle Ages,John Marshall Carter
Batsford Book of Sporting Verse,Peter Verney
Leistungsengagement und Sportinteresse,Hans Linde
Volleyball game theory and drills,"Berthold Fröhner, Berthold Frohner, Tilt T. Romet, Peter Klavora"
F1 88,"Daniele Amaduzzi, Andrea De Adamich, Oscar Orefici"
In spite of us,David F. Prouty
The Basin,D. O. Neely
Sports and freedom,Ronald A. Smith
The everyday champion,"Sinjin Smith, Neil Feineman"
The sports of our Presidents,"Durant, John"
Pictorial history of American sports,"Durant, John"
"Law and liability in athletics, physical education, and recreation",James A. Baley
The centered athlete,Gay Hendricks
Physical activity patterns in Ontario--III,Peter J. Dean
The economics of sport,"Robert Sandy, Peter Sloane, Mark S. Rosentraub"
"Sportpsychologische Diagnostik, Intervention und Verantwortung","Tagung der ASP (1987 Trier, Germany)"
Balls,"Susan Dudley Morrison, Howard Schroeder"
"Sports in North America: A Documentary History, Vol 3",George B. Kirsch
The weekend athlete's fitness guide,Peter Verney
Studies in the sociology of sport,North American Society for the Sociology of Sport. Conference
What's what in sports,Reginald Bragonier
Measuring sports participation,Fred Coalter
Sport and community development,Fred Coalter
Histoire du sport,Bernard Gillet
Great shape,"Pat Lyons, Debby Burgard"
Das Ehrenamt,Joachim Winkler
Wait till next year,William Goldman
Hypokinesia and weightlessness,"O. IU At'kov, Oleg Y. AtKov, Victor S. Bednenko"
Boxing the champions,"Jones, Ken, Ken Jones, Chris Smith"
All about sports with Inspector McQ,Patty Rutland Mullins
"Case of the Missing Playbook (Jack B. Quick, Sports Detective, #2)",L. E. Wolfe
Acrosport,Céline Gendron
Dear Dr. Psych,Nate Zinsser
Literatur zur Geschichte des Arbeitersports in Deutschland von 1873 bis 2005,Eike Stiller
"The ""in"" sports",D. S. Halacy
Sports technology,Neil Duncanson
Aggressive Handlungen im Sport,Hartmut Gabler
Leistungsmotivation im Hochleistungssport,Hartmut Gabler
Practical sponsorship,Stuart Turner
Fishing the Big Bend,"Bobert McGowan, Richard Farren, Bob McGowan"
"The Scribner Encyclopedia of American Lives, Thematic Series - Sports Figures",Kenneth T. Jackson
A farewell to heroes,"Graham, Frank"
Sport for all,"World Congress on Sport for All (1990 Tampere, Finland), Pekka Oja, Risto Telama"
"De eerste Surinaamse sportencyclopedie, 1893-1988","R. Stutgard, David McDonnell"
Béisbol,"Michael M. Oleksak, Mary Adams Oleksak"
"Baseball, football, Daddy, and me","Friend, David"
Las Tres Mellizas hacemos deporte,"Mercè Company González, Roser Capdevila, Merce Company Gonzalez"
The Bases Were Loaded (and So Was I),Tom Callahan
Who won what when,Sandra Lee Stuart
Developing successful sport sponsorship plans,David Kent Stotlar
Developing successful sport marketing plans,David Kent Stotlar
Sport and the law,"Colloquy on European Law (18th 1988 Maastricht, Netherlands)"
"Sports and games in Canadian life, 1700 to the present",Nancy Howell
Squaring off,Leonard Todd
The joy of snorkeling,Steve Blount
The poetry & song of Black & Amber Glory,James Murphy
The rivals,Jerry Izenberg
Psycho-motor behavior in education and sport,Bryant J. Cratty
Legal liability and risk management for public and private entities,Betty Van der Smissen
Sport and the British,Richard Arthur Holt
Contemporary readings in sport psychology,William P. Morgan
A content analysis of sociocultural trends in sport and society,Jon Holtzworth
The sunlit hours,Sir Theodore Andrea Cook
Athletic scholarships,"Clark, Andy"
Liability and safety in physical education and sport,James E. Hart
Sport in society,Peter McIntosh
The crimson and the gray,Richard B. Fry
Chicago sports quiz,"Brenda Alesii, Brenda Alessi, Daniel Locche"
The Broncos,Patricia K. Ourada
A brief history of American sports,Elliott J. Gorn
Genetic technology and sport,Claudio Marcello Tamburrini
The lords of the rings,Vyv Simson
Spare me!,"Dawson Taylor, Gary Patterson"
The Case of the Tour De Tricks and Other Mysteries,L. E. Wolfe
Sport à la une,Jules Gritti
Mind over matter,"Shi, Ming., Shi Miing, Siao Weijia"
Razzano,"Tony Razzano, Richard Weiner"
Dog Days:The New York Yankees' Fall from Grace and,Philip Bashe
Cy Young,Reed Browning
Anwendungsfelder der Sportwissenschaft,Landessymposium der Sportwissenschaftliche Institute Baden-Württembergs (3rd 1990 Universität Stuttgart)
How to live with a golfaholic,"Mark Oman, Jay Campbell, Carl Christ"
Find your own fundamentals,"Bob Toski, Jim Flick"
Come all you loyal heroes,Con Houlihan
The dictionary of sporting champions,"Morrison, Ian"
Pratique des paysages en Baie du roi et sa région (Svalbard),Th Brossard
Mudville's revenge,Ted Vincent
Sports Pages of the Los Angeles Times,Harry A. Adams
Indian running,Peter Nabokov
Sports in the Western world,William J. Baker
"Games, sports and exercises for the physically handicapped",Ronald C. Adams
Sports Law,Russ VerSteeg
Sports riddles,Everett M. Hafner
Körperspuren,Karl-Heinrich Bette
Sam's Goal (Graphic Trax),Michael Hardcastle
Under the boardwalk,Norman Rosten
Baseball before We Knew It,David Block
Sports Illustrated,Rick Reilly
Sportsponsoring,Norbert Drees
Reining,"Bob Loomis, Kathy Kadash"
The antitrust laws and organized professional team sports including consideration of the proposed merger of the American and National Basketball Associations,United States. Congress. House. Committee on the Judiciary. Subcommittee No. 5.
God in the stadium,Robert J. Higgs
Sportmotorisches Lernen und Techniktraining,"International Symposium Motor Learning and Movement Behavior (1989 Saarbrücken, Germany)"
The all-time greats of British and Irish sport,"Matthews, Peter, Peter Matthews, Ian Buchanan"
Menschen im Sport 2000,"Kongress ""Menschen im Sport 2000"" (1987 Berlin, Germany)"
Baseball,"Warner Fusselle, Rick Wolff, Brian Zevnik"
Hunting,"May Lamar, Rich Donnell, Chip Cooper"
Science of sports training,"Kurz, Thomas"
Pregnancy and sports fitness,Lynne Pirie
Sacked!,Bob Brodhead
A paddler's guide to northern Georgia,"Bob Sehlinger, Don Otey"
We are a team =,Sharon Gordon
Fatso,"Arthur J. Donovan, Arthur J., Jr. Donovan, Bob Drury"
Anwendungsfelder der Sportpsychologie,"Tagung der ASP (1985 Cologne, Germany)"
Handlungskontrolle und soziale Prozesse im Sport,"Tagung der ASP (19th 1986 Kiel, Germany)"
"Working class physical recreation in Montreal, 1860-1895",Alan Metcalfe
Sciences et techniques des activités physiques et sportives,Raymond Thomas
Psychologie du sport,Raymond Thomas
Angling to zorbing,Mary Elizabeth Salzmann
Gents andplayers,Frank Keating
Portugal,Noronha Feio
"Beans Baker, number five",Rich Torrey
Windsurfing,Amanda Wray
"Environmental factors, genetics and health/nutrition, recreation/leisure","Olympic Scientific Congress (1984 Eugene, Or.)"
Art Rust's Illustrated history of the Black athlete,"Art Rust, Edna Rust"
Sportswriter's Eye,Frank Keating
Ethics and morality in sport and physical education,Earle F. Zeigler
A History of Physical Education & Sport in the United States and Canada,Earle F. Zeigler
An introduction to sport and physical education philosophy,Earle F. Zeigler
The pictorial history of baseball,"John Stewart Bowman, John S. Bowman, Joel Zoss"
Track & field,Dan Zadra
Customized sports conditioning and weight training,"William J. Stone, William Stone, William Kroll"
Beginner's luck,Dan Lees
Yachting in America,"Gerald E. Morris, Llewllyn, III Howland, Llewellyn Howland"
Sports bloopers,Phyllis Hollander
Outdoor recreation legislation and its effectiveness,"Truxal, Andrew Gehr"
The athletic trainer's handbook,Roland Bevan
The national sports of Great Britain,Henry Thomas Alken
Sport for the million,Tom Stenner
Recreation,Ferdinand John Lipovetz
Competition,Gary Warner
NLP & sports,"O'Connor, Joseph., Joseph O'Connor"
Ranger-Commando Junior,Victor E. Lawson
Selected recreational sports for girls and women,Julia H. Post
Urheilusanakirja,Kaius Sulonen
Pavilʹon Fizkulʹtura i sport,"Vsesoi͡uznai͡a selʹskokhozi͡aĭstvennai͡a vystavka (Moscow, Russia)"
Mathematik und Sport,Ernst Lampe
Minnesota state-wide recreation program,R. W. Murchie
Sveriges hockey historia,Kamratföreningen Sveriges ishockeyjournalister
Welcome to my world,Charlie Vincent
The greatest moments in sports,Len Berman
Skateboard sonar,Eric Stevens
Einführung in das österreichische Sportrecht,Wolfgang Holzer
The comparative economics of sport,Stefan Szymanski
Kickboxing,Gail Mack
The sportsman in Canada,Frederic Tolfrey
Pocket personal coach,Eric Harr
Adolescence and sports,Dilip R. Patel
How we played the games,Amy Pastan
Book of baseball stuff,Ron Martirano
Sport and public policy,Charles Andrew Santo
The sportsman in Canada,Frederic Tolfrey
Living life in the zone,"Kyle Rote, Joe Pettigrew"
"Working out, working within",Jerry Lynch
This island isn't big enough for the four of us!,Gery Greer
Sports rules,Elizabeth Moore
Sports illustrated 2004 almanac,Editors of Sports Illustrated
The baseball bargain,Scott Corbett
Modern sports science,Larry Kettelkamp
I can be a football player,Carol Greene
Great moments in American sports,Jerry Brondfield
Tʻai chi,"Manqing Zheng, Cheng Man-Ch'Ing, Robert W. Smith"
Teaching individual and team sports,Raymond Talmadge De Witt
Spotlight on sports stars,Randal C. Hill
Fascinating facts,"Encyclopædia Britannica, Inc."
Sports titans of the 20th century,Al Silverman
The Bill James handbook 2006,"Bill James, Bill James"
The aerobic exercise/training journal,"John A. Hudetz, David M. Macias"
Winning the mental way,Karlene Sugarman
The Olympic factbook,"Martin Connors, Diane L. Dupuis, Marie J. MacNee, Christa Brelin"
Everyone wins at tee ball,Henry Grosshandler
Fishing Virginia,"Martin Freed, Ruta Vaskys"
The ultimate book of sports,Scott McNeely
"Brincar, jogar, viver","Leila Mirtes Santos de Magalhães Pinto, Beleni Saléte Grando"
Sportswriter's Eye,Simon Barnes
"Theory, sport & society","Joseph A. Maguire, Kevin Young"
Sport and physical education in China,Robin Jones
"The economics of sport, health and happiness","Plácido Rodríguez, Stefan Késenne, Brad R. Humphreys"
The Meaning of Sport,Simon Barnes
A century of champions,Associated Press.
Traprock,"Ken Nichols, Clint Cummins"
Soviet sport,Valeriĭ Shteĭnbakh
Stickhandling Through The Margins,Michael A. Robidoux
Ron Fawcett Rock Athlete,Ron Fawcett
Scouting For Moyes,Les Padfield
Japanese sports,Allen Guttmann
100 Essential Things You Didnt Know You Didnt Know about Sport,John D. Barrow
Sportographica,Simon Toseland
Modern Football Is Still Rubbish,Nick Davidson
How To Enjoy The World Cup,Chris England
"Run, Swim, Throw, Cheat",Chris Cooper
Naomi the Netball Fairy,Daisy Meadows
Sports endocrinology,Michelle P. Warren
Fraud Corruption And Sport,Graham Brooks
A thing or two about golf,"Larry Dennis, James Irwin"
Judo,"Didier Janicot, Gilbert Pouillart"
Sports,Tony Tallarico
Sport and the transformation of modern Europe,Alan Tomlinson
Beyond the scoreboard,"Richard B. Horrow, Karla Swatek"
Jo,Don Zier
Measurement in sport and exercise psychology,Gershon Tenenbaum
Coach's practical guide to athletic motivation,Thomas A. Tutko
Sports law in Switzerland,Lucien William Valloni
Regulation of fatigue in exercise,Frank E. Marino
Haltung und Bewegung beim Menschen,W. Berger
Sports law in the United States,Matthew J. Mitten
Decision making and outcomes in sports rehabilitation,John V. Basmajian
"Sport, politics and society in the Arab world",Mahfoud Amara
Sports in American life,Frederick W. Cozens
Sport and identity in France,Philip Dine
"Careers in sport, fitness, and exercise",American Kinesiology Association
Sports psyching,Thomas A. Tutko
2002 ESPN information please sports almanac,"Gerry Brown, Information Please, Michael Morrison"
Curveballs and screwballs,"Jeffrey Lyons, Douglas B. Lyons"
Yosemite trails,"Lew Clark, Lewis J. Clark, Virginia D. Clark"
Rocky,Rosalyn Drexler
The old sports of England,
Throw like a girl,"Shelley Frost, Shelley Frost, Ann Troussieux"
Sports Data Mining,Robert P. Schumaker
Enjoying sport and exercise,Sheila Hollins
Raising an athlete,Jack Perconte
Kampen om kroppen,Ove Korsgaard
The Complete Book of Racquetball,Steve Keeley
John Elway,Sports Illustrated.
Sports memories of western Pennsylvania,Lisa A. Alzo
Sports Cardiology Casebook,Antonio Pelliccia
Sea kayak rescue,"Roger Schumann, Jan Shriner"
"The best American sports writing, 1997","George Plimpton, Glenn Stout"
The Olympic marathon,"Martin, David E., David E. Martin, Roger W. H. Gynn"
Petty family album,"Kyle Petty, Pattie Petty"
The only game in town,David Remnick
Outwitting Fish,Bill Adler Jr
Reversing field,"Andre Douglas Pond Cummings, Anne Marie Lofaso"
Mountain biking the national parks,"Clark, Jim, Jim Clark"
Winning soccer for girls,Deborah Crisfield
Jugger,Ruben Philipp Wickenhäuser
The best American sports writing 2007,David Maraniss
Hammond's sports atlas of America,"Jordan, E. L."
History afield,Robert C. Willging
Baseball prospectus 2003,"Gary Huckabay, Joseph Sheehan, Clay Davenport, Chris Kahrl"
Shark attack!,"Greg Norman, George Peper"
2003 ESPN Information please sports almanac,"Gerry Brown, Michael Morrison, Michael Morrison"
"Weight training for cyclists, from the editors of Velo-news","Fred Matheny, Stephen Grabe, Andrew Buck, Geoff Drake"
The sports page,Peter Beilenson
Economics of sport,"Mark J. Eschenfelder, Ming Li"
Corps Romains,Philippe Moreau
On edge,"Jon Jackson, James R. Pereira"
Hot goalies,"Stan Fischler, Chico Resch"
Introduction to international and European sports law,Robert C. R. Siekmann
"Speaker's Treasury of Sports Anecdotes, Stories and Humor",Gerald Tomlinson
A dictionary of sports studies,Alan Tomlinson
Be a winner,Richard Orr
Book of records,
Sports in America from colonial times to the twenty-first century,Steven A. Riess
The athlete's clock,Thomas W. Rowland
Sportsoziologie,Karl-Heinrich Bette
Public/private partnerships for major league sports facilities,Judith Grant Long
Mediasport,Lawrence A. Wenner
Fast break to line break,Todd Davis
Rivals,National Association of Fellowships Advisors. Conference
365 amazing days in sports,
Karate's modern masters,"George Parulski, Official Karate Editors"
Parenting young athletes,Frank L. Smoll
Selbstorganisation von Migranten im deutschen Vereinssport,Silvester Stahl
Sports pages,Arnold Adoff
Sport Assignments,John Taylor
Jump Rope (Games Around the World),Dana Meachen Rau
The unauthorized NASCAR fan guide '99,"Bill Fleischman, Bill Fleishman, Al Pearce"
One hundred greatest Canadian sports moments,James Bisson
Sport and Race in South Africa,Mary Draper
Il campione e il suo doppio,Sandro Picchi
Sport mechanics for coaches,Brendan Burkett
The ultimate athlete,George Leonard
Critical essays in applied sport psychology,David Gilbourne
Ski tips,"Suzy Carter, Susan Carter"
"Baseballs, basketballs and Matzah balls","Smith, Mitchell."
Fathers & daughters & sports,Rebecca Lobo
El deporte en la ciudad de Sevilla durante el siglo XV,Gonzalo Ramírez Macías
The Sportspages Almanac 1990,Matthew Engel
Handbook of sports psychology,Calvin H. Chang
Philosophical reflections on physical strength,Mark Holowchak
Guldränderna,Johan Flinck
The business of sports,Scott Rosner
Military athletic sports,Canada. Canadian Army
Bird,"Steve Lipofsky, Roland Lazenby"
Športna morala,Maja Smrdu
Comeback,"Dennis Conner, Bruce Stannard, Paul C. Larsen"
Biomechanics in sport,
Marsh,Don Wright
Aolinpike yu Beijing Ao yun,
The Council of Europe and Sport,"Robert C. R. Siekmann, Janwillem Soek"
History of sport in Canada,"Maxwell Leo Howell, Reet Howell"
Sport thesaurus,
Anthology of statistics in sports,"Jim Albert, Jay Bennett"
The significance of sport for society,"Ilkka Vuori, I. Vuori"
Sports and children,"K. M. Chan, Lyle J. Micheli"
"The Court of Arbitration for Sport, 1984-2004","Ian Stewart Blackshaw, Robert C. R. Siekmann, Janwillem Soek"
Cross-country ski tours of Washington's south Cascades and Olympics,"Tom Kirkendall, Vicky Spring"
Cross-country ski tours of Washington's North Cascades,"Tom Kirkendall, Vicky Spring"
Understanding sports massage,"Patricia J., Ph.D. Benjamin, Scott P. Lamp"
Ao yun zhi guang,Sanya Shan
American Fan,Dennis Perrin
Canoeing,"Cecil Kuhne, Cherie Kuhne"
Televizyon spor haberleri,Mete Kazaz
Fundamentals of sport and exercise nutrition,Marie Dunford
Pain and injury in sport,"Sigmund Loland, Ivan Waddington"
English sports and pastimes,Christina Hole
Intrinsic motivation and self-determination in exercise and sport,"Martin Hagger, Nikos Chatzisarantis"
History of football from the beginnings to 1871,Francis Peabody Magoun
Sports and athletes,James D. Torr
Manual de la organización institucional del deporte,"Blanco, Eduardo, Eduardo Blanco, Ed Paidotribo"
Social psychology of exercise and sport,"Martin Hagger, Nikos Chatzisarantis"
Moutaineering medicine,"Fred T. Darvill, John A., Jr., M.D. Feagin"
Winning,"Susan Andrew, Patrick Burgoyne, Susan Andrews"
L'olimpiade dimezzata,Sergio Giuntini
Sport and social order,"Donald W. Ball, John W. Loy"
Who rules?,"Ryan Canner-O'Mealy, Chris Stuchko"
Walt Disney's sport Goofy encyclopedia.,Staff of Publisher
The bathroom sports quiz book,"Murphy, John., John Murphy"
The bathroom sports almanac,Multiple authors
"The Best American sports writing, 1993",Frank Deford
Be a sport!,Lori Stacy
We let the dawgs out,"Linda Ford, Julie Walters"
Experiments With Sports,Salvatore Tocci
The Elusive Fan,Philip Kotler
The Olympics,Stephanie True Peters
Periodismo deportivo y el deporte en Panamá,Carlos E. Collado Vargas
Novosadski olimpijci,Dobrivoje Antonić
Lucky legs,Steve Gurney
Les contrats de travail des sportifs,Serge Pautot
The Last Hero,Howard Bryant
The greatest moments in sports,Len Berman
2005 ESPN sports almanac,"Gerry Brown, Michael Morrison"
The great book of San Francisco Bay Area sports lists,Damon Bruce
Parachuting,"Dan Poynter, Mike Turoff"
Life above the rim,"Keith Brown, Keith Brown"
What to do and how to do it,Daniel Carter Beard
Sports,Liz Miles
Career opportunities in the sports industry,Shelly Field
Questions kids ask,Grolier Limited
The Voyage Of The Cormorant,Christian Beamish
International cases in the business of sport,"Simon Chadwick, Dave Arthur"
Alice the Tennis Fairy,Daisy Meadows
Dave Stanley's no nonsense guide to fly fishing in Nevada,"Stanley, Dave, Dave Stanley, Jeff Cavender"
Jews and the sporting life,Ezra Mendelsohn
Hexen,Joseph Grant Bell
Kids gone fishin',"Creative Publishing International, Creative Publishing international, Dave Maas"
The Florida Gators,"Stewart, Mark"
Ten rings,"Yogi Berra, Dave Kaplan"
Whitaker's Olympic almanack,Stan Greenberg
The Bill James handbook 2008,"Bill James, Baseball Info Solutions"
Wrigley Field,"Green, Stephen, Mark Jacob, Ernie Banks"
Basketball,Diane Yancey
Classic rivalries,"Stewart, Mark"
AMC river guide,"Katherine Yates, Carey Phillips"
Game face,Sylvia Gunnery
Sports,Jayne Creighton
Psychology and sociology of sport,James H. Humphrey
Opening days,Lee Bennett Hopkins
"Persons, minds and bodies",
Smooth play,Regina Hart
Rope Opera,Vince Russo
Emancipation through muscles,"Michael Brenner, Gideon Reuveni"
"Foods, nutrition, and sports performance","Clyde Williams, John T. Devlin, C. Williams"
Berkshire encyclopedia of world sport,"David Levinson, Karen Christensen"
Sport psychology,"Ronnie Lidor, Michael Bar-Eli"
They don't wash their socks,Kathlyn Gay
Encyclopedia of world sport,"David Levinson, Karen Christensen"
Heavy weather boating emergencies,"Chuck Luttrell, Jean Luttrell"
Athletic injuries,"Thorndike, Augustus"
Encyclopedia of traditional British rural sports,"Collins, Tony"
"Japan, sport, and society",Joseph A. Maguire
Contemporary issues in sociology of sport,"Andrew Yiannakis, Merrill J. Melnick"
Pep talk,Mike Dowdall
Deja vu all over again!,"Andersen, Richard, Richard Andersen"
Trout and salmon flies,"Sutherland, Douglas, Jack Chance, Douglas Sutherland"
Sport law for sport managers,"Doyice Cotten, T. Jesse Wilde"
Historia de los espectáculos en España,"Andrés Amorós, José María Díez Borque, Carlos Alvar, Andres Amoros, Benito Paninzi, Jose Maria Diez Borque"
Sport and leisure in the civilizing process,"Eric Dunning, Chris Rojek"
"Sport, racism, and ethnicity",Grant Jarvie
Handbook of research in applied sport and exercise psychology,"Dieter Hackfort, Joan L. Duda, Ronnie Lidor"
Sport in Britain,Tony Mason
Secrets of baseball told by big league players,"Rogers Hornsby, Applewood, Lou Gehrig, Charles L Hartnett, Tris Speaker, Et Al Hornsby"
Ellis Island to Ebbets Field,Peter Levine
Sport and gender in Canada,Kevin Young
The guys' guide to making sports more awesome,Eric Braun
Managing sports organizations,Daniel Covell
The baffled parent's guide to coaching boys' lacrosse,"Gregory P. Murrell, Jim Garland"
The theater of sport,Karl B. Raitz
Twice around the bases : the thinking fan's inside look at baseball,"Kevin Kennedy, Bill Gutman"
The unlevel playing field,"David Kenneth Wiggins, Patrick B. Miller, David K. Wiggins"
Sports and the law,Kenneth L. Shropshire
Therapeutic modalities in sports medicine,William E. Prentice
Hobbies,Eric Wood
Discovering careers for your future,"Facts on File, Inc."
The snowball,"Paul McCarthy, Jason Rhoades, Peter Bonde"
The spine in sports,Stephen Hochschuler
The frozen coast,"Graham Charles, Marcus Waters, Mark Jones, Sarah Moodie"
Live Albom III,Mitch Albom
Physiological testing of the elite athlete,"Howard A. Wenger, J. Duncan McDougall, Howard J. Green"
Shooting pool,"Michael Ian Shamos, Mike Shamos, George Bennett"
"The Best American sports writing, 1994","Glenn Stout, Thomas Boswell"
Sports injuries,Freddie H. Fu
Current research in sports sciences,"V. A. Rogozkin, Ron J. Maughan"
Sport safety training,United States Olympic Committee
The live Albom,Mitch Albom
Sport und Recht,"Friedrich-Christian Schroeder, Hans Kauffmann"
Biomedical engineering principles in sports,Jani Macari Pallis
The StairMaster fitness handbook,"Peterson, James A., Cedric X. Bryant, James Peterson"
A series to remember,"Joe Morgan, Buck Martinez"
Sport in Canadian society,M. Ann Hall
Outdoor recreation in American life,"H. Ken Cordell, Carter J. Betz, J. M. Bowker, Donald B. K. English, Shela H. Mou, John C. Bergstrom, R. Jeff Teasley, Michael Tarrant, John Loomis"
Gatekeeper,Gary Goodridge
The football game I'll never forget,Chris McDonell
Barbaro,"Pamela K. Brodowsky, Tom Philbin"
The best American sports writing 1998,"Bill Littlefield, Glenn Stout"
Great women in the sport of kings,Mary Jo Festle
Prevention and treatment of athletic injuries,Paul C. Trickett
Hockey chronicles,"Trent Frayne, Lance Hornby, Gord Miller, Al Strachan"
Sports law,"Raymond L. Yasser, C. Peter Goplerud, Rames R., III McCurdy"
A practical guide to sport management,"Miller, John undifferentiated, Todd L. Seidler"
The 30 greatest sports conspiracy theories of all time,Elliott Kalb
Training professionals in the practice of sport psychology,"John M., III Silva, Jonathan N. Metzler, Bart Lerner"
The Philadelphia story,Frank Dolson
Interference,Dan E. Moldea
Therapeutic recreation programming,"Charles Sylvester, Judi Voelkl, Gary Ellis"
Rules for New York sports fans,Joe Benigno
"Basketball drills, plays, and strategies","Clinton M. Adkins, Steven R. Bain, Edward A. Dreyer, Robert A. Starkey"
Remembering Yankee Stadium,Harvey Frommer
He Zhenliang shen Ao ri ji,Zhenliang He
Moduli psikhologicheskoĭ struktury v sporte,A. A. Polozov
Move Without the Ball,Stedman Graham
Regards sur l'économie et le management du sport et des sportifs professionnels,"Wladimir Andreff, Jacques Fontanel, Liliane Bensahel, Pierre Chaix"
Problem athletes and how to handle them,Bruce C. Ogilvie
Uncle John's bathroom reader sports spectacular,
The great Philadelphia fan book,"Glen Macnow, Glen MacNow, Anthony L. Gargano"
Zhongguo jun tuan,Bo'ao Wan
"Olympic, World Cup, mega sports taehoe, kŭrigo kŏnchʻuk kwa tosi, yesul munhwa",Chin-wŏn Yi
Contemporary sport psychology,Robert J. Schinke
"Race, sport, and the American dream",Earl Smith
Sport,
Régimen de responsabilidad de administradores de clubes de fútbol,Sebastián Balbin
Kejia ti yu,Yuhua Wu
Sports technology,"Linda Bruce, Linda Bruce"
Türk spor mevzuatı,Kısmet Erkiner
"La pretesa abolizione delle Olimpiadi antiche fra romanità, ebraismo e cristianesimo",Veruska Verratti
Xi bu shao shu min zu chuan tong ti yu de xian zhuang yu zou xiang =,Hong Huo
Philosophie und Bewegung,Michael Sukale
Comentários ao estatuto de defesa do torcedor,Sérgio Santos Rodrigues
Football And American Identity (Contemporary Sports Issues) (Contemporary Sports Issues),Gerhard Falk
The Quotable Cyclist,Bill Strickland
The experts pick basketball's best 50 players in the last 50 years,"Kenneth A. Shouler, Ken Shouler"
Mind game : how the Boston Red Sox got smart and finally won a World Series,"Steven Goldman, Steve Goldman, Baseball Prospectus Team of Experts"
Les sports au Que bec 1879-1975,Ghislaine Houle
The best of Sports afield,Jay Cassell
In the game,Amy Bass
The Lives of Conn Smythe From the Battlefield to Maple Leaf Gardens,Kelly McParland
Christianity & leisure,"Glen E. Van Andel, Thomas L. Visker"
Thinking Critically,Carla Mooney
Mario Tennis,Jason Young
Women and Exercise,"Mona M. Shangold, Gabe Mirkin"
CAPITAL PUNISHMENT,"DOUGIE & EDDY BRIMSON, Dougie Brimson"
Sports cardiology essentials,Christine E. Lawless
Counselling athletes,John H. Kerr
Rethinking aggression and violence in sport,John H. Kerr
How should college athletics be reformed,David L. Bender
Shen Wangshu shu shou du wen hua yu wen hua chan ye de Ao yun zhun bei,Wangshu Shen
Threats to sports and sports participation,Gijón Congress on Sports Economics (3rd 2008 Escuela Universitaria Jovellanos de Gijón)
Statistical thinking in sports,Jim Albert
Hints and points for sportsmen,H. H. Soulé
The liquid locomotive,"Hai-Van K. Sponholz, John Long"
L'Athlète dans les étoiles,Hervé Le Tellier
The Liverpool way,"John Williams, John Williams"
Marketing du sport,Michel Desbordes
Western pleasure,"Doug Carpenter, Carolyn S. Pryor"
Yosemite trout fishing guide,"Charles S. Beck, Steve Beck"
"Problemy fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury, sporta i turizma Severo-Zapada Rossii",I︠U︡. S. Lanev
Tube flies,"Mark Mandell, Les Johnson"
To all things a season,"E. Donnall Thomas, E. Thomas"
Sportswriter's Eye,Matthew Engel
Great E-Sports Debates,Meg Marquardt
Sports,Keith Dunstan
Obstacle race,Colin Martin Tatz
Power taiji,"Erle Montaigue, Michael Babin"
Needles,"Sally Moser, Greg Vernon, Patrick Paul"
Full STEAM Sports,"N. Helget, Sean McCollum"
Kakushu kyōgi kisoku,Asahi Shinbunsha. Undōbu
Sylacauga,Peggy Easterling Rozelle
Policy and Governance in Sport,"Jason W. Lee, Robin Hardin"
Peyton Manning,Jameson Anderson
Talladega Superspeedway,Kent Whitaker
Chosŏn ch'eyuksa,Hŭi-ch'ang Sŏn
Sports and labor in the United States,Michael Schiavone
Vintage pennant price guide,Mike Egner
Direito desportivo,Alvaro Melo Filho
Green County,Joseph Y. DeSpain
Know your numbers,Alex Kuskowski
"Planning an applied research project in hospitality, tourism, and sports",Frederic B. Mayo
Sporting facts and sporting fancies,Harry Hieover
Saint and Greavsie's funny old games,Ian St. John
"Never before, never again",Larry Writer
darren lockyer auto biography ,Darren Lockyer
Mind in sport,Kenneth E. Jennings
A sportsman's memories,Edward Roper
Les Cultures sportives,Christian Pociello
Herzfrequenzvariabilität,Kuno Hottenrott
Skills for work,Emma Hayes
Athletics for physical culture,Theodore Christian Knauff
Qiao yin liao shang,Jiaxiong Li
About strange but true mysteries,Tony 'Anthony' Tallarico
A evolução do futebol e das normas que o regulamentam,Mauricio de Figueiredo Corrêa da Veiga
Athlētikē nomothesia,Stelios N. Kousoulēs
Guardians of the peaks,"Katherine M. Calvert, Kathy Calvert, Dale Portman"
Professional athlete and sports official,"John Riddle, Rae Simons, Joyce Libal, Rae Simon"
Les organisations sportives et l'Europe,Colin Miège
Kaleidoskope des Körpers,Maud Corinna Hietzge
"An English XIX century sportsman, bibliopole and binder of angling books","Andrews, William Loring"
Be safe on your bike,Bridget Heos
Greatest comebacks in sports,Dustin Long
Sportbeugung,Zübeyde Duyar
Toward one flag,Walter Henry Palmberg
Science in sports,International Congress of Sports Sciences (1978 University of Alberta)
A study of a Japanese-American basketball league and the assimilation of its members into the mainstream of United States society,Haruo Nogawa
To authorize amateur boxing in the District of Columbia,United States. Congress. House
Amateur Sports Integrity Act,"United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation."
Authorization of soap box derby races on Capitol grounds,United States. Congress. House. Committee on Transportation and Infrastructure
"Tennis, back to the basics","Carole J Zebas, Carole J. Zebas, H. Mardi Johnson"
"Full Committee Hearings on S. 2441, H.R. 6171, H.R. 6805, H.R. 4316, S. 1990, H.R. 6478, H.R. 7058",United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on Armed Services.
"Full Committee Hearing on S. 677, H.R. 2736, S. 1220, H.R. 4692, S. 1244, H.R. 1184, H.R. 3911",United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on Armed Services.
"Sport history, sport pedagogy and sport philosophy, sport sociology",Olympic Scientific Congress (1984 University of Oregon)
Scientific program abstracts,Olympic Scientific Congress (1984 University of Oregon)
"Welfare, recreation, and morale",United States Department of the Army
Career patterns and career contingencies in sport,International Committee for the Sociology of Sport. Regional Symposium
West Midlands sport 2000,West Midlands Council for Sport and Recreation.
Motor learning and biomechanical factors in sport,Congress of the Canadian Society for Psychomotor Learning and Sport Psychology (10th 1978 Toronto)
U.S. participation in the 1980 summer Olympic games,United States. Congress. House. Committee on Foreign Affairs
British sports and pastimes. 1868,Anthony Trollope
Fiqh al-lahw wa-al-tarwīḥ,Yūsuf Qaraḍāwī
Friday Night Fighter,Troy Rondinone
Sport in Urban England,Catherine Budd
Tour de France,Paul Hansford
Working Out Desire,Sertaç Sehlikoglu
Wopper,Frank Amoroso
Sports Television,Victoria E. Johnson
Dizionario dello sport,Giuseppe Ragazzini
Simple Soul,Kimberly Cowherd
Little Book of Irish Athletics,Tom Hunt
How to Street Fight,"Sam Fury, Shumona Mallik"
Skill Acquisition in Sport,"Nicola Hodges, Mark A. Williams"
Perception and Decision-Making in Sport,"A. Mark Williams, Robin Jackson"
Meaning of Sports,Michael Mandelbaum
Sex Gender and Sexual Diversity in Sport,Vikki Krane
Feminist Figure Girl,Lianne McTavish
Strength and Conditioning,Ian Jeffreys
Highlights,Frank Keating
Five Strides on the Banked Track,"Frank Deford, Iooss, Walter, Jr."
Soccer Fitness,Dylan Joseph
Sports Medicine for Moms,Deniece Oates
Proceedings of the 10th International Symposium on Computer Science in Sports (ISCSS),"Paul Chung, Andrea Soltoggio, Christian W. Dawson, Qinggang Meng, Matthew Pain"
La gouvernementalité du sport en Afrique,Elias Mbengalack
Stress and Recovery in Sport,"Michael Kellmann, Sarah Kölling"
Informelles Lernen Im Sport,Nils Neuber
Who's Coming Out to Play,Claire Carter
Playing While White,David J. Leonard
Ask a Sport Psychologist,Tony Westbury
Gender and Race in Sports,"Duchess Harris, Kate Conley"
Kids' Guide to Sports Design and Engineering,"Thomas K. Adamson, McConnell, Robert L."
Youth Sport and Spirituality,Patrick Kelly
Scuba Pioneer,George Landgrabe
The spirit of the game,Mihir Bose
Inspired,Steven Redgrave
Applied Sport Psychology,Jim Taylor
Managing Mega-Sport Events,Stephen Frawley
Body Composition,Henry Charles Lukaski
Pirates Reader,Richard Peterson
Starting a Sport,Harold T. Rober
BTEC level 3 national sport,Jennifer Stafford-Brown
Weird-But-True Facts about Sports,"Arnold Ringstad, Kathleen Petelinsek"
The sports book,Ray Stubbs
Corpus Approaches to the Language of Sports,"Marcus Callies, Michaela Mahlberg, Magnus Levin, Wolfgang Teubert"
BTEC Nationals Sport Student Book 2 + ActiveBook,"Adam Gledhill, Alex Sergison, Chris Lydon, Dale Forsdyke, Chris Manley"
Walking on Water,Geoff Holt
Squire Osbaldeston: his autobiography,George Osbaldeston
This Sporting Life,Robert Colls
Game Day,Kevin Sylvester
Hillside Fields,Bob Barnett
Muscling in on New Worlds,"Raanan Rein, David Sheinin"
Vintage Skiing,"Ray Atkeson, Rick Schafer"
Contemporary Cases in Sport,"Alan Fyall, Brian Garrod"
Kartellrecht der Sportregeln,Christian Dietz
Coaching for Elite Performance,Mike Symonds
Sporty Looping,Allyssa Loya
Best American Sports Writing 2014,"Glenn Stout, Christopher McDougall"
Game Changer,"Kirk Cousins, Ted Kluck"
Physiological Aspects of Sport Training and Performance,Jay Hoffman
Judge Merit Golfing Club,Matt Hargrove
My Horseback Riding Lessons,Karleen Tauszik
My Martial Arts Lessons,Karleen Tauszik
ACE Your Way,Ben Loeb
Wopper YA,Frank Amoroso
Backwoods ethics,Laura Waterman
Success Trail,Jack Perconte
Built 4 Winning,Jeff Friday
My Swimming Lessons,Karleen Tauszik
Perfect Game,William Winokur
Legendary Speaking,"Joe Broadmeadow, Billy Vigeant"
"Joe Harris, the Moon",Joyce Miller
Clemente Ball,Brian Croasmun
Brooks Stevens and the Stevens Family Legacy,Robert Birmingham
Wopper - The Show,Frank Amoroso
My Basketball Season,Karleen Tauszik
A Man and His River,"Reid, D. C."
Meridian 12,"Quinn Haber, Shane Colclough"
Basketball,Christina Earley
Baseball,Christina Earley
Football,Christina Earley
Arena,"David Koch, Calvin Schiraldi"
Prinzipien des Karate,"Russ Smith, Philipp Surkov, Mark V. Wiley"
Joe Nuxhall : the Old Lefthander & Me,John Kiesewetter
Diary of a Cycle Path,"John Brown, Steve Johnson, Lilianna Guia"
Wopper - The Series,Frank Amoroso
"Monsters, Mayhem and Miracles",Chuck Wechsler
Fighting Hard,"B. B. Anderson, Rylan Hunter, Siolnatine"
And My Father Was There,Noah McCaffrey
"Going, Going, Gone!",Steve Hermanos
The Book of sports lists # 2,"Phil Pepe, Zander Hollander"
AMERICA'S HORSE,Jimmy Patterson
KAW Match 1 - Ringside Rumble,Scott Groach
"Pro Mountain Biker: The Complete Manual of Mountain Biking - Bikes, Accessories and Techniques","Jeremy Evans, Brant Richards"
The Complete Handbook of the Summer Olympic Games,Zander Hollander
Fractured Futures,Kris Butler
Damaged Dreams,Kris Butler
Shattered Secrets,Kris Butler
W.H. Murray,"W. H. Murray, W.H. Murray"
Sports' One-Hit Wonders,Thomas Carothers
Alley-Oop!,"Zanthia ""The Ball Mom Doc"" Reddish"
Suparinpei,Giles Hopkins
Short Season with Ernie,Joe Seme
ABC's of Hunting,Josh Farr
Written on Water,Randy Spencer
I of the Tiger,Kimberly Carducci
Art of Kicking,Eric Piccione
Memories and Dreams,The National Baseball Hall of Fame
Timely Assist,Robyn M. Ryan
Tennis for Little Humans,Venetia Thompson
Hockey,Craig Ellenport
Least among Them,Paul Russell Semendinger
Practical Skills in Sport and Exercise Science,Mark Smith
Handbook on the Economics of Sport,"Wladimir Andreff, Stefan Szymanski"
Surfer Alone,Nick Bruechle
My Dance Lessons,Karleen Tauszik
My Archery Lessons,Karleen Tauszik
My Gymnastics Lessons,Karleen Tauszik
System,"Bill Madden, Michael Rappaport, Earl Shores"
My Ice Skating Lessons,Karleen Tauszik
Playmakers,Tom Greve
Adventures of Carmelo-Jiu Jitsu,fred berri
Abdi's World,"Myles Schrag, Mo Farah, Abdi Abdirahman"
United States Open Golf Champions,Tony Dulio
Science and Soccer,Mark A. Williams
Sloppy by Design,Dan Le Batard
LeBron James,Mango Media Staff
Masters,Associated Press
Get Up & Fight,"Rena Rusty Kanokogi, Jean Kanokogi, Billie Jean King"
The Ultimate Assist,Greg Nared
Sport participation in Canada : 1998 report =,Sport Canada.
Sports Geography,J. Bale
Diva Was a Female Version of a Wrestler,Scarlett Harris
Common Angler,Jack Wollitz
Athletes all,Walter Camp
Michigan Wolverines Softball Coloring Book,Anthony Powell
I Am Oum Ry,"Addi Somekh, Zochada Tat, Oum Ry Ban"
I Guess Today I'm Horseshit Coach,Gregory Johnson
Empowering TRIathletes to LEAD,"Tekemia Dorsey, Beloved Joshua Simons, Halee Simons, Heaven Simons"
Long Way Home,Pete Ripmaster
Career ideas for kids who like sports,Diane Lindsey Reeves
Superstars of Sports,"Brenda Haugen, Tyler Omoth"
Matter of Fact,M. E. Carter
Camden Hills Bouldering,"Mike Lee, Tom Hardy"
Focus Like a Champion the Athletes' Playbook to Build Confidence in Basketball,Delice Coffey
Hooking,Kristine Allen
Ely Air Lines,"Mike Ely, Linda Street-Ely"
Jimmy,"Provance, Donald, Jr."
Goodfellows,"Rick Gosselin, Tony Dungy"
Show Strides,Piper Klemm
Changing Lives Series,Jessie Bowen
You Are the First You,Whitney Holtzman
War,Don Stradley
Simone Biles : Gymnstars Volume 6 : Gymnastics Superstar & G.O.A.T. : Gymnstars Volume 6,"Christine Dzidrums, Joseph Dzidrums"
Transforming Trauma with Jiu-Jitsu,"Jamie Marich, Anna Pirkl"
Curling,Ashley Gish
Luge,Ashley Gish
Freestyle Skiing,Ashley Gish
Snowboarding,Ashley Gish
Speed Skating,Ashley Gish
Ice Hockey,Ashley Gish
Alpine Skiing,Ashley Gish
Figure Skating,Ashley Gish
World's Greatest Backyard Games,"Matthew Grear, Polly Jiménez"
Beatboxing,Todd D. Snyder
Sports for Sprouts,Holly Karapetkova
Ancient Greek Athletics,"Charles H. Stocking, Susan A. Stephens"
Obstacles,Odelia Chan
My Volleyball Season,Karleen Tauszik
My Cheerleading Season,Karleen Tauszik
Science and Philosophy of Martial Arts,"Alex W. Tong, Frederick Turner"
Martial Arts and the Mirror Image,Phillip Starr
Great Day...Today!,Bill Kramer
Perfect Golf Swing in Words and Picture,Shauger
Searching for Center,"Henry Wang, Ted Libby"
How sport works,Carol Gold
Secret Home of Golf,Jim Hartsell
Ethics of Sport,Robert L. Simon
Le sport dans tous ses pouvoirs,"Université sportive d'été (12th 1995 Dijon, France)"
The Useful Knots Book,"Sam Fury, Diana Mangoba"
Regarding Willingness,"Tom Harpole, Daniel J. Rice, Loren Haarr"
Fundamentals of sport marketing,"Brenda G. Pitts, David K. Stotlar"
On Wisconsin!,"Don Kopriva, Jim Mott"
Sport in space and time,"International Seminar for Sociology of Sport (11th 1993 Vienna, Austria)"
The political economy of sport,Bruce Kidd
Andere tijden sport,"Jurgen Leurdijk, Dirk Jan Roeleven"
The Idea of Sport in Western Culture from Antiquity to the Contemporary Era,Saverio Battente
A landsman's log-book,John T. P. Knight
Anatomy of a Winning Culture,Tom Atencio
Deportes de ciudad,"Isidro Sánchez Sánchez, Isidro Sanchez, Carme Peris"
Making the American team,Mark Dyreson
My Best Race,Chris Cooper
Best of Mixed Martial Arts,"Tapout Magazine, Mma Worldwide Magazine, Randy Couture"
The Great American Soccerbook,Harvey Frommer
The One She Needs,Marissa J. Gramoll
365 Days of Survival,"Check Freedman, Billy Jensen"
The clinical pharmacology of sport and exercise,Fundacion Dr. Antonio Esteve. Symposium
Cassell's Sports Quotations,David Pickering
"Pitchers do get lonely, and other sports stories",Ira Berkow
Ultimate Diver's Log Book,Dived Up Publications
Amino Acids and Proteins for the Athlete,Mauro G. Di Pasquale
Luchador,Erin Finnegan
Sportsoziologische Aufklärung,Karl-Heinrich Bette
Race and sport,Richard Thompson
Hoops Heist,Jon Finkel
Come to Win,"Venus Williams, Kelly E. Carter"
Greek Athlete,Fiona MacDonald
The meat in the sandwich,Alice Bach
Sport and the Natural Environment,Michael Pfahl
Every boy's book,Edmund Routledge
The inner athlete,Robert M. Nideffer
Wielki słownik sportowy rosyjsko-polski,Zbigniew Fedus
The Poetry of Sport,Hedley Peek
Super sports trivia,Jeff Burdick
Betting the Line,"Richard O. Davies, Richard G. Abram"
Sport and Exercise Psychology,Aidan P. Moran
"More than beards, bellies and biceps","Robert Gordon, Tom Burgoyne"
Changes in the affective state of guilt as a function of exhibiting instrumental or reactive aggression,John M. Silva
A World-Class Mountain Biker (The Making of a Champion),Paul Mason
2006 ESPN sports almanac,"Gerry Brown, Michael Morrison"
Livin It,Stephen Baldwin
The Story of English Sport (Student Sport Studies),Larry Ray
The complete knot pack,"Steve Judkins, Timothy Davison"
Tales from the Gamecock's Roost,Tom Price
Making sense of sports,Ellis Cashmore
Poetry of Motion,Alan Bold
Route Finding,Gregory Crouch
Major Leagues,Thomas W. Brucato
In the Game,Eric Anderson
Gender and Sport,S. Scranton
Tiger Woods,Jack Clary
Sport and Society (Issues in Society),Graham Scambler
Forty years of a sportsman's life,"Champion de Crespigny, Claude Sir, bart."
Sheltie rides to win,Peter Clover
Sports photo album,William Jacobellis
From rattlesnake hunt to hockey,William Perkins Bull
"""Pop"" Warner's book for boys",Glenn S. Warner
British sport,"Parker, Eric"
Sport at home and abroad,"Lennox, William Pitt Lord"
The Minoan-Mycenaean background of Greek athletics,William Robbins Ridington
The scientific American boy,A. Russell Bond
Safety in athletics,Frank Sidney Lloyd
British field sports,"Lawrence, John"
Merveilles de la force et de l\'adresse,Guillaume Depping
Wonders of bodily strength and skill,Guillaume Depping
King Edward VII. as a sportsman,Alfred Edward Thomas Watson
The complete sportsman,Thomas Fairfax
Return of a champion,"Joseph Layden, Joe Layden"
Buddha,"Garry Hocking, Jason Underhill"
Beginning wrestling,"Thomas Ryan, Julie Sampson"
The economics of sports,"Michael A. Leeds, Peter von Allmen"
Foreign package holidays,Monopolies and Mergers Commission
Real Sports (South Atlantic Quarterly),James T. Fisher
"Irish sport, 1950-2000",Ian Foster
Ricky in the world of sport,Marion Renick
World War Two,Robert J. Hoare
Sportbiologie,Gottfried Schönholzer
American Indian Games,Jay Miller
Leisure in the North West,North West Sports Council.
The sportsman's encyclopedia,Bill Burton
The Wild World of Sports,Gene Elston
Comparative physical education and international sport,Myrtis E. Herndon
Soziologie des Sports,Magglinger Symposium (10th 1969)
Imaging,"Ross Robert Olney, Ross Olney, Patricia Olney"
Jim Thorne's guide to adventure,Jim Thorne
East-West sport relations,Ivor Goldsmid Samuel Montagu
Începuturi sportive bucureștene,Ion Puiu Dumitrescu
More sports titans of the 20th century,Al Silverman
The origin and the historical development of Silambam fencing,J. David Manuel Raj
Berufssport am Beispiel Fussball,Sporttagung Evangelische Akademie Bad Segeberg 1975.
Strange and Incredible Sports Happenings,Mac Davis
Great American sports humor,Mac Davis
Great sports humor,Mac Davis
Food for Sports (Making Healthy Food Choices),Neil Morris
Beat the Clock Sports,Ray Miller
Champions' book of sports,Samuel Nisenson
Promoter ain't a dirty word,Harry Glickman
ABC's wide world of sports record book,Jim Bukata
Sporting heritage,Guy Lewis
Monografía del deporte,Rubén Encalada Alonzo
Athletic injuries,J. V. Cerney
You are the captain,Percy E. Arthur
Handbook for student athletic managers,John Harold Griffin
Das grosse Lexikon des Sports,Heinrich Zech
The sporting gesture,Thomas Louis Stix
Proceedings,"Big Ten Symposium on the History of Physical Education and Sport Ohio State University 1971., Bruce Bennett"
"Sport, Culture and the Media",David Rowe
The intramural handbook,Carl David Voltmer
Bench and bar in the saddle,Charles Pascoe Hawkes
Memoria del Primer Congreso Internacional de Derecho del Deporte,International Congress on Sports Law (1st 1968 Mexico)
Coach's guide to public relations,Sal Verderame
The legal aspects of athletics,Andrew W. Grieve
Coaching the young swimmer,"Kurt Wilke, Orjan Madsen"
"Burguesía y ""gangsterismo"" en el deporte",Dante Panzeri
Le sport en Afrique,Achôt Mélik-Chakhnazarov
Sport and International Relations,Benjamin Lowe
Peaks and pines,"Lees, J. A."
Introdução è sociologia dos desportes,João Lyra
Kreative Sportinformatik,Internationaler Jubiläums-Kongress Sportinformatik Graz 1975.
Biomedizin und Training,Internationaler Kongress für Wissenschaftler und Trainer Mainz 1971.
Twelfth man in the huddle,David L. Diles
Courage on the Line,Cynthia Bates
The art of team coaching,Jim Hinkson
Greek athletics,"Wright, F. A."
The Philosophy of Sport,Robert G. Osterhoudt
Aspects of contemporary sport sociology,C.I.C. Symposium on the Sociology of Sport University of Wisconsin 1968.
"Football, the scientific way","Frank S. Pyke, Ross Smith"
A descriptive analysis of research concerning the philosophy of physical education and sport,Robert G. Osterhoudt
Sport and Leisure (Life in Victorian Times),Neil Morris
Mind-Body Maturity,Louis Diamant
God save the players,Neil Offen
Gymnastik--jederzeit und überall,Hannelore Pilss-Samek
Treatment and prevention of athletic injuries,Joseph P. Dolan
Sport and social exclusion,Michael F. Collins
Soccer for youth,"Norbert Rogalski, N. Rogalski, E. Degel"
Olympische Analysen,Internationaler Kongress für Wissenschaftler und Trainer Mainz 1973.
An anatomical analysis of sports,Gertrude Hawley
The sportsman's primer,Norman Henry Crowell
Winged words on Chantrey's woodcocks,James Patrick Muirhead
"Subcommittee hearing on H. R. 1184, to authorize the training for, attendance at, and participation in, Olympic games by military personnel, and for other purposes",United States. Congress. House. Committee on Armed Services. Subcommittee No. 3.
Basketball drills for skills,"Johnson, Kevin, Kevin Johnson, Tom Newell"
Hiking Oregon's geology,Ellen Morris Bishop
Sport and medicine,"Commonwealth and International Conference on Sport, Physical Education, Dance, Recreation, and Health (8th 1986 Glasgow, Scotland), Physical Education, Dance, Recreation, and Health (8th : 1986 : Glasgow, Scotland) Commonwealth and International Conference on Sport, J. A. Macgregor"
Kinanthropometry III,"Commonwealth and International Conference on Sport, Physical Education, Dance, Recreation, and Health (8th 1986 Glasgow, Scotland)"
"Guinness Sports Record Book, 1989-90",David A. Boehm
Aktuelle Probleme der Sportphilosophie,"Workshop in the Philosophy of Sport (1980 Karlsruhe, Germany)"
Fun and Games with Alistair Cooke,Alistair Cooke
The Pack fights back,"George Sauerberg, Vernon Biever"
The ABC's of athletic injuries and conditioning,Albert Barnett Ferguson
Gimme a break!,Warner Wolf
70 let sovetskogo sporta,G. S. Demeter
Olimpiĭskie mgnovenii͡a︡ =,Igorʹ Aleksandrovich Kazanskiĭ
Famous sporting fiascos,Stephen Winkworth
Stretching,"Michèle Esnault, Esnault, Viel"
Theories de la motivation et pratiques sportives,Cury /Sarrazin Franco
Le sport et les collectivités territoriales,"Patrick Bayeux, Que sais-je?"
Les institutions sportives,"Colin Miège, Que sais-je?"
Sports for the blind,Charles E. Buell
Sports Illustrated Kids Crunch Time,"Matt Chandler, Thom Storden"
The way of the champion,"Jerry Lynch, Al Chung-Liang Huang, Chungliang Al Huang"
Fly Tying Illustrated/third Edition,Tom Gauthier
Varsity Seven,Peter Hawkins
The worst day I ever had,Fred McMane
The quiet storm,"Alexandra Powe Allred, Alexandra Powe-Allred, Michelle Powe"
Baseball Is Life Is Baseball,Charlie LaDuca
Effective Coaching,Jon Metz
Underbelly Hoops,Carson Cunningham
Once Bitten,Nigel Vardy
Physical Education,"Carl Atherton, Symond Burrows, Sue Young, Michaela Byrne"
Going Low - How Profane Politics Challenges American Democracy,Finbarr Curtis
Practical Guide to Reloading Ammunition,Tom McHale
Climbing Alphabet,"Katherine Willow, Laure Braconnier"
Record Breakers,"Shane Frederick, Hans Hetrick"
"Collecting Fishing Tackle Ephemera, Volume One","Leonard P. Brooks, James K. Garrett, Todd E. A. Larson"
Coach Herrin,Matt Wynn
Ballin with a Playbook,Sullivan Phillips
Ballin with a Playbook Workbook Edition,Sullivan Phillips
Training Soccer Champions,"Ansom Dorrance, Tim Nash, Adrienne Nunez"
Association Work,Scott Johnson
American Treble,Negro Lomas
Alley-Oop,"Harvey, Walter, Jr., Lock, Kenneth, 2nd"
Training Mission One,"Hock Hochheim, Jane Eden"
28,"Brad Mangin, Murphy, Brian"
Let the Games Begin,Kevin Mcleod
Openweight,Jonathan Pogioli
Use It or Lose It,Dana Burnett
"Glory of old IU, Indiana University","Bob Hammel, Kit Klingelhoffer"
Technology in Esports,Cecilia Pinto McCarthy
Gaming Careers in Esports,Emily Hudd
Esports Competitions,Erin Nicks
The View from Pluto,Terry Pluto
Fields of friendly strife,John Janovy
That's Not Hockey!,"Andrée Poulin, Félix Girard"
Sports Illustrated Kids Stars of Sports,"Matt Chandler, Shane Frederick"
Jackrabbit,"Bill Chastain, Tony Barnhart"
Die Wissenschaft der Selbstdisziplin,Peter Hollins
60 Season,Joey Monteleone
Race and Sports Management,"Duchess Harris, Michael Miller"
O Cérebro No Esporte,"David Grand, Alan Goldberg"
Scooter and Rocky,Scott Shimada
"Season of Victory, MANTI Football","Robert R. 'Buck' Gent, Sam Sherrill"
Marcus,Victor Ehimen Ighedosa
Catching Baby Moses,Anthony Barbera
My Life Be Like,Chase Howell
Center Bench All-Star,Brian Campbell
Time to Win Again,"Pete Moore, Mark Siermaczeski"
Game of my life,"Steve Greenberg, Steven Greenberg, Laura Lanese"
Body Turn,Robert Gugutzer
Mississippi State Bulldogs Women's Basketball Coloring Book,Anthony Powell
Sid Hartman's Great Minnesota Sports Moments,Sid Hartman
Esports Stars,Erin Nicks
Orange County Football Book,Dennis Bateman
Unusual Histories,"Lucia Raatma, Craig Sodaro"
50 Years in the Bleachers,Christine Hawkinson
Root of Nepal Taekwondo,Jay K. Shin
Ice Pack,"Jim Valenti, Kevin Ryan"
Mountain Dreams,Steve Gardiner
Lords of the Veldt & Vlei,Jim Casada
Moving the Goalposts,Martin Polley
Blood on the Horns,Roland Lazenby
Faith in sports,Steve Hubbard
Glove Letters,"Taylor Wilson, Jacque Hillman, Kim Stewart, Katie Gould"
Game Ball,Peter Alson
For the Record,"Tyler Omoth, Anthony Wacholtz, Shane Frederick"
"Muscle Energy Techniques, Second Edition",John Gibbons
"China Gold, A Companion to the 2008 Olympic Games in Beijing","Fan Hong, Duncan Mackay, Karen Christensen"
Way to go!,Lillian Morrison
Sports Fun,"Imogen Kingsley, Tyler Dean Omoth"
Soccer,K. C. Kelley
Thanks-Thanks a Lot,"Billy Parker, John Wooley, Brett Bingham"
Christmas on Ice,Kerry Evelyn
Ultimate Fundraisers That Work!,Joel Orlando
Overseas Famous : the Travels and Tribulations of a Basketball Globetrotter,Kevin Owens
Assessment tools for recreation therapy,"Joan Burlingame, Thomas M. Blaschko"
Dirt!,"Howard, John, John Howard"
George Plimpton on Sports (On),George Plimpton
Great Sporting Eccentrics,Geoff Tibballs
Basketball,K. C. Kelley
The franchise,Michael MacCambridge
College Esports,Erin Nicks
Complete Book of Outdoor Sports,Gene Brown
High School Basketball,Joshua Banks
For Those Who Can't,Brendan Walsh
Windy city wars,Gerald R. Gems
The athletic crusade,Gerald R. Gems
Inside The Nautical Mind's Eye,Karen Jewell
Great Sporting Failures,Geoff Tibballs
Great Sporting Mishaps,Geoff Tibballs
Dr. le Cara's Approach to Blood Flow Restriction Training,Edward Le Cara
Opportunities in sports and athletics careers,"William Ray Heitzmann, Wm. Ray Heitzmann"
Best short hikes in California's north Sierra,"Karen Whitehill, Shane Shepherd, Owen Wozniak, Terry Whitehill, Mountaineers (Society)"
Tales of Minnesota Motorcycle Racing,Bob Chase
Stepping Stones,Ken Harvey
Finding Elevation,Lisa Thompson
Martial Arts and Your Life,"Lawrence Kane, Kris Wilder"
The psychology of coaching team sports,Larry M. Leith
VSL 2 Enhanced,Karl Coyne
Winterdanse,Michael Russell
Amazing Race,Amanda Banks
Sliding Headfirst,Kristin Lee
Finding Your First Horse,Meredith Hill
Cricket Skills,Charles Frederick Hartley
Hiking!,"Philip Ferranti, Joie Goodkin, Cecilia Leyva"
America's obsession,Richard O. Davies
DECKER,"Kayley Loring, Connor Crais"
Pickleball Faith,"Stacy Lynn Harp, David Hart, Sandi Frederick"
Cyclettes,Tree Abraham
Los deportes,Hugo Angel Jaramillo
Taming the Beast,"Rory Holloway, Eric Wilson"
Basketball,Ellen Labrecque
Soccer,Jim Buckley
Rock Climbing,"Michael Teitelbaum, Jeffrey S. Gehris"
Golf,Jim Buckley
Baseball's Greatest Players,James H. Smith
Equality in Sports,Tracy Miller
Winter Sports,"Josephine Pollard, McLoughlin Brothers Staff"
Manuel D'Auto-Défense,"Sam Fury, Neil Germio, Mincor Inc"
Nützliche Knotenbuch,"Sam Fury, Diana Mangoba, The Urban Writers"
Vince's Secret Locker Mystical Enhanced : Volume 1,Karl Coyne
Vince's Secret Locker Volume 3,Karl Coyne
Vince's Secret Locker Artistic Enhanced Volume 1,Karl Coyne
Surviving Junior Tennis,Alanna Wolff
Help! I Bought a New Horse!,Meredith Hill
Get up Living,"Sean Crevier, Linda Wolf, Scott Ventura"
Peligro de Gol - Estudios Sobre DePorte y Sociedad (Colección Grupos de Trabajo de Clacso),Pablo Alabarces
Spirit of Nebraska,Debra Kleve White
Learn to Fish,"Gail Ann Grizzell, Dennis James Knowles, Jamie Sale"
Fast Lines,Pete Lyons
More Than a Story,Jenni Bara
On the Road for Travelball,Sue Rosenfeld
Gender Politics in US College Athletic Departments,"Lisa A. Kihl, Vicki D. Schull, Sally Shaw"
Of Course Tennis,P. J. Parsons
Saddles of the frontier West,"B. Byron Price, Richard Rattenbury, Helene Sage"
The Mental Edge for Sports,Jim Taylor
Courtside Conversations,"May, Amere, Sr."
Quarterback Dads,"Teddy Greenstein, Donovan Dooley"
Forgetful Scarlett Plays Soccer,"Sarah Boyle, Sergio Drumond"
Catching the Wind,Steve Physioc
"Oh, the Mountains You'll Ski!","Chutes, Debra Federline"
Spokane Bouldering,"Nate Lynch, Shane Collins"
Training the teenager for the game of their life,Kris Gebhardt
Against the Boards,Danica Flynn
Monster Fishing the World and Back,Mark Spitzer
Academy,T. Z. Layton
Sixteen Win by Two,Andy Durham
Best Chelsea Trivia Book Ever,House of Ballers
Championship at Thunder Mountain,Cynthia Reisenauer
National Championships,Cynthia Reisenauer
Regional Championships,Cynthia Reisenauer
Melting the Ice,Kerry Evelyn
Winning Pétanque,Harwell Thrasher
Fans Have More Friends,"Ben Valenta, David Sikorjak"
Favorite Hikes in and Around Saint George,"Bo Beck, Jeremy Gorzalski"
Culture System,J. P. Nerbun
2022 Winter Olympics (Volume 5),Alice Daena
My Brother's Keeper,"Eugene Lee, Omari Hardwick"
Portraits of NASCAR,"Anita Rich, Robin Dallenbach"
Glory Through Pain,"Christy Callahan, Nick Dvorak"
Complete Introduction to Mountain Biking : MTB Tips for Beginners,"Sam Fury, Neil Germio"
Burnout,Alex A. Gaynes
Blistering Pace,Marc Frost
Sports Science Fair Projects,Madeline Goodstein
Let Us Play the Damn Game,Joe Kelly
Hockey Is for Everybody,"Anthony Walsh, Justine Ross"
Rebel,Ginger Scott
Ice Hockey,Barbara M. Linde
Classic NFL Games,Matt Scheff
Loner,Ginger Scott
Sports Camp,"Monique Dorcely, Gabby Dorcely, Jehovahnie Dorcely, Emmanuel Dorcely, Angelique Dorcely"
12 Reasons to Love Gymnastics,Joanne Mattern
Scholastic Year in Sports 2015,James Buckley Jr.
Football,Christina Earley
Baseball,Christina Earley
Basketball,Christina Earley
Rookies in the Wild,John Riha
12 Reasons to Love Skiing and Snowboarding,Joanne Mattern
Fierce NFL Rivalries,Matt Scheff
In Tandem,"Jay Livingston, Szifra Birke"
How to Coach Tee-Ball,Donald E. Pena
How to Be a Winner,Bryce Wilson
World Cup '98,"Glen Phillips, Tim Oldham"
Life Is Not a Lay-Up,Marty Urand
Open Fire,M. E. Carter
Pistol Practice,John Kolis
My Swim Journal,S. R. Fabrico
My Gymnastics Journal,S. R. Fabrico
How to Mentally Control a Game During Competition,Michael Taylor
Sports Therapy,Mark Hudson
How to Ride the Bench and Still Get an Athletic Scholarship,Michael Taylor
Dream boat living,"Bette L. Waters, Bette Waters, Gerald Curwin"
The cultural significance of sport in the Colonial Chesapeake and Massachusetts,Nancy L. Struna
A study of Martin Buber's I-Thou and I-It relationships in sport,Joy Theresa DeSensi
Advanced turkey hunting,"Michael Hanback, Creative Publishing int'l, Gary Clancy"
Sport governance in the global community,James E. Thoma
The dragon and the tiger,"Sid Campbell, Greglon Lee"
Balisong,"Sid Campbell, Gary Cagaanan, Sonny Umpad"
"Sport, culture, politics and Scottish society",Joseph M. Bradley
The Gaelic Athletic Association and Irishness in Scotland,Joseph M. Bradley
"""Daily Telegraph"" Century of Sport",David Welch
On the edge,Jeff Putnam
Mr Smith,"Smith, Walter, Walter Smith, Ken Gallacher"
Idræt,Johannes Stræde
Masajul,Adrian N. Ionescu
Lost Fire Lookout Hikes and Histories,Leslie Romer
Booked!,Tom Humphries
Kata,Javier Martinez
Noah James the Rodeo King,"Keylonda Wheeler, Selena Tosato"
Here Comes Football,"Burkley Hoover, Sarah Meiers, David Smale"
Cali's Adventures in Sports - Surfing in Hawaii,Joanne Slazyk
Grateful,"Eric Bischoff, Guy Evans"
Head Coach's Guide for Working with Assistants,Scott Rosberg
Amateur sports act of 1978,United States. Congress. House. Committee on the Judiciary. Subcommittee on Administrative Law and Governmental Relations.
Captain John's DOCKING SECRETS,John Jamieson
"Hometown Sports Heroes, Vol. 3","Mike Hauser, Jack Siedlecki"
Cali's Adventures in Sports - Soccer in Seattle,Joanne Slazyk
Runners' Fairy Tales,"Richard Chezum, Julia Chezum"
Cali's Adventures in Sports - Skiing in Whistler,Joanne Slazyk
Ryan Goes Mountain Biking,"Katie Dalton, Craig Friedman, Erica Leigh"
Noble Experiment,Jim Poteet
Down Set Lead,Rod Bourn
With Purpose,"Carleton Brooks, Traci Brooks, Rennie Dyball"
Latter Days,Monte Dutton
Women in the Olympics,"Lindsay Parks Pieper, Jörg Krieger"
Handicapper,Robert Kalich
Scuba Diving Log Book,On Point Paper
Ejercicios de Fútbol de la Copa Del Mundo,Chest Dugger
The Education of a Cave Diver,Guy Bryant
Cruel Hate,Isla Vaughn
Coach's Football Playbook & Game Planner,Coach B. Sports Academy
Delay of Game,Jade Dollston
Football Playbook Designer,Coach B. Sports Academy
Plan TOO,"Tywanna Smith, Tyson Smith"
Ice skating,"Karin Künzle-Watson, Karin Kunzle-Watson, Stephen J. Dearmond"
The 3 scoring clubs,Jim McLean
"Sports, Inc",Phil Schaaf
Effectively Wild,Aeryn Rudel
Keeper,"Raine Miller, Brit DeMille"
Remarkable Life of James Henry O'Rourke,Bernard Crowley
Wicked Ends,Isla Vaughn
Brutal Nights,Isla Vaughn
Unforgettable!,"Richard B. Perelman, Mark Meyers"
Aiken's Sporting Life,"Jane Page Thompson, Linda Knox McLean"
LaVell,"LaVell Edwards, Lavell Edwards, Lee Benson"
Fly and Spin Fishing for River Smallmouths,Bruce Ingram
Sportswise,Lyle J. Micheli
Can You Name That Team?,David B. Biesel
Sportometrics (Texas a & M University Economics Series),Brian L. Goff
Everything You Always,Mickey Herskowitz
Hearst Marine Books sea kayaking basics,"Harrison, David, David F. Harrison, Ronald Carboni"
Surfing,"Ben R. Finney, James D. Houston"
Sharing Best Practices in Sport Marketing,Brenda G. Pitts
Fundamentals of sport marketing,Brenda G. Pitts
Pumping paper,"Richard M. Fenker, Judith Lambiotte, N. T. Pham"
Atlas of imaging in sports medicine,"Jock F. Anderson, Jock . Anderson, I. F. Anderson, John Read"
Graphing sports,Casey Rand
John Cena,Robert Grayson
Yunnan Yi zu chuan tong ti yu wen hua,Guoquan Zhu
The official American Youth Soccer Organization handbook,"American Youth Soccer Organization, Vincent Fortanasce, John Ouelette"
This is my ball =,Amanda Hudson
"A history of sport in Canada, 1807-1867.",Peter Leslie Lindsay
Running for fun!,Jessica Deutsch
Jeff Gordon,Kerrily Sapet
Improving evaluation of sports through statistics,International Sports Statistics Committee. Meeting
Sport as an aesthetic experience,Jean Louis Poirot
Basic sport science,Klaus Klausen
"El Deporte,es Bueno Para La Salud","Stephane Cascua, Stéphane Cascua"
Jeux de hockey,Daniel Carteron
Na mesma sintonia,Orlando Duarte
Zhongguo gu dai ti yu shi hua,Bingguo Liu
Wild Flowers of Western Med,Qihui Wang
Qiang guo meng,Yu Zhao
"Sport and culture formation in Chicago, 1890-1940",Gerald Robert Gems
"Alternative patterns and values of play, games, and sport in America",Dorothy L. Brightman
A history of women's intercollegiate athletics at the University of North Carolina at Greensboro,Deborah Elaine Jones
Sportsmanship in a sporting America,Robin L. Chambers
"The self-concept of participants in kayaking, skydiving and hang gliding",Daniel A. Wheeler
"Sport, physical activity, and achievement",Bruce L. Howe
Affective outcomes in competitive youth sport,Robert John Brustad
"Comparison of various motor ability, strength and structure measures of university varsity golf, tennis and volleyball team members",Brian Anthony Parton
A history of women's intercollegiate athletics at Florida State University from 1905-1972,Mildred M. Usher
The life of Lynn W. St. John,Robert Frederick Block
An analysis of completed doctoral research in physical education and sport philosophy,William Lindsay Shaun Seaman
"Competence perceptions and sources of worry in high, medium, and low competitive trait anxious young athletes",Robert John Brustad
Student support for the intercollegiate athletics programmes at the University of Western Ontario,Larry Bird
Sociological implications of participation in interscholastic varsity football,Robert H. Donnelly
"Sport, athletics, and gymnastics in ancient Greece",James G. Thompson
The development of amateur sport in Ontario,Hilary Anne Findlay
The relationship of task and ego involvement to sportsmanship and aggression tendencies,Linda Kay Olson
The effect of anxiety on sport performance,Julie Anne Smith-Fortune
Sport and physical education in Estonia,Reet Ann Nurmberg
Survey of the family sports environment and attitudes toward recreational and AAU age-group swimming,Steven Edward Haufler
Personal investment in exercise and sport,Kwan Chen
The history of physical activities at an emerging Christian liberal arts college,Jacelyn Carol Jones
Women's basketball,Margaret Ruth Downing
The adaptation and validation of a sport-specific measure of locus of control,Carol Vona Persson
Sources of stress in athletes,Allen Edward Cornelius
Perceptual field dependence among levels of athletes in sports with a preponderance of open or closed skills,William G. McLeod
Sport fans and others,Jeanine Bennett
"A comparison of knee stability related to skeletal maturation of the knee among male and female skiers, swimmers and non-athletes",Mary Elizabeth Vitale
The role and function of physical education and sport in the nation building of Thailand,Sakchye Tapsuwan
The interactive effect of state and trait anxiety on gymnastic performance,Susan Jill Rouse
Typology and social control,Yaping Liu
"A ""Pink 'un"" remembers","Booth, J. B."
Pink parade,"Booth, J. B."
Achievement orientations and sport behavior of males and females,Martha Ewing
Riding,"Richard Hobson, Richard Hobson"
American Anglo-Saxon domination of the 1896 Olympic Games,Rebecca L Trunzo
al- Siyāsah fī ghayr al-siyāsah,ʻAbd al-Munʻim Saʻīd
Manual of British rural sports ..,"Walsh, J. H."
Sports and games,Doug Kincaid
Amateur sport,"Canada. Parliament. House of Commons. Standing Committee on Health and Welfare, Social Affairs, Seniors and the Status of Women."
The sportsman's book for India,Frederick G. Aflalo
Sport in the low-country of Ceylon,Alfred Clark
"A history of sports in Canada, 1868-1900.",Allan Elton Cox
Steroids in sports,"United States. Congress. House. Committee on Energy and Commerce. Subcommittee on Commerce, Trade, and Consumer Protection"
O direito de imagem do praticante desportivo profissional,Sofia de Barros Carvalhosa
European sports law,Stephen Weatherill
"Series chronologica, Olympiadum, Pythiadum, Isthmiadum, Nemeadum, quibus veteres Græci tempora sua metiebantur",William Lloyd
Kingdom come,Eoghan Corry
English Sports Council,English Sports Council.
The sport fan,John Clifford Pooley
Racing and chasing,Hablot Knight Browne
Walks from the West Highland Railway,"Chris Harvey, Chris Harvey, John Harvey"
Greek athletics & festivals in the fifth century,"Museum of Fine Arts, Boston. Division of Museum Extension."
Construction and validation of an instrument designed to assess states of consciousness during movement activity,Jane D. Adair
Rochwist i palant,Wojciech Lipoński
The Stamford Bridge encyclopedia,"Paul Harrison, Paul Harrison"
Toward 2000,Canada. Task Force on National Sport Policy.
Masterclass riding techniques,"Paul Hinton, Paul Hilton, Paul Lyons"
QS,Sarah Deane
The best Los Angeles sports arguments,J. A. Adande
Cómo me divierte el deporte!,"Javier Lascuraín, Javier Lascurain, Pierdomenico Baccalario"
Match analysis and game preparation,"Henry Kormelink, Henny Kormelink, Tjeu Seeverens"
Sports picture puzzles,Matt Bruning
The 100 sporting events you must see live,Robert Tuchman
The complete idiot's guide to ultimate fighting,"Rich Franklin, Rich ""Ace"" Franklin, Jon F. Merz"
Recreation programming,J. Robert Rossman
Fundamentals of sport and exercise psychology,Alan S. Kornspan
La charge de travail en sport de haut niveau,"Entretiens de l'INSEP (2001 Paris, France)"
Getting into Olympic form,"Thomas D. Fahey, Fahey, Thomas D."
SPORT BUSINESS FUTURE,Aaron Smith
Yun dong yi xue jiang zuo,Jinxin Lai
Chen style taijiquan,"David Gaffney, Davidine Sim, David Gaffney"
The Social psychology of sport,Gordon W. Russell
The throws manual,"George D Dunn, George Dunn, Kevin McGill"
The James Traynor and Hugh Keevins sports quiz book,"James Traynor, Jim Trainer, Hugh Keevan"
Playing off the field,Kausik Bandyopadhyay
Yi shi er niao Ying yu wang,Cherise Arnesen
"Sports, the East and the West","ISHPES Seminar Sports, the East and the West (3rd 1996 Ta-liang chen, China)"
Float fishing,"Steve Webb, Steve Webb, Steve Pierpoint, Dave King"
"Proceedings of the sixth international symposium of the International Society of Biomechanics in Sports, held at Montana State University, Bozeman, Montana, July 1988",International Society of Biomechanics in Sports. Symposium
The big jump,"Travis Pastrana, Travis Pastrana, Alyssa Roenigk"
Zone play,"Angelo Perini, Angelo Pereni, Michele Di Cesare"
Soccer fitness training,"Enrico Arcelli, Ferretto Ferretti"
Swimming,"Thomas Jager, Thomas M Jager, Thomas Jager"
The development of a survey instrument to profile donors to athletics,Veronica A. Hammersmith
Rick Monday's tales from the Dodgers dugout,"Rick Monday, Rick Monday, Ken Gurnick"
Big bass zone,"Bill Siemantal, Bill Siemantel, Michael Jones"
Fresh water fishing,"Henry Waszczuk, Henry Waszczuk, Italo Libignan"
Distance training for young athletes,"Arthur Lydiard, Arthur Lydiard, Garth Gilmour"
Winning weight training for girls,"David Porter, David Porter, Gerry Green"
Sport sponsorship & financing of sport,English Sports Council. Information and Research Services.
Rico Pertocelli's tales from impossible dream,"Rico Petrocelli, Rico Petrocelli, Chaz Scroggins"
The outsports revolution,"Jim Buzinksi, Jim Buzinski, Cyd, Jr. Zeigler"
Backcountry skiing,"Martin Volken, Martin Volken, Scott Schell"
Rumi maki fighting arts,"Juan Ramon Rodríguez Flores, Juan Ramon Flores, Alex Bushman Vega"
"Strength, conditioning, and injury prevention for hockey","Joseph M Horrigan, Joseph Horrigan, Earl Joseph Kreis"
Sport and exercise biomechanics,P. Grimshaw
Drop me a line,"Richard Walker, Richard Walker undifferentiated, Maurice Ingham"
Kiliçoyunu terimleri sözlüǧü,Sait Tayla
Fifty years of college football,"Bob Boyles, Bob Boyles, Paul Guido"
How Dr. Death become Dr. Life,"Steve Williams, Steve Williams, Tom Caiazzo"
Managing the money,Martin Venning
The new complete sportsman,"Fairfax, Thomas Esq."
Supōtsu shakaigaku no kanōsei,Masaru Kōzu
Die Sozialpsychologie des Sports in den Medien,Holger Schramm
Le sport et l'Europe,Michel Pautot
Sport (Oxford Literature Resources),John Foster
Freshwater and Salmon Fisheries (Scotland) Act 1976,Rand McNally
Direito penal desportivo,Leonardo Schmitt de Bem
Strange but true sports,Lori Polydoros
Heroes Don't Just Happen,Rose Blue
The Berenstain Bears' Soccer Star,Stan Berenstain
Meet the Red Sox,Mike Kennedy
Meet the Yankees,Mike Kennedy
Meet the Dodgers,Mike Kennedy
The sport quiz book,Philip Reed
Speak Wright,"Ben Wright, Ben Wright, Michael Shiels"
Avery's sports nutrition almanac,"Edmund Burke, Daniel Gastelu"
Greek and Roman sport,Don Nardo
Win Forever,Pete Carroll
Gareth Edwards,"Gareth Edwards, Gareth Edwards, Peter Bills"
Psychosoziale Ressourcen im Sport,Ralf Sygusch
No dribbling the squid,Michael J. Rosen
HIV/AIDS in sport,Gopal Sankaran
The gospel according to ESPN,"Jay Lovinger, Hunter S. Thomopson"
Career Ideas for Kids Who Like Sports (Career Ideas for Kids),Diane Lindsey Reeves
Embodied sporting practices,Kath Woodward
Pathfinder,"Karen E. Channey, Donald D. Shaw"
The October twelve,"Phil Rizzuto, Tom Horton"
Official commemorative book of the Centennial Olympic Games,"David Miller, Woodford Publishing"
Outtakes,"Dan Patrick, Dan Patrick, Pete Sampras"
Paintball Blast,Jake Maddox
The best American sports writing 1999,"Richard Ford, Glenn Stout"
Games We Used to Play,Roger Kahn
Sports,Liz Miles
"Sport Tourism Development (Aspects of Tourism, 13)",James E. S. Higham
Porristas =,Holly Karapetkova
"Sports in America,1950-1959",Jim Gigliotti
Les voies de règlement des litiges sportifs,Cécile Chaussard
Sportivement politique,Alain Herbet
Smash it tennis,Paul C. Challen
Sportselection,Robert Burns Arnot
Stocking stumpers,
How to succeed in sports without ever playing,"Megan Stine, William H. Stine"
Amazing but true sports stories,Steve Riach
Oklahoma shooter,Mike Chapman
Tales from the Reds dugout,"Tom Browning, Tom Browning, Dann Stupp"
Hanʾguk ŭi chʻeyuk chipʻyo =,Sŭng-yun Sin
10 - 13 shi ji Song Li Ri wen hua jiao liu yan jiu,Meihua Li
"Constitution, by-laws and laws of the Montreal Amateur Athletic Association and affiliated clubs",Montreal Amateur Athletic Association.
Teaching individual and team sports,Raymond Talmadge DeWitt
"Le sport, guide officiel",J. P. R. Drouin
Sport and education in history,"ISHPES Congress (8 2003 Urbino, Italy)"
Sport nashikh dedov,Tatʹi︠a︡na Andreeva
Ethiek in beweging,Hilde Bax
Kirche und Sport in Altertum und Mittelalter,Armin Ader
Stridsskrifter,Ivar Lo-Johansson
Corps et société en Guadeloupe,Harry P. Mephon
Salmon and Freshwater Fisheries Act 1975,Rand McNally
The Notre Dame football encyclopedia,"Keith Marder, Mark Spellen, Jim Donovan"
Sports Shorts,"David Lubar, Joseph Bruchac"
The boys' book of sports,Maurice Thompson
Chicken Soup for the Sports Fan's Soul,"Mark Donnelly, Jack Canfield"
Wrestling's great grudge matches,"Bert Randolph Sugar, Bert R. Sugar, George Napolitano"
Chicken Soup for the Sports Fan's Soul,Mark Donnelly
A treasury of sports cartoons,Lawrence Lariar
Asiatische Reiterspiele,Carl Diem
Holiday sports and pastimes for boys,H. D. Richardson
Tributação no futebol,Felipe Ferreira Silva
Leyendas,Jesús Arturo Llanes
Historia del balón,Adriana Suburú
"L'éducation par le sport, imposture ou réalité?",Thierry Long
CareerBall,Russ Hafferkamp
Advanced Studies in Physical Education and Sport,John Taylor
The World of Sport Examined,John Taylor
Top 10 of Sport,Russell Ash
Bink and Gollie,Kate DiCamillo
Cooperstown Symposium on Baseball and the American Culture (1989),"Cooperstown Symposium on Baseball and the American Culture (1st 1989 Cooperstown, N.Y.), N. Y.) Cooperstown Symposium on Baseball and the American Culture (1st : 1989 : Cooperstown, Alvin L. Hall"
Story of the G.A.A,Thomas F. O'Sullivan
"Russia in the 'eighties,'",John F. Baddeley
Athletics in Canadian universities,A. W. Matthews
Time out,Philip Star
Sport et nature dans l'histoire =,International Society for the History of Physical Education and Sport. Congress
Sport competition anxiety test,Rainer Martens
The crazy world of soccer,"Bill Stott, Bill Scott, Bill Stott"
"The development of organized sports in England, 1860-1890",Neil Richard Chinn
The immediate effect of swimming and track competition on blood pH values,James B. Knott
Impulse to addiction,Robert Daley
An analysis of the internal communication structure of a provincial administrative centre for amateur sport,Barbara Elizabeth Chisholm
Annals of American sport,John A. Krout
Die psychologische Theorie des Sports,Wilhelm Benary
A history of the involvement of the American presidency in school and college physical education and sports during the twentieth century,Donald P. Zingale
Senda Berenson Abbott,Agnes CoraRuth Stillman
Sporting Chance,"Lori Alexander, Allan Drummond"
Up Your Game!,"Gary Belsky, Neil Fine"
Nation at Play,Ronojoy Sen
International Research in Science and Soccer II,"Barry Drust, Terence Favero, Brian Dawson"
Palio and ponte,"Heywood, William."
Native Games,"Chris Hallinan, Barry Judd, Kevin Young"
Sky's the limit,Richard Moore
Sport,"Nick Hunter, Nancy Dickmann"
Social Issues in Sport,Ron B. Woods
Pass,John Donnelly
Respiratory Muscle Training,Alison McConnell
Rowdy,"Ariel Teal Toombs, Colt Baird Toombs"
Sports Top Tens,Sandy Donovan
Sally Pearson - Believe,"Sally Pearson, Scott Gullan"
Sport,Jay Schulkin
Sticker Sports,"Kate Davies, Patrick Morize"
On the Origins of Sports,"Gary Belsky, Neil Fine"
Playing to Win,"Robert Alan Brookey, Thomas Patrick OATES"
Biomechanics of Sport and Exercise,Peter M. McGinnis
Whose Side Are You On?,Teddy Jamieson
26.2,"Bryant, John"
"Lombardi Dies, Orr Flies, Marshall Cries",Brad Schultz
"Sport, Social Development and Peace","David Kinney, Kevin Young, Chiaki Okada"
Gloves Off,"Lowell Cohn, Murphy, Brian, Jim Harbaugh"
Well Coached,Keith Wahl
"The village green, or, Sports of youth",Sidney Babcock
Story of the Seattle Seahawks,Jim Whiting
Story of the Cincinnati Bengals,Diane Bailey
Story of the Buffalo Bills,"Mark Shulman, Solomon Shulman"
Story of the New Orleans Saints,Jim Whiting
Story of the Baltimore Ravens,Diane Bailey
Story of the Cleveland Browns,Diane Bailey
Story of the Detroit Lions,Craig Ellenport
Story of the Arizona Cardinals,Craig Ellenport
Story of the Kansas City Chiefs,"Mark Shulman, Solomon Shulman"
Motocross,Heather C. Hudak
Story of the Pittsburgh Steelers,Diane Bailey
Story of the Green Bay Packers,Craig Ellenport
Story of the Minnesota Vikings,Craig Ellenport
Story of the Chicago Bears,Craig Ellenport
Corporate Citizenship im Nachwuchsleistungssport,"Sebastian Braun, Marcel Pillath"
Sportrecht,"Frank Fechner, Johannes Arnhold, Michael Brodführer"
The 50 coolest jobs in sports,"Fischer, David"
Live Albom II,Mitch Albom
Supercharged Sports,Paula Johanson
Achieving Ethical Excellence,Michael Schwartz
Sports report,"Brigitte Henry Cooper, Tim Heitz"
Entre nous,Grant Farred
Stephen Curry,Jordan Lowe
She's Got Game (Set Of 8),North Star North Star Editions
What Did We Do? (Set Of 8),North Star North Star Editions
Team Sports at the Paralympics,Matt Bowers
Wheelchair Sports at the Paralympics,Matt Bowers
All about Stephen Curry,"Anthony Curcio, Colleen Deignan, Calderon, Amber, II"
Girl Without a Face,"Randall Hicks, Hailey Hicks"
Sporty Bugs and Errors,Allyssa Loya
Sporty Conditionals,Allyssa Loya
Great Sports Fails,Grace Campbell
Macho Time,Christian Giudice
Athletic Director's Story and the Future of College Sports in America,"Robert E. Mulcahy, Stewart, Robert, John Samerjan"
Sporty Algorithms,Allyssa Loya
Fistful of Murder,Don Stradley
Biggest upsets in sports,Ken Rappoport
The Ultimate Yankee Book : From the Beginning to Today,Harvey Frommer
The fashion of football,"Paolo Hewitt, Mark Baxter"
Essentials of Cave Diving,Jill Heinerth
Daredevils of the Atlantic,Peter Firstbrook
Michael Jordan,Jordan Lowe
Russell Westbrook,David Bowes
LeBron James,Jordan Lowe
Kobe Bryant,Jordan Lowe
New Psychology of Sport and Exercise,"S. Alexander Haslam, Katrien Fransen, Filip Boen"
Stephen Curry,David Bowes
"Britain and the Olympic Games, 1908-1920",Luke J. Harris
Simply Verona,Verona Van de Leur
Managing Sport Across Borders,A. E. Goslin
Routledge International Encyclopedia of Sport and Exercise Psychology,"Dieter Hackfort, Robert J. Schinke"
Sports Analytics,"Benjamin Alamar, Dean Oliver"
Sports Championships,"Shane Frederick, Tyler Dean Omoth"
Will to Win,"Lana McCarthy, Andy Martin, Geoff Watson"
The body language,"Blake, Andrew, Andrew Blake"
Tales from the University of South Carolina Gamecocks Locker Room,"Price, Tom"
Massillon Tigers 15 For 15,"Lee Morgan, David, Jr., Scott Ryan"
Arctic adventure,Axel Lewis
Männliche Selbstvergewisserung im Sport,"Christoph Blomberg, Nils Neuber"
Innovations in Mental Skills Training,"Bertollo Maurizio, Edson Filho, Peter C. Terry"
Abkürzungen beim Sport,Alfred H. Sokoll
African footballers in Sweden,Carl-Gustaf Scott
Paintball,Demi Jackson
Hornby,"Ian Harrison, Pat Hammond"
Physical education activities handbook,Dennis Keith Stanley
The wacky world of sports,Henry Fankhauser
Corporate sport marketing,Mark E. Moore
Seven lifetime sports,Jerry F. Clark
Subordinate Legislation,"Scotland. Parliament. Education, Culture and Sport Committee."
365 amazing days in sports,"Fischer, David"
Tamarind Stars,Ruth Redford
Die finanzpolitische Bedeutung des Sports in Deutschland,"Tim Pawlowski, Christoph Breuer"
We Could Be Heroes,"Ben Dirs, Tom Fordyce"
Beat the Racetrack,"William T. Ziemba, Donald B. Hausch"
Dr. Z's Beat the Racetrack,"William T. Ziemba, Donald B. Hausch"
Eat Sweat Play,Anna Kessel
Sport and Oral Health,"Siobhan C. Budd, Jean-Christophe Egea"
X Games,"Ian Young, Timothy V. Rasinski"
"Sporting Cultures, 1650-1850","Daniel O'Quinn, Alexis Tadié"
Sport Nutrition,"Asker Jeukendrup, Michael Gleeson"
The Science of Baseball,A. Terry Bahill
Fields of Courage,Max Davidson
The Ethics of Coaching Sports,Robert Simon
Sports Science and Technology in the Real World,Janet Slingerland
It's Not the Winning that Counts,Max Davidson
Spring Creek Treasure,Jay Ford Thurston
Das Sportbuch DDR,Volker Kluge
Sport zur Gesundheitsförderung oder treiben nur Gesunde Sport?,Simone Becker
Physics of Baseball & Softball,Rod Cross
Application of Infrared Thermography in Sports Science,Jose Ignacio Priego Quesada
Extreme sports,"Bobbie Kalman, John Crossingham"
Building a Stadium,Angie Smibert
50 Greatest Players in Indians History,Robert W. Cohen
American Sports in an Age of Consumption,Cory Hillman
Public-Private Partnerships in Physical Activity and Sport,"Norm O'Reilly, Michelle K. Brunette"
AQA AS physical education,Carl Atherton
"Sport, Race, Activism, and Social Change","Fritz G. Polite, Billy Hawkins"
Sports Medicine for Sports Trainers,Sports Medicine Australia Staff
NASCAR in the Driver's Seat,"Mark Stewart, Mike Kennedy"
Winning the Mind Game,"John H. Edgette, Tim Rowan"
Loving Sports When They Don't Love You Back,"Jessica Luther, Kavitha Davidson"
La tranchée d'Arenberg et autres voluptés sportives,Philippe Delerm
Tales from the Minnesota Gophers,"Ray Christensen, Dave Mona"
Tales from the Vanderbilt Commodores,Chris Lee
Stem jobs in sports,Rick Raymos
"Proceedings of the 3rd International Colloquium on Sports Science, Exercise, Engineering and Technology","Norasrudin Sulaiman, Shariman Ismadi Ismail, Rahmat Adnan"
Lucky Johnny,Johnny Sherwood
Sport under Unexpected Circumstances,Gregor Feindt
Philadelphia Phenoms,Michael Baumann
Tales from the Texas Tech Red Raiders Sideline,"Spike Dykes, Dave Boling, Bill Little"
Sport in the USSR and the 1980 olympic games,"Riordan, James"
Skate on Thin Ice,Gilbert Pepper
High Impact Teaching for Sport and Exercise Psychology Educators,"John Coumbe-Lilley, Amber Shipherd"
My name'5 Doddie,Doddie Weir
Super sports,Helen Greathead
Damage,Tris Dixon
Crossing Pirate Waters,Julie Bradley
Sport in a Changing World,"Nixon, Howard L., II"
Beyond Home Plate,Michael G. Long
High-Tech Sports,"Shane Frederick, Suzanne Slade, Thomas K. Adamson"
"Black Press and Black Baseball, 1915-1955",Brian Carroll
Digital Qualitative Research in Sport and Physical Activity,Andrea Bundon
Shunt,Tom Rubython
Get Your Kids Hiking,Jeff Alt
Sport and life in British Columbia,"Piers, Charles Pigott Sir, bart."
Heightened Expectations,Aimee Medeiros
Tackling Life,Jonny Wilkinson
Greenwashing Sport,Toby Miller
Sport Business Handbook,Richard B. Horrow
Too many men on the ice,"Joanna Avery, Julie Stevens"
Impact of Technology in Sports,Matt Anniss
The book of athletics,Paul Withington
SI Kids Guide Books,"Suzanne Slade, Thomas K. Adamson, Christopher Forest, Shane Frederick"
Basketball Science,"Nicki Clausen-Grace, Jeff Grace"
Sports Math,"Thomas K. Adamson, Shane Frederick"
Chosen Ones,Lisa Luciano
The London Olympics of 2012,Stephen Wagg
Sports Poems,Mary Colson
"Blood, Sweat, and Tears",Derrick E. White
A Will to Win,Alex Ferguson
Sports Analytics,"Gil Fried, Ceyda Mumcu"
Sport Governance,Neil A. King
Politics and Protest in Sports,"Duchess Harris, Cynthia Kennedy Henzel"
Performance Anxiety,Michael Hau
Sport and the Shaping of Italian-American Identity,Gerald R. Gems
The game within the game,"Walt Frazier, Dan Markowitz"
Whitewash to Whitewash,Daniel Brettig
"Amateur Musical Societies and Sports Clubs in Provincial France, 1848-1914",Alan R. H. Baker
Gnarly Sports Injuries,John Perritano
African Rifles & Cartridges,John Taylor
Racer,"John Andretti, Jade Gurss"
Mina vs. the Monsoon,"Rukhsanna Guidroz, Debasmita Dasgupta"
Physical Science in Cycling Sports,Enzo George
This Piece of My Heart,Robyn M. Ryan
Father on the Line,Jim Hock
Philosophy of Sport,Jason Holt
Doping in Sports,Stephanie Sammartino McPherson
Math in Art and Sports,Nancy Dickmann
Sports in the News (Set Of 4),North Star North Star Editions
Sports Records (Set Of 6),North Star North Star Editions
Best Easy Day Hikes Pinnacles National Park,"Linda Mullally, David Mullally"
'93 Til,Pete Thompson
Understanding sport psychology,Melanie Gregg
Die Möglichkeit des Sports,Swen Körner
Ordnung in Bewegung,Thomas Alkemeyer
Sports law,D. P. Panagiōtopoulos
O Rio de Janeiro nos jornais,"Jorge Luiz Ferreira, Alessandra Ciambarella"
Signification du sport,Michel Bouet
Yorkshire Tragedy,Anthony Clavane
Die Rechtsproblematik Multipler Regulierungsstrukturen in der Doping-Bekaempfung,Henning Hildebrandt
Psychologie Im Leistungssport,Martin K. W. Schweer
Of Gods and Games,"William J. Baker, Mitchell Reddish"
Athletic Movement Skills,Clive Brewer
Welcome to Helmet Night,"John Blanchette, Shaun O. Higgins"
International Safeguards for Children in Sport,"Daniel Rhind, Frank Owusu-Sekyere"
Sports Bucket List,"Rob Fleder, Steven Hoffman"
Telegraph Book of Champions,"Martin Smith, The Telegraph"
British sport and games,Bernard Darwin
Hickman's farriery,"John Hickman, Maertin Humphrey"
Whitetail hunting,"Shawn Perich, Michael Furman, The editors of Creative Publishing international"
Sporting books in the Huntington library,Henry E. Huntington Library and Art Gallery.
The 500 world's greatest golf holes,"George Peper, Editors of Golf Magazine, The Editors of GOLF Magazine"
Tales from the Oakland Raiders,"Tom Flores, Matt Fulks"
The market structure of sports,Gerald W. Scully
Walk on,"Stephen Kiesling, E. C. Frederick"
Sooch!,Joe Soucheray
Let's go camping with Mr. Sillypants,M. K. Brown
Chapman trailering,"Joe Skorupa, Pat Piper"
Disability sport and recreation resources,"Michael J. Paciorek, Jeffery A. Jones"
Encyclopedia of outdoor & wilderness skills,"Chris Townsend, Annie Aggens"
Basic essentials,"Roseann Beggy Hanson, Jonathan Hanson, Roseann Hanson"
The babe in boyland,Fabulous Sports Babe.
Gold medal mental workout,Dariusz Nowicki
Dream Can Be Achieved,"Brianna Clement, Kingsley Nwosa"
Byrds and the Bees,Nick Mizak
Sociologie politique du sport,Jean Marie Brohm
Polly's in a PICKLE!,Bamboo Island Adventures
Devotion : Strength in Numbers,Jonas N. Strickland
The GAA book of lists,Eoghan Corry
Why Does My Horse Act Like This?,Meredith Hill
Greenwashing Sport,Toby Miller
Teaching cues for sport skills,Hilda Ann Fronske
Demons of Stony River,"Tom Willard, Ted H. Spraker"
101 women's basketball drills,Theresa Grentz
Broadview Book of Sports Anecdotes,Brendan Connor
World motor racing circuits,"Peter Higham, Bruce Jones"
"English literature of the 19th & 20th centuries, being a selection of first and early editions of the works of esteemed authors & book illustrators, together with books on sports and pastimes",Maggs Bros.
Saved by Grace,Carsen Lane
Duke Still Sucks,"Andy Bagwell, Reed Tucker"
Quarter Horse Kids : An Eventer,Jill Thomas
"My Dad, the Baseball Coach","Ashley Hover, Heath Hover, Kenny Kiernan"
Any Given Spring Morning,Hunter Farrior
Racing Hearts and Burning Cars,"Ward Wilson, Robert Schwab"
Black Line Blues,George Tsakumis
"Mario Lemieux over time, 66","Chrys Goyens, Frank Orr"
Crossover to Success,Jimmie L. Lucas
C4 - Building the Powerful Team,"Marshall Calman, Jack Levitt"
Cool Careers Without College for People Who Love Sports,Adam Hofstetter
Run to the River,Ron Glodich
Motorcycle Hacks,David Mixson
Parent's Section,Simone Joye
Jeu et sports en Méditerranée,"Colloque de Carthage (1989 Qarṭājannah, Tunisia)"
Patterns in Sports,Bela Davis
Hate Football?,Barrie Atkin
Faith in Action!,"Andre Foulks, Jarvis Ross"
How to Make the Ultimate Soccer Trip with My Son,"Alvaro Plaza, Clara Jovanovic"
Ultimate Poker Journal,Michael Gabriel
Mental Toughness for Young Athletes,R. K. Publishing
Celebrating National Treasures,Andrew Myers
Sports Illustrated Great Football Writing,Editors of Sports Illustrated
"Guide to the Upper Salt River, Arizona","Duwain Whitis, Barbara Vinson"
Run for Joy,Clifford Calderwood
Volleyball Coaching Wizards - Wizard Women,"Lauren Bertolacci, John Forman"
Making the play,"Dave Winfield, Michael Levin"
Lucky Puck,"Raine Miller, Brit DeMille"
Root Root Root for the Home Teams,Tom Dobrez
The Buttons and the Little League,Edith S. McCall
Training the body for China,Susan Brownell
"Bear Bryant, countdown to glory","Peterson, James A., James Peterson, Bill Cromartie"
Name your adventure,James Everest
I know about sports,Chris Jaeggi
Casey,Joseph Durso
The all-American dollar,Joseph Durso
"Principles of physical education and sports studies, and research in all nations",Noriaki Osada
Boxer's shorts 5,Robert W. Boxer
A study of the peak-experience in sport,Ken Ravizza
Heads-up baseball,"Ken Ravizza, Tom Hanson"
Youth baseball,"Wendell Kim, Sally Tippett Rains"
"Sport, Medien und Kommunikation",Heinz-Dieter Horch
Physical education syllabus,"Long, James W."
Baseball,William B. Mead
On sports,Frederick C. Klein
Sports literature,John Joseph Brady
Skiing,"Rob Reichenfeld, Anna Marie Bruechert"
Sports picture quiz book,John Grafton
Sports Stories (Story Library),Alan Durant
"Collecting baseball, basketball, football, and hockey cards","Green, Paul, Paul Green, Tony Galovich"
Dictionary of sports idioms,"Robert A. Palmatier, Robert S. Palmatier, Harold L. Ray"
Purely Poliquin,Bud Poliquin
The Joy of Pickleball,Mike Branon
Tallahassee Face Punch,Franklin Price
Gridiron Gangsters - 2nd Half,Don Greco
Chasing the Show,Pete Hall
British sport,Dennis Brailsford
"Sport, time, and society",Dennis Brailsford
Bodies in motion,"Gilad Janklowicz, Ann Marie Brown"
From sky to sea,"Susan Van Hoek, Marion Clayton Link"
Saddlebags,Shelby Strother
Sport fishing and aquatic resources handbook,"Schmidt, Bob., AFTMA Staff, Amer Sport Fishing, Tackle Manufacturer's Assn"
The Social Psychology of Sport,Gordon W. Russell
Sport Science Secrets,Gordon W. Russell
Psychological preparation and athletic excellence,Bryant J. Cratty
Dirt under the felt,"Ooben Hadd, Betzy Ben-Hadd"
Sports with an attitude,"Mike Fleiss, Michael Silver"
Sailor's multihull guide to the world of cruising catamarans & trimarans,"Kevin Jeffrey, Charles Kanter, Kevin Jeffery, Charles E. Kanter"
Sport,Claude Serre
The waterpower workout,Lynda Huey
The jack of all trades,Daniel Carter Beard
The outdoor handy book,Daniel Carter Beard
Roger Craig's Tales from the San Francisco 49ers sideline,"Craig, Roger, Roger Craig, Matt Maiocco"
The sports hall of fame encyclopedia,David Blevins
A taste for diversions,Dennis Brailsford
Integration of medical and sports sciences,"International Biochemistry of Exercise Conference (8th 1991 Nagoya-shi, Japan)"
The winning mind,Peter Terry
Sportsmen and gamesmen,John Dizikes
More amazing but true sports stories,"Phyllis Hollander, Zander Hollander"
Pour des Assises nationales du sport,"Université sportive d'été (8th 1990 Montpellier, France)"
"Introduction to nutrition, exercise, and health",Frank I. Katch
K2,"Andrew J. Kauffman, Andrew J. Kaufman, William Lowell Putnam"
Accidents in North American Mountaineering,Jed Williamson
The Sports Process,Eric G. Dunning
Careers in Sport,Louise Fyfe
Careers in sport,Louise Fyfe
Solutions in Sport Psychology,Ian M. Cockerill
Fitness for Sport,Rex Hazeldine
Clinton Anderson's downunder horsemanship,"Clinton Anderson, Ami Hendrickson"
Cycling's Golden Age,"Owen Mulholland, Brett Horton, Shelly Horton"
Des mots et des muscles,Collectif
Bob Mathias,Chris Terrence
Corner Kick,Bill Swan
UFC's Ultimate Warriors,Jeremy Wall
Misconduct,Beverly Scudamore
Power eating,"Frances G. Berkoff, Barbara J. Lauer, Yves Talbot"
The Pro Wrestling Hall of Fame,Greg Oliver
Skateboard roadmap,"Skin Philips, Carlton Books"
Pebble Beach Golf Links,"Neal Hotelling, Joann Dost"
Leadership preferences of selected Canadian and Japanese physical education students,David Cruise Malloy
Funtime Riddles,Marilyn Helmer
The World Cup of Hockey,"Joe Pelletier, Patrick Houda"
Off the Bench and into the Game,Ryan Walter
Coping with drugs and sports,Elizabeth Ann Nelson
Sports Nutrition,Marie Dunford
Tennis Confidential,Paul Fein
Around the world,John Coy
Everything Golf Instruction Book,"Rob Blumer, Rex Chaney"
Volleyball,"Collin Henry, Judy Corcoran"
"100 [i.e. Cien] años de deporte, del esfuerzo individual al espectáculo de masas",Manuel Vázquez Montalbán
Prawo sportowe,Poland.
H2H,"Greg Thompson, Kid Peligro"
Seminole Gold,Philip L. Ben
Dale Earnhardt,Triumph Books
"The Leaping, Sliding, Sprinting, Riding Science Book",Bobby Mercer
Mountain bike like a champion,"Ned Overend, Ben Hewitt, Ed Pavelka"
The seven secrets of successful coaches,"Jeff Janssen, Gregory A. Dale"
Radsports Guides,Tracy Nelson Maurer
The Hubert H. Humphrey Metrodome Souvenir Book,Dave Mona
The John Wooden Pyramid Of Success,Neville L. Johnson
Front Range Top Ropes,Fred Knapp
Nick Owen's sports quiz,"Nick Owen, Sandy Ransford"
Sports (Encyclopedia Britannica Fascinating Facts Series),Facts Fascinating
Motives toward track and field competition of foreign and domestic grant-in-aid student-athletes in NCAA Division I colleges and universities,Howard F. Stidwill
"Early American sporting books, 1734 to 1844",Ernest R. Gee
Skateboarding: how it works,Emily Sohn
Alpine Trailblazer,Jerry Sprout
Amateurism in Sport,L. Allison
Amateurs and Professionals in Post War British Sport (British Politics and Society),Adrian Smith
"Sport and Memory in North America (Cass Series--Sport in the Global Society, 32.)",S. Wieting
Million Dollar Bucket,"Roxbury Park, Geof Smith"
Kayaking,"Nigel Foster, Julia Claxton"
Deconstructing Sport History,Alun (FWD) Munslow
"""Who Wants to Be a Millionaire?"" (Who Wants to Be a Millionaire)",Quizmasters
"Ready, Set, Go","Pamela Chanko, Susan Canizares"
Nutrition and Sport (Advances in Sport and Exercise Science),Don MacLaren
Great Sports Upsets,Gutman
An introduction to sports physiology,Martin R. Farrally
Biophysical Foundation of Human Movement,Bruce Abernethy
Doing Sport Psychology,Mark B. Andersen
"Sports Heroes, Fallen Idols",Stanley H. Teitelbaum
Little girlsin pretty boxes,Joan Ryan
I'm Running to Win,Ann Kiemel
Bluegill--,"Wilson, Terry, Roxanne Wilson, Terry Wilson"
Visions of Sport,Allsport
The Wild Toboggan Ride,Suzan Reid
Forever England,"Mark Shaoul, Tony Williamson"
Bulldogs On Ice,Daniel K. Fleschner
The Virginia Sports Hall of Fame,Clay Shampoe
Field sports,"Jack Charlton, Tony Jackson"
Native Athletes in Sport and Society,C. Richard King - undifferentiated
NBA ShowTime,BradyGames
Hiking trails of Southern Africa,"Willie Olivier, Sandra Olivier"
Soccer Star!,Jacqueline Guest
The Jura,"Kev Reynolds, R.Brian Evans"
Soft Tissue Injuries in Sport,Sylvia M. Lachmann
The world of sports statistics,Arthur Friedman
Voices in Sports and Society,Robert Mertzman
Saskatchewan Sports,Holden Stoffel
Sport and Physical Education Around the World,Earle F. Ziegler
Conditioning drills,"Debbie Ryan, Andy Landers, Joan Bonvicini, Pat Head Summitt"
Directory of European Sports Organisations,Martyn P. Glanville
You've Got News for Them!,Womens's Sports Foundation
Mental Training and Performance Enhancements,Brett D. Mills
America's Complete Sports Scholarship Guide,Mark Bercik
Goluboĭ monstr,S. I. Gusʹkov
"Stability, sport, and performance movement",Joanne Elphinston
Kickboxing,Thomas Streissguth
North Yorkshire,"Sarah McLeod, Gary McLeod"
Sport - the opiate of the people?,Peter Ballantine
Famous American athletes of today,Leroy Atkinson
Famous American athletes of today. Third series,"Leroy Atkinson, Austen Lake"
The life of Tom Morris,William Weir Tulloch
Sports de rue et insertion sociale,"Pascal Duret, Muriel Augustini"
Trekking in the Caucasus,"Yury Kolomiets, Aleksey Solovyev"
Snowmobiling,"Hallam, David, Dave Hallam, Janes Hallan"
Sport law,Linda A. Sharp
Developing a lifelong contract in the sports marketplace,Greg J. Cylkowski
A to Z of Sport,Trevor Montague
Videotape Disk Sport,National
Hoopmania!,Brad Herzog
20 greatest athletes of the 20th century,Brad Herzog
Sport and Physical Education,Chandler/Cronin
Competitive Excellence,Stephen J. Brennan
Sport Tourism,Heather Gibson
Financial management of sports-related organizations,"Terry Haggerty, Garth Paton"
Medicine ball training,"Zoltan Tenke, Z. Tenke, A. Higgins"
Get paid to play,Nancy Nitardy
Developing a career in sport,Greg J. Cylkowski
Le groupe,Rey
Routledge Handbook of Biomechanics and Human Movement Science,Youlian Hong: R
Sport and American Society,"Mark Dyreson: J, Mark Dyreson, J. A. Mangan"
Rethinking Gender and Youth Sport (International Studies in Physical Education and Youth Sport),Ian Wellard: Ri
"Philosophy, Risk and Adventure Sports",Mike McNamee
Psychology From Start to Finish,F. Schubert
Sport in Society (Aspects of PE),Kirk Bizley
Samaranch,Jaume Boix Angelats
Critical Readings,David Charles Rowe
"Sport, Culture and the Media (Issues in Cultural and Media Studies)",David Charles Rowe
Halcyon Days,Austin E. Moorhouse
Combat Sports in the Ancient World,Michael B. Poliakoff
A Colour Atlas of Injury in Sport,J. G. P. Williams
Rebound!,Adrienne Mercer
Acquiring Skill in Sport,Bob Sharp
UFL Collective Bargaining Agreement,Louis Marino
Sports of the Times,Arthur Daley
The Business & Politics of Sports,Evan Weiner
Sports Style Guide & Reference Manual,Jennifer Swan
Patriotic Games,Steven W. Pope
Directory of Undergraduate Programs in Sport Management,P. Greg Comfort
"Sports Chronobiology, An Issue of Clinics in Sports Medicine (The Clinics: Orthopedics)",Teodor T. Postolache
Trampolining,"Brian Phelps, Erika Phelps"
Women's lacrosse,"Bobbie Trafford, Kath Howarth"
Great Scott!,"Scott Hastings, Derek Douglas"
Book of British Sporting Heroes,James Huntington-Whiteley
Jikkanteki supotsu-ron,Yukio Mishima
Rééducation en traumatologie du sport,Jean-Claude Chanussot
Traumatologie du sport chez l'enfant et l'adolescent,Henri Bensahel
Against the Wind,Ollie Byrnes
Joe Paterno,George Paterno
Directory of Graduate Programs in Sport Management,P. Greg Comfort
Coaching for the Inner Edge,Robin S. Vealey
Sport und Spiel bei Griechen und Römern,Staatliche Museen zu Berlin (Germany)
Sport (Look Ahead: A Guide to Working In...),Allen Vincent
Performance in Sport (Aspects of PE),Nuala Mullan
The hunting book of Gaston Phébus,"Gaston III Phœbus Count of Foix, Gaston, Wilhelm Schlag"
Taking Part in Sport (Aspects of PE),Kirk Bizley
Performance Assessment for Field Sports,Christo Carling
Official Rules of Sports & Games 1992-93,Tony Pocock
Day by Day in Jewish Sports History,Bob Wechsler
The science of track and field athletics,"Howard Payne, Rosemary Payne"
Routledge Companion to Sports History,Steven W. Pope:
The Sport and Society Reader,David Karen: Ro
SPORT PSYCHOLOGY FOR COACHES,Damon Burton
Wheelchair Field Events (Wheelchair Sports),James R. Little
Sport Science,Roy Hawkey
The Viking Tradition,Susan J. Bandy
A Question of Sport,Hazel Lewthwaite
Winning is not enough,"Andrew Wingfield Digby, Stuart Weir"
Touchdown! God's Words of Life from the NIV Sports Devotional Bible,Zondervan Publishing Company
The Edge,Howard E. Ferguson
The History ofGaelic Games,Ian Prior
Gender equity in coaching,"Dorothy Strachan, Paul Tomlinson"
Losers First Poems and Stories on Game and Sport,John B. Lee
Well I Never Knew That! (Well I Never Knew That 1),Peter Ryding
Secret techniques of Wing Chun Kung Fu,"K. T. Chao, J. E. Weakland"
A Necessary Spectacle,Selena Roberts
The Quality of Effort,Reggie Marra
Schenectady's Best,Barry Mandell
Catastrophic Injuries in Sports Avoidance Strategies,S. Adams
Ford Sierra Cosworth,"Dennis Foy, Terry West"
Wing chun kung fu,"Ip Chun, Michael Tse"
Table tennis,"Damien Davis, Bernie Blackall, Damien Davies"
"""May the Best Man Win""",P.F. McDevitt
Mountain bike guide,"Pete Bursnall, Irvine Butterfield, Jack Baines"
Walking with legends,"Ralph Mellanby, Mike Brophy"
Team building,"Henny Kormelink, Tjeu Seeverens"
Smelling of roses,"Barnes, Stuart, Stuart Barnes"
Mental Toughness,Karl Kuehl
State anxiety and athletic competition,Peter Klavora
Gender differences in situational inhibitors to participation in sport,Patrick J. Duffy
Sports,Carol Yehling
North-west highlands,"Dave Broadhead, Alec Keith, Ted Maden"
Scrambles in the Canadian Rockies,Alan Kane
Sportstättenentwicklungsplanung,Lüder Bach
Fix the Yips Forever,"Hank Haney, Matthew Rudy"
Culturas En Juego,F. Xavier Medina
Sports Law,Gardiner et al
Soccer,"Eugenio Fascetti, Romedio Scaia"
This day in New York sports,"Jordan Sprechman, Bill Shannon"
The best Dallas-Ft. Worth sports arguments,Jaime Aron
Real men work in the pits,"Jeff Hammond, Geoff Norman"
The Chelsea Piers fitness solution,Elena Rover
The 'spalding Baseball Collection,New York Public Library.
Critical Moments During Competition,Roland Carlstedt
A tale of two cities,"Dave McPherson, Derek Watson"
Physical education and sport as an instrument of nation building in the Republic of Korea,Sung Jae Park
Fighting Illini Basketball,News-Gazette
"Same Knight, Different Channel",Jack Isenhour
Pain Gang,Neil Reynolds
25 projects for outdoorsmen,"Leo Somma, Peter J. Fiduccia"
Fit for Sport,Terry Moule
Sports Marketing Europe:The Legal and Tax Aspects,Ian Blackshaw
From doom to boom,"Dave Allan, Adrian Bevington"
The Fabulous Ball Book,Kathy Stinson
Ford Mustang,"Andy Willsheer, Bob McClurg"
"Jeux de main, jeux de vilain",Violaine Vanoyeke
You Can Do It!,Lauren Catuzzi Grandcolas
Sailpower,"Lawrie Smith, Andrew Preece"
Guide to sea kayaking in Central and Northern California,"Roger Schumann, Jan Shriner"
Sports Pocket Power Guide,Pcs
Crosstraining for endurance athletes,Raul Guisado
Lt. Col. W. S. Codrington's know your horse in health and disease,"W. S. Codrington, Peter Gray"
Teaching the mature rider,"Martin Diggle, Anne Pilgrim"
Touching horses,"Marion Kaselle, Pamela Hannay"
Bridlework,"Robert H. Steinke, Robert Steinke"
The Philosophical Athlete,Heather L. Reid
NFC South,K. C. Kelley
Tennis-court conjunctions,Doris Fisher
"Biathlon, cross-country, ski jumping, and nordic combined",Kylie Burns
Sport Et Pouvoir,Jean Harvey
Helming to win,"Lawrie Smith, Ian Pinnell"
Sports and the Law,Charles E Quirk
How Baseball Works (How Sports Work),Keltie Thomas
Classic After-Dinner Sports Tales,Jonathan Rice
Sociological dynamics of sport and exercise,"James E. Bryant, James S. Bryant, Mary McElroy"
The 100 Greatest Days in New York Sports,Stuart Miller
The Most Important Thing I Know About the Spirit of Sport,Lorne A. Adrain
Kick ball capitalization,Michael Ruscoe
Badminton today,"Sunny Kim, Mike Walker"
Nitschke,Edward Gruver
How to lead a winning team,"Steve Morris, Eddy Knasel, Graham Willcocks"
The World's Wackiest Sports Stories,Michael J. Pellowski
Sports Nutrition,"Dan, Phd Benardot"
Outside Shooter,Philip Raisor
The Passion for Sports,Sporting News
Organized professional team sports,United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on the Judiciary. Subcommittee on Antitrust and Monopoly.
Professional basketball,United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on the Judiciary. Subcommittee on Antitrust and Monopoly.
Safety and injury,John Aldridge
Attitudes toward physical activity as a function of religious affiliation,Donna Jean Leonard
ha-Psikhologyah shel ha-sport veha-peilut ha-gufanit,Gilad Weingarten
ha-Sport be-Yisrael,Uri Afek
A study of the peak-experience in sport,Ken Ravizza
An assessment of the factor validity of the Precompetitive stress inventory,Laura Marie Finch
The sport fan,John C. Pooley
Respuestas Para Todo - Deportes,Peter Brooke- Ball
Sport promotion and sales management,Richard L. Irwin
A conceptual model of incentive values for explaining and predicting preference for selected physical activities,Linda M. Lander
The interrelationship of lactic acid and blood pH to performance in selected competitive running events,Frederic Dean Kirchmann
Effects of group performance in coacting and interacting sport competitions on the trait and causal attributions of thirteen and fourteen year old boys and girls,Jacob Taiwo Ogundari
The role of physical education in the nation building of Nigeria,John Ademola Adedeji
A conceptual analysis of Art as experience and its implications for sport and physical education,Robert Thomas Mitchell
An analysis of selected relationships between sport skill and the modification of a social attitude,Stanton Henry Neumann
States of consciousness and the sport experience,Sue Marilynn Durrant
The nature and incidence of injuries to the lower extremity of college soccer players,Michael S. Davis
Comparative study of academic progress of scholarship athletes and the effectiveness of the Office of Student Life,Laura Louise Lageman
Ti yu shi chang jing zheng ce lue yu guan li =,Long Li
Irresistible force,"Ian Gregson, Ian Gregson"
Swing!,Rufus Butler Seder
Vers l'équité en éducation physique,Hélène Dallaire
Diving Australia,"Neville Coleman, Neville Coleman, Nigel Marsh"
Constitution and rules of the British Columbia Amateur Lacrosse Association,British Columbia Amateur Lacrosse Association.
The physiological basis of physical education and athletics,Edward L. Fox
Science and golf III,"World Scientific Congress of Golf (3rd 1998 University of St Andrews), World Scientific Congress of Golf 1998 (University of st Andrews), Alastair J. Cochran, Martin R. Farrally"
The British over-and-under shotgun,"Geoffrey Boothroyd, Boothroyd, Geoffrey., Susan Boothroyd"
"Seleccions esportives, un dret de Catalunya",Jordi Finestres Martínez
Le antiche olimpiadi,Mario Pescante
Sport ethics,"David Cruise Malloy, David Cuise Malloy, Saul Ross, Dwight H. Zakus"
Canada at the Olympics,Canadian Olympic Association.
The 500 home run club,"Bob Allen, Bob Allen, Bill Gilbert"
Science and golf II,"World Scientific Congress of Golf (2nd 1994 University of St. Andrews), Cochran"
Tales from the Devils ice,"Glenn Resch, Mike Kerwick, Chico Resch"
Eating disorders in athletes,Joaquín Dosil
Aikido and Chinese martial arts,"Tetsutaka Sugawara, Tetsutaka Sugawara, Xing Lujian"
sportscotland annual report,sportscotland.
O berro impresso das manchetes,Nelson Rodrigues
Joel White,"Bill Mayher, Bill Mayher, Maynard Bray"
Tilting at windmills,Andy Miller
British baseball and the West Ham club,"Josh Chetwynd, Josh Chetwynd, Brian A. Belton"
Sport and work on the Nepaul frontier,"Inglis, James"
"The carry-over value of sports among graduates of Clinton County, Ohio, high schools",Robert E Jacoby
"Sporting body, sporting mind",John D. Syer
A season-long examination of intrinsic motivation in first year college athletes,Anthony J Amorose
Psychology of motor behavior and sport,NASPSPA (Organization)
Rural sports,William Barker Daniel
A study of the peak-experience in sport,Ken Ravizza
Developing a lifelong contract in the sports marketplace,Greg J Cylkowski
Amateur sports,United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on Commerce
Self-cathexis ad body-cathexis participants in selected environmental sport activities,Judith Anne O'Neill
Compensation for physical injury sustained by participants in sport,Hayden Opie
Typology and social control,Ya-pʻing Liu
The backpacker's companion,"Sharon AvRutick, Sharon Avrutick, Joseph Wallace"
Inmul ro pon Chosŏn sidae chʻeyuk sasang,Yun-su Chin
The best Chicago sports arguments,John Mullin
I padroni del pallone,Maurizio Crosetti
Soccer skills & drills,"James W. Lennox, Jim Lennox, Bill Steffen, Janet Rayfield"
Tapering and peaking for optimal performance,Iñigo Mujika
What is sport?,Roland Barthes
Kent State University athletics,Cara Gilgenbach
"The great book of Washington, D.C. sports lists",Andy Pollin
Vereins- und Verbandsstrafen am Beispiel des Fussballsports,Jan F. Orth
Le sport,Isabelle Queval
"Zidane, une vie secrète",Besma Lahouri
Waterhouse and Smith,John Ellicott
Athletic scholarships for dummies,Patrick Britz
Sociologie du sport,Jacques Defrance
El periodismo deportivo de Rafael Pont Flores,Enrique Arnaldo Vargas Rodríguez
Physical education activities handbook for men and women,Dennis Keith Stanley
SCUM AIRWAYS: INSIDE FOOTBALL'S UNDERGROUND ECONOMY,"JOHN PETER SUGDEN, John Sugden"
BIOCHEMICAL BASIS OF SPORTS PERFORMANCE,"RON MAUGHAN, Ron Maughan, Michael Gleeson"
Sport management,"Lussier And Kimball, Lussier, Kimball"
Supōtsu no genryū,Hiroyasu Satake
Nick Bakay's tale of the tape,Nick Bakay
Les sports de montagne et le droit,Wladimir Rabi
Effects of menstrual cycle phase on selected performance variables in athletes and nonathletes,Lynne Marie Clement
Gran Canaria South,"D. A. Brawn, David Brawn, Rosamund Brawn"
Fundamentals of riding,"Charles Harris, Harris"
Paralympics,"R. D. Steadward, Robert D. Steadward, Cynthia J. Peterson, American Wheelchair Basketball Association, Canadian Paralympic"
Premiers soins du sportif,"Philippe Chaduteau, Dr P. Chaduteau, L. Paris"
The Ithaca College of my time,Isadore Yavits
The Stark approach,"Ian Stark, Ian Stark, Tim Smith"
Psychological analysis of high school athletes' anxiety responses,Laurinda Rene Dixon
It's only a game,"Lindi St. Clair, Pamela Winfield, Lindi St.Clair"
Riḥlah fī tārīkh al-riyāḍah al-Yamanīyah wa-dawrihā fī al-ḥarakah al-waṭanīyah,ʻAbduh Juḥaysh
Sport in England,Norman Wymer
The effect of a prophylactic knee brace on muscle performance,Cindi Aiken Gold
Effects of mastery and coping rehearsal on competitive state anxiety,Michael D. Poetzsch
Effect of a prophylactic knee brace on leg muscle performance of athletes,Nih-Mey Wang Chen
Dingers!,"Peter Keating, Peter Keating"
All about wave skis,"Roger Shackleton, Roger Shackleton, John Christensen"
Student study guide to accompany Fox's physiological basis for exercise and sport,"Susan Muller, Ann Roberts Fox-Day, Steven J. Keteyian, Merle L. Foss"
al-Riyāḍah al-badanīyah ʻinda al-ʻArab,ʻAbd al-Ḥamīd Salāmah
A walker's guide to the Isle of Wight,"Martin Collins, Martin Collins, Norman Birch"
Understanding American Sport,Gertrud Pfister
A golfer's travels with Peter Alliss,"Peter Alliss, Peter Alliss, James Mossop"
Sport Sociology,Andrew Yiannakis
The cross-cultural analysis of sport and games,Günther Lüschen
Group cohesion and sport,Peter Donnelly
A phenomenological approach to the sport experience,Seiji Inoue
Achievement orientations and sport behavior of males and females,Martha Elaine Ewing
"The historical transition of women's sports at the Ohio State University, 1885-1975",Mary Ann Daniels
The Centennial Olympic Congress,"Centennial Olympic Congress (1994 Paris, France)"
The status of psychomotor learning and sport psychology research,"Canadian Symposium for Psychomotor Learning and Sport Psychology (1974 6th Halifax, N.S.)"
Histoire du sport,Bernard Gillet
Zwischen Blau und Weiss liegt Grau: der FC Schalke 04 im Nationalsozialismus,Stefan Goch
Games of the past--sports for the future?,"ISHPES/TAFISA Symposium (4th 2000 Duderstadt, Germany)"
Local identity and sport,"ISHPES Seminar Kanzawa, Japan)"
Mon enfant fait du sport,Annie Coudray
The mental game plan,"John G. Albinson, J. G. Albinson, Stephen J. Bull"
Días geniales o lúdicros,Rodrigo Caro
The accomplishment of masculinity,Andrew Dale Thornton
Our Mickey,"Bill Liederman, Bill Liederman, Maury Allen"
Canyoneering,"David S. Black, David Black"
Pageantry of sport from the age of chivalry to the age of Victoria,"Arlott, John."
Old Fitz,Frank Hussey
Nurinst 2006. Beiträge zur deutschen und j udischen Geschichte,Jim G. Hrsg: Tobias
Fitness and strength training for all sports,"Jhurgen Hartmann, Jurgen Hartmann, Harold Tunnemann, Peter Klavora"
Sports of Greater Britain,W. R. Gilbert
Sea kayaking Canada's west coast,"John G. Ince, John Ince, Hedi Kottner"
Low-stress fitness,Millie Brown
Sport und Humanität,Helmut Thielicke
Current sports medicine issues,"National Sports Safety Congress (1st 1973 Cincinnati, Ohio)"
Dog training,"Jason A. Smith, Creative Publishing international, Jason Smith"
Nutritional knowledge of elite Scottish athletes from nine sports,Lynne Douglas
Greening our games,David Chernushenko
Using division at sports camp,Linda Bussell
Kiteboarding,"Jack David, Jack David"
...Historia del deporte,Fabricio Valserra
Pedal,"Peter Sutherland, Zephyr, Ken Miller, Swoon"
Extending the boundaries,"Allan Edwards, Allan Edwards, Keith Gilbert, James Skinner"
SURFING: IN SEARCH OF THE PERFECT WAVE,"PETER DIEL, Peter Diel, Eric Menges"
Joe D.'s tales from the Buffalo Bills,"Joe Delamielleure, Joe Delamielleure, Michael Benson"
Sport et assimilation à la Guadeloupe,Jacques Dumont
Sporting lives,James W. Pipkin
The sportsman's vocal cabinet,Charles Armiger
Under the Trade Wind Sky...,Lou Boudreau
95 Theses on the Reformation of Football,David Kilpatrick
Score,Bill Gosse
Jake Oats,Mark L. Williams
Leisure,Julian Rowe
Sports Research with Analytical Solutions,J. P. Verma
This Piece of Our Being : Clearing the Ice,"Robyn M. Ryan, Cara Lockwood, Karla Fouts, Mary Callaghan, Rachelle Reese"
150 Years of Braves Trivia,"Bradsher Hayes, Tiffany Drawdy, Gerald Shaw, Joe Chatman"
Exploring All I Can Do - Snowboarding and Skiing,"Nia Obotette, Hans Landy"
Hegemony and Sport,"April Henning, Jesper Andreasson"
Bringing Back the Lions,Mike Arnold
Park,Lily Schell
Cowboys Are 14-0 in Games When...,"Vincent Croyle, William Croyle"
Skydivers Know Why Birds Sing : (because They Can Fly),Ricki T. Thues
Hooking off the Jab,Nigel Collins
History of Physical Culture,Conor Heffernan
Mind of a Tennis Player,Steve Brady
Raven Run,Kevin McJunkin
"Negro Leagues Book, Volume 2","Larry Lester, Wayne Stivers"
This Piece of My Soul : Clearing the Ice,"Robyn M. Ryan, Karla Fouts, C. Lockwood, Mary Callaghan, Rachelle Reese"
Hiking Maine,Tom Seymour
Clearing the path to victory,Aladar Kogler
80/20 Endurance,Matt Fitzgerald
This Piece of My Heart : Clearing the Ice,"Robyn M. Ryan, Mary Callaghan, Francy Dickinson, Rachelle Reese"
Grateful Running,Grayson Kimball
How to Create a Successful Ski Lesson for Senior Citizens,Herbert K. Naito
Brutal Days,Isla Vaughn
Wicked Games,Isla Vaughn
Mindy Mouse Lifts a House,"Brittany Hesterly, Mockingbird Artist"
The weekend athlete's injury guide,Mitch Kaplan
Road to Atlanta,Tracy McIntyre
Encyclopedia De Las Reglas Deportivas (Los Indispensables),Bing Broido
The ancient Olympics,Nigel Jonathan Spivey
The Business of Sports,Mark Conrad
Six Seconds to Glory,Hal Higdon
Fumble!,"Michael G. Poplar, James A. Toman"
The bunch attack,"Andrew Coverdale, Dan Robinson"
The Chicago Cubs,"Warren N. Wilbert, Warren Wilbert, William Hageman"
"Frank Sargeant's secret spots, Southwest Florida","Frank Sargeant, Larry Larsen"
Pitching Around Fidel,Sabra L. Price
Winter Games,John Feinstein
Knife Combatives,"Hock Hochheim, Margaret Eden"
Keep the Bastards Honest,Aidan Harmon
Cm Skiing,Ota Rojek
Handbook of Electrical Systems for Powerboats,Bulent I. Dervisoglu
Mad as hell,Mike Lupica
.300 Hitter,Charley Rosen
Booker T From Prison to Promise,"Booker T. Huffman, Andrew William Wright"
Withdrawn,Lisa Luciano
Spalding Book of Rules,Bing Broido
"Pleasure, Profit, Proselytism",J. A. Mangan
Sport in Latin American Society,J. A. Mangan
Hunter's Tales,J. A. Heinlein
Brees Way,"Mike Nabors, Doug Flutie"
Self-Worth Is Only Achieved Through Sports,"Patrick McNerthney, Jane Stewart"
College Golfer,James Berry
College Golfer,James berry
Yankee Stadium,"Robinson, Ray"
Most Amazing Sports Moments of All Time,Doug Williams
America's leisure revolution,David Quentin Voigt
Horse trails to regional rails,"Jim Toman, James A. Toman, Blaine S. Hays"
Body Brilliance,Alan Davidson
Gymnastics Girl Maya's Story,"Kara Douglass Thom, Pamela Seatter, Susie Brooke, Jodi Norgaard"
Soccer Girl Cassie's Story,"Kara Douglass Thom, Pamela Seatter, Susie Brooke, Jodi Norgaard"
Dancer Girl M. C's Story,"Kara Douglass Thom, Susan Brooke, Pamela Seatter, Jodi Norgaard"
"Proceedings of the 2nd International Colloquium on Sports Science, Exercise, Engineering and Technology 2015 (ICoSSEET 2015)","Shariman Ismadi Ismail, Norasrudin Sulaiman, Rahmat Adnan"
Two Wheels and a Will,Colin Hunter
Time to Be Born,Stephany Evans Steggall
Mind over Tennis,"Jorgen Jensen, Peter Lundgren, 4 Horsemen Publications"
Pro Sports by the Numbers,Tom Kortemeier
Science of Sports with Max Axiom,"Nikole Brooks Bethea, David Dreier, Blake A. Hoena, Caio Cacau"
Fundamentals of Special Strength Training in Sport,Andrew Charniga
Golf Fundamentals,"Seymour Dunn, Adrienne Nunez"
"Proceedings of the International Colloquium on Sports Science, Exercise, Engineering and Technology 2014 (ICoSSEET 2014)","Rahmat Adnan, Shariman Ismadi Ismail, Norasrudin Sulaiman"
Positive Gymnastics Movement,James Devlin
Ohtani,Jeff Fletcher
Black Pearls,"Colin Tatz, Paul Tatz"
Foundations of physical education and sport,"Bucher, Charles Augustus"
Big Comeback,"Hemphill, Richard, Jr."
Sport Literate,William Meiners
"Brief History of Baitcasting, Bass Fishing and the Kentucky Reel","William Hinkebein, Art Lander"
5 Elements of Success,"Roger Knick, Ray Messecar"
Sam Snead's How to play golf,Sam Snead
Parnelli,Bill Libby
The Complete Book of Camping,Gould
Training Mission Four,"Hock Hochheim, Margaret Eden"
Coach Izzy,Roger Johnson
Ultimate Athletic Coaching & High-Performance Development Handbook,Henri J. Russell
Essence of Reflection,Dan Popp
Metamorphosis of Becca,Jocelyn Kraemer
Tour Stories,Shaun Morrison
Cut 'n' run,Frank Deford
"Play it again, Bud!",Bud Greenspan
Stealing a Second Chance,Kristin Lee
1001 basketball trivia questions,"Dale Ratermann, Steve Greenberg"
The Best Of Frank Deford,Frank Deford
Casting About,Jerry Girard
Pettis Norman Story,"Pettis Norman, Melanie Saxton, Holly Chervnsik"
On Pace,Matt Fitzgerald
Free Game,Khalid Diallo Akhdaru Green
Science of Hockey,Ryan Nagelhout
Restart. Sport after the Covid-19 Time Out,"Jörg Krieger, April Henning, Lindsay Parks Pieper"
Legends from the Locker Room,Herb Appenzeller
The Fastest Bicycle Rider in the World,"Marshall Taylor, Zito Madu"
Quest for the Dragon Star,Kristopher Landis
Science of Basketball,Norman D. Graubart
Top Sports Tips,"Rebecca Rissman, Heather E. Schwartz"
Women in Sports,Katie Kawa
West Side Pride,"Carey, James"
The Chief,Clint Crockett
Four Foundations of Golf,Jon Sherman
Making Her Mark,Ernestine Miller
Emergers,"Doug Swisher, Carl Richards, Dick Pobst"
Studie osobnosti ve sportu,Miroslav Vaněk
Foaling Season,Natalie Keller Reinert
Top 10 Worst Injuries in Football,David Aretha
Lacrosse,Ryan Nagelhout
Using God's Playbook for the Game of Life,Tonya Avent
Ice Bowl,"Tony Walter, Chuck Mercein"
Stop Resisting,Jeremy Butler
Should Girls Play Sports with Boys?,Amy B. Rogers
Girls' Lacrosse,Heather Williams
Buckeye Tailgate,"Trevor Zahara, Rex Kern"
Simple Machines in Sports,Gillian Gosman
Fantastic Sports Facts,Michael Hurley
Slam dunk Pronouns,"Doris Fisher, Scott Angle, D. L. Gibbs"
Meditations from the Finish Line,Dunn Neugebauer
Women in Sports,Abby Colich
Using Math in Sports,Carla Mooney
Critical Perspectives on Minors Playing High-Contact Sports,John Torres
Passport to World Sports,Paul Mason
Morning Exercises for All the Year,"Sindelar, Joseph C."
Broad-Sword and Single-Stick,R. G. Allanson-Winn
Go Shin Jitsu Kenpo Chinese Kempo Kai,"Chun, William, Jr."
Athletes Pressing Charges,Jörg Krieger
Creating Your Passing Game,Eian Bain
"I Love the Work, but I Hate the Business",Mel Proctor
Lansdowne FC,Charles Ivar McGrath
VII Jornadas sobre Deporte Municipal,Jornadas sobre Deporte Municipal (7th 1994 Instituto Andaluz del Deporte)
What's the Matter at the Ballpark?,"Catherine Ciocchi, Chantelle Thorne, Burgen Thorne"
Swinging for Love,Kristin Lee
Wacky Sports,Virginia Loh-Hagan
XI Jornadas sobre Actividad Física Adaptada,Jornadas sobre Actividad Física Adaptada (11th 1994 Instituto Andaluz del Deporte)
Grinders,"Mike Capps, Chuck Hartenstein"
How to Prepare for Your Child's First Ski Lesson,Herbert K. Naito
Comprehensive Guide for Coaching Children How to Ski,Herbert K. Naito
AS/A2 PE/Sports Studies,"James, R."
"Sleigh, Sleigh, Sleigh All Day","Simidele Adeagbo, Petra Paliskova"
Porcupine Mountains Wilderness State Park,Jim DuFresne
Stringer : ,"Garrett, Robert"
"Like Father, Like Daughter",Talitha Anyabwele
The art of beading,"Wendy Simpson Conner, H.A. Branham, Buz McKim"
Right Thing to Do,Doug Moe
In Bikes We Trust,"Raquel Harris, Leeky Da Bike Star"
The Final Game,William Roy Brownridge
Rugby lesson plans for three-quarters,"Johnson, Peter., Peter Johnson"
Reflections on High Places,Hugh W. Morton
Single Action Sixguns,John Taffin
Concentration,Marie Dalloway
"Giftedness, excellence and sport",Ian Thomson
Sportsmanship (Character Education),Lucia Raatma
"Sport, Power, and Society : Institutions and Practices",Robert E. Washington
Clemson Through the Eyes of the Tiger,John Seketa
The Hooper Trophy,"Samuel Lewis, Owen, Charles"
"Alligator, Beware!",Frances Pendell
Giraffes vs Eagles,"Phillips, Michael, Sr."
Harris Hawk and the Golden Golf Ball,"Carmen Harris, Ross Harris"
Kareem... a Precious Love,Brenda Venus
Masters of Budo : the Interviews,Jon Braeley
Fog Island,Norm Culver
Score Out,"Melisa Torres, Daniel Ramos"
Tales from the Hardwood Surviving & Thriving,Andrew Marotta
Tennis Treasures,Richard Jackson
CORRIENDO CONTRA VIENTO Y MAREA,Desmond Dunham
Stalking Second,Naomi Springthorp
Complete Guide to Spring Training 2023 / Arizona,Kevin Reichard
Creating Young MindsTM,Shira A. Ackerman
Finders keepers,Roy Deering
Hiking Log Book,Alice Devon
Sports Card Fanatic,Nick Pedersen
Ten Minutes in the Sin Bin,M. J. Schiller
Reef Smart Guides Florida Keys,"Peter McDougall, Ian Popple, Otto Wagner"
Rodney Makes It Rain,"Katie Pronsky, James Koenig"
What a Ride!,David Dimmick
Baseball's Brief Lives,David Roth
Complete Guide to Spring Training 2023 / Florida,Kevin Reichard
FIRST down Moving the Chains,"Jason Watkins, Tamunique Clark"
Ugly Laws of the Beautiful Game,Bernard Seal
Lead Like a Champion,Jeremiah Brown
Shooting Paddlers,Toni Harting
12 Reasons to Love Softball,Joanne Mattern
Ela the Fancy Skater,Kim Reale
From Tidewater to the Shenandoah,"David Driver, Lacy Lusk"
Pat Young... in a Pale Kent Football Moonlight,Patrick Young
12 Reasons to Love Martial Arts,Joanne Mattern
Wishing for More,Jenni Bara
TARGETS,Daniel R. Engel
Pickleball Nation,Jennifer Huebner
Evolution of Skating Vol 2,"Amirah Palmer, Edwards, Charles, Lisa Campolo - Goodheart, Linwood Neverson, Bryant Harvey"
For the Boys,Amanda Chaperon
PRAYSE,"Stephanie D. Moore, Debra M. Smith"
My Cheer Journal,S. R. Fabrico
1936 Berlin Olympics,Jules Boykoff
My Soccer Journal,S. R. Fabrico
How to KILL the Ball Book : How to KILL the Ball Book,Shauger
Golf Reaches the Seven Hills,Gerry A. Lanham
Best Day Ever,"Kevin Lovegreen, James Monroe Design, Angela Wiechmann, Margarita Sikorskaia"
Making March Madness,Chad Carlson
Hiking,"John McKinney, Thomas Sawyer"
Mountain Biking,"Michael Teitelbaum, Thomas Sawyer"
New Challenges,Melisa Torres
Patterns in Sports,Rebecca Felix
What Do I Wear on My Feet to Play Tennis?,Emma Doyle
Wee Bobby Cruickshank,Diana Smith
What Makes a Great Coach?,"Emma Doyle, Natalie Ashdown"
The X-Factor for Success,David Angeron
Chase,Danica Flynn
Wonder Boy - the Story of Carl Scheib,Lawrence Knorr
Sports Broadcasting,Michael Teitelbaum
Bare-Knuckle Boxer's Companion,"Ulf Karlsson, David Lindholm"
Master the Art of Winning,Donene Taylor
Red Belt Guide Instructional Guide 2nd Edition,"Kee Hwang, H. C. Hwang"
Principal Park,Steve Dunn
Skiing,"Michael Teitelbaum, Thomas Sawyer"
Running,"Katie Marsico, Cecilia Minden, Thomas Sawyer"
Football,Jim Gigliotti
Baseball,Michael Teitelbaum
Kentucky Hustler,"Terry Hatton, Jeremy Rice, Travis Pilling"
Bad Lie,Todd Kolb
Thurm,"Thurman Munson, Marty Appel"
Catching Big Bubba,"Kevin Lovegreen, James Monroe Design, Angela Wiechmann, Margarita Sikorskaia"
VII Jornadas sobre Dirección y Gestión Deportiva,Jornadas sobre Dirección y Gestión Deportiva (7th 1994 Instituto Andaluz del Deporte)
Mechanics of Tennis,Peter P. Zeeh
King on the Court,"Judah King, King, Ron, Jr."
Catch Me If You Can,"Filbert Bayi, Myles Schrag, Segun Odegbami"
Best Manchester United Trivia Book Ever,House of Ballers
GAA V Douglas Hyde,Cormac Moore
Happenstance Farms,"S. McMichael, Justo Borrero"
Rebel Girls Game-Changing Footballers,Jess Harriton
Dress and Tack Guidelines,"American Sidesaddle Association, Vicki Pritchard, Audrey Sears, Frankie Wood-Black, Carole Vincer"
Own the Pieces,Josiah Igono
Hunting Big Mule Deer,Robby Denning
Winning vs. Sportsmanship,Scott Rosberg
Happy Lonesomes,"Tim Rowland, David Thomas-Train"
Barnstorming to Legends : the Best of Black Professional Baseball,Alois Ricky Clemons
A Torch Bearer's Salute,Kermite Bristow
Wild shot,Andy Liebner
Hello Baseball,"Destiny Phillip, Whimsical Designs Cj"
Pioneers of Baseball,Russ Cohen
All Heart,Cornelius Geary
José Fernández,Clark Spencer
Biomechanics in sports XII,International Symposium of Biomechanics in Sports (12th 1994 Hungarian University of Physical Education)
L'athlétisme,Jason Page
Backstop,"William McNeil, William F. McNeil, Foreword by Pete Palmer"
"Sport, policy, and politics",Barrie Houlihan
The government and politics of sport,Barrie Houlihan
Photo finishes,Michael E. Goodman
From first down to touchdown,"Keyshawn Johnson, James Strom, Kid Peligro"
Until victory always,Jim McGuinness
Emanzipation Durch Muskelkraft,Michael Brenner
Ocean City Fishing Reels,Michael Cacioppo
Roulette,Carina Alyce
Truth Bee Told,"Brian Blair, Ian Douglass, Bret Hart, Steve Keirn, Hulk Hogan"
Curveball at the Crossroads,Michael Lortz
Kingdom of Animal Wrestlers KAW Biographies,Scott Groach
I Can Ride My Bike! ACTIVITY BOOK,Claire McGee
The Complete Guide to Spring Training 2022 / Arizona,Kevin Reichard
Best Friends Playbook,A. W. Downer
Complete Guide to Spring Training 2022 / Florida,Kevin Reichard
Let's talk about cheating,Dolly Brittan
The politics of sports development,Barrie Houlihan
Analyse du mouvement humain par la biomécanique,"Allard, Paul"
Dream Team,Frederick Day
Big Business in Esports,Marty Gitlin
Courir au bon rythme,Jean-Yves Cloutier
Extreme spot the difference,Tim Dedopulos
Sport!,Moira Butterfield
Sport and society,Scott Witmer
Rugby rivals,Martyn Williams
Heading for home,Kent Stock
Rugby wit,Richard Benson
Sporting heroes,Jane Bingham
Sport und Semiotik,DVS-Tagung (1992 Schloss Rauischholzhausen)
Path to victory,International Bible Society
'News of the World' football and sports annual,"Butler, Frank"
A sporting pilgrimage,Caspar Whitney
The ultimate guide to marathons,"Dennis Craythorn, Rich Hanna"
Einführung in die Sportpsychologie,"Thomas, Alexander"
When human heads were footballs,Don L. Wulffson
Syn celerového krále,Ota Pavel
The American boy's book of sports and games,Nathaniel Orr
"Appalachian Mountain Club quiet water canoe guide, Pennsylvania","Scott Shalaway, Linda Shalaway"
Bombs to Trails,Jessica Pekari
Assignment: sports,Robert Lipsyte
Eddie the Yeti - Hard Work Wins the Game,"Christopher Scott Thornton, Temiree Temiree"
Lion of Dellwood,Don Greco
Club de Fútbol Monterrey Internacional 1956-2021,José Manuel Meléndez Hamett
Grandfather Games,Jeffery Davison
West Region Outdoor Masters Track and Field Championship,Jeffery Davison
Inner Touch,Stephanie Cunha
Shopping for safer boat care,"Smith, Neil, Neil Smith, Phil Troy"
Major league losers,Mark S. Rosentraub
Fox Running,R. Rozanne Knudson
When dinosaurs walked,Andrew Chaikin
"'59, summer of the Sox","Bob Vanderberg, Bob Vandenberg"
Feminism and Sporting Bodies,M. Ann Hall
The book of baseball lineups,"Nick Acocella, Nicholas Acocella, Donald Dewey"
Classic golf,"Walter Iooss, Walter Iooss Jr., Rick Reilly"
Mind matters,Daniel S. Kirschenbaum
ESPN25,"Charles Hirshberg, Chris Berman"
Kevin VanDam's bass strategies,"Kevin VanDam, Kevin Vandam, Louie Stout"
Rock,"Michael Benge, Duane Raleigh"
Playing the Game,Derek Birley
On the ball,"David M. Carter, Darren Rovell"
The biomechanics of human movement,Marlene Adrian
Girls Play Sports Too,Janna Eichelberger
Savage Truth,Isla Vaughn
Sports Parenting,Bill Schillings
Athletes and athletics,G. Keith Dolan
A treasury of Notre Dame football,Gene Schoor
Sports photography,Lee Wulff
Musial,James N. Giglio
My Youth Football Playbook Play Creator,Coach B. Sports Academy
Fantasy Football Planner & Journal,Coach B. Sports Academy
Cruel Love,Isla Vaughn
Bauman's Fight Book,"Michael Chidester, Jessica Finley, Elias Flatscher"
Savage Lies,Isla Vaughn
Winter's Rise,Winter Vinecki
Catching Air,"Gina Moore, Lauren Zurcher"
Just Keep Going,Rohin Relan
I Love Being the Enemy,Reggie Miller
Just Keep Swimming,Cindy Kolbe
"Physical activity, aging and sports",Sara Harris
Orienteering,Neil Champion
Teenage Hotrodders Book Two,Retro Comic Reprints
Sports Novels Gridiron Classics,Higgins
Dimitra Ice Skates,"Dimitra Korri, Kali Mavromati"
Teenage Hotrodders Book Three,Retro Comic Reprints
Sports Novels Fight Classics,O'Sullivan
Sports Novels Backcourt Badman,Shotwell
Drake Relays,Jeffery Davison
SCA Outdoor Masters Track and Field Championship,Jeffery Davison
Sports Novels Baseball Classics,Freeman
Chi-Ryu Jiujitsu,Dan Popp
Assistant Coach's Guide to Coaching,Scott Rosberg
The Search for the Next Mickey Mantle,Barry Sparks
Wrong side of the wall,"Stone, Eric., Eric Stone"
Patriotic games,S. W. Pope
Physiology of exercise and sport,Bruce J. Noble
"Major league baseball, 1979-1992","Darby, William, William Darby, David Darby"
2022 NASCAR Cup Series Yearbook,"Cory DeMarco, Ryan Long"
Cycling Journal,Yael Cohen
Inner Rival,Jeff Butorac
Bo Don't Know Me,"Riley, Fred, Jr."
Sticks and Stones,"Russ Cohen, Adam Wodon"
Enter the Boyzone,Caroline Plaisted
Pro Sports,Don L. Wulffson
Who We Met on the Way to Stanford,Richard Sinay
One Hundred Most Important Players in Baseball History,Lincoln Mitchell
Class C,Shiloh Robison
Golf Word Search,Great Point Publishing LLC
Striders Meet of Champions,Jeffery Davison
Teenage Hotrodders Book Four,Retro Comic Reprints
Running Against the Grain,"Roy Weaver, David Sullivan, Shawn Sriver, Amy Junod"
A whole new ball game,Allen Guttmann
Imagined Olympians,John Bale
Roger Bannister and the four-minute mile,John Bale
My Biggest Fan!,"Jenna Fiandach, Lau Frank"
Anti-Sport Sentiments in Literature,John Bale
Jin dai ti yu you xi jiao yu shi liao hui bian,Qiang Wang
Olimp,
Get ready for squash,"David Collins, Claire Chapman, Anne De Looy, Peter Thomas"
Body check,Deirdre Martin
Denali,"Art Davidson, Frederick Albert Cook, Browne, Belmore, Hudson Stuck, Belmore Browne"
The great American stock car racing trivia book,"Dave Lindsey, Matt Lindsey"
"Anthropologie du sport, perspectives critiques",Jean Marie Brohm
L'agonismo dai miti greci al mondo romano,Maria Rosaria Borriello
Reflejos de Apolo,Paloma Cabrera Bonet
Supōtsu,
Golf (Top Sport),Bernie Blackall
Sport,Heiner Geissler
Late medieval Englishwomen,"Barry Collett, Anne Lake Prescott"
Sports quiz,Gordon Jeffery
Deadball stars of the National League,"Tom Simon, SABR"
Stack it!,"Kennedy, Robert, Robert Kennedy"
Palmetto Golf Club,"George Brelsford, Dale Haas, Whitney Tower"
The whole horse catalog,"Steven D. Price, Gail Rentsch, Barbara Burn, David A. Spector"
"Sex, money, & sports",Michael Maggio
You don't say!,"Hartley Miller, Jim Swanson"
Five-Star basketball drills,"Howard Garfinkel, Howard Garfinkle, Will Klein"
Baseball's best shots,"Major League Baseball (Organization), DK Publishing, Major League Baseball, Johnny Bench"
It’s Great to Be a Fan in Minnesota,Matthew McCabe
It’s Great to Be a Fan in Florida,Matthew McCabe
Courage in Sports,Todd Kortemeier
It’s Great to Be a Fan in North Carolina,Donna B. McKinney
It’s Great to Be a Fan in California,Todd Kortemeier
Sports Makes You Type Faster,Dan Jenkins
Group dynamics in sport,Albert V. Carron
The woman's book of sports,Jahial Parmly Paret
The best American sports writing 2015,"Wright Thompson, Glenn Stout"
Strength Training for Sport,William J. Kraemer
The book of truly stupid sports quotes,Jeff Parietti
All they ever wanted,Tracy Solheim
Working in Sports,Darlene Sigda Ivy
Incredible Sports Trivia,Eric Braun
Essential Wilderness Navigation,"Craig Caudill, Tracy Trimble"
"Two Breaths, One Step",Sylvia Verange
The Sport Star,Barry Smart
ABC's Monday night football '98,"Shane Mooney, Mark L. Cohen"
The Ideals of Global Sport,Barbara J. Keys
Sports quiz book,Gilbert W. Davies
Cleveland's Finest,Vince McKee
Time out!,"Edgar Welden, Edgar W. Welden, Keith Dunnavant"
Sports Nutrition,"Christine Karpinski, Christine A. Rosenbloom"
Sports Marketing,Larry Degaris
Leo Mazzone's tales from the mound,"Leo Mazzone, Scott Freeman"
National identity and global sports events,"Alan Tomlinson, Christopher Young"
The Agassi story,Dominic Cobello
Showing to win,"Carolyn Henderson, Carloyn Henderson, Lynn Russell"
Sport matters,Eric Dunning
The sociology of sport,Eric Dunning
Big Red!,"Nichols, John, John Nichols"
Max the champion,Sean Stockdale
Game over,Dave Zirin
Backcountry skiing adventures,"Goodman, David, David Goodman"
Ninja baseball Kyuma!,Shunshin Maeda
Rules of the game,"Jones, Michael E."
Spine in sports,Ted A. Lennard
The Mental Edge,Kenneth Baum
Thomas Hauser on sports,Thomas Hauser
"Verses written for Nicholson's ""Almanac of sports for 1898""",Rudyard Kipling
Fanaticus,Justine Gubar
"The best American sports writing, 2004","Glenn Stout, Richard Ben Cramer"
Sierra South,"Thomas Winnett, Jason Winnett, Kathy Morey, Lyn Haber"
The European Union and sport,"Robert C. R. Siekmann, Janwillem Soek"
"Recueil des sentences du TAS, 2001-2003",Matthieu Reeb
Starting in taekwondo,"Fox, Joe., Joe Fox, Art Michaels"
Canada,Dave Best
The pleasures of country sports,Various
Fireside waterfowler,"David E. Wesley, Glenn D. Chambers"
Sport and leisure operations management,"Una McMahon-Beattie, Ian Yeoman"
Bolivia,"Yossi Brain, Paula Thurman"
Readings in sports,"Murray Bromberg, Melvin Gordon"
Great quotes from great sports heroes,Peggy Anderson
Visions of sport,"Martin, Bob"
Human game,"Francesco Bonami, Maria Luisa Frisa, Stefano Tonchi"
Encyclopedia of International Games,Daniel Bell
Neue Sportkultur,Rainer Pawelke
"Fighting back, taekwondo for women","Yeon Hee Park, Jeff Leibowitz"
The Oxford Handbook of Sports History,"Robert Edelman, Wayne Wilson"
Heart of a champion,Jeff Sheppard
Jackie Robinson,"Jackie Robinson, Wendell Smith"
Sport and exercise psychology,Aidan P. Moran
Advanced whitetail hunting,"Ron Spomer, Creative Publishing international, Gary Clancy"
The Newberg Report,Jamey Newberg
Pitching Around Fidel,S. L. Price
Sports law practice,Martin J. Greenberg
"The management of clubs, recreation, and sport","Thomas H. Sawyer, Owen Smith"
Sport History in the Digital Era,Murray G. Phillips
So Many Olympic Exertions,Anelise Chen
Training Thoroughbred Horses,"Preston M. Burch, Alex Bower"
The 40-Knot Sailboat,Bernard Smith
Why Not Load Your Own,Townsend Whelen
Wilderness Hunting and Wildcraft,Townsend Whelen
North Carolina's Mountains-to-Sea Trail Guide,Friends of the Mountains-to-Sea Trail
"When Race, Religion, and Sport Collide",Darron T. Smith
Sport Philosophy Now,Matthew James McNees
Ponting,Ricky Ponting
Introduction to sport studies,Harold J. VanderZwaag
Wohlbegründete olympische Politik?,Sven Güldenpfennig
INFO IPA SPORTS 1991 PA,Mike Meserole
Zhongguo min jian ti yu =,"Wugong Hu, Baoxiu Shi"
And the Crowd Goes Wild,Joe Garner
Aktualʹnye problemy sportivnogo prava,A. A. Solovʹev
The Ohio State University at the Olympics,Rusty Wilson
Groot sportfotoboek Suriname,Guno Hoen
Urbanidades da natureza,Cleber Augusto Gonçalves Dias
Ethic and sport,Panathlon International. Congresso
More teaching games for understanding,"Joy Butler, Linda L. Griffin"
Managing Your Career in the Sports Industry (Ferguson Career Coach),Shelly Field
The complete guide to paintball,"Jerry Braun, Rob Rubin"
Wettbewerbsspiele,"Jürgen Schwier, Claus Leggewie"
Sŭpʻochʻŭ sahoe chʻŏrhak tamnon,
Listos!,
Be-migrash ha-miśḥaḳim,Yair Galily
A century of sports at the University of Nebraska at Kearney,"Mark R. Ellis, Jordan T. Kuck"
Sports jokes,"Pam Rosenberg, Mernie Gallagher-Cole"
Garimpando memórias,Silvana Vilodre Goellner
Vostok--Rossii︠a︡--Zapad,
Liupanshui Shi zhi,
Values in sport,"Torbjörn Tännsjö, Claudio Marcello Tamburrini"
"The "" E"" factor","Bob Goldman, Ronald Klatz"
Why a curveball curves,Frank Vizard
Zhonghua ti yu jing shen yan jiu,Li Huang
Géoéconomie du sport,"Liliane Bensahel, Maxence Fontanel, Jacques Fontanel"
The everywoman's guide to marathoning,"Wendy Robbins, Wendy Robbins, Alyce Vilines"
Zunyi Diqu zhi,
Alle origini del movimento sportivo cattolico in Italia,Felice Fabrizio
Issues in physical education and sports,George McGlynn
Professional athlete,Gayle Bryan
The worst call ever,"Kyle Garlett, Patrick O'neal"
Play ball,Time-Life for Children (Firm)
Sport,
"Encyclopaedia of sports, games, and pastimes",
Ruffing it,"Mardi Richmond, Melanee L. Barash"
The psychology of team sports,Ronnie Lidor
Leisure and recreation,"Julie Gibson, Eric MacIntyre, Ian Wood - undifferentiated, Katherine Kemp, Stephen Pearson"
Encyclopedia of sports,Martin Tyler
SPORTS MEGA-EVENTS: SOCIAL SCIENTIFIC ANALYSES OF A GLOBAL PHENOMENON; ED. BY JOHN HORNE,"Horne, John, Wolfram Manzenreiter"
Deconstructing sport history,Murray G. Phillips
The Olympic factbook,"Rebecca N. Ferguson, Marie J. MacNee, U. S. Olympic Committee, Marie Macnee"
Total baseball,"Thorn, John, Michael Gershman, John Thorn, Pete Palmer"
Traité de physiologie de l'exercice et du sport,Paolo Cerretelli
Stock assessment,"Vincent F. Gallucci, Saul B. Saila, Daniel J. Gustafson, Brian J. Rothschild"
Taiiku supōtsu ni kansuru 27-nenkan no zasshi bunken mokuroku,Nichigai Asoshiētsu
Red zone,Tom Shatel
Das Leistungssportsystem der DDR in den 80er Jahren und im Prozess der Wende,"Hans J. Teichler, Klaus Reinartz"
Fly fishing southern Colorado,"Craig Martin, Tom Knopick, John Flick"
Tar Heel tradition,Philip L. Ben
"Cram101 textbook outlines to accompany Ethics and morality in sport management, Desensi and Rosenberg, 1st edition","Joy Theresa DeSensi, DeSensi, Rosenberg"
Let's discover sport and entertainment,
A Brief History of American Sports,"Elliott J. Gorn, Warren Goldstein"
Autocourse official history of the Indianapolis 500,"Donald C. Davidson [racing historian], Rick Schaffer"
"Practice, program, and policy","Sara Harris, Raymond Harris"
Sports science,Elaine Pascoe
The Oxford book of Australian sporting anecdotes,"Richard Cashman, Graeme Kinross-Smith"
"The independent Carolina Baseball League, 1936-1938","R. G. Utley, Scott Verner"
Sports law,Raymond L. Yasser
Total baseball,"Thorn, John, John Thorn"
Zhongguo Hunan Tongdao Dong zu wen hua yi chan ji cheng. di er ji. (3 vols.),
The team manager,Paul J. Deegan
Strength and power in sport,"Paavo Komi, H. G. Knuttgen"
Kenpō saizensen,"Kawaguchi, Tadashi"
Histoire du sport féminin,"Thierry Terret, Pierre Arnaud, France) Colloque Histoire du sport féminin (1994 : Lyon"
The metabolic basis of performance in exercise and sport,"David R. Lamb, Murray, Robert"
Sports & recreation fads,Frank W. Hoffmann
"Best easy day hikes, South Dakota's Black Hills","Robert C. Gildart, Bert Gildart, Jane Gildart"
25 years of Super Bowl head-butts and high-fives quote by quote,"Wes Janz, Vickie Abrahamson"
The sociocultural foundations of human movement,"Kirk, David, David Kirk, Stephanie Hanrahran, John Nauright"
"SPORTING EVENTS AND EVENT TOURISM: IMPACTS, PLANS AND OPPORTUNITIES; ED. BY MARTIN ROBERTSON",Martin Robertson
The musical ride of the Royal Canadian Mounted Police,"William Kelly, H. Kelly, Nora Hickson Kelly"
Risk management in sport,Herb Appenzeller
L'atleta nell'antichità,Elena Maria Menotti
Bearcats!,"Kevin Grace, Greg Hand, Tom Hathaway, Carey Hoffman"
"Der Sport-Brockhaus, alles vom Sport von A-Z",
The Oxford companion to Australian sport,Wray Vamplew
Sport and gender in Canada,"Kevin Young, Philip White, Kevin Young"
"F1 images / [photographs, Daniele Amaduzzi ... [et al.] translation, Laura Hollis]","Daniele Amaduzzi, Alberto Borsieri, Roberto Di Lellis"
"Class, sports, and social development",Richard S. Gruneau
Colemanballs,"Barry Fantoni, Larry"
People who sweat,Robin Chotzinoff
The sportsmedicine book,Gabe Mirkin
The heart of a coach,Fellowship of Christian Athletes
Olympic Sports,Nick Hunter
Private Eye's Colemanballs2,"Barry Fantoni, Larry"
The British sportsman,William Augustus Osbaldiston
Cocaine + surfing,Chas Smith
Greed and glory,Sean Deveney
The official rules of in-line hockey,"Hockey Association, National In-Line Hockey Association Staf"
Babe conquers the world,"Rich Wallace, Sandra Neil Wallace"
Financing the Sport Enterprise,"Thomas H. Sawyer, Michael Hypes, Julia Ann Hypes"
The Harlem Globetrotters Present,Larry Dobrow
The Allen book of riding,"Carolyn Henderson, Jennifer Bell"
Hockey night in Canada,"Richard S. Gruneau, Richard Gruneau, David Whitson"
The athlete's guide to sponsorship,"Jennifer Drury, Cheri Elliot"
Upon further review,Mike Pesca
The pursuit of endurance,Jennifer Pharr Davis
"Foundations of Canadian physical education, recreation, and sports studies",David F. Anderson
The Year book of sports medicine 1985,James Lee Anderson
Posing!,"Kennedy, Robert, Robert Kennedy"
"The Lower extremity and spine in sports medicine / ed. by James A. Nicholas, Elliott B. Hershman",Elliott B. Hershman
Law for recreation and sport managers,"Doyice Cotten, T. Jesse Wilde"
Sport,None
The pinky ball book,Dina Anastasio
Textbook of science and medicine in sport,"John Bloomsield, Peter A. Fricker"
The official book of Super Bowl XXIX,"Ronnie Lott, Dan Fouts"
Arbeitersport- und Arbeiterkulturbewegung im Ruhrgebiet,Horst Ueberhorst
Devotions from the world of sports,John Hillman
Sport,"Adam Lewis, Jonathan Taylor"
Would a dinosaur eat my teacher?,Carl Mehling
Exercise,Donald Macleod
Microtraumatologie du sport et surmenage articulaire,"Jacques Robineau, L. (Lucien) Simon, France) Colloque international de pathologie locomotrice "
The Sporting Life,Bill Barich
"L'Equipe, 50 ans de sport",
Manuel et règlement du jeu du croquet,
"Horsehide, pigskin, oval tracks and apple pie",James A. Vlasich
Silent seasons,"Thomas McGuane, Russell Chatham, William Hjortsberg"
In praise of heroes,Jimmy Smyth
Psychology of sport training,"Boris Blumenstein, Ronnie Lidor, Gershon Tenenbaum"
Postcards from the Ledge,Greg Child
Sports and pastimes of Scotland,Robert Scott Fittis
Reps!,"Kennedy, Robert, Robert Kennedy"
Human body dynamics,Dhanjoo N. Ghista
Physical activity and youth sports,Milton Schwebel
Farokh Engineer,"John Cantrell, John Cankell, Farokh Engineer"
Jace Wins the Race,"Jessica K. Childers, Nafisa Arshad"
Chapman Piloting and Seamanship 69th Edition,"Charles Frederic Chapman, Jonathan Eaton"
The development and control of behavior in sport and physical education,Brent S. Rushall
"Awesome, Disgusting, Unusual Facts about Sports",Eric Braun
Law and the sportsman,Robert M. Debevec
The bluewater handbook,"Steve Dashew, Stephen Dashew, Linda Dashew"
Raise your hand if you love horses,"Pat Parelli, Kathy Swan"
You Won't Believe This But..,Barry Cryer
The Biteback Dictionary Of Humorous Sporting Quotations,Fred Metcalf
Young Athlete's Perspective : Talent Development Stories,"Graham Turner, John Coomer, Jonathan Sainsbury"
The Australia Day Regatta,Christine Cheater
Different Class,"Jimmy Magee, Jason O'Toole"
Nutrition du sportif,Xavier Bigard
Heart of Dixie,Ruthie Henrick
And the Fans Roared,Joe Garner
Beyond the Game,Gary Smith
"The East Asian Olympiads, 1934-2008","Michael Baskett, Roger Buckley"
Selected team sports for men,John Howard Shaw
"Camping Journal Log Book & RV Trip Planner, Camper Green",Enchanted Willow
Coach Winston,Russell Winston
Intentional Balk,"Daniel Levitt, Mark Armour"
"Camping Journal Log Book & RV Trip Planner, Camper Blue",Enchanted Willow
Sweet Knockout,"Neha Lavu, Storyshares"
RUNNER - Correre Non è Mai Stato Così Facile,Tina A. Cooper
I Will Always Love You,Kaitlyn Calicott
Billy Bush,Bill Bush
Sport in Cuba,Paula J. Pettavino
Promoting Athlete Welfare in Aesthetic Sports,Aimie Epoch
Footprints on the Mountains,"Dennis Renshaw, Jacque Hillman, Katherine Gould"
Dropping In,Shane Sebastian
Building Leaders Empowering Students & Athletes,Martin Esqueda
Youth Wrestling 101,"Tre Horton, Savannah Horton, Kase Johnston, Jody McAlister"
"Camping Journal Log Book & RV Trip Planner, Wander Not Lost",Enchanted Willow
"Camping Journal & RV Travel Logbook, RV There Yet",Enchanted Willow
Robbie Deans,Matt McIlraith
"Camping Journal Log Book & RV Trip Planner, Happy Camper",Enchanted Willow
Judging Hunters and Equitation,"Tricia Booker, Julie Winkel"
From the Hill to the Hall,Shelby Luse
Celtic,Andy Dougan
Bradman's War,Malcolm Knox
Carwyn,Alun Richards
"New Zealand sporting disasters, disappointments & curiosities",Keith Quinn
Faldo,"Nick Faldo, Bruce Critchley, David Cannon"
"Travel-trailer homesteading under $5,000","Brian D. Kelling, Burt Rapp, Tony Lesce, Brian Kelling"
Talking bodies,Martti Silvennoinen
"Camping Journal Log Book & RV Trip Planner, Blue Vintage Camper",Enchanted Willow
Extreme Sports,Brad McCormick
Guide to Fantasy Football : Understanding the Different Fantasy Football Leagues,Todd Bailey
Allenamento Nella Terza Età,Tina A. Cooper
Bex Plays Sports,"Jordana Stewart, Diane Berwick"
Something to Talk About,Ruthie Henrick
Play It As It Lies,"Matthew F. Filner, James Sitar"
There Are No Shortcuts to Success,Daniel Merritt
Parade Readying Your Horse,"American Sidesaddle Association, Gael Orr, Vicki Pritchard, Maggie Herlensky, Audrey Sears"
Mechanical Advantage-Tools for the Wild Vertical,"Middendorf, John, IV"
Handbook of Research on Sport and Business,Sten Soderman
50 Greatest Pirates Every Fan Should Know,Lew Freedman
Ski flex,"Paul Frediani, Harald Harb"
Transforming play,Dennis G. Slade
Championship team building,Jeff Janssen
Games and Empires,Allen Guttmann
"The second H book of Harvard athletics, 1923-1963","Movius, Geoffrey H."
The Complete Guide to Orienteering,Berglund
Stan Hochman Unfiltered,Gloria Hochman
Behavioral Sport Psychology,James K. Luiselli
The Golfer,Joanne Slazyk
Peace of Mind Anshin Self Defence,Graham Summerfield
Evolution of Skating Vol 7,"Terrell Ferguson, Morgan Weske, William Tate, Chad Lankford, Lorraine DeLarosa"
Coach's Corner : Winning at Work,Troy Stevenson
A yachtsman's guide to the collision rules,"Campbell, John, John Campbell"
"Sport, media and society",Eileen Kennedy
Goalkeeping,Alex Welsh
Skilful show jumping,"Jane Holderness-Roddam, Bob Langrish"
Roberts rules!,"Marc Roberts, Theresa Foy Digeronimo"
Clean Break,"Christophe Bassons, Peter Cossins, Benoît Hopquin"
Manly and Muscular Diversions,Tony Money
The 12 metre class,"Luigi Lang, Jones Dyer"
Microcomputing in sport and physical education,"David A. Brodie, David Brodie, John Thornhill"
State of Origin,Liam Hauser
Sport Psychology,Rhonda Cohen
Obnoxious Parents and Ruthless Coaches,Randy Corwin
What a street!,Barbara Shook Hazen
Rites of Passage,"E. C. Joe, Vitaliy Musiyenko, Linda Adams, Kathryn Allison"
Devil in the Diamond,Gregory Cioffi
Beyond the Arc,"Brundage, Vernon, Jr."
Rebound,"Matt Doherty, Michael Jordan"
Golf Fore Ever,Mikedeagle
Untethered,Paul Aklilu
It Was Sooo Easy,Antonio Jackson
"Outside the Box, Within the Cube",Lance Loya
Chosen Few,Mitja Velikonja
Medieval Wrestling,"Jessica Finley, Robert Charrette"
Best Season Yet,Rebekah Trittipoe
Game,"William Meiners, Brian McKenna"
Competitive Diving,"Hobie Billingsley, Dr. Peter Andersen Ph.D."
Skateboarding,Thomas Kingsley Troupe
The Economics of Sport (International Library of Critical Writings in Economics) [2-Vol. Set],Andrew Zimbalist
Playing Tough,Roger I. Abrams
Journey of Discovery - 62 Days on the TransAmerica Trail,Wayne Aho
"Overload, performance incompetence, and regeneration in sport",Manfred Lehmann
Sport technology,Andy Miah
Physiological bases of sports performance,"Mark Hargreaves, John Hawley"
Sport in Norfolk county,Allan Forbes
Extreme rafting,"Tenucci Bernasconi, Marco Teucci"
Wicked Good Year,Steve Buckley
Miller Rounding Third,Tommy Reynolds
Dare to Make History,"Jocelyne Lamoureux-Davidson, Monique Lamoureux-Morando"
This is your brain on sports,L. Jon Wertheim
The Way It Looks from Here,Stephen Brunt
Technical foul,Rich Wallace
Sports camp,Rich Wallace
The sports book,"Bob Bridle, Richard Gilbert, Margaret Parrish"
The Smart Girl's Guide to Sports,Liz Hartman Musiker
The Strange Career of the Black Athlete,Russell T. Wigginton
Spartan seasons,Lynn Henning
Critical thinking for sports students,Emily Ryall
Sport studies,Barbara Bell
"You call it sports, but I say it's a jungle out there",Dan Jenkins
Key concepts in sport psychology,John Kremer
Advances in physiological sciences,International Congress of Physiological Sciences (28th 1980 Budapest)
Sport in the UK,Leona Trimble
Two Good Rounds,Elisa Gaudet
Turkeys strike out,Hannah Eliot
Beyond Technique in the Dojo,Don S. Lewis
Pioneer in Perfection - the True Story of Nadia Comaneci,Steven Matthews
Hooper's Handbook,"Watson, Tony, 2nd, Jessica Cameron, Matt Ristine"
Identity,Cameron Kinley
Life above Par,"Robinson, Phillip, Jr., Christine Robinson, Berge Design"
Small Piece of Her Heart,Corine Marie
Jesus Is a Baller,Elijah N. Gurash
Regift Horse : Ocala Horse Girls,Natalie Keller Reinert
Building Leaders Gratitude Journal,Martin Esqueda
"Camping Journal Log Book & RV Trip Planner, Purple Vintage Camper",Enchanted Willow
"Camping Journal Log Book & RV Trip Planner, Red Vintage Camper",Enchanted Willow
Ejercicios de Rondo para Fútbol,Chest Dugger
Where Jump Shots Meet Jesus,"Allston, Tim, 3rd, Gibson, Dave ""the Rave"", Jr., Debbe Millet, Nasar Khan"
366 Days of Tennis,Rob Carver
"Replays, Rivalries, and Rumbles",Steven Gietschier
Reed's advanced electrotechnology for marine engineers,"Edmund George R. Kraal, Thomas D. Morton, Leslie Jackson, Anthony S. Prince"
Sport for diabetics,John Betteridge
CRUELLEST MILES: THE HEROIC STORY OF DOGS AND MEN IN A RACE AGAINST AN EPIDEMIC,"GAY SALISBURY, Gay Salisbury, Laney Salisbury"
Day skipper exercises,"Pat Langley-Price, Philip Ouvry"
World of Shakespeare: sports and pastimes,Alan Dent
Sport and corporate nationalisms,"Michael L. Silk, David Lawrence Andrews, Cheryl L. Cole"
My Life Behind Bars,Brian Scura
Kick It,Rebel Girls
Coach : Carrie Returns,Adison Fernandez
Hockey Princess,Angela Cotey
Spellbound,Ruthie Henrick
"Ted Williams' fishing ""the big three""","Williams, Ted, Ted Williams, John Underwood"
Crosstraining,Zondervan Staff
A course of their own,"John H Kennedy, Kennedy, Kennedy, John H."
The Best of Hal Lebovitz,Hal Lebovitz
McPherson's sports & fitness manual,"McPherson, John"
Science of Hitting,Ted Williams
The Quotable Coach,Thom Loverro
Nationensport und Mediennation,Dieter Reicher
Surfing: vintage surfing graphics,"Jim Heimann, Paul Mussa"
We all play sports,Diana Noonan
The Russian Five,Keith Gave
Godspeed,L. D. Russell
Snowboarding to Nirvana,Frederick Lenz
Best friends,Tina Athaide
Lacrosse the Globe,Nick Marrocco
In the Game,Diana Herweck
Stem : The Science of Fitness,Georgia Beth
Playing Through,Jim Moriarty
"Arnie, Seve, and a Fleck of Golf History","Bill Fields, Ben Crenshaw"
Game Before the Money,Jackson Michael
Exploring sport and exercise psychology,Judy L. Van Raalte
Sport in divided societies,"Alan Bairner, John Peter Sugden, John Sugden, Alain Barner"
Badminton handbook,Bernd-Volker Brahms
A Payroll to Meet,David Whitford
Fencing to win,"A. T. Simmonds, Professor A.T. Simmonds, E.D. Morton"
KTM Dirt Bikes,R. L. Van
Mr. Quarter-to-Two,"Robert H Miller, Rusty Baillie"
Mae West Was Right,"Miller, Robert H."
Where Are the Balls?,Entendre Games
Gentleman Jake,"Deitz, Harry, Jr."
The Science of Waves and Surfboards,Lisa Steele MacDonald
Texas off-Road Racing 2,Mike Kowis
The dark side of sports,Nick T. Pappas
Green-Clad Kicker,"Jamie Graham Duprey, Joe Puckett, Cosette Puckett"
Ten Best Steps Teaching Yourself to Swim Safely and Efficiently,Pete Andersen
Teach Yourself or Your Child to Swim at Home Without a Pool,Pete Andersen
Tioga Tramps,"Elizabeth Stone O'Neill, Adele Nova O'Neill"
Unstoppable,Kara Kendrick
Woman's Guide to the World of Sailing,Jane Golden
Pain and Performance,"Ryan Whited, Matt Fitzgerald"
Building a Dream,Lawren Just
In the Ring,Sierra Isley
"Hey Coach, I Gotta Pee!",Vincent D. Burruano
Never Give Up,Nicholas Dozier
Dis,Solomon Briggs
Arte de Rematar en el Fútbol,Chest Dugger
Swimming,Thomas Kingsley Troupe
The Little Baseball Poetry Book,Walter the Educator
Fujian Five Ancestor Boxing,Russ Smith
Shut up and Clap!,"Batchelor, George, 3rd"
Competitive Diving Illustrated,"Hobie Billingsley, Dr. Peter Andersen Ph.D."
Ollie Visits Where It All Started,"Lawrence Blundred, Milt Priggee, DocUmeant Designs, Jennifer Lucore"
Soccer Prince,Seth Davis
Words to Negotiate By,Mark Termini
Golf,Thomas Kingsley Troupe
Snowboarding,Thomas Kingsley Troupe
How to Become a Scuba Diver,"Kenny Dyal, Dinosaur House"
A Basic Fencing Companion,"Paul Sise, Camilla Sise"
Eight world cups,George Vecsey
Triple H,"Triple H., Triple H, James Rosenthal, Robert Caprio"
Sport Sociology (Active Learning in Sport),Amanda Jones
Curriculum and instruction,"Deborah A. Wuest, Bennett J. Lombardo"
On the Ridge Between Life and Death,David Roberts
Eat My Schwartz,"Geoff Schwartz, Mitch Schwartz, Seth Kaufman"
Sparky and me,Dan Ewald
Captain for Life,"Harry Carson, Harry Carson"
Games girls play,"Caroline Silby, Caroline Silby Ph.D., Shelley Smith"
Key Concepts In Sport And Exercise Research Methods,Michael Atkinson
The Game Must Go On,John Klima
"Researching Leisure, Sport and Tourism",Jonathan A Long
She's got game,Melissa Malamut
Phenom,Rob Miech
Blue Bistro,Elin Hilderbrand
Bob Logan's Tales from Chicago Sports,Bob Logan
Seventh Game,Roger Kahn
The limit,Michael T. Cannell
Say it ain't so,Josh Berk
Hawkeyes for Life,Steve Roe
Research Methods In Sport,Mark F. Smith
"Introduction to Physical Education Exercise Science, and Sport",Angela Lumpkin
Game changers,Molly Schiot
Flying High,Jamison Hensley
Sweetness,Jeff Pearlman
Sports in hell,Rick Reilly
Southpaws & Sunday punches,Christine Ammer
The Sporting News selects football's 100 greatest players,"Ron Smith, John Rawlings"
Sports in America,Robert Jacobson
Players,Matthew Futterman
Tales from the Maryland Terrapins,"Dave Ungrady, Boomer Esiason"
"Concussion in Sports, an Issue of Physical Medicine and Rehabilitation Clinics of North America",Scott R. Laker
Game of My Life Chicago Bears,Lew Freedman
Volleyball,Gabrielle Vanderhoof
Game of My Life New York Rangers,"John Halligan, John Kreiser"
Wish granted,Make-a-Wish Foundation
The big show,"Keith Olbermann, Dan Patrick"
The SAGE Dictionary of Sports Studies,Dominic Malcolm
"Fox Tossing, Octopus Wrestling and Other Forgotten Sports",Edward Brooke-Hitching
Essentials of Athletic Injury Management with eSims,William E. Prentice
Heidi Heckelbeck tries out for the team,Wanda Coven
Athletic taping and bracing,David H. Perrin
Coaching hockey successfully,"Dennis Gendron, Dennis Gendron, K. Vern Stenlund"
Golf past 50,"David Chmiel, David Chmiel, Kevin Morris"
Advances in Motivation in Sport and Exercise,Glyn C. Roberts
Sportplay,National Association for Sport & Pe &Nas
Complete conditioning for volleyball,"Allen E. Scates, Mike Linn, Vince Kowalick"
Sport promotion and sales management,"Richard L. Irwin, William A. Sutton, Larry M. McCarthy"
On the Guard II,YMCA of the USA
A Summer Up North,Jerry Poling
Better runs,"Joe Henderson, Jeff Galloway"
Sports and exercise for children with chronic health conditions,Barry B. Goldberg
Disability and sport,Karen P. DePauw
Making Magic,"Leslie McDonald, Leslie Mcdonald, Meredith Weller"
Coaching basketball technical and tactical skills,"Kathy McGee, American Sport Education Program."
Kings of the road,"Robin Magowan, Robin Macgowan, Graham Watson"
POW baseball in World War II,Tim Wolter
Sport and physical activity,Barbara L. Griffin
Sport psychology,"David Lavalle, John Kremer, Aidan P. Morgan, Mark Williams"
Maths and Science for Sport and Exercise Students,Craig Williams
The boy who saved baseball,John H. Ritter
Secrets of sport,James de Winter
Physical training of the Soviet soldier,David J. Foley
Golfer's Stroke Saving,"Craig Shankland, Benjamin Lupo"
Canadian football,"Edwards, J. F."
You go girl!,"Kim Doren, Charlie Jones, Kristine Lilly"
Sport in Latin America and the Caribbean (Jaguar Books on Latin America),"David G. Arbena,  Joseph L. LaFrance"
The sports industry's war on athletes,"Peter S. Finley, Peter Finley, Laura Finley"
Sport and Politics in Modern Britain,Kevin Jefferys
Sportstalk,Robert A. Palmatier
Freckleface Strawberry and the dodgeball bully,Julianne Moore
Exploring the world of sports,Phyllis Jean Perry
Sports Biomechanics: The Basics,Anthony Blazevich
Sport and Social Identities,"Harris, John, Andrew Parker"
Sport in America,Donald Spivey
Athletes tell their unforgettable moments in sport,"Robert M. Sterling, Bob Sterling, Marc Looy"
Peak Performance,Felicity Heathcote
"Coaching, athletics, and psychology",Robert N. Singer
The Comeback,Abby Gaines
I'm Champion : Call Me Bob,Bob Champion
Leveling the playing field,Paul C. Weiler
Broadway Joe,Pete Birle
Sculpting Her Body Perfect,"Brad Schoenfeld, Kiana Tom"
Psychology of motor behavior and sport--1980,"NASPSPA (Organization), Glyn C. Roberts, Daniel M. Landers"
Best Fight,Michael DeMarco
Practical Guide to the Operational Use of the FN FAL Rifle,Erik Lawrence
Sports Drama & Scandals Word Search,Free Thinking Media LLC
Self Defense Why Even Bother,D. J. Stephens
I Don't Believe It... We're Good?,"Barry Schumer, Elizabeth Ann Atkins"
GOLFING with Daddy,Moon
Game Within,Walter Beede
Practical Guide to the Operational Use of the HK G3/HK91 Rifle,Erik Lawrence
"Pavilion, Crease, Boundary and Beyond",Mike Webster
Grealish : the Complete Story of a Football Superstar,House of Ballers
Saka : the Complete Story of a Football Superstar,House of Ballers
Sean Goes To Barcelona,"Tanya Preminger, Elettra Cudignotto"
Smart Doubles,"Ron Shields, Steven Adler"
Jugando por ti,Gianna Gabriela
Brave in Season,Jon Volkmer
Foden : the Complete Story of a Football Superstar,House of Ballers
Fußballtraining,Chest Dugger
Horses 101,Kimberly Story
Flight : The Eventing Series,Natalie Keller Reinert
Building Good Teammates,Lance Loya
High Performance Nordic Training,Stuart Kremzner
Audacity of Hoop,Alexander Wolff
Mat Return,Ron Lang
The Sports Parent Solution,J. P. Nerbun
Adams Realty,Papa Tony
Art of One Pocket,Steve Booth
Pickleball in No Time : Pickleball Made Simple,Christopher Klein
Memoirs from the Edge,Jeb Corliss
Magic Puck,"Sarah Clifford, Ricky Audi"
I Quit!,"Jean Herring, Shannon Triplett, Brigid Malloy"
Cold Inside,Paul Hernsey
Greater Fool,Lucas Roman
"He's Not Like Us, His Kick Was Special",Roy L. Baxter III
Moo Do Chul Hahk,United States Soo Bahk Do Moo Duk Kwan Federation
Winning Mentality for Student-Athletes,"Tyson Gentry, Jim Tressel"
Scout,"Carina M. Rose, Carina Rose"
Climbology,Craig Berman
Baseball,Cesar Love
"SPORT TOURISM: INTERRELATIONSHIPS, IMPACTS AND ISSUES; ED. BY BRENT W. RITCHIE","Brent W. Ritchie, Daryl Adair"
"Raise a Fist, Take a Knee",John Feinstein
The DH,John Feinstein
Sport and Ireland,Paul Rouse
al- Marʾah wa-al-riyāḍah min manẓūr Islāmī,Muḥammad Khālid ʻAbd al-ʻAzīz Manṣūr
The encyclopedia of North American sports history,Ralph Hickok
"Football, Europe and the press / Liz Crolley and David Hand","Liz Crolley, Liz Crolley, David Hand"
Sport and Adventure Tourism,"Simon, Ph.D. Hudson"
Religion and Sport,Charles S. Prebish
Sport Politics,Jonathan Grix
The Leisure literature,"Nancy L. Herron, Adele F. Bane"
Taking the Field,Michael A. Messner
"Leisure, Sports & Society",K. Spracklen
Modern sports ethics,Angela Lumpkin
Sport and the Law,William J. Stewart
Sports Training Principles (Nutrition & Fitness),"Dick, Frank W."
Football,"Stewart, Mark"
Golf,"David Davies, Patricia Davies"
Arete,"Miller, Stephen G."
The teacher from the Black Lagoon and other stories,Mike Thaler
Applied sport psychology,Jean M. Williams
Basketball,Gabrielle Vanderhoof
Extreme sports,Wenfang Li
More than a game,Martin Barry Vinokur
Football,Richard Giulianotti
Living out of bounds,Steven J. Overman
Sports,Robert J. Higgs
Sport Psychology: The Basics,David Tod
Assignment: sports,Robert Lipsyte
Take time for paradise,A. Bartlett Giamatti
Essentials of sports law,Glenn M. Wong
Essentials of amateur sports law,Glenn M. Wong
Sport and Society in Latin America,Joseph L. Arbena
Sports,Donald L. Deardorff
Sports law and legislation,John Hladczuk
Muhammad Ali,Anthony O. Edmonds
Biomechanics in Sport,Vladimir M. Zatsiorsky
Tae kwon do,"Dong Keun Park, Allan Schein"
Ko je general Svetomir Đukić,Siniša Ivanović
Old English sporting books,"Nevill, Ralph"
Soziale Stadtentwicklung durch grosse Projekte?,"Eckehart Ehrenberg, Wilfried Kruse"
Plaisirs des sports,Jean Prévost
O esporte na cidade,Ricardo de Figueiredo Lucena
Sport psychiatry,Robert Burton
Caddie sense,"Michael Carrick, Steve Duno"
Careers for sports fans,Andrew Kaplan
Half-time,Robert Winder
Sports injuries,James G. Garrick
The Complete Guide to Sports Nutrition,Anita Bean
Ray Christensen's Gopher Tales,Ray Christensen
Guardians of the home,Matthew Strange
Critical Race Theory in Sport,Kevin Hylton
A Biographical Dictionary of the Baseball Hall of Fame,John C. Skipper
The business of sports agents,Kenneth L. Shropshire
What sport tells us about life,E. T. Smith
Si chou zhi lu ti yu tu lu  =,Jinmei Li
Z tradycji kultury fizycznej w Polsce po II wojnie światowej,Stanisław Zaborniak
Out of Nowhere,Geoff Hollister
Great careers for people interested in sports & fitness,Lois Edwards
My Body Needs Exercise,Jenna Lee Gleisner
The mountain biker's guide to the Great Lake states,"Phil Van Valkenberg, Jack McHugh"
Chasing Excellence,"Pat Melgares, Myles Schrag, Billy Mills"
Ultimate College Basketball Road Trip,Jeff Seidel
A level playing field,Gerald Lyn Early
With Winning in Mind,Lanny R. Bassham
Vision and sports,James R. Gregg
When women dive,"Erin O'Neill, Ella Jean Morgan"
A Slice Of Golf,Mark Rowlinson
Smarty Marty's got game,Amy Gutierrez
Thoroughly Unhelpful History of Australian Sport,Titus O'Reily
Tightrope walking,"Zhozefina Pasternak, Josephine Pasternak, Rimgaila Salys"
Sport and photography in the Rocky Mountains,Andrew Williamson
Keeping Fit with Sports,Dona Herweck Rice
Michigan,Bruce Madej
Soldier Field,Liam T. A. Ford
Dictionary of American sports,John S. Salak
Howard Cosell,Mark Ribowsky
What Drives Winning,"Brett Ledbetter, Lisa Kuntz"
Mechanics of sport,Gerald A. Carr
Handbook for Handguns,Charles Bruckerhoff
The Ergogenics Edge,Melvin H. Williams
Competitive Fire,Michael Clarkson
Stronger arms and upper body,"Sean Cochran, Sean Cochran, Tom House"
Sportethik,Frank Martin Brunn
Introduction to sport law,John O. Spengler
Sport and neoliberalism,"Michael L. Silk, David Lawrence Andrews"
Crossing boundaries,"Susan J. Bandy, Anne S. Darden"
High-performance soccer,"Paul Caligiuri, Dan Herbst"
Playing the Field,"O'Brien, George"
Tumor progression and therapeutic resistance,"Wafik S. El-Deiry, Karel Pacak, INTERNATIONAL SYMPOSIUM ON CATECHOLAMINE"
Finance for Sport and Leisure Managers,Robert Wilson
Stress and performance in sport,"Lew Hardy, Jones, J. Graham"
Fantasy Soccer and Mathematics,Dan Flockhart
Developing Partnerships in Sport and Leisure,Brigid Simmonds
SOCIOLOGY OF SPORT: THEORY AND PRACTICE,ROBYN L. JONES
St. Andrews & the Open championship,"David Joy, Iain Macfarlane Lowe"
Science and medicine in sport,J. Bloomfield
Fantasy Basketball and Mathematics,Dan Flockhart
Smart golf,"DeDe Owens, Dede Owens, Dan Kirschenbaum"
Training in Sport,Bruce Elliott
Glig-gamena angel-deod,Joseph Strutt
Handbook of sport psychology,"Robert N. Singer, Heather A. Hausenblas, Christopher Janelle"
A history of sports and games in Eastern Canada prior to World War I,Stewart Alexander Davidson
Ley general de deportes,Heriberto Morrison
Globetrotting,Damion L. Thomas
"The golden age of the great passenger airships, Graf Zeppelin & Hindenburg","Harold G. Dick, Douglas H. Robinson"
How to get a job in sports,Dale Ratermann
"Illini Legends, Lists & Lore",Mike Pearson
Martina & Chrissie,Phil Bildner
Marco y Yo Queremos Jugar Al Béisbol,"Jo Meserve Mach, Vera Lynne Stroup-Rentier, Mary Birdsell, Karen Diaz-Anchante"
Maker Projects for Kids Who Love Sports,Sarah Levete
"Once a Vol, always a Vol!","Gus Manning, Gus Manning, Haywood Harris"
Neymar,"Matt Oldfield, Tom Oldfield"
OE Wants It to Be Friday,"Jo Meserve Mach, Vera Lynne Stroup-Rentier, Mary Birdsell"
Overtime,Peter Schwed
Strength and power in sport,Paavo V. Komi
The Young Athlete,Helge Hebestreit
Sport Psychology,Tony Morris
Dog problems,"David Weston, Ruth Ross, Ruth Weston"
Fantasy Football and Mathematics,Dan Flockhart
Fantasy Baseball and Mathematics,Dan Flockhart
Mind games,Jeff Grout
Jocks,Dan Woog
Knowledge of the Ancestors,Ryan Leech
The bonnie prince,"Charlie Cooke, Charlie Cooke, Martin Knight"
Culture of Sports in the Harlem Renaissance,Daniel Anderson
Fitness and Health,Brian J. Sharkey
Sports Slump Busting,Alan S. Goldberg
Rope-a-dope,Pete Birle
Shootout,Pete Birle
Peak Performance in Tennis,Robert Pasahow
The Instructor's handbook,"British Horse Society., Pony Club"
Skating Engineers,Kurt Stutt
Türklerde spor kültürü,Özbay Güven
Psychological dynamics of sport and exercise,Diane L. Gill
Social Issues in Sport,Ron Woods
Sport finance,"Gil Fried, Gil Fried, Timothy D. Deschriver"
Creator's Game,Allan Downey
Rookie coaches wrestling guide,"American Coaching Effectiveness Program, American Coaching Effectiveness Program., U S A Wrestling"
The Sports process,"Eric Dunning, Joseph A. Maguire, Eric G. Dunning"
Sport marketing,Bernard James Mullin
Functional progressions for sport rehabilitation,"Steven R. Tippett, Michael L. Voight"
Las Vegas Dreams,Gil Conrad
Kiss it good-bye,"Moody, John"
Who are the best-- ?,Bob McMahon
Toward active living,"International Conference on Physical Activity, Fitness, and Health (2nd 1992 Toronto, Ont.), H. Arthur, Ph.D. Quinney, Lise Gauvin, A. E. Ted, Ph.D. Wall"
YMCA pool operations manual,"Ralph L. Johnson, Gerald E. Demers"
Athletes' guide to mental training,Robert M. Nideffer
The kid from courage,Ron Berman
American Indian sports heritage,Joseph B. Oxendine
Ergonomics in sport and physical activity,Thomas Reilly
"Comparative physical education and sport, volume 4","International Seminar on Comparative Physical Education and Sport (4th 1984 University of Kiel), Herbert Haag, Dietrich Kayser"
Right actions in sport,Warren P. Fraleigh
Physiological testing of the high-performance athlete,"Howard A. Wenger, Green, Howard J. Ph. D., J. Duncan Macdougall"
Teaching archery,"Kathleen Haywood, Kathleen M., Ph.D. Haywood, Catherine F. Lewis"
Total conditioning--the BYU football way,"LaVell Edwards, Lavel Edwards, Fred Whittingham"
Competitive sports for children and youth,"Eugene W. Brown, Eugen W. Brown, Crystal F. Branta"
Introduction To Athletic Training,Susan Kay Hillman
The pitching edge,"House, Tom"
The Creative side of experimentation,"Conrad Wesley Snyder, Bruce Abernethy"
Ergogenic aids in sport,Melvin H. Williams
Psyching for sport,Terry Orlick
Psychological dynamics of sport,Diane L. Gill
Disability Sport,"Karen P. Depauw, Susan J. Gavron"
Supplements for endurance athletes,"Jose Antonio, Jeffrey R. Stout"
Biomechanics of sport and exercise,Peter Merton McGinnis
Mind games,Tim Mantoani
The New Americans,Harvey Lauer
Freeing the Female Body,J. A. Mangan
Sports Wars,David W. Zang
Spoilsports,Brackenridge
What a time it was,W. C. Heinz
Basketball Analytics,Stephen M. Shea
Acadia National Park dayhiker's guide,"Jerome Malitz, Suzy Malitz"
Tales of the ultimate sportmen,"Jon Hedin, John Hedin, Tim Worel"
A round of golf jokes,"Bill Stott, Helen Exley, Bill Stott"
The self-sufficient sailor,"Larry Pardey, Lin Pardey"
On The Diamond,"Martin H. Greenberg, Ray Bradbury, Frederik Pohl"
The Anatomy of Sports Injuries,Brad Walker
Bill Rosinski's tales from the Carolina Panthers,"Bill Rosinski, Bill Rosinski, Pat Yasinskas"
"Sports, sports everywhere",Frank J. Jupo
Sport through the ages,"Wilson, Peter"
Sports,Melvin Berger
S Is for Score!,Laura Purdie Salas
Russell Westbrook,Jordan Lowe
NBA in Black and White,Scott
Sports & pastimes,Eva March Tappan
Doping in sports,"Detlef Thieme, Peter Hemmersbach"
Some Girls Do,Jennifer Dugan
Comparative physical education and sport,Bruce Lanyon Bennett
Avalanche accidents in Canada,"James Bruce Jamieson, Bruce Jarnieson, Torsten Goldestzer"
Evaluation of orthopedic and athletic injuries,Chad Starkey
Moo Duk Kwan® Orange Belt Instructional Guide Soo Bahk Do® & Tang Soo Do,United States Soo Bahk Do Moo Duk Kwan Federation
Hail to the Victors 2023,"Seth Fisher, MGoBlog Inc, Brian Cook"
Gatorade : Sports Drink Innovator,Rebecca Rowell
10-Day Self-Talk Transformation,Donna Blevins
Moo Duk Kwan® Red Belt Instructional Guide Soo Bahk Do® & Tang Soo Do,United States Soo Bahk Do Moo Duk Kwan Federation
Moo Duk Kwan® Green Belt Instructional Guide Soo Bahk Do® & Tang Soo Do,United States Soo Bahk Do Moo Duk Kwan Federation
Darwin's Trio of Golf Tales,Bernard Darwin
Lombardi's Destiny,Larry Names
John Cena,Tammy Gagne
Pool Water Doesn't Taste Like a Taco,"Michelle Lang, Deborah M. Lang"
Reef Smart Guide Curacao,"Peter McDougall, Ian Popple, Otto Wagner"
Football Mysteries #1,"David A. Kelly, Robert Thiebeault"
Dirt Bikes,Cameron Childers
Scottish Roots,Bill Thesken
"The Tap, Life Lessons, and Jiu Jitsu : Volume 1","Chaye Tione Alexander, Sonny Lata Yiu"
Lost Skill Syndrome,Christina Callaway
Sandlot Legacy,Walter Beede
Complete Guide to Spring Training 2024 / Arizona,Kevin Reichard
Remarkable Stories of New Jersey Golf,Kevin Casey
Strength Training for Seniors,Scott Hamrick
Master Reilly's Curriculum,K. T. R.
The Color Orange,Russell Martin
The Complete Guide to Spring Training 2024 / Florida,Kevin Reichard
Etape,Richard Moore
ESPN : Top Sports News Channel,Kristian R. Dyer
Fail Points,"Kenji Yoshinari, Julia Ustinovich"
Adidas : Athletic Apparel Trailblazer,J. R. Kinley
Thirty-Five Logs on the Fire,Jeffrey D. Morris
Sports Illustrated : Leader in Sports Media,Gail Radley
Nike : Sportswear and Brand-Building Powerhouse,Rebecca Rowell
Game On,Danica Flynn
JBA League,Brandon Williams
Winners Win,Ken Carter
ABCs of Swimming,"Kelly McKesten, Joe McEvoy, Maddie Schwimmer"
Beyond C. L. R. James,"John Nauright, Alan G. Cobley, David K. Wiggins"
Bronchos to Spurs,Chris Foltz
"Salmon, trout & charr of the world","Rupert Watson, Watson"
Talking Balls,Andrew Delahunty
Football,"Tom Flores, Robert O'Connor"
Harrington on hold 'em,Dan Harrington
Sporting fever,"Parkinson, Michael"
TOM SMITH'S CRICKET UMPIRING AND SCORING: THE INTERNATIONALLY RECOGNISED DEFINITIVE GUIDE TO THE INTERPRETATION..,"T.E SMITH, Tom Smith"
The complete guide to food for sports performance : a guide to peak nutrition for your sport,"Louise Burke, Michael McCoy"
Sport Und Recht,Franz Zeilner
Survival Guide For Coaching Youth Football,Brandon Castel
Psychological foundations of sport,"John M. Silva, Diane E. Stevens"
"Michael Jordan, Inc",David L. Andrews
The Yale football story,Tim Cohane
100 Day Accountability Journal for Athletes,Pro Big Bros
Son of Bum,"Wade Phillips, Vic Carucci"
Small Town Girl,Ruthie Henrick
Sport and International Development,Fred Coalter
"Injury-Free Running, Second Edition",Tom Michaud
Walking in the Central Italian Alps,"Gillian Price, Gillian Price"
Columbia Gorge hikes,"Don Lowe, Don, Roberta Lowe"
Tigers by the River,Wylie McLallen
Believe it!,Chicago Tribune
"Sport, play, and ethical reflection",Randolph M. Feezell
Worldwide experiences and trends in sport for all,"Lamartine Pereira da Costa, Ana Miragaya, Lamartine P. Dacosta"
"TWO PLAYERS, ONE GOAL?: SPORT IN THE EUROPEAN UNION; WALTER TOKARSKI...ET AL","Walter Tokarski, Dirk Steinbach, Karen Petry, Barbara Jesse"
Tennis,"Jindřich Höhm, Jindrich Hohm, Peter Klavora"
Skillful rowing,"Edward McNeely, Marlene Royle"
Walking,"Klaus Bös, Klaus Bos, Joachim Saam"
Values and norms in sport,Paul de Knop
"2nd European Forum ""Sport Sciences in Europe 1993""","European Forum ""Sport Sciences in Europe 1993"" (2nd 1993 Deutsche Sportshochschule Köln)"
METHODS OF RESEARCH IN SPORT SCIENCES: QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE APPROACHES,"Gershon Tenenbaum, Marcy P. Driscoll"
New approaches to sport and exercise psychology,"European Congress on Sport Psychology (11th 2003 Copenhagen, Denmark)"
25 Years of the Ironman Triathlon World Championship,Bob Babbitt
"Biomechanical Research Project, Athens 1997","Gert-Peter Brüggemann, H. Müller"
Association of Ringside Physicians English to Spanish Dictionary for Ringside Personnel,Nicholas Rizzo
Championship Nutrition and Performance,Nicholas Rizzo
Packin' in on mules and horses,"Smoke Elser, Bill Brown"
Ropes in Trees,Philipp Strasser
Fit for heaven,Trent Beattie
Comrades on the Colca,Eugene Buchanan
What Drives Winning,Brett Ledbetter
Centre College,William Strode
"Tiger, meet my sister..",Rick Reilly
Mayflies,"Malcolm Knopp, Robert Cormier"
Qualitative Research In Sport And Physical Activity,Ian Jones
Ernste Spiele,"Gabriele Klein, Michael Meuser"
Black gold,Ron Palenski
Taking sports seriously,Jeffrey Standen
Baxter's the foot and ankle in sport,"David A. Porter, Lew C. Schon"
Hoop Dreams on Wheels:,Ronald J. Berger
Research methodology in sport sociology,David Whitson
Called Out,"Floyd Sullivan, Jay Amberg, Ann Wambach, Jeanne Sullivan Meissner, Sarah Koz"
Press Box,Red Smith
Foolish Games,Tracy Solheim
Focus,"Scott Simpson, Larry Mize, Loren Roberts"
The keeper,Tim Howard
Mickey and Willie,Allen Barra
Mickey Mantle,Larry Canale
History and Philosophy of Sport and Physical Education,Robert A. Mechikoff
The Game,Robert Benson
How good do you want to be?,"Nick Saban, Brian Curtis"
The big time,Tim Green
Athletic scholarships for dummies,Pat Britz
Change up : an oral history of 8 key events that shaped modern baseball,"Larry Burke, Larry Burke, Peter Thomas Fornatale, Jim Baker"
Aaron is a good sport,P. D. Eastman
Citadels of Pride,Martha Nussbaum
Difficult Par,James R. Hansen
God Save the Fan,Will Leitch
Hoops,"Walter Iooss, Walter Iooss Jr., Mark Jacobson"
Goalkeeper in Charge,Matt Christopher
Fair play,Deirdre Martin
Adventure Sports Physiology,Christopher Hodgson
Cornered,Ron MacLean
Complete idiot's guide to coaching youth basketball,"Bill Gutman, Ph.D., Tom Finnegan"
FATHERS & SONS & SPORTS,Mike Lupica
"Faster, Higher, Stronger",Mark McClusky
Equilibrio,"Nik Wallenda, David Ritz"
Fall of the Phantom Lord,Andrew Todhunter
The Art of the Short Game,"Stan Utley, Matthew Rudy"
Bicycling magazine's complete book of road cycling skills,"Ed Pavelka, Ben Hewitt, The Editors of Bicycling Magazine"
Andy Roddick Beat Me with a Frying Pan,Todd Gallagher
Constructing the CrossFit Games,Dave Castro
Sports memorabilia,John A. Douglas
The great book of Philadelphia sports lists,"Glen MacNow, Big Daddy Graham"
Scorecasting,"Tobias Moskowitz, L. Jon Wertheim"
The worst of sports,"Jesse Lamovsky, Matthew Rosetti, Charlie Demarco"
Munson,Marty Appel
The Meaning of Sports,Michael Mandelbaum
Marathoning for mortals,"John Bingham, John Bingham, Jenny Hadfield"
The name of the game,Jerry Gorman
Golf after 50 : playing without pain,"Terry W. Hensle, David Chmiel, David Chmiel"
Mental training for peak performance,Steven Ungerleider
Honda Dirt Bikes,R. L. Van
Safe Cycling,Nicole Sipe
Nike,Martha London
Hollywood's Team,"Jim Hock, Michael Downs"
Understanding the AR-15 and AR-10,Keith Rutledge
Banana Splits and Pizza Braves,Franklin Coxon
The Serious Runner Handbook,Stephen Gnoza
Winning Without a Championship,Jason Bornn
Austin Climbing,John Hogge
Pickleball Leadership,Kaliym Islam
Shelby 1923,Gerard Gibbons
Fly Fishing,Don Haaheim
What Happens after the Game,Michelle Reed
Influence of Sports Games on College Students' Physical Quality,Huaxia Zhang
Beyond the Bleachers-,Walter Beede
Apropos of Running,"Charles Moore, Telvin Wallace, David Walker"
Winning Mentality for Christian Athletes,"Tyson Gentry, Jim Tressel"
Because Kids Can Scuba Dive,"Kaja Birkeland, Let Your Light Shine Press"
Husqvarna Dirt Bikes,R. L. Van
Suzuki Dirt Bikes,R. L. Van
Yamaha Dirt Bikes,R. L. Van
Two Friends and a Polar Bear,"Terry Williams, Aaron Linsdau"
Principles & Practices of Coaching Basketball,"Shannon Welch, Ellwood Crosier"
Rules for becoming a legend,Timothy S. Lane
Il linguaggio calcistico in Grecia,Vicenzo Rotolo
Sport und Arbeit,Bero Rigauer
Soviet sport,"Riordan, James"
Sport policy in Britain,Barrie Houlihan
Watching the game,Heather Sperring
A people's history of sports in the United States,Dave Zirin
The charter & flotilla handbook,"Claire Wilson, Frank Wilson"
61*,"Ron Smith, Billy Crystal"
Kettlebell Simple & Sinister,Pavel Tsatsouline
High performance racing,"John Merricks, Ian Walker"
Danoli,"Tom Foley, Michael Taub"
Routledge Handbook of Youth Sport,Andy Smith
Fly like an eagle and other stories,"Elizabeth Van Steenwyk, David Mamet"
Trapped!  the Story of Floyd Collins,Roger W. Brucker
History of sport and physical activity in the United States,Betty Mary Spears
Sports and games in the ancient world,Věra Olivová
"Sports, politics, and ideology in China",Jonathan Kolatch
Ausländer und Sport,Thomas Abel
Olympism,United States Olympic Academy. (7th 1983 Texas Tech University)
Die Veränderung des Sports ist gesellschaftlich,Henning Eichberg
Kommunale Sportverwaltung in Deutschland,Ulrich Metz
Training socialist citizens,Molly Wilkinson Johnson
Resilience,Alonzo Mourning
Ḥuqūq-i varzishī,Nādir Shukrī
Sport psychology,Britton W. Brewer
Sport in Deutschland,Martin K. W. Schweer
Halifax Commonwealth Games bid,James Wildsmith
Olympisch Oranje,Ton Bijkerk
"Sport, nationalisme français et régénération de la race",Alain Derlon
Sports-Recreational Injuries,Charles Tator
La politique par le sport,François Bégaudeau
Celtic & Ireland in song and story,Derek Warfield
Sports law and regulation,Matthew J. Mitten
Malai︠a︡ ėnt︠s︡iklopedii︠a︡ Zabaĭkalʹi︠a︡,R. F. Geniatulin
Surfing with Sartre,Aaron James
Crooked,Fran Zimniuch
Sport al grandangolo,"Barbara Mazza, Nico Bortoletto"
American Pearl,Tori Murden McClure
"""Fatti"" di sport",Rosalba Altopiedi
Chasing Moonlight,Brett Friedlander
Global SportforDevelopment,Nico Schulenkorf
Agudot ha-hitʻamlut ṿeha-sporṭ be-ʾErets-Yiśraʾel li-fene milḥemet ha-ʻolam ha-rishonah,Uriel Simri
Practical English-Hebrew dictionary for terminology of physical education and sport,Uriel Simri
Recreational sports,Clifford Lee Brownell
The Derrydale Press,"Henry A. Siegel, Harry C. Marschalk, Isaac Oelgart"
Social approaches to sport,
Stories from the Sidelines,"Hughes, Michael"
Sport and recreation,Chris Gratton
Crimson in Triumph,Joe Bertagna
Sports science,"Commonwealth and International Conference on Sport, Physical Education, Dance, Recreation, and Health (8th 1986 Glasgow, Scotland), Physical Education, Dance, Recreation, and Health (8th : 1986 : Glasgow, Scotland) Commonwealth and International Conference on Sport, Thomas Reilly, James Watkins"
Triathloning for Ordinary Mortals,Steven Jonas
Winners,Richard Beddoes
Z futbolom u svit,O. Skot͡senʹ
The complete book of running,James F. Fixx
Sport and political ideology,John M. Hoberman
Fair game,Eric C. Midwinter
Bewegtes Leben,Rebekka v. Mallinckrodt
Bewegungsraum und Stadtkultur,"Jürgen Funke-Wieneke, Gabriele Klein"
Les jeux des îles de l'océan Indien,Yves-Eric Houpert
Le sport en France,"Pierre Arnaud, Michaël Attali, Jean Saint-Martin"
Disability Sport: Policy and Society,Nigel Thomas
The 25 Greatest Sports Conspiracy Theories of All-Time,Elliott Kalb
Ethical Issues in Sport,Mike Mcnamee
Participatory sportswriting,Zachary Michael Jack
Women and sport,"International Congress on Women and Sport (1980 Rome, Italy)"
The Mamba mentality,Kobe Bryant
Coaches' guide to nutrition & weight control,Patricia Eisenman
Illustrierte Geschichte der Körperkultur,Wolfgang Eichel
Königlich bayerisches Sportbrevier,Herbert Rosendorfer
Maximum sports performance,James F. Fixx
Afrique,J.-M Mignon
I Never Played the Game,Howard Cosell
Soccer in the dock,Simon Inglis
The sports industry and collective bargaining,Paul D. Staudohar
A sporting time,Melvin L. Adelman
Der Sport am Scheidewege,Willy Meisl
The games ethic and imperialism,J. A. Mangan
Quest for excitement,Norbert Elias
Covering all the bases,Gary A. Uberstine
"Sport, space and segregation",Christopher Edmond Merrett
Meet The Gecko,Wendelin Van Draanen
Symposium on Upper Extremity Injuries in Athletes,"Symposium on Upper Extremity Injuries in Athletes (1984 Washington, D.C.), Frank A. Pettrone"
Lingua e sport,Lanfranco Caretti
No limits to strength and skill,Aleksandr Abramovich Svetov
Out of bounds,Helen Lenskyj
ha-Etgar,Dani Devorin
Die Zukunft des Sports,"Kongress ""Menschen im Sport 2000"" (1987 Berlin, Germany)"
Den Grønne by,Magne Bruun
Analyse du sport,Bernard Jeu
Nice guys finish last,"Gardner, Paul"
Every kid can win,Terry Orlick
Stand on it,Stroker Ace
The farrier and his craft,Leslie B. Prince
"Sport, culture, and society","John W. Loy, Barry D. McPherson"
Sport in the Soviet Union,Victor E. Louis
Physiological chemistry of exercise and training,"International Course on Physiological Chemistry of Exercise and Training (1st 1979 Fiuggi, Italy)"
Sport and work,Bero Rigauer
Tumultuous merriment,Heywood Hale Broun
Wörterbuch der Sportwissenschaft,Erich Beyer
Sport history,"Olympic Scientific Congress (1984 Eugene, Or.)"
Stress and motor performance,David Pargman
Sarı kırmızılı kaşkol,Hıncal Uluç
Sports cardiology,R. H. Fagard
Playing for keeps,John Goldlust
The champions,Peter Fuller
Die Profis,Willy B. Wange
Sport in Soviet society,"Riordan, James"
The Sporting spirit,Robert J. Higgs
The English squire and his sport,Roger Longrigg
The name of the game,Fred Inglis
Sociology of American sport,D. Stanley Eitzen
History of sport and physical activity in the United States,Betty Spears
Sport,"Krockow, Christian Graf von"
Contemporary issues in sport,James H. Frey
Movement education,Robert E. Gensemer
Sport and the body,Ellen W. Gerber
Fair play,Peter C. McIntosh
The miracle machine,Doug Gilbert
Sports lingo,Harvey Frommer
La cohésion de l'équipe,Georges Rioux
Financial analysis of intercollegiate athletics,Mitchell H. Raiborn
A geography of American sport: from Cabin Creek to Anaheim,John F. Rooney
Short circuit,Michael Mewshaw
Les Motivations des sportifs ..,Michel Bouet
Wie erziehbar ist der Mensch?,August Sahm
The Encyclopedia of Sports Talk,Zandes Hollander
Canadian sport,"Richard S. Gruneau, J. G. Albinson"
Dogs Who Play Baseball,Thomas Louis Carroll
World of Shakespeare,Alan Dent
Rules of the game,Diagram Group
Sport en maatschappij,K. Rijsdorp
Lo sport nella Grecia antica,Roberto Patrucco
"Sports, culture & personality",Donald W. Calhoun
Gamekeeping,David S. D. Jones
A sporting family of the old South,Harry Worcester Smith
Bewegungsregulation im Sport,"Hug, Otto."
L' éducation en France: problèmes et perspectives,André G. Delion
"1993 statutory and documentary supplement to Cases, materials and problems on sports and the law",Paul C. Weiler
Kiev vstrechaet Olimpiadu,K. Mikhaĭlenko
Psychická odolnost při neúspěšné činnosti,Václav Hošek
Legal challenges from entertainment and sports,Paul C. Weiler
"Die DDR, Breiten- und Spitzensport",Dieter Ehrich
The American sporting scene,John Kieran
Psychologische Analysen zum Alltag jugendlicher Leistungssportler,Bernd Alexander Ruoff
"Meerdoelige opname onder kleurlinge--1977, enkele aspekte van sport en ontspanning",C. W. Kies
"Meerdoelige opname onder Swartes in stedelike gebiede--1978, enkele aspekte van sport en ontspanning",C. W. Kies
"Cases, materials and problems on sports and the law",Paul C. Weiler
Sports supplement,Paul C. Weiler
Sport psychology,Joy S. Martyniuk
Sot͡s︡ialʹno-ėkonomicheskie problemy fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta,B. S. Kuzʹmak
Wen wu yu ti yu =,"Xu, Yongchang."
Norfolk broads and rivers,G. Christopher Davies
A season for glory,Gloria Gage
And on the eighth day God created the Yankees,Vincent Bove
Playing His game,Vincent Bove
Greatest moments in BYU sports,Brad Rock
International Symposium on Sports for Everyone,"International Symposium on Sports for Everyone (1984 Anaheim, Calif.)"
Venezuela en las olimpíadas,Alí Ramos
Deportes olímpicos,Manuel Bennett
Sports medicine,Alfred F. Morris
Ti yu yong dong ming ci ci dian =,"Wu, Liansheng."
Tennis medic,Steven R. Levisohn
Stadium,Jacinto Miquelarena
Athlete's feats,Dale Harder
Les Sports et jeux d'exercise dans l'ancienne France,"Jusserand, J. J."
A magyar sport kézikönyve,"Antal, Zoltán."
Excellence now-- and for the future,Ron Jaworski
Sport and identity,Patsy Neal
Sport bez svatozáře,Václav Pacina
Team sports,Diagram Group.
Team Sports (Sports Facts),Diagram Group.
Sports Rules on File (Facts on File Reference Library),Diagram Group.
Sport's Fan Ultimate Book of Sports Comparisons,Diagram Group.
The giant book of more strange but true sports stories,Howard Liss
The giant book of strange but true sports stories,Howard Liss
Champions,Jim Kearney
The sport sciences,Canadian Association of Sports Sciences. Meeting
Birth of a tiger,D. A. Berry
How 'bout them Hawkeye fans!,Mike Kielkopf
The history of athletics and physical education at Howard University,Ted Chambers
Five monographs,Ernst Jokl
Physical education and sport in the People's Republic of Bulgaria,Dimitŭr Kharalampiev
III Krajowa Konferencja Morfologia w Sporcie,"Krajowa Konferencja ""Morfologia w Sporcie"" (3rd 1980 Poznań, Poland)"
A challenge to the nation,Gerald A. Regan
Sport in der Schweiz,Fritz Pieth
"Vergangen, nicht vergessen",Horst Ueberhorst
Vlii͡anie sporta na formirovanie lichnosti,"Kiselev, I͡U. I͡A. kandidat psikhologicheskikh nauk."
Sports fitness and training,Richard Mangi
Anatomie et science du geste sportif,Rolf Wirhed
Hochleistungssport und Entfremdung,Gerd Helmer
The Bowerman system,Chris Walsh
"Dokladi ot Nauchno-prakticheskata konferent͡sii͡a na tema ""Intenzivno vnedri͡avane na masovata fizicheska kultura, masovii͡a sport i turizma v sot͡sialisticheskii͡a nachin na z͡hivot na stolichnoto naselinie""","Nauchno-prakticheska konferent͡sii͡a na tema ""Intenzivno vnedri͡avane na masovata fizicheska kultura, masovii͡a sport i turizma v sot͡sialisticheskii͡a nachin na zhivot na stolichnoto naselenie"" (1985 Sofia, Bulgaria)"
Sports in Cleveland,John J. Grabowski
Idrætsjura,Preben Stuer Lauridsen
Nationales Automobil-Sportgesetz O.S.K,"Oberste Nationale Sportkommission für den Kraftfahrsport in Österreich., Oberste Nationale Sportkommission für den Kraftfahrsport in Österreich"
Half a century of sport,"Pease, Alfred E. Sir"
Sport et alimentation,"Roth, Christian."
Hanʼguk chʻeyuksa,"Na, Hyŏn-sŏng"
Kyoyang chʻeyuk kaeron,"Hwang, Tŏk-ho"
Spin a sport,Hank Herman
Energetický metabolismus u vybraných tělesných cvičení,Václav Seliger
Fyziologie sportovní výkonnosti,Václav Seliger
Sports illustrated sports guide 1983-84,Dave Condon
Second innings,"Prittie, Terence"
Mainly Middlesex,"Prittie, Terence"
Hanʼguk chʻeyuksa,"Kim, Yong-gap"
"Trim and fitness international, Frankfurt/Main, 23.-25.5.1973","Expert Conference (1973 Frankfurt am Main, Germany)"
Sport en jeugd,Jan Wauters
Magyar olimpikonok önmagukról és a sportról,"Földesiné Szabó, Gyöngyi."
Spoiled sport,"Underwood, John"
"III Sympozjum Biochemii Sportu na temat biochemia w sporcie wyczynowym, Poznań-Sowiniec","Sympozjum Biochemii Sportu (3rd 1976 Poznań and Sowiniec, Poland)"
"Nat͡sionalna teoretiko-prakticheska konferent͡sii͡a za izuchavane trudovete i razrabotkite na drugari͡a Todor Zhivkov sled XII kongres na BKP, Sofii͡a, 24 i͡uni 1983 god","Nat͡sionalna teoretiko-prakticheska konferent͡sii͡a za izuchavane trudovete i razrabotkite na drugari͡a Todor Zhivkov sled XII kongres na BKP (1983 Sofia, Bulgaria)"
Kullan ja kunnian tähden,Pasi Penkki
Prírastky knižného fondu,N. Kováčová
Sport für alle Herausforderung an den Sport,Deutscher Sportbund. Bundestag
Pod nashimi sportivnymi znamenami,V. I. Vinokurov
Coaching girls and women,Patsy Neal
Sport? Sport!,A. Zhili͡aev
Des jeux aux sports,Bertrand During
Great Sporting Moments,David Thomas
"Morphology, nutritional status, and physical performance, 1894-1968",Paul J. Smit
Growth and sport =,Paul J. Smit
The sports zone,"Chmielewski, Gary"
Sports jokes,"Chmielewski, Gary"
Confessions of a sportswriter,Don Bloom
WWF Wrestlemania 2000,Eric Winding
Rock climbing is for me,Tom Hyden
Du sport plein la tête,Marcel Hansenne
Wen hua bao ku zhong de yi ke ming zhu,"Xu, Yongchang."
Sports,John Bytheway
Sichovymy shli͡akhamy,Omeli͡an Tvardovsʹkyĭ
Attitudes of selected community college students toward athletic programs for professional development,Manque Winters
Sportscape,John R. Gleeson
"Istorii͡a USVT ""Chornomorsʹka Sich"" u foto-svitlynakh, 1924-2004",Omeli͡an Tvardovsʹkyĭ
The Coach's Toolbox,Peter S. Pierro
Bibliografia educației fizice și sportului,Maria Postolache
Diccionari de ..,"Termcat (Catalonia, Spain)"
Bulgaria at the Olympic Games,Nikolaĭ Kolev
Spet͡sialʹnai͡a silovai͡a podgotovka sportsmena,"Kuznet͡sov, V. V."
Sport Examined,John Taylor
Sportethik,Rudolf Weiler
Sports for the athletically impaired,Tom Raabe
Humor bola & lapangan,Wienaktoe.
The Complete Manual of Sports Science,Wilfred Henry Charles Paish
Khelādhūlāra nepathye,Cirañjība.
Chemie und Sport am Rhein,Andreas Luh
Sports quotations,Andrew J. Maikovich
The ultimate sports trivia encyclopedia,Andrew J. Maikovich
"Tezisy dokladov Vsesoi͡uznoĭ nauchno-prakticheskoĭ konferent͡sii ""Fiziologicheskie mekhanizmy t͡selenapravlennoĭ dei͡atelʹnosti sportsmenov"", Krasnodar, 15-19 senti͡abri͡a 1991 g","Vsesoi͡uznai͡a nauchno-prakticheskai͡a konferent͡sii͡a ""Fiziologicheskie mekhanizmy t͡selenapravlennoĭ dei͡atelʹnosti sportsmenov"" (1991 Krasnodar, Russia)"
"Win, lose, or wear a tie",Peter Desberg
African unity through sports,Anthony I. Omo-Osagie
Sport (Then and Now),Nigel Smith
Then And Now,Nigel Smith
Hawaiian games for today,Donald D. Kilolani Mitchell
"Sport, Delinquenz und Lebensstil",Jörg Böhnke
Sport zwischen Spiel und Leistung,"Scherer, Georg"
Bŭlgarii͡a v olimpiĭskoto dvizhenie do 9.IX.1944 g,Vasil T͡Sonkov
The big book of PC sports,Peter Scisco
Tjelesno vježbanje i šport u Dubrovniku od 14. stoljeća do 1941 godine,Milivoj Petković
Psicopedagogía aplicada,Santiago Coca
Sports quotes,"Klein, Joe"
The spectator's handbook,J. B. Pick
Sports coaching and teaching,Tony Gummerson
Movement and sport during the life-span,Marjatta Marin
Mawsūʻat tārīkh al-ḥarakah al-riyāḍīyah fī al-Mamlakah al-ʻArabīyah al-Saʻūdīyah,Amīn Sāʻātī
al- Riyāḍah ʻinda al-ʻArab fī al-Jāhilīyah wa-ṣadr al-Islām,Amīn Sāʻātī
The call of the game,Steve McKee
Sportbeoefening van een kategorie jeugdigen,A. Felling
Handbuch Sport und Umwelt,Hans-Joachim Schemel
Australia and the Olympic games,"Gordon, Harry"
Essays on physical education and sport,John Andrews
Código desportivo,Brazil. Estado Maior das Forças Armadas.
Anais,Simpósio Esporte: Dimensões Sociológicas e Políticas (1993 Universidade de São Paulo)
Topics of social and behavioral science in sport,Germany) German Japanese Symposium of Sport Science (6th 2005 Jena
广宁体育志,Guangning Xian (China). Ti yu yun dong wei yuan hui
The bold collegians,Trevor West
Sport in Karlsruhe,"Ernst Otto Bräunche, Volker Steck"
Sport- und Freizeitpolitik in Köln 1945-1975,Gabi Langen
"Sportwissenschaftliche Geschlechterforschung im Spannungsfeld von Theorie, Politik und Praxis",Deutsche Vereinigung für Sportwissenschaft. Kommission Geschlechterforschung. Jahrestagung
Olympische Spiele und Turngeschichte,Deutsche Vereinigung für Sportwissenschaft. Sektion Sportgeschichte. Tagung
Play-back,Tony Verna
Sports,"Charles Wrye, Gene Krackehl"
Vad är idrottandets mening?,Kjell Gustavsson
Encyclopaedia of traditional games,Pietro Gorini
The legend of Bearby the Knight,Terry Whittaker
Filme und Rundfunkreportagen als Dokumente der deutschen Sportgeschichte von 1907-1945,Hans Joachim Teichler
De aanpassing aan het nieuwe verenigingsrecht bij drie sportbonden,N. J. P. Giltay Veth
A Magyar és az osztrák olimpiai mozgalom története 1918 előtt,"Kutassi, László."
A magyar egyetemi és főiskolai sportmozgalom a felszabadulás után,"Kutassi, László."
"Sports in America, 1900-1919",James Buckley
A magyar szakszervezeti sportmozgalom a felszabadulás után,"Kutassi, László."
Informationseinrichtungen im Sport,Lothar Wieser
The Phoenix dictionary of games,J. B. Pick
0:01,Steve Wulf
Instal·lacions esportives adequades per a l'esport de lleure,Jordi Hernández
Sport et Tiers-Monde,Youcef Fatès
The gilded age of sport,Herbert Warren Wind
"The Celtics, 1894-1994",Hugh O'Brien
"La femme, le sport et l'activité physique",Helen Lenskyj
Sporthoschule Koeln Zss.-Laender-Reg. 1986,Deutsche Sporthochschule Köln.
The framing of policy,Laurence Hilmond Chalip
Sporthochschule Koeln Zeitschr.-Verz. 1986,Deutsche Sporthochschule Köln.
Sport e società solidale,Carlo Mazza
'Til the echoes ring again,Jack Falla
Fondsen voor de topsporter,H. T. van Staveren
Het voetbalcontract,H. T. van Staveren
From the sidelines,Bill McGrotha
A history of the Oklahoma State University inter-collegiate athletics,Doris Dellinger
Los pioneros españoles del olimpismo moderno,Angel M. Magdalena
Sporda şiddetin ve düzensizliğin önlenmesi kanunu ve yorumu,Erdener Yurtcan
The gamer,Gary Carter
"Sport and the English middle classes, 1870-1914",John Lowerson
The sports marketing guide,Terence R. Wascovich
Van Aaken method,George Beinhorn
The practical delivery of sports medicine services,Jerald D. Hawkins
Sport on film and video,Judith A. Davidson
Siṃhala jātika krīḍa,Weerakandabaduge Richard Perera Somaratne
Du pain et des jeux ... parabole du bonheur?,Roger Lapointe
Playoff pressure,Renardo Barden
The sports stadium as a municipal investment,Dean V. Baim
Fra Robin Hood til fodbold,Niels Kayser Nielsen
"The National police gazette and the making of the modern American man, 1879-1906",Guy Reel
Here's why : science in sports,George Barr
Sports science for young people,George Barr
Here's why,George Barr
Cheza Kenya,Niket Bhushan
Norman Rockwell's American sportsman,"Hoffman, Marian"
Lady Gators--,Ruth Hammack Alexander
Übungsleiter und Trainer im Sportverein,Joachim Mrazek
"Sport und kommunale Entwicklungsplanung, am Beispiel der Sportstättenleitplanung",Heinrich Haass
The Best of Times,Trent Frayne
Mathematics in sport,M. Stewart Townend
Concepts of human movement,"Johnson, William E."
Sports Mazes,Vladimir Koziakin
Código de derecho deportivo,Argentina.
Il Codice dello sport,Italy
Reflections on a life in sport,Sam Ramsamy
Mieczysław Matt Adamczyk,Roman Korban
Die Zulässigkeit der staatlichen Förderung des Kinderhochleistungssports in der Bundesrepublik Deutschland,Christine Fahlbusch-Wendler
Zarys działalności Sokolstwa polskiego na obczyźnie w latach 1887-1918,Marek Szczerbiński
[Zhivai͡a︡ rechʹ v uslovii͡a︡kh massovoĭ kommunikat͡s︡ii,Kazimierz Wieliczko
IV Sympozjum Biochemii Sportu,"Sympozjum Biochemii Sportu (4th 1980 Poznań, Poland)"
Racquetball is for me,"Lerner, Mark."
Grant Hill Estrella Del Basketball/ Basketball All Star (Deportistas De Poder),Rob Kirkpatrick
Le droit public du sport,Jean-Marc Duval
Sportivnai͡a︡ Ėstonii͡a︡,Lembit Koik
Sport in Estonia,Lembit Koik
"Byline, Si Burick",Si Burick
The generous champ (Beyond victory),Robert Everett McAdam
Great moments in Australian sport,R. S. Whitington
Principi di teoria e metodologia applicati all'educazione fisica e allo sport,Vitaliano Bin
Ho neos athlētikos nomos,Anastasopoulos
Athlētikē ennomē taxē,"Panhellenic Sport Law Conference (2nd 2001 Athens, Greece)"
Apo tous prōtous Olympiakous Agōnes tēs Athēnas stous prōtous Olympiakous Agōnes tēs Eurōpēs,Panagiōtēs Skourēs
Le sport,Yves Brossard
Hē didaskalia tēs archaias Hellēnikēs glōssas kai politismou,"Symvoulio tēs Eurōpēs (8th 2003 Limassol, Cyprus)"
Likewise in life,Zach Dostart
Day by day in Jewish sports history,"Wechsler, Robert."
Australian sporting almanac,"Shepherd, Jim."
Sex before athletic competition,Tommy Boone
Ethical Standards and Professional Credentials in the Practice of Exercise Physiology,Tommy Boone
Tourney time,Bill May
Is sports nutrition for sale?,Tommy Boone
Warriors Of The Ultimate Fighting Championship,Erich Krauss
Sportsmen of Cornwall,Michael George
Hawaiian sports in the twentieth century,Joel Stephen Franks
Dicionário do esporte no Brasil,Victor Andrade de Melo
EyeOpeners - Sports (EyeOpeners),Emma Nathan
Abre Los Ojos y Aprende (EyeOpeners) - Deportes (Sports) (Abre Los Ojos y Aprende (EyeOpeners)),Emma Nathan
La responsabilità sportiva,Bruno Bertini
Playing the game,Chris Lincoln
To The Limit (The Real Deal),Ian Rohr
A history of sport and physical education in the Republic of South Africa,F. J. G. Van der Merwe
For the love of the game,Nancy Barbara Bouchier
Kinanthropometry X,International Society for Advancement of Kinanthropometry. International Conference
Falling Star,Robert Rayner
I Krajowa Konferencja Naukowa Polonijna Kultura Fizyczna,"Krajowa Konferencja Naukowa Polonijna Kultura Fizyczna (1st 1978 Lubniewice, Poland)"
A review of the Sports Development Office,Utah. Legislature. Office of the Legislative Auditor General.
Try your best,Robert L. McKissack
Sto velikikh olimpiĭskikh chempionov,Vladimir Malov
Spor hukuku,Y. Selim Sarıibrahimoğlu
Depi patvo patvandan,A. Ō Babayan
Fencing is for me,Art Thomas
Bibliograficheskiĭ ukazatelʹ rabot opublikovannykh v sbornikakh trudov po psikhologii sporta za 1973-1976 g.g,A.A Lalayan
"Sporting Sam, from the Sunday Express",Reg Wootton
The Pride of Price Hill,Bill Koch
Le sport dans la ville,Jean-François Loudcher
Sport et société,Jean-Philippe Bozouls
"Performanță sportivă, personalitate, selecție",Viorel Prelici
Uri minjok ui nori munhwa,Wan-muk Cho
Wspomnienia szydercy,Tomasz Domaniewski
II Konferencja Przyrodnicze Podstawy Kultury Fizycznej,"Konferencja Przyrodnicze Podstawy Kultury Fizycznej (2nd 1977 Poznań, Poland)"
How to prevent and heal running and other sports injuries,Eric Golanty
Grāma Bāṃlāra khelādhulā,Saiẏada Mājahārula Pārabheja
Winners and losers,Gajendra K. Verma
Il diritto nello sport,Paola Di Salvatore
Research methods for sport studies,"Jones, Ian"
Beyond the finish line,Mal Whitfield
"Dale Earnhardt, Jr.: Nascar Road Racer (Reading Power: Hot Shots)",Rob Kirkpatrick
Devlet politikası ve toplumsal yapıyla ilişkileri açısından spor yönetimi,Kurthan Fişek
III Simpósio Mineiro de Psicologia do Esporte,Simpósio Mineiro de Psicologia do Esporte (3rd 1997 Universidade Federal de Juiz de Fora. Faculdade de Educação Física e Desportos)
De eeuwige bankzitter,Rob Schouten
Historia y pensamiento de la educación física y el deporte,Luis Dómenech Sepúlveda
L' organisation contractuelle du spectacle sportif,Frédéric Buy
Sport Lauderdale,Cynthia Thuma
Strengthening Canada,Michael R. Bloom
Narysy z istoriï sportyvnoho rukhu v Zakhidniĭ Ukraïni,Oksana Vat͡seba
Der Sport und seine Ethik,Moth Stygermeer
"Sovetskie sportsmeny--chempiony olimpiĭskikh Igr, 1952-1992 gg",T. E. Alizaev
"Pour mieux jouer, 5 minutes de réchauffement","Bergeron, Yves."
"Les différents aspects d'une politique de développement des activités sportives, sur le plan de l'éducation, des loisirs et de la compétition",France. Conseil économique et social.
Pal̲aṅkāla viḷaiyāṭṭukaḷ,Ceṅkaip Potuvan̲
Mar̲aikin̲r̲a viḷaiyāṭṭukaḷ,Ceṅkaip Potuvan̲
The business playbook,Brandon Steiner
"Rugby skills, tactics, and rules","Williams, Tony"
III Konferencja Humanistyczne Podstawy Kultury Fizycznej,"Konferencja Humanistyczne Podstawy Kultury Fizycznej (3rd 1978 Poznań, Poland)"
VII Sympozjum Rola Rytmów Biologicznych w Wychowaniu Fizycznym i Sporcie,"Sympozjum Rola Rytmów Biologicznych w Wychowaniu Fizycznym i Sporcie (7th 1977 Poznań, Poland)"
Delitos contra el deporte,Daniel Aguirrezabala
L' odyssée du sport mauricien,Jean-François Leckning
Sports therapist,Geoffrey M. Horn
Kinanthropometry VIII,International Society for Advancement of Kinanthropometry. International Conference
"Sport, professionalism, and pain",P. David Howe
Rallying,Richard L. Knudson
"Official report of participation inthe XXV Olympiad Barcelona, Spain 1992",Olympic Council of Ireland.
"Deutsche Sportbibliographie, 1945-1952",Rudolf Mack
"Deutsche Sportbibliographie, 1959-1962",Rudolf Mack
Life among the wolverines,Tom Hemingway
The financing of sport in the United Kingdom,Pat Butson
Texts adopted at previous meetings of European Ministers Responsible for Sport,Conference of European Ministers Responsible for Sport (4th 1984 Malta)
O incrível roubo da loteca,Stella Carr Ribeiro
Ernest Hemingway,Gregory S. Sojka
Who's who in Canadian sports,Bob Ferguson
Algunas consideraciones generales sobre el movimiento deportivo internacional,Miguel Llaneras Rodríguez
The complete idiot's guide to sports history & trivia,Mike McGovern
Athletics in the school,Fred Streit
"Dviži se, za da ne zaboraviš da odiš",Blaže Smilevski
Life is a ball!,"Douglas, Bob"
Winning spirit III,Shellie M. Frey
Sport et civilisation,Michel Caillat
L' idéologie du sport en France depuis 1880,Michel Caillat
Toute la jurisprudence sportive en Suisse,Jacques Bondallaz
Skirenn og brotak,Leif Halse
Bewegungsanalyse im Sport,Ulrich Göhner
Sport budushchego,I. I. Pereverzin
"Canada, your friendly neighbor, invites you",Canada. Travel Bureau.
Sports and recreation in the Peace Corps,Peace Corps (U.S.)
Developmental conditioning for physical education and athletics,Anthony A. Annarino
Nieuwe encyclopedie van de sport,Marcel Smet
"Educația fizică și sportul, fenomen social",Florian Georgescu
Sporterziehung und Evaluation,"International Council on Health, Physical Education and Recreation."
The Compleat Dr. Rowing,Andy Anderson
Zakład Sportów Różnych w 60-leciu akademickiego nauczania wychowania fizycznego,Zdzisław Okupniak
"Khel, ʻahd-i qadīm se daur-i ḥāz̤ir tak",Ḥashmatullāh Lodhī
Twenty years of sports in Pakistan,Mukhtar Bhatti
Sportinformation in Theorie und Praxis,Internationaler Kongress für Sportinformation Duisburg 1977.
Faszination des Ovals,Matthias Alexander
Zakład Psychologii Sportu w 60-leciu akademickiego nauczania wychowania fizycznego,Gertruda Olszewska
Physical performance characteristics in Finnish athletes,Heikki Rusko
Outstanding sports personalities of St. Lucia,Rupert J. Branford
Blood Feud,Bill Nowlin
Seitsemän kierrosta,Reijo Cavén
Jeux et sports dans les Pyrénées françaises,"Robert, Jean conservateur."
Onderzoekwensen op sportgebied,H. A. A. J. Jacobs
Sportbegriffe von A-Z,Hans Jürgen Winkler
Simposio internazional di medicina psicosomatica sportiva,Simposio internazional di medicina psicosomatica sportiva Rome 1967.
Sportnota Middelburg,Provinciaal Opbouworgaan Stichting Zeeland.
Le sport au Canada,Canada. Parliament. House of Commons. Sub-Committee on the Study of Sport in Canada.
Le sport et l'homme,"Martin, Paul educator."
Report of the Law Committee on Legislation hampering the Normalisation of Sports Relations in the Republic of South Africa,Law Committee on Legislation Hampering the Normalisation of Sports Relations in the Republic of South Africa.
Aggressive Motivation im Sport,Dieter Peper
Komsomol i sport,Vi͡acheslav Ivanovich Trushkov
"Socrates, sport, and students",Sheryle Bergmann Drewe
Norsk idrettslitteratur gjennom 200 år,Jakob Vaage
Why Sport?,Sheryle Bergmann Drewe
The quotable athlete,Mike McGovern
Rangers Football Official Yearbook 2000,Paul Sinclair
Upper Iowa University--Doc Dorman's Peacocks,Fred Breckner
L- Istorja sportiva tal-pulizija Maltija,Alfred Debattista
Power and precision,Jason Page
Pobuna robota,Ljubodrag Simonović-Duci
Compendiu de psihologie pentru antrenori,Mihai Epuran
Interpsihologie în activitatea sportivă,Gheorghe T. Dumitrescu
Coletânea,"Congresso Brasileiro de História do Esporte, Lazer e Educação Física (6th 1998 Rio de Janeiro, Brazil)"
"Fine books on angling, hunting, guns, including an extensive group of Derrydale Press books",Parke-Bernet Galleries.
Five centuries of sport,Parke-Bernet Galleries.
"Hasil Musyawarah Olahraga Nasional VIII tahun 1999, Jakarta, 22-24 Februari 1999",Komite Olahraga Nasional Indonesia. Musyawarah Olahraga Nasional
The organization and administration of playgrounds and recreation,Jay Bryan Nash
N.A.G.W.S. research reports. v. 1-  (1971)-,National Association for Girls & Women in Sport.
Le sport et l'argent,Julien Giarrizzi
Materiali v pomosht na politicheskata uchebna godina s bŭlgarskite sportisti,"Popov, Dimitŭr"
Sportethos,Walter Kuchler
Zakład Zespołowych Gier Sportowych w 60-leciu akademickiego nauczania wychowania fizycznego,Andrzej Koniarek
"13,000 grand masters sports quiz game plus 5,000 movie game quiz",Edward Simpkins
Un poco de mis cosas,Fidencio Garris
Développement unitaire et succès sportif,Georges Rioux
Street Luge in the X Games,Christopher Blomquist
Psychologische Grundlagen der Bewegungsund Trainingsforschung,Horst Tiwald
Zur Soziologie der Konsumwerbung,Ingwalt Dolberg
Teorie a didaktika sportu,Miroslav Choutka
Studium struktury sportovních výkonů,Miroslav Choutka
Sport a společnost,Miroslav Choutka
Sportovní výkon,Miroslav Choutka
Moskva sportivnai͡a,I͡Uriĭ Maksimovich Kirʹi͡anov
Berufliche Entwicklung der Amateurspitzensportler in der Bundesrepublik Deutschland,Klaus Lehnertz
Lo sport e le sue leggi,Franco B. Ascani
Sportwissenschaftliche Skizzen,Horst Tiwald
Fizjologiczne aspekty sterowania treningiem sportowym,"Krajowe Sympozjum Fizjologii Sportu (2nd 1978 Poznań, Poland)"
Kleines olympisches Lexikon,Klaus-Jürgen Schönfelder
American Bar Association,American Bar Association. Forum on the Entertainment and Sports Industries. Meeting.
More than just a game,Nancy B. Reed
Marketing esportivo,Ernani Bevilaqua Contursi
Pro sports trivia,Lee Pretner
Sport am Morgen,Vip
Spartakiad chekannyĭ shag,"Ivanov, Dmitriĭ Ivanovich zasluzhennyĭ master sporta."
DGWS research reports: women in sports,"American Association for Health, Physical Education, and Recreation. Division for Girls and Women's Sports."
Gli ordinamenti sportivi,Inigo Marani Toro
Trainingswissenschaftliche Beiträge zum Gerätturnen,Stephan Starischka
Ley nacional para el desarrollo de la cultura fisica y el deporte. titulo 1,Guatemala
Complete handbook of sports scoring and record keeping,Jack W. Richards
El libro de los campeones,Bernardo Guerrero J.
"Wojsko Polskie wobec tężyzny fizycznej społeczeństwa, 1918-1939",Jan Kęsik
Tales From the Small Time,Jim Moore
Perchè lo sport?,Angela Ramello
The Ultimate Sports Handbook,Richard O'Brien
L' activité physique et le bien-être de l'homme,"International Congress of Physical Activity Sciences (1976 Québec, Québec)"
A collection of the formal papers presented at the International Congress of physical Activity Sciences,"International Congress of Physical Activity Sciences (1976 Québec, Québec), Fernand Landry"
"Sport, diritto e società",Giuseppe Consolo
"Physiologie der Leibesübungen für Sportlehrer, Trainer, Sportstudenten, Sportärzte",Josef Nöcker
Die biologischen Grundlagen der Leistungsteigerung durch Training,Josef Nöcker
Football fitness and injuries,David Sutherland Muckle
Die öffentliche Sportförderung in der Schweiz,Viktor Jenny
Kinanthropometry II,International Seminar on Kinanthropometry Katholieke Universiteit te Leuven 1978.
Anatomia și biomecanica educației fizice și sportului,Mircea Ifrim
Organization and management of sport,James D. La Point
Beyond research--solutions to human problems,American Academy of Physical Education.
Psychology of motor learning,C.I.C. Symposium on Psychology of Motor Learning University of Iowa 1969.
Combats pour un sport africain,Jean Claude Ganga
Broken cigars,Myron Cope
Actes de la Conférence des ministres européens responsables du sport =,"Conference of European Ministers Responsible for Sport (1st 1975 Brussels, Belgium)"
Sports in North Carolina,Charlie Harville
Zhongguo gu dai ti yu xi su,"Huang, Wei."
Adventure education,David E. Wood
Evaluating the high school athletic program,"American Association for Health, Physical Education, and Recreation."
Informator,Akademicki Związek Sportowy. Zarząd Środowiskowy w Krakowie.
Rolʹ temperamenta v sportivnoĭ dei͡atelʹnosti,B. A. Vi͡atkin
Sports heroes who wouldn't quit,Hal Butler
Underdogs of sport,Hal Butler
The impact of Sport for All policy 1966-1984 and a way forward,Peter C. McIntosh
Pension fairness for NBA pioneers,United States. Congress. House. Committee on Education and the Workforce. Subcommittee on Employer-Employee Relations
Moving to win,Sara B. Chase
"""My father, the coach,"" and other sports stories",Bill Gutman
Great sports feats of the '70s,Bill Gutman
Amateur sports act,"United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation."
"Damn you, Al Davis",Jack Murphy
Advances in exercise physiology,"International Symposium on Exercise and Sports Physiology (1974 Patiāla, India)"
The hidden skier,Corky Fowler
The world of sports statistics,"Friedman, Arthur"
Scoreboard,Dunstan Tucker
The story of sports,Frank Jupo
Little giant in the world of sport,Doug Gilbert
"Sport et formation de l'esprit, modèles de décisions pour les cadres",Jean Marie Conty
Boisko odmładza,Zofia Swieczko
Sports doc,Parnell Donahue
"Makkabi chai, Makkabi lebt",Eric Friedler
Profiles in Pennsylvania sports,Paul B. Beers
Žena a sport,Josef Kvapilík
Sports and recreational activities for men and women,David Alvin Armbruster
South African sport,Neville Ivor James Leck
Fielding Yost's legacy to the University of Michigan,John Richard Behee
Hacia un deporte popular,Colectivo Socialista de Educación Física y Deportes.
Derecho deportivo en el Perú,Enrique Varsi Rospigliosi
A hand in sport,Willard Mullin
The New Junior Illustrated Encyclopedia of Sports,Willard Mullin
The big red machine,Yuri Brokhin
The phantom athlete,Noodles.
Hail to the victors!,John Richard Behee
Sports,"Fowler, Bob."
"Vacances, sports, loisirs",Nathalie Brunet
Sportphotographie 1860-1960,Jean Lattes
How to enjoy sports on TV,James J. Tuite
Great Linebackers No. 1,Bill Gutman
"This sporting life, that sporting death",John Kiely
"A review, Division of Intercollegiate Athletics, University of Wisconsin--Madison",Wisconsin. Legislature. Legislative Audit Bureau.
Sport und Sportberichterstattung,Harald Binnewies
Sport as life content of successful Finnish amateur athletes,Pauli Vuolle
Organized professional team sports,United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on the Judiciary
"Organized professional team sports, 1960",United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on the Judiciary
A magyar sport aranykönyve,"Havas, László."
Arbeitsmaterialien für Bewegungsstudien,Ekkehard Blumenthal
The Official Duffer's Guide to Rugby,Gren.
VII Seminarium Teoria Wyniku Sportowego,"Seminarium Teoria Wyniku Sportowego 7th Poznań, Poland 1973."
Muscle and tendon injuries in athletes,"Krejčí, Vladimir Ph Dr."
This day in sports,John G. Fetros
Sports for life,Robert Buxbaum
Undefeated,Dave Branon
Theorie und Bedeutung sportlicher Handlungen,Elk Franke
"Exercise, the why and the how",Paul A. Vodak
Business practices in the professional boxing industry,"United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation."
Motivation and coaching psychology,Fred Wilt
"Personality, perception and exercise tolerance",John Dennis Brooke
Romantyczne mecze,"Tomaszewski, Bohdan."
Neuruppiner Bilderbogen mit Spiel- und Sportmotiven,Schweizerisches Sportmuseum.
Igiena educației fizice și sportului,Constantin Alexandrescu
Sports in West Virginia,Doug Huff
Sustaining motivation in sport,Robert N. Singer
Exercise injuries,Robert C. Cantu
Rounding the Bases,Joseph L. Price
Play on,"Harms, John"
New perspectives on sport and deviance,Tony Blackshaw
"Historia política del deporte argentino, 1610-2002",Víctor F. Lupo
"The Gaelic Athletic Association in Dublin, 1884-2000",William Nolan
Steroids,A. R. Schaefer
Understanding Sports and Eating Disorders,Debbie Stanley
"Labdarúgók, sportolók","Zsolt, Róbert."
Keeping score,Robert W. Hamblin
Edwardians at play,Brian Dobbs
It's a Rule (Yellow Umbrella Books),Jeri S. Cipriano
Management of Sports Development,Vassil Girginov
"It's a Rule (Social Studies (Mankato, Minn.).)",Jeri S. Cipriano
Sportlights of 1923,Grantland Rice
Performance assessment for field sports,Christopher Carling
Popp Fly,Stephen Cosgrove
Sports jokes,Pam Rosenberg
Sport and exercise psychology,"Shaw, D."
Direito do atleta,Alan Menezes Pessotti
Instant notes in sport and exercise psychology,"Shaw, D."
Novo Código brasileiro de justiça desportiva comentado,Inácio Nunes
A responsabilidade civil e criminal nas atividades desportivas,Hélder Gonçalves Dias Rodrigues
Direito desportivo empresarial,Eduardo Carlezzo
Secrets of My Suburban Life,Lauren Baratz-Logsted
Freizeitsport und Verein,Friedhelm Tödtmann
Great Gary athletes and coaches of the twentieth century,John Daniel Smith
Alʹpinisty MVTU imeni N.Ė. Baumana,A. G. Ovchinnikov
Effective coaching,Donald E. Fuoss
Sports research in Australia,Martin W. Thompson
The athletic connection,Damon Joseph Sprock
The Mark Twain proposition,Gina Cerminara
The future of the Cairngorms,Kai Curry-Lindahl
"Sportolók, sporterkölcsök","Zsolt, Róbert."
The boys' book of sports,Grantland Rice
Die Gesellschaft für Sport und Technik,Paul Heider
Myths and truths in sports psychology,Robert N. Singer
India and the Olympics,Boria Majumdar
"Big ""Bubba"" Bigg, Jr",Stephen Cosgrove
Extreme Wakeboarding Moves (Behind the Moves),A. R. Schaefer
Ästhetik des Sports,Günter Witt
Sports law,Adam Epstein
"I Can Play Fairly (Read and Learn, You and Me)",Angela Leeper
I Can Play Fairly,Angela Leeper
Spitzensport mit spitzer Feder,Hans Neudecker
Die sportwissenschaftliche Elite in beiden Teilen Deutschlands,Gerd Weisspfennig
Improving the Asian quality of life through physical education and sport,Asian Society for Physical Education and Sport. International Conference
Tilting at Windmills,Andy Miller
"Striking, grappling, and ground fighting",Jim Whiting
Drag Racers (Motor Mania),Jeffrey Zuehlke
Power and global sport,Joseph A. Maguire
Reading Power Set 3,Kristin Eck
Wakeboarding: Check It Out! (Reading Power: Extreme Sports),Kristin Eck
Sovetskoe pravo,V. N. Uvarov
Drugs and Sports (Point/Counterpoint),Alan Marzilli
Amateur Athletics (Point/Counterpoint),Alan Marzilli
Sports math,Kieran Walsh
"Test-Prep Your IQ with the Essentials of Sports, 1st edition",Nathan Barber
Śarīra carcāra āloke Bāṃlāra lokakrīṛā,Aloka Byānārjī
The Ultimate Guide To Weight Training For Soccer (Ultimate Guide to Weight Training for Soccer) (Ultimate Guide to Weight Training for Soccer) (Ultimate Guide to Weight Training for Soccer),Robert G. Price
High flying martial arts,John Crossingham
The ultimate guide to weight training for sports,Robert G. Price
The Ultimate Guide to Weight Training for Tennis,Robert G. Price
Ultimate Guide To Weight Training For Triathlon (Ultimate Guide to Weight Training for Triathlon) (Ultimate Guide to Weight Training for Triathlon) (Ultimate Guide to Weight Training for Triathlon),Robert G. Price
The Ultimate Guide To Weight Training For Volleyball (Ultimate Guide to Weight Training for Volleyball) (Ultimate Guide to Weight Training for Volleyball) ... Guide to Weight Training for Volleyball),Robert G. Price
Yŏnggwang ŭl molgo taninŭn saramdŭl,Kwang-hŭi Kim
Store idrettsøyeblikk,Magnus Breili
Ot Spartakiad k Olimpiadam,Konstantin Antonovich Kulinkovich
Fizicheskai͡a︡ kulʹtura i sport v SSSR,Sergeĭ Pavlovich Pavlov
Codice dello sport,Italy
Metody issledovanii͡a︡ v sportivnoĭ antropologii,"Martirosov, Ė. G."
A will to win,Dwight Lewis
Single wing offense with the spinning fullback,John F. Aldrich
Surfing,Naima Green
Situacioni trening u sportu,Drago Tomić
"Sports In Lincoln County, NC (Images of Sports)",Jason L. Harpe
Sukan dalam masyarakat Malaysia,Mohd. Salleh Aman.
Delito y deporte,Adela Reta
Ultimate challenge,Todd Hafer
Sport--commerce--culture,"Andrews, David L."
The Best Pittsburgh Sports Arguments (The Best Sports Arguments),John Mehno
Great Moments in Wisconsin Sports,Todd Mishler
Gli eroi di Olimpia,Enzo Lippolis
Analítico de disposiciones jurídicas de acuerdo al proceso administrativo,Mexico.
David Beckham,Jim Whiting
A new generation of warriors,Jim Whiting
Krīṛā-patha,Rājeśa Mohana Upretī
Sport public relations,G. Clayton Stoldt
"""Recuerdos de una epopeya""",Luis Acosta Díaz
Youth and sports,Algeria. Wizārat al-Akhbār wa-al-Thaqāfah.
Score! A baker's dozen sports stories,William MacKellar
Winning is the only thing,Randy Roberts
"The Rock, the Curse, and the Hub",Randy Roberts
I grandi match,Lamberto Artioli
Premesse storiche al diritto sportivo,Ugo Gualazzini
Amerikai arénák,"Gallov, Rezső."
Physiology of exercise,Ernst Jokl
Sports in the cultural pattern of the world,Ernst Jokl
Sŭpʻochʻŭ wa jŏnŏllijŭm,"Yi, Hae-chʻang."
"IV Krajowa Konferencja ""Morfologia w Sporcie""","Krajowa Konferencja ""Morfologia w Sporcie"" (4th 1983 Poznań, Poland)"
The Ultimate Guide to Weight Training for Football (Ultimate Guide to Weight Training for Sports Series) (Ultimate Guide to Weight Training for Football) ... Guide to Weight Training for Football),Robert G. Price
The Ultimate Guide to Weight Training for Golf (Ultimate Guide to Weight Training for Sports Series) (Ultimate Guide to Weight Training for Golf) (Ultimate ... (Ultimate Guide to Weight Training for Golf),Robert G. Price
The ultimate guide to weight training for skiing,Robert G. Price
Sports People (21st Century Lives),Liz Gogerly
A Beginner's Guide to Very Cool Skateboarding Tricks (The World of Skateboarding),Aaron Rosenberg
Zakon za fizicheskoto vŭzpitanie i sporta,Bulgaria.
The ultimate guide to weight training for bowling,Robert G. Price
Coachisms,Randy Howe
Sports in America,"Walters, John"
Playing safely,"Nelson, Robin"
1955 in SPORT,Dave Anderson
The sporting news this day in sports,Ron Smith
Sportpszichológia,Pál Rókusfalvy
Hunting,Adam G. Klein
Fishing,Adam G. Klein
Historia tou Kypriakou athlētismou,Andreas Chatzēvasileiou
Argonautōn athla,Nikos Tsaknēs
Snowboarding! Shred the Powder (The Extreme Sports Collection),Chris Hayhurst
Seven games in October,"Brady, Charles."
Fast tracks,Raymond Krise
Sports In America,Glenn W. Ferguson
Cool careers without college for people who love sports,Adam B. Hofstetter
Sport and gender,Ann Hall
Chief Cloud of Dust,Robert Everett McAdam
Un siglo de deporte olímpico,Fabio Ruiz Vinageras
Bibliographie zur Psychologie des Sports 1978-1980,W. Essing
Bibliographie zur Psychologie des Sports 1972-1975,W. Essing
Bibliographie zur Psychologie des Sports 1968-1971,W. Essing
Sport psychology,Matt Jarvis
Gymnastics Competitions,Jen Jones
Kinanthropometry IX,International Society for the Advancement of Kinanthropometry. International Conference
Winter Sports (Get Active!),Barbara C. Bourassa
Gymnastics Events,Jen Jones
Bat and Ball Sports (Get Active!),Barbara C. Bourassa
Techniktraining,Manfred Grosser
Combat sports in the ancient world,Michael Poliakoff
Deporte y municipio,Emilio Ortega
Russko-angliĭskiĭ sportivnyĭ slovarʹ-razgovornik,"Nevskiĭ, I͡U. G."
Be a Sport,Sandra Briggs
Something to cheer about,Jack McDonald
Good Sports: A Large Print Anthology of Great Sports Writing,Judith Leet
Sophrologie et compétition sportive,Luis Fernandez
Yuan yuan liu chang di shi jie ti yu,"Yang, Wenqing."
Cʻxovrebis xibli cʻxovrebašia,Davitʻ Čeliże
Questions and answers =,Kathleen Petelinsek
Diabetic athlete's handbook,Sheri Colberg
"Oxygen uptake kinetics in sport, exercise and medicine",Andrew M. Jones
Mmdi Total Super Bowl,Bernard Ireland
Sport for all in Malaysia,Selina Khoo
Urheilu--ihminen--yhteiskunta,Kalevi Heinilä
Sportivnyĭ siluėt strany,Sergeĭ Vishni͡akov
The Ryder Cup,Colin Jarman
The Guinness Book of Humorous Sports Quotations,Colin Jarman
Weight lifting & bodybuilding,Donald Dean Macchia
Breakaway,Al Janssen
The Wolfpack,William H. Beezley
Athletic ability,Rolf Wirhed
Texas sport,Jon Holmes
The best of Wooldridge,Ian Wooldridge
Pittsburgh and western Pennsylvania sports hall of fame,Chet Smith
Organisatie en financiering van de sport voor allen,Urbain Claeys
Rationalising sports policies,Urbain Claeys
The games they played,Douglas A. Noverr
"Sport, das Leitbild in der Traditionspflege","Sportwissenschaftliches Kolloquium ""Zur Leitbildorientierung im Rahmen der Traditionspflege des DTSB der DDR und des Schulsports"" (1981 Bad Blankenburg, Germany)"
Roller Hockey,Mike Kennedy
The only living boy in New York,David Goodwillie
Mmdi Total Quarterback,Bernard Ireland
Livewire Sports Poetry,Andy Croft
A sporttevékenység regulációs felfogása,Pál Rókusfalvy
The sociology of sports,Tim Madigan
The best of pro soccer,Heather Adamson
Hunting,Adam G. Klein
Hiking,Adam G. Klein
Boating,Adam G. Klein
Organized crime in sports (racing),United States. Congress. House. Select Committee on Crime.
Landesgesetz über die öffentliche Förderung von Sport und Spiel in Rheinland-Pfalz,"Schmidt, Karl Ltd. Ministerialrat."
Sport und Freizeit,Jürg Schiffer
Jock : sports & male identity,Donald F. Sabo
Lapualla on Virkiä,Heikki Pehkoranta
Mastering Your Inner Game,David R. Kauss
Démocratisation du sport,Yves Le Pogam
Ensaios no tempo,António Paula Brito
Schulsport und Leistungssport,Uwe Heldt
Belépés nemcsak tornacipőben,"Gyárfás, Tamás."
The illustrated handbook of sporting terms,Graeme Wright
Acrobats & ping-pong,Isobel Willcox
Children's sports in China,"Liu, Ping-chiang."
Physical feats that made history,Harold H. Hart
Great days in Canadian sport,Henry Hall Roxborough
"Hidden causes of injury, prevention and correction, for running athletes and joggers",John Jesse
"Sports, a multimedia guide for children and young adults",Calvin Blickle
Psychologische und pädagogische Untersuchungen zum Sportspiel,Kurt Kohl
Psychologische Erkenntnis und Sportpraxis,Kurt Kohl
Answer book on Soviet sport,Sergei Grigorʹevich Popov
Idrettens Bevegelser,Adam Kotula
Hearts of Champions,Mark Todd
The Best of the Show,Bill Scheft
Benchwarmer's Sports Trivia,Bob Alexander
A treasury of sports humor,Milton J. Shapiro
Soundness in the horse,"Gray, Peter"
Labor relations in professional sports,United States. Congress. House. Committee on Education and Labor. Special Subcommittee on Labor.
Sociology of sport,"Edwards, Harry"
"Minutes of the adjourned meeting of the Council members of the Asian Games Federation held in Djakarta, Indonesia, 3rd September 1962",Asian Games Federation. Council.
La corrupción en el deporte español,"García, José María"
"Buku kenang-kenangan Pekan Olah Raga Angkatan Kepolisian Sumatera Utara 23 Nopember 1964-28 Nopember 1964, Medan","Pekan Olah Raga Angkatan Kepolisian Sumatera Utara Medan, Indonesia 1964."
"Alimentation du sportif et de l'homme moderne, diététique et gastronomie",Gérard Debuigne
W poszukiwaniu obiektywnych kryteriów selekcji w sporcie,"Konferencja ""Cechy alternatywne w selekcji sportowej"" (1979 Poznań, Poland)"
Sportsvision,Leon Revien
Voennoe troeborʹe,N. F. Lodi͡aev
Begreppsfältet kroppsövning,Kaj Wikström
Manual of physical exercises,"Wood, William."
The young athlete's health handbook,Douglas W. Jackson
Ergonomia în sport,Viorel Cătăniciu
Rand McNally illustrated dictionary of sports,Graeme Wright
Verschenkter Lorbeer; deutsche Sportler zwischen Ost und West [von] Willi Knecht,Willi Ph Knecht
Xut!,"Solà i Dachs, Lluís"
Sport-santé et nutrition,Jean Paul Ostiguy
"The "" House"" on sport","Stock Exchange (London, England)"
L'influence du movement sportif sur l'évolution de l'education physique dans l'enseignement secondaire français,Jacques Thibault
Science and medicine of exercise and sport,Warren Russell Johnson
Suspended,Robert Rayner
Sports law and litigation,"Moore, Craig LLB"
Tickets for Texas,Arnold Starr
Fifty sports years along memory lane,Mabe Kountze
Wakeboarding in the X Games,Christopher Blomquist
Sport und Humanisierung der Arbeitswelt,Horst Tiwald
Malá encyklopedie sportu,Pavel Vitouš
Van Aaken method,Ernst van Aaken
Programmiert für 100 Lebensjahre,Ernst van Aaken
Socialisation och involvering i idrott =,Göran Patriksson
Die Christlich-deutsche Turnerschaft Österreichs und Mons. Franz Xaver Hofstaetter (obit 1968),Anton Hochrainer
Psychospołeczne uwarunkowania aktywności sportowej człowieka,Jacek Gracz
Emocje przedstartowe oraz ich związek z aspiracjami sportowców,Jacek Gracz
Variation of emotional states and environmental involvement during occupational activity and sport fishing,Irving A. Spaulding
Sport in Niederösterreich,"Austria, Lower. Sportabteilung."
Socialisering van vrijetijdsrollen,Albert Remans
Women athletes blazing a trail,Kitty Rogers Baird
Rekordy w plecaku,Jan Lis
Kultura fizyczna współczesnego społeczeństwa,"Wiosenna Sesja Zgromadzenia Ogólnego Członków Oddziału PAN (1980 Poznań, Poland)"
Le corps dans la nature,Union française des centres de vacances et de loisirs.
"Sportovci, kteří proslavili naši tělovýchovu",Knihovna Jiřího Mahena.
Upowszechnianie kultury fizycznej wśród młodzieży i dorosłych mieszkańców wsi w latach 1944-1973,Stanisław Drążdżewski
L'E ́quipe dans les sports collectifs,Georges Rioux
Éléments de psychopédagogie sportive,Georges Rioux
"The English at play, in the Middle Ages",Teresa McLean
Athletes afire,"Arndt, Richard"
"Aktivierung, Motivation, Handlung und Coaching im Sport",Arbeitsgemeinschaft für Sportpsychologie in der Bundesrepublik Deutschland. Internationales Symposium.
Studie zur Persönlichkeitsforschung im Leistungssport,Rudolf Welteke
Wenn der Muskelkater faucht,Barbara Weiner
"Sport Magazine Crosswords, Volume 1 (Other)",Stanley Newman
Sovetskiĭ sport na olimpiĭskikh arenakh,N. I. Li͡ubomirov
The gladiators,John Dennis McCallum
C'era una volta lo sport--,Sergio Puggelli
An Athens Diary: 1996,Mike Cheatham
Class of the Carolinas,Mike Cheatham
Fotheringham's Sporting Pastimes,William Fotheringham
Playboy's Guide to Rating the Video Games,Walter Lowe Jr.
Barbie girls club,Sarah Jane Brian
Since when is catching flies a sport?,Amy Bowman
Sports,Amy Bowman
Weatherbeaten,Joyce Kay
Le Sport contre les peuples,Robert Redeker
Classic contests of sports,Bill Libby
A sport for every kid,Nicole B. Sperekas
Introdução ao estudo da filosofia da educação física e dos desportos,Inezil Pena Marinho
Legal considerations in the administration of public school physical education and athletic programs,Don E. Arnold
Stanford sports,Gary Cavalli
Errord Hamahaykakan khagher,"Hamahaykakan khagher (3rd 2003 Yerevan, Armenia)"
Le club sportif à l'épreuve de l'économie et des politiques locales,"Université sportive d'été (22nd 2004 Lille, France)"
Countryside recreation site management,Ian Keirle
Tietê,Henrique Nicolini
Hiking,Valerie Bodden
"Billiards, bowling, table tennis, pinball, and video games",Robert R. Craven
Motorcycles,Charles Hofer
Chris Jericho,Sean Price
Sportscape,Paul Wombell
The athlete's handbook,Johnny Unitas
The pride of Mongolian sports,"Ėrdėnėchimėg, D."
Desafios para o século XXI,"Conferência Nacional de Educação, Cultura e Desporto (1st 2000 Brasília, Brazil)"
At the top of their game,Robert H. Boyle
Sports without pain,"Benjamin, Ben E."
Energy Metabolism in Exercise and Sport (Perspectives in Exercise Science and Sports Medicine),David R. Lamb
"If I quit baseball, will you still love me?",Jeff Millar
I cattolici e la rinascita dello sport italiano,Aldo Notario
England's revelry,Emma Griffin
Maximising revenue from sports ticketing,David Walmsley
Le associazioni sportive,Stefano Ragghianti
Chicago's Soldier Field (IL) (Postcards of America),Paul Michael Peterson
What is a coach? Module 6 A coaching philosophy,John Lyle
Kultura fizyczna antycznej Grecji,Bogdan J. Kunicki
Nāṭṭuppur̲ac cir̲uvar viḷaiyāṭṭukkaḷ,Mū Karuṇāniti
Le Comité international olympique et le droit international,Franck Latty
Computersimulation in der Biomechanik,Ulrich Glitsch
Sporting events,Gabriel Kaufman
Jonas Brothers,Sarah Tieck
Nobody asked me,Jimmy Cannon
Mongolyn sportyn bakharkhal,"Ėrdėnėchimėg, D."
Tripurāra ādibāsīdera ābahamāna khelādhulā,Satyajit̲a Nāhā
How to draw sports things,Rob Court
My Little Pony Book & Charm Pony Field Day (My Little Pony (Reader's Digest)),Ruth Koeppel
Tizenkét menet,"Jakab, József"
Improving health and performance in the athlete,Johnny Unitas
The book of sports trophies,Brian A. Wynne
Suomalaisen urheilun synty,Erkki Vettenniemi
Sports in Pennsylvania,Karen Guenther
The New England sports trivia book,Gerald Beirne
National pastime,Barry Svrluga
P is for pom pom!,Laura Purdie Salas
Snowmobiling,Laura Purdie Salas
Risk management in sport and recreation,John O. Spengler
Training and conditioning of athletes; a manual for trainers and physicians,Max M. Novich
Training and conditioning of athletes,Max M. Novich
Entertainment in Colonial America (Primary Sources of Everyday Life in Colonial America),Charlie Samuel
Back to the hill,"O'Leary, John"
Sports bloopers,Mark Huebner
Sports,Rennay Craats
Zhongguo ti yu jian shi,"Li, Yiping."
The making of champions,Miriam Morton
Sportsmen's encyclopedia,William A. Bruette
The Olympic movement in the Philippines,Celso Limjuco Dayrit
Droit du sport,Piermarco Zen-Ruffinen
Play by play,"Davis, David"
Les communistes et le sport à l'heure de Munich,Paul Laurent
This round's on me,Lorne Rubenstein
Huit leçons sur le sport,Paul Yonnet
Systèmes des sports,Paul Yonnet
Baseball from A to Z,Michael P. Spradlin
Elite sports development,Mick Green
Sport in a philosophic context,Carolyn E. Thomas
Think Like a Champion,Dick Devenzio
Analysis of sport motion,John W. Northrip
Sports and physical education,Bonnie Gratch Lindauer
"Measuremen and evaluation in physical education, fitness, and sports",James S. Bosco
"Measurement and evaluation in physical education, fitness, and sports",James S. Bosco
On three,Herm Weiskopf
Forty for sixty,Robert Everett McAdam
Viva Gonzales!,Robert Everett McAdam
Bull on ice!,Robert Everett McAdam
In a cloud of dust (Beyond victory),Robert Everett McAdam
Play the game,Robert Everett McAdam
Sports off-center,Ken Widmann
Start! Borʹba! Pobeda! =,Alevtina Sergeevna Levit͡skai͡a
The courage to believe,Craig Morton
Mundury i laury,Edward Woźniak
La tyrannie sportive,Jean-Marie Brohm
"Proceedings of Conference on Sport, Society and Personality held at La Trobe University from Sunday, 18 May to Tuesday, 20th May, 1975","Conference on Sport, Society, and Personality (1975 La Trobe University)"
Rebonds,Michel Canque
Aktywność sportowa kobiet,Zdzisława Wyżnikiewicz
Great beginnings,Stephen C. Turner
"Report of the National Conference of Senior Officials to Consider Unesco Recommendations on Physical Education and Sport, held in Washington, D.C., November 16-18, 1977","National Conference of Senior Officials to Consider Unesco Recommendations on Physical Education and Sport (1977 Washington, D.C.)"
Warenstrukturelle Bedingungen leistungssportlichen Handelns,Bero Rigauer
Steuerpraxis im Verein,Ulrich Kroeker
Självkontroll genom mental träning,Lars-Eric Uneståhl
Training nutrition,Ed Burke
"VI Sympozjum ""Rola rytmów biologicznych w wychowaniu fizycznym i sporcie""","Sympozjum Rola Rytmów Biologicznych w Wychowaniu Fizycznym i Sporcie 6th Poznań, Poland 1975."
Dansk idræts-forbund's jubilæumsskrift 1896-1971,John Idorn
The living image: Shakespearean essays,Thomas Rice Henn
List of periodicals =,Coaching Association of Canada. Sport Information Resource Centre.
Sociologie du sport,René Catinaud
Sport der Jugend,Stefan Grössing
Sport-Almanach,Österreichische Bundes-Sportorganisation.
Grootboek van de sport,Piet Theys
Der Geist des Sports,Hans Wolfgang Heidland
Da Olimpia a casa mia,Gigi Ghirotti
Atti del Convegno CISM sul mezzofondo,Antonio Venerando
The New York times sports question box,S. Lee Kanner
Les perspectives d'emploi dans le secteur des loisirs et des sports,Pierre Georges Garneau
Lidové tělovýchovné slavnosti na Moravě. 1922-1938,Antonín Verbík
Šport a vedomie,Ivan Macák
Hochleistungssport in den USA,Helmut Digel
Einstellung und Schulleistungen,Dieter Pache
Sprache und Sprechen im Sport,Helmut Digel
Storia dello sport in Italia,Felice Fabrizio
O desporto como prática filosófica,Manuel Sergio
Safe at home,"Arndt, Richard"
20 Jahre Sportverlag Berlin,"Sportverlag, Berlin."
El deporte en Granada,Miguel Rodrigo Aragonés
Diccionario del deporte zamorano,J. Arroyo Gago
Psicologia dos esportes,R. Haddock Lobo
Daten sportmedizinischer Untersuchungen (1971-1973) im Spitzensport,"Fleischer, Hans."
Kirche und Sport in Deutschland,Willi Schwank
Sport und gewerkschaft in der Bundesrepublik Deutschland,Willi Schwank
Physical Activity and Obesity,Claude Bouchard
Sudʹby chempionov,Georgiĭ Stepanidin
Man in motion,Terence Parkes
Hazena u Bosni i Hercegovini,Bogdan Cuvaj
"Sport, santé et forme",Pierre Talbot
"Installation de M. Jean Bracquemond, premier président",Jean Bracquemond
Didaktika sportovních her,Lubomír Dobrý
Partnerschaft auf Raten,Willi Ph Knecht
Wege nach Olympia,Willi Ph Knecht
L' Influence du mouvement sportif sur l'évolution de l'éducation physique dans l'enseignement secondaire français,Jacques Thibault
Science and medicine of exercise and sports,Warren Russell Johnson
"Sănătatea, o performanță?","Drăgan, Ioan Dr."
Zakład Fizjologii Ogólnej i Sportu w 60 [sześćdziesięcio]-leciu akademickiego nauczania wychowania fizycznego,Wanda Rożynek-Łukanowska
Suomen osallistuminen Tukholman olympialaisiin vuonna 1912,"Paasivirta, Juhani."
Canada's Olympic chances,"Craig, John"
Însemnări din lumea sportului,Ion Matei
Lidé a hry,Věra Olivová-Pávová
Spitzensport und soziale Mobilität,Wolfgang Kneyer
Sporting scenes,Doug Ibbotson
Vít̕azná cesta,Igor Mráz
The pursuit of excellence in sport and physical education,National Association of Teachers in Further and Higher Education. Physical Education Section.
Behind the superstars,Gerry Patterson
La grande fête du sport,Michel Boutron
Report of the Ad Hoc Enquiry Committee on Games and Sports,India (Republic). Ad Hoc Enquiry Committee on Games and Sports.
Wir waren die Juddebube: Eintracht Frankfurt in der NS-Zeit,Matthias Thoma
Sportas nepriklausomoje Lietuvoje,Jonas Narbutas
Vers une nouvelle politique sportive,C. Piard
"Sport, médecine, et santé",Jacques Turblin
The boy's own book,"Clarke, William."
L' élite sportive québécoise,Institut des sports du Québec.
Sports in the German Democratic Republic,Armour Milne
Anaerobe Energiebereitstellung im Hochleistungssport,Wilfried Kindermann
Zakład Biochemii Sportu w 60-leciu akademickiego nauczania wychowania fizycznego,Stefan Bączyk
Liikuntakäyttäytymisen bibliografia =,Timo Haajanen
Dějiny československého olympijského hnutí,Jiří Kössl
Los deportes en Puerto Rico,Emilio E. Huyke
Cien años de prensa deportiva en Cataluña,Salón Náutico Internacional.
Heja Sverige,Olof Groth
"Abenteuer, Wagnis, Risiko im Sport",Wolfram Schleske
"Bibliographie Freizeit- und Erholungssport, 1971-1977",Karl Heinz Purkopp
Tito i sport,Krešimir Špeletić
Sports,Peter Kühnst
The log of a sportsman,Edward Humphrey Dalrymple Sewell
Mic dicționar al sporturilor,Tiberiu Căileanu
"Proceedings of the 26th ICHPER World Congress, 1983, Wingate Institute, Israel",ICHPER World Congress (26th 1983 Wingate Institute)
Preparación psicológica del atleta venezolano,Julio V. Loreto Rodríguez
Sport in the RSA,HSRC Sports Investigation. Main Committee.
"Seminario Internacional sobre la Educación Física, el Deporte y la Formación Integral, La Habana, Cuba, 21-24 de febrero de 1983","Seminario Internacional sobre la Educación Física, el Deporte y la Formación Integral (1983 Havana, Cuba)"
Stories from the game of life,"Welch, Bob"
Processus de récupération en sport,M. V. Volkov
Za po-visoko kachestvo v podgotovkata na rezerva na bŭlgarskii͡a sport,Gruĭo I͡Urukov
Bewegungsbewusstsein,Ulrich Nickel
A sportmozgások anatómiai alapjai,"Miltényi, Márta."
German Democratic Republic: sports,Joachim Fiebelkorn
A new chapter in the history of German sport,Joachim Fiebelkorn
Emotionale Belastungen im Sport,Ulrich Kuhl
Sport und Körpereziehung auf Cuba,Wolf Krämer-Mandeau
Sociology of sport,North American Society for the Sociology of Sport. Conference
Sport und irische Geschichte,Peter Hörbe
Sportethik,Erwin Niedermann
Sport und Spiel in Salzburg,Erwin Niedermann
Werte im Sport?,Erwin Niedermann
Denn sie leben ja voneinander,Jobst Thomas
Wahrnehmung und taktisches Handeln im Sport,Inge Sonnenschein
Dunk skunk,Michael Rex
K teorii testování pohybových schopností,Petr Blahuš
Hat der Spitzensport (noch) eine Zukunft?,Magglinger Symposium (23th 1985)
Martine et les sports,Marcel Marlier
Sports in Dayton,Ritter Collett
Dimensions of sport studies,Donald Chu
The Edwin Pope collection,Edwin Pope
The Blackie Sherrod collection,Blackie Sherrod
Normas básicas sobre desportos,Brazil. Ministério da Educação e Cultura.
Meditations for athletes,Bob Sessoms
The illustrated history of sports at the U.S. Military Academy,Joseph E. Dineen
"Kānkīlā læ phalasưksā nai Prathēt Thai nai ratchasamai Phrabāt Somdet Phra Čhunlačhō̜mklāo Čhaoyūhūa, Phō̜. Sō̜. 2411-2453",Salapsī Phatthanawibūn.
"Sexus, Sport und geistiger Elan","Dietz, Heinrich"
Ripley's [50th anniversary] believe it or not: oddities in sports,Robert Le Roy Ripley
The not-so-great moments in sports,Tim Braine
Fitness profiles of elite Finnish athletes,Antti U. Arstila
"Histoire du sport, de l'antiquité au XIXe siècle",Jean-Paul Massicotte
Sport und Leibeserziehung,Helmuth Plessner
Sportélettan,"Frenkl, Róbert."
A sport helye az egészségnevelésben,"Frenkl, Róbert."
Sport organizations and the structure of society,Pekka Kiviaho
Sport and intracultural social change,Pekka Kiviaho
Beiträge zur Biomechanik des Sports,Rainer Ballreich
40 godini sot͡s︡ialisticheski sport v Bŭlgarii͡a︡,Trendafil Martinski
Sports in the People's Republic of Bulgaria,Trendafil Martinski
No mountain too high,Stan Cottrell
Zu aktuellen Fragen der olympischen Bewegung,"Sportwissenschaftliches Kolloquium (3rd 1984 Bad Blankenburg, Germany)"
Un sfert de secol de avînt sportiv,Dan Gîrleșteanu
V svoi vorota,Vladimir Andreevich Novoskolʹt͡sev
Les vestiaires du sport,Jacques Perrilliat
Handbuch für den Sportartikel-Kaufmann,Jürgen B. Wamser
Treinamento desportivo e ritmos biológicos,Lamartine Pereira da Costa
"Formação profissional em educação física, esporte e lazer no Brasil",Lamartine Pereira da Costa
The Coach and Sport Management (Stipes Management Monographs in Sport and Physical Education),Glynn A. Leyshon
Sportgrossveranstaltungen und Fremdenverkehrsmarketing,Peter Schnedlitz
Exploring careers in pro sports,Harry Stapler
Your future in pro sports,Harry Stapler
Humanität im Spitzensport,Germany (West). Bundestag. Sportausschuss.
Bewegungsbeobachtung und Bewegungsbeurteilung im Sport,August Neumaier
Norsk idrettslitteratur 1971-1975,Halldis Aubert
One thousand sport stories,Alfred H. Spink
Sportanglizismen im modernen Franzo?sisch,Karl-Heinz Becker
Home-grown heroes,Frank Pagnucco
Piccolo encyclopedia of sport,"Matthews, Peter"
The Guinness encyclopaedia of sports records & results,"Matthews, Peter"
Everybody's a winner,Tom Schneider
Výchovné pôsobenie v telovýchovnom procese,Andrej Kuchen
Rechtsfragen des organisierten Sportlebens in der Schweiz,Urs Scherrer
Sárchluichí le sárimreoirí,Pádraic Ó Gaora
L' attività lavorativa nello spettacolo,Francesco Pranteddu
Le grand jeu,Jacques Caron
"Trei decenii de aur în istoria sportului românesc, 1944-1974",Dan Gîrleșteanu
"Două decenii de avînt sportiv, 1944-1964",Dan Gîrleșteanu
Sports et sociétés contemporaines,International Committee for Sociology of Sport. International Symposium
Zemnye zvezdy,Leonid Borisovich Gori͡anov
Sliding into home,Dori Hillestad Butler
New York sports trivia,Irv Finkel
A sport Magyarországon,"Kun, László."
60 sporta gadi,Jānis Dikmanis
Pasynok di͡adi Sėma,Lidii͡a Borodina
The Rudy in you,Don T. Phillips
Sovremannai︠a︡ sistema sportivnoĭ trenirovki,N. G. Ozolin
Sistema contemporáneo de entrenamiento deportivo,N. G. Ozolin
Sistema Mexicano de Información del Deporte,Mexico. Subsecretaría del Deporte.
"Proceedings of the International Conference on Computer Applications in Sport and Physical Education, January 2-6, 1992",International Conference on Computer Applications in Sport and Physical Education (1992 Mikhlalah le-ḥinukh gufani ʻa. sh. Zinman bi-Mekhon Ṿingaiṭ)
Besonderheiten der Unternehmensfinanzierung und Investitionseffizienz im professionellen Fussball,Markus Kern
Traditional sports in North Sulawesi,Budi Abigail Lolowang
Les grands du sport breton,Georges Cadiou
ha-Maḥoziʼadah ha-19 ʻal shem Miryam Tsarfi ... 16-20.5.2006,Histadrut ha-ʻovdim ha-kelalit ha-ḥadashah. ʻAmutah li-sporṭ bi-meḳomot ha-ʻavodah be-merḥav Yerushalayim
Sport w społeczeństwie współczesnym,Jerzy Krawczyk
Potentiële topsporters in het MBO,Charles Felix
Kappestrid og dugnadsånd,Helga Gilberg
A tranquil haven,Lindy Scripps
גבורי ספורט,Michael Margolin
Sports schools,Sabine Radtke
Le football,F. J. J. Buytendijk
Kalmykii͡a sportivnai͡a,A. P. Laktionov
Entwicklung eines innovativen Geschäftssystems im Breiten- und Leistungssport,Dirk Gutzeit
Nravstvennyĭ potent͡sial sovremennogo sporta,"I. M. Bykhovskai͡a, V. G. Valentinova, Rudolʹf Fedorovich Nezvet͡skiĭ"
סדום ועמורה 2,Shaʼul Aizenberg
The sporting dictionary,George J. Manson
Hints and points for sportsmen,H. H. Soulé
حقيقة كرة القدم,Dhiyāb ibn Saʻd Āl Ḥamdān Ghāmidī
双辽市文化体育志,Chunsheng Gao
Planung & Erfolgskontrolle im Sportsponsoring,Michael Dinkel
Carla-too-little,Sylvia Root Tester
Index to sporting manuscripts in the UK,Richard William Cox
Laufbahnberatung und Umfeldmanagement an Olympiastützpunkten,Andreas Schlattmann
Tamil̲nāṭṭu viḷaiyāṭṭukaḷ,Ñā Tēvanēyan̲
Wege zur Spielintelligenz,Markus Raab
Windsor to the Smithsonian,Ken Milburn
What words inspire you?,National Association for Girls & Women in Sport
Daredevil bladers,S. S. Gorman
Sociedades anónimas deportivas,Rafael Gómez-Ferrer Sapiña
Le développement personnel et l'intégration sociale des jeunes par les loisirs,Janine Tillard
Sport--a guide to historical sources in the UK,Richard William Cox
History of sport,Richard William Cox
Sport in Britain,Richard William Cox
Triple Threat,Elliot Johnson
Spor Komisyonu raporu,Devlet Planlama Teşkilatı (Turkey). Gençlik ve Spor Özel İhtisas Komisyonu.
Le stress en psychologie du sport,François Lasnier
Authorization of soap box derby races on Capitol grounds,United States. Congress. House. Committee on Public Works and Transportation.
Sport et sacré,René Jantzen
"Si, carino",Quino
Figuraties in de sport,Jan van Gestel
Motivationale und selbstkonzeptbezogene Aspekte im Fitness-Sport,Eckhard Enders
Sport and the construction of identities,"Austria) International Congress ""Sport and the Construction of Identities (11th 2006 Vienna"
Mädchen und Frauen mit Migrationshintergrund im organisierten Sport,Christa Kleindienst-Cachay
E-Learning in der Sportwissenschaft,Marco Danisch
"Sport zwischen Recht, Wirtschaftlichkeit und Kultur","Philipp Juchli, Marcel Würmli, Diego Haunreiter"
"9th ISHPES Congress, Cologne, 7-11 September, 2005",International Society for the History of Physical Education and Sport. Congress
Familie und Leistungssport,Ulrike Weber
Sport als Kommunikationsmedium der Wirtschaft,Gerhard Tschakert
Jägermeister Racing 1972 bis 2000,Eckhard Schimpf
"Sterben, Tod und Unsterblichkeit im Sport",Arno Müller
Leistungssport-Pädagogik,Kerstin Behm
Ehrenamtliche Führungskräfte im organisierten Sport,Sabine Radtke
A study of the structure and customs of Iran's traditional sports,Amīr Ḥusaynī
Marzashkharhi anvani Hayerě,Avetis Bayramyan
De dynamiek van de sportarbeidsmarkt,J. M. H. Lucassen
Sportbeleid in internationaal vergelijkend perspectief,Hans Westerbeek
Ramificaciones,Hernán Zucchi
Individualʹnyĭ podkhod k razvitii͡u myshechnoĭ sily u i͡unykh sportsmenov,P. V. Pevnev
Peraturan P. O. N. (Pekan Olahraga Nasional),Komite Olahraga Nasional Indonesia. Pusat
Sporting excellence,David Hemery
Winning without drugs,David Hemery
לנצח ביושר להפסיד בכבוד,Emanuel Gil
Milletlerarası özel hukukta spor,Rifat Erten
Fundamentals of sports biomechanics,Charles Simonian
אוגדן הספורט בישראל 29/1991,Yitsḥaḳ Ofeḳ
The cartoon world of Lamar Sparkman,Lamar Sparkman
Analyse structurale des jeux sportifs traditionnels de la Corée du Sud,Il-Bong Baik
The reframing of performance anxiety,Joan S. Ingalls
Ultimate performance system,Ashley Reece-Podgorski
Een gele kaart voor de sport,Annet Tiessen-Raaphorst
Zum Sportverständnis von Jugendlichen,Ulrike Burrmann
História do desporto em Portugal,Homero Serpa
Psicologia e sport,Marco Guicciardi
孟县体育誌,
怀德县体育志,Shaojun Sun
陕县体育志,
福建省泉州市体育志,Quanzhou Shi ti yu yun dong wei yuan hu
"Laporan pelaksanaan program tahun kesatu, kedua, ketiga dan program pelaksanaan tahun keempat, serta rencana tahun kelima Repelita III, Direktorat Jenderal Pendidikan Luar Sekolah, Pemuda dan Olahraga",Pemuda dan Olah Raga Indonesia. Dirjen Pendidikan Luar Sekolah
A sure thing?,Jeff Savage
Experimenting with science in sports,Robert Gardner
Sporthygiene und präventive Sportmedizin,Kurt Biener
Sportunfälle,Kurt Biener
Practice to win,Larry Jones
The Chicago sports barroom analyst,Bob Logan
Top 10 Sports Bloopers and Who Made Them (Sports Top 10),Jeff Savage
Science and sports,Robert Gardner
Ludi medi aevi,John Marshall Carter
Science projects about the physics of sports,Robert Gardner
If Christ came to the Olympics,William J. Baker
The Art Spander collection,Art Spander
Einwilligung und Risikoübernahme im Strafrecht,Heinz Zipf
Sports medicine for coaches and trainers,Edward J. Shahady
What's wrong with sports,Howard Cosell
"Olympia, Olympia",Kurt Biener
The great teams,Robert A. Liston
Track & field building strength,Dan Zadra
"Perception, Cognition, and Decision Training",Joan N. Vickers
The space olympics (A Tempo book,Alice Lightner Hopf
Winning words,Michael Benson
You can be good at sports!,Laurence Korwin
Coach's guide to athletic training,Michael R. Schiavi
Multisport,Pierre Capdeville
Sports behind the Iron Curtain,Simon Freeman
Quantitative oder qualitative Sozialforschung in den Sportwissenschaften,Roland Bässler
Getrennt vom Reich,Ernst Schute
Sport a svět,Karel Procházka
"Sport and American mentality, 1880-1910",Donald J. Mrozek
Sponsoring von Sportverbänden,Stephan Netzle
"Pictorial history of American sports, from colonial times to the present","Durant, John"
Image des Sports,Otmar Weiss
Scientific foundations of Sports medicine,Carol C. Teitz
Encyclopedia of International Games,Daniel Bell
Drugs and the athlete,Gary I. Wadler
Kampioenen en krukken in kniebroek,Pierre Heijboer
My Secrets of Playing,Willie Mays
"Kultura fizyczna w Polsce, 1944-1984",Leszek Gondek
Bewegungsfelder,Otto Penz
Sport in der modernen Gesellschaft,Gilbert Norden
Die vertrimmte Nation,Jörg Richter
Selbständigkeit im Sport,Christian Wopp
Sports review,Louis Thomas Stanley
The Sporting collector,Louis Thomas Stanley
"Fussball, Vereine, Politik",Siegfried Gehrmann
The way it was,George Vecsey
The athletic eye,Arthur Seiderman
Baseball and Cricket,George B. Kirsch
The creation of American team sports,George B. Kirsch
Acest straniu secol al sportului,Victor Bănciulescu
Sport și artă,Victor Bănciulescu
Bericht zum VI. FEPSAC-Kongress 1983,"FEPSAC Congress (6th 1983 Magglingen, Switzerland)"
Shaʻashue ḥatser,Rachel Hasson
Sports cards,"Young, Robert"
Hub fans bid Kid adieu,John Updike
Dream teams,Michael Benson
Militärischer Dreikampf,Wolfgang Braband
Athlētismos kai koinōnia,Kōnstantinos Hērantos
Telovýchovné hnutie na Slovensku socialistickou cestou,Jaromír Perútka
"Sports, hobbies, & recreation",Lucia McKay
Sports and games,Brian Jewell
XXII Ogólnopolska Konferencja Studenckich Kół Naukowych Akademii Wychowania Fizycznego,"Ogólnopolska Konferencja Studenckich Kół Naukowych Akademii Wychowania Fizycznego (22nd 1984 Poznań, Poland)"
Sports Psychology Basics,Andrew Caruso
The Orvis Fly Patterns Index,John R. Harder
Výsledky vědeckovýzkumné práce VÚT za 7. PLP a program na léta 1986-1990,Univerzita Karlova. Výzkumný ústav tělovýchovný.
The bowling experience,Lou Marks
Balls!,Michael J. Rosen
"Művészetek, sport, 1945-1984","Hölgyesi, Györgyi."
Sport behind the Iron Curtain,Simon Freeman
Psikhologii͡a︡ fizicheskoĭ podgotovki molodezhi,V. A. Koleda
"Texts adopted at meetings of the European Ministers responsible for Sport, 1975-86",Conference of European Ministers Responsible for Sport.
"Ted Williams, Sam the genius, and other sports stories from the Wall Street journal",Michael Gartner
Il linguaggio sportivo contemporaneo,Carlo Bascetta
"Anais do Ciclo de Debates, Panorama do Esporte Brasileiro","Ciclo de Debates, Panorama do Esporte Brasileiro (1983 Brasília, Brazil)"
Psychological factors in competitive sport,"Davies, Don"
Tarmompa poekija ollaan,Hannu Itkonen
Treating sports injuries the natural way,Lyle W. Morgan
Homeopathic treatment of sports injuries,Lyle W. Morgan
L' imperfetta epopea,Nicola Porro
"Identità, nazione, cittadinanza",Nicola Porro
L' attore sportivo,Nicola Porro
Business practices in the professional boxing industry,United States
Dzieje wychowania fizycznego i sportu od końca XVIII wieku do roku 1918,Ryszard Wroczyński
La dirección del sector deporte,Gastón San Román Herbage
Russko-karakalpakskiĭ terminologicheskiĭ slovarʹ po fizicheskoĭ kulʹture i sportu,A. U. Karibaeva
Behind the lines,Don Strock
Sport Safety Training,American National Red Cross
The genesis of sport in Queensland,Reet Howell
California thrill sports,Erik Fair
Los Angeles sports quiz,Brenda Alesii
Buffalo jock rap,Brenda Alesii
Washington-Baltimore sports quiz,Brenda Alesii
New York sports quiz,Brenda Alesii
South Australian women in sport,Tanya Tarnogursky
The bottom line,Andrew S. Zimbalist
First camping trip,C. B. Colby
100 great moments in sports,Louis Sabin
Karl Bühren Arbeitersportler und Sportfunktionär,Eike Stiller
Dancing With Sonny Liston,Tom Callahan
Sport i nasilje danas u nas,Srđan Vrcan
Kinanthropometry IV,"International Congress on Youth, Leisure and Physical Activity, and Kinanthropometry IV (1990 Vrije Universiteit Brussel)"
Troll games,Mary K. Whittington
Island of champions,Cleve Dheensaw
A Picture History of the America's Cup,John Rousmaniere
Window on the deep,Andrea Conley
Sport für alle?,Ilse Hartmann-Tews
The New Lords of the Rings,Andrew Jennings
Q. What do you do for a living? A. I'm an athlete,Rob Beamish
Sociální interakce ve sportovní činnosti,Pavel Slepička
Arbeitersport im Spannungsfeld der zwanziger Jahre,Herbert Dierker
Para una ética del deporte,Juan Parent
At the Olympics,Clarisa Bell
Socialization into the role of sport consumer,Barry D. McPherson
How sports began,Don Smith
Glossario di linguaggio sportivo,"Medici, Mario"
"Eat smart, play hard",Elizabeth Ann Applegate
Sportförderung in Brasilien,Liselott Diem
"Dictionnaire encyclopédique des sports, des sportifs et des performances",Bernard Le Roy
Dictionnaire La Presse des sports du Québec,Patrice Fontaine
Game day for Charlie,Joanne Renfro
I soggetti della pratica sportiva,S. La Mendola
Leichtathletik und Freizeitsport,Leichtathletik-Verband Nordrhein. Symposium
Scientific basis of athletic conditioning,A. Garth Fisher
El problema penal de la muerte y las lesiones deportivas,Arturo Majada
Wahrnehmung kardiovaskulärer Prozesse und Gesundheit,Jörg Knobloch
Hellēnikē symmetochē stis synchrones Olympiades,A. Tarasouleas
Satchel Paige,Kathryn Long Humphrey
Der neue Sport,Bernd Elpel
The American way in sport,"Tunis, John Roberts"
Lawn games,"Tunis, John Roberts"
Haftungsrechtliche Probleme der Sportregeln,Wolfgang Grunsky
Alta competencia,Raúl Madero
L' Italia ai giochi della XIX Olimpiade,Comitato olimpico nazionale italiano.
Leistung in Sport und Gesellschaft,Eckhard Meinberg
Die Moral im Sport,Eckhard Meinberg
The name of the game,Lafe Locke
Spiel und Sport,Werner Hägele
Der Beitrag der Sportpsychologie zur Zielbestimmung einer modernen Erziehung und Ausbildung im Sport,Arbeitsgemeinschaft für Sportpsychologie in der Bundesrepublik Deutschland. Arbeitstagung
Games people play,Clarisa Bell
En Las Olimpidas (This Is Entertainment Series),Clarisa Bell
The First Ever English Olimpick Games,Celia Haddon
Vamos a jugar,Clarisa Bell
What's your sports IQ?,Bill Jeakle
A hero perished,Nile C. Kinnick
"Internationales Sportrecht vor dem staatlichen Richter in der Bundesrepublik Deutschland, Schweiz, USA und England",Thomas Summerer
Sports,"Tunis, John Roberts"
Democracy and sport,"Tunis, John Roberts"
Kirby's guide to fitness and motor performance tests,Ronald F. Kirby
"Amateur Sports Integrity ACT, S. 718",United States
Making Your Own Jumps (Step By Step Picture Guides),Mary Gordon-Watson
Dangerous sports,Missy Allen
Lorbeerkranz und Trauerflor,Ruth Fuchs
Dress her in orange and blue,Buddy Sullivan
100 momenti di gloria,Gianfranco Colasante
Out of bounds,Tom McMillen
Les sports et l'Ètat au Québec,Michel Jamet
L' équipée belle,Jacques Goddet
Good sports,"Kane, Robert J."
Pride in the past,Herb Appenzeller
The Bok busters,Terry McLean
Snorkeling,Mike Holbrook
Journey of Hope,Gordon M. Brewer
Successful sport marketing & sponsorship plans,David Kent Stotlar
-- But how you played the game!,Gordon M. Brewer
Successful sport marketing,David Kent Stotlar
"Classification.  Class G; geography, anthropology, folklore, manners and customs, recreation",Library of Congress. Subject Cataloging Division.
Encyclopaedia of Sport,Peter Matthews
Sports at random,Jerome Agel
Sports and games in Canadian life,Nancy Howell
Fitness and fun through recreational sports and games,Betty Van der Smissen
The sportsman's glossary,F. C. Avis
How many miles to Camelot?,Jerry Izenberg
The Negro in sports,Nat Low
La sécurité dans les sports et les loisirs,José Garcia
"Sponsorship, principles & practices",Ron Bergin
Léta plná medailí,Jan Kotrba
Opomíjené hvězdy,Jan Kotrba
Formule odvahy,Jan Kotrba
Sport for all in Europe,"Marchand, Jacques"
Whitaker's Almanack International Sports Records and Results (Whitakers Almanack),Peter Matthews
Incredible athletic feats,Jim Benagh
Buck Bailey,Weldon B. Gibson
On the Run (Pathway Books),Hazel Townson
"Ovaltine presents the Captain Midnight action book for sports, fitness, & nutrition",Scott Edelman
"Puissance, capacité, endurance anaérobies alactiques chez les sportifs algériens","Taoutaou, Zohra."
The Dreams of Little Boys,Donald Zolan
A report to the American Council on Education on an inquiry into the need for and feasibility of a national study of intercollegiate athletics,George H. Hanford
Liikuntakulttuurin alueellinen erilaistuneisuus,Risto Sänkiaho
Nauchnye podkhody razrabotki programm zani͡atiĭ fizicheskimi uprazhnenii͡ami i sportom,"Mezhdunarodnai͡a nauchno-prakticheskai͡a konferent͡sii͡a po teme ""Nauchnye podkhody razrabotki programm zani͡atiĭ fizicheskimi uprazhnenii͡ami i sportom"" (1988 Sofia, Bulgaria)"
"Sports, accidents et sécurité",Pierre Chazaud
"Le sport dans la commune, le département et la région",Pierre Chazaud
Körper und Identität,Rolf Peuke
The mathematics of projectiles in sport,Neville De Mestre
Otchet na TSentralnii͡a sŭvet na Bŭlgarskii͡a sŭi͡uz za fizicheska kultura i sport za perioda mezhdu chetvŭrtii͡a i petii͡a kongres i predstoi͡ashtite zadachi,Bŭlgarski sŭi͡uz za fizicheska kultura i sport. T͡Sentralen sŭvet.
Sport und europäische Integration,Werner Schroeder
The Tommy John story,Tommy John
ABC's wide world of sports encyclopedia,Jim Benagh
A felnőtt lakosság szabadidősportja és távlatai,"Kozmanovics, Endre."
Behind closed doors,Bob Woolf
Answer Book Of Sport,Bill Mazer
Sport et délinquance,Jean-Yves Lassalle
La violence dans le sport,Jean-Yves Lassalle
Biologie du sport,Jürgen Weineck
Sporty riddles,Joanne E. Bernstein
From Tobacco Road to Amen Corner,Ron Green
The nature of female socialization into sport,Susan L. Greendorfer
The Jerry Izenberg collection,Jerry Izenberg
Diccionari de l'esport,Enric Bañeres
Psychology in contemporary sport: guide-lines for coaches and athletes,Bryant J. Cratty
Flexibility for Sport (The Skills of the Game),Bob Smith
"Från ""sportfåneri"" till massidrott",Jan Lindroth
Biomécanique des techniques sportives,James G. Hay
Girls Only! vol. 1,Beverly Lewis
"Le sport dans la société, entre raison(s) et passion(s)",Michel Jamet
Compte-rendu,Séminaire sur l'organisation du sport au Burundi (1988 Université du Burundi)
Moving for life,Gary Berg Spindt
Psychologie et pratiques sportives,F. C. Bakker
Sport heute,Bernhard Maier
Száguldás a földön,"Hámori, Tibor."
Seitigkeitsphänomene und Seitigkeitstypologie im Sport,Heinz Oberbeck
"Sports, medicine, and health","World Congress of Sports Medicine (24th 1990 Amsterdam, Netherlands)"
Ikonomicheski problemi na fizicheskata kultura i sporta,Krŭsti͡u Dushkov
Tenth and Eleventh Olympic Congresses,Nadezhda Lekarska
Grundlagen der Sportpädagogik,Ommo Grupe
Sport und Protestantismus,Erich Geldbach
"President Lyndon Baines Johnson's involvement in the conduct of amateur sport, 1963-1968",Georganne Greene
Sunday punch,Vic Ziegel
The Incredible Inman's Louisville Trivia Challenge!,David Inman
Grace & glory,Karen Drollinger
Spor sözlüğü,İsa Savaş
Go Big Red,Hollis Limprecht
The new answer book of sports,Bill Mazer
Ergogenic aids and muscular performance,William P. Morgan
Sport als Kultur,Ommo Grupe
Zur Entwicklung des Sports und der Leibeserziehung in Kolumbien,Carlos Eduardo Vargas
Sponsorship,Ron Bergin
Jugend und Sport,Klaus-Peter Brinkhoff
"Művészetek, sport, 1945-1979","Benkő, Zsuzsanna."
1001 Motivational Messages and Quotations for Athletes and Coaches,Bruce Brown
"Sport qui tue, sport qui sauve",Jean François Brisson
Sport i ėsteticheskai͡a︡ dei͡a︡telʹnostʹ,N. N. Viziteĭ
Sporting females,Jennifer Hargreaves
The mental edge,"Brennan, Stephen J."
Fashion then and now,"Lennox, William Pitt Lord"
Apartheid und Sport,Andreas Krumpholz
The games they played,Richard B. Lyttle
Official report,Asian Congress on Physical Education 1st Djakarta 1962.
"Timpen, hinkelen & pierebollen",Tony Burrett
Konkreatives Handeln,Matthias Wiskow
Latvijas 2. sporta kongress,"Latvijas sporta kongress (2nd 1992 Rīga, Latvia)"
Mastering Genesis sports games,Carol Ann Hanshaw
I can,Arthur L. Lindsay
Im Sport ist mehr drin,Gerhard Hauk
Hot air ballooning,Christie Costanzo
The old college try,John R. Thelin
Practical philosophy of sport and physical activity,R. Scott Kretchmar
British manly exercises,Donald Walker
Agoni ginnici,Bronisław Biliński
Pictures of sporting life and character,"Lennox, William Pitt Lord"
Sport : the way ahead : the report of the Minister's Task Force on Federal Sport Policy,Canada. Minister's Task Force on Federal Sport Policy.
Sport : the way ahead : an overview of the Task Force report,Canada. Minister's Task Force on Federal Sport Policy.
Minister's Task Force on Federal Sport Policy,Canada. Minister's Task Force on Federal Sport Policy.
"Sport, the way ahead",Canada. Minister's Task Force on Federal Sport Policy.
Royal horses,Judith Campbell
Wisconsin sports quiz book,Jack Swanson
Soft tissue injuries in sport,Sylvia Lachmann
Sports Babylon,Mark Sabljak
Boston sports quiz,Brenda Alesii
Buzz Beamer's radical sports,Bill Hinds
Selected readings in recreational sports,National Intramural-Recreational Sports Association (U.S.). Conference
Filosofia das actividades corporais,Manuel Sérgio
Motivation et stratégies de motivation en milieu sportif,Edgar Thill
Intervencion publica en el deporte (Monografias Civitas),I. Agirreazkuenaga
Sportbericht der Bundesregierung 1973,Germany (West). Bundesregierung.
Intervención pública en el deporte,I. Agirreazkuenaga
El padrino,María Eugenia Yagüe
How to get a job in sports,"Taylor, John"
Sport and civil society,Hannu Itkonen
Keeping young athletes healthy,Alan R. Figelman
The season after,"King, Peter"
Fizkulturnite organizat͡s︡ii v selishtna sistema Kavarna,Raĭna Bŭrdareva
"Sportŭt v Bŭlgarii͡a︡, poi͡a︡va i razvitie 1878-1944",Raĭna Bŭrdareva
"Le sport, la mort, la violence",Bernard Jeu
"Le sportif, le philosophe, le dirigeant",Bernard Jeu
"Le sport, l'émotion, l'espace",Bernard Jeu
The boy's own book,"Williams, J. L."
"The ""hand of God""?",Claudio Marcello Tamburrini
Saga Landsmóta UMFÍ,Viðar Hreinsson.
Malloy's sports collectibles value guide,Roderick A. Malloy
Histoire du sport en France,Jean-Paul Callède
L' esprit sportif,Jean-Paul Callède
Sociologie des politiques sportives locales,Jean-Paul Callède
Sportmotorische Entwicklung,Friedrich Fetz
"La sociologie française et la pratique sportive, 1875-2005",Jean-Paul Callède
The case of the screaming skates and other mysteries,L. E. Wolfe
Grundriss des Sportrechts und des Sporthaftungsrechts,Bernhard Reichert
Thelwell's Sporting prints,Norman Thelwell
"XXVIII Międzyuczelniana Konferencja Studenckich Kół Naukowych, Poznań, 26 i 27 kwietnia 1991 r","Ogólnopolska Konferencja Studenckich Kół Naukowych Akademii Wychowania Fizycznego (28th 1991 Poznań, Poland)"
Methodology in Comparative Physical Education and Sport,Reet Howell
Sports of the world,Louis Trimble
"The Karate Kid, Part II",B. B. Hiller
An unfair advantage,James Allan Davis
Zwei Medizin-Professoren als Turnreformer,Eerke U. Hamer
Massena stories,Scott Conroe
Epithesē,Sōtērēs Kakisēs
Sports marketing,Chris Brooks
Kognitionen und Emotionen in sportlichen Leistungssituationen,Sabine Rethorst
Spitzensport in Japan,Willi Könning
Estudios y trabajos técnicos,Galicia (Spain : Region). Consellería de Cultura e Benestar Social. Dirección Xeral de Xuventude e Deportes.
Basketball skills,Tom Robinson
The book of manly games for boys,George Frederick Pardon
Playing by the rules,"Wilson, John"
Young scientist and sports,George Barr
Biorhythm sports forecasting,Bernard Gittelson
Les tournants de la gloire,Alain Giraudo
Ariyoshi Sawako to shichinin no supōtsuman,"Ariyoshi, Sawako"
Frisbee disc flying is for me,Tom Moran
"Up close, and in your face with the greats, near-greats, and ingrates of sports",Roy Firestone
Slices of orange,Sal Maiorana
White water rafting,Marty Nabhan
Matematika i sport,Leonid Efimovich Sadovskiĭ
Some thoughts on sports,Muneer Ahmad Rashid
Sports science researches,"Sharma, S. S."
"Sports psychology, a study of Indian sportsmen",Agya Jit Singh.
The ultimate sports trivia book,Tim Hays
Sports,Staci Bonner
Sports,Allen F. Richardson
Paintball!,"Barnes, Bill"
Social issues in contemporary sport,"Wise, Suzanne"
Ley del deporte,Bolivia.
MacArthur must die,Ian Slater
Ultimate sports nutrition,Frederick C. Hatfield
"Alternatywne metody oceny i agregacji wyników, oraz potencjałów sportovych",Bogusław Ryba
Psikhologii͡a︡ rukovodstva i liderstva v sportivnom kollektive,R. L. Krichevskiĭ
"Sport und Sportler, Image und Marktwert",Erhard Thiel
Der nichtsportliche Sport,Knut Dietrich
Kommerzielle Sportanbieter,Knut Dietrich
"Public hearing before Senate Revenue, Finance, and Appropriations Committee","New Jersey. Legislature. Senate. Revenue, Finance and Appropriations Committee."
Sport management field experiences,Jacquelyn Cuneen
Accept the challenge cuz there's only one way 2 play!,Dal Shealy
Success in sports,Nick David Smart
"The Olympic games, Trinidad and Tobago, 1948-1988",Anthony Mark Jones
Dzieje kultury fizycznej w Polsce w XIX i XX wieku,"Gaj, Jerzy prof. nadzw. dr hab."
Le sport et son droit,Dominique Rémy
Wahrnehmungs- und Reaktionsleistungen von Sportspielern,Gerhard Schmidt
Epharmosmenē athlētikē psychologia,Anastasios Vas Stalikas
Idrett og samfunn,Sigmund Loland
Drawings from the Cheap Seats,Richard Harris
Psicologia della personalità nello sport,Giovanni Pietro Lombardo
Spiel und Sport am japanischen Kaiserhof,Jörg Möller
Sport und Freizeit in Stuttgart,Hans Wieland
"PON VIII pretasi, Jakarta 1973",Pekan Olahraga Nasional
Soziale Integration vereinsorganisierter Jugendlicher,"Tina Nobis, Jürgen Baur"
MAS nite,"MAS Sports and Recreation Club, Kuching, Sarawak"
ספורט הניווט,Shmuel Goren
Theologie und Sportphilosophie,Tim Nebelung
Aufbau eines körperlich-aktiven Lebensstils,"Fuchs, Reinhard, Wiebke Göhner, Harald Seelig"
Pädagogische Professionalität und stellvertretende Problembearbeitung,Ilka Lüsebrink
Vorbilder im Sport,"Thorsten Schauerte, Jürgen Schwier"
Millisekunden und Milliarden,Helmut Dietl
Sport ist Spitze,Germany) Internationaler Workshop/Sportgespräch der Ruhrolympiade (21st 2006 Cologne
Mitmenschlichkeit und Sport,Stefan Schenk
Sport und Recht,Universität St. Gallen. Institut für Rechtswissenschaft und Rechtspraxis
Sport und Gesundheit in Wirtschaft und Gesellschaft,Sabine Urnik
"""Deutschland bewegt sich!""","Walter Brehm, Tobias Krug, Till Limbrock"
Was ist Sport in den Medien?,Thorsten Schauerte
נתניה מצדיעה לספורטאים המצטיינים לשנת 5002,Netanyah (Israel)
Feedbackkompetenz,Gernot Schmitt
Jugar con ventaja,Salomé de Diego
Respect in en door sport,Paul Verweel
Sport e mercato,"Antonio Flamini, Luca Di Nella"
Sfera fizychnoï kulʹtury i sportu v umovakh rynku,I͡U. P. Michuda
Steuerbarkeit von Sportregionen,Christoph Breuer
Organisationsentwicklungen und De-Institutionalisierungsprozesse im Sport,"Thomas Alkemeyer, Bero Rigauer, Gabriele Sobiech, G. Anders"
Europa in beweging,"Jeroen Scheerder, Charlotte Van Tuyckom, An Vermeersch"
Sporting colours,Mihir Bose
Aggression und Konflikt im Sport,Gunter Pilz
Towards efficient grassroot sports administration and implementation of sports development policy in the local governments,"Zone 6 Workshop for Local Government Councillors, Sports Officers, Organising Secretaries (1st 1991 Kaduna, Nigeria)"
Konvergenz im TV-Sport,Rolf Scholz
Die Vielfalt der Sportwissenschaft,"Silja Schröder, Martin Holzweg"
"Voilà, une dame!",Bernd Barth
Wer läuft denn da?,Dieter H. Jütting
Het voordeel van thuis spelen,Agnes Elling
奥运会法律问题,Shixi Huang
"Harvard freshman directory of tradesmen for the Class of 1906, 1902-1903",Harvard University Associated Tradesmen
Raceball,Kathryn A. Tiskus
U mikrofonu byli ..,Miloslav Holman
Co jsme do mikrofonu neřekli,Miloslav Holman
Co se nevešlo do mikrofonu,Miloslav Holman
Having a ball,Egypt 2010 Bid
Lessons from the Edge,Maryann Karinch
History of sport and physical education in the United States,"Swanson, Richard A."
菏泽地区体育志,Heze Diqu (China). Ti yu yun dong wei yuan hui. Shi zhi ban gong shi
Sportgeist,"Maria Perrefort, Diana Lenz-Weber, Hans-Günther Fascies, Eva-Maria Lerche"
Con,Con Houlihan
In so many words,Con Houlihan
"An overview of programme implementation of Directorate General of Out-of-School Education, Youth and Sports (Diklusepora) during the Fifth-Five Year Development Plan (Repelita V), 1989/1990-1993/1994","Indonesia. Dirjen Pendidikan Luar Sekolah, Pemuda dan Olah Raga."
Almanac of North Dakota Sports,Robert R. Schaible
Sport in der Klassengesellschaft,Gerhard Vinnai
"Sportspiele: Technik, Training Taktik",Deutsche Hochschule für Körperkultur Leipzig.
Anthropologie du geste sportif,Gérard Bruant
Handbook of Athletic Training,Phillip Hossler
Urheilijan psyykkinen valmennus,Laura Jansson
Law and sports,Pat Okupa
Kosmos i sport,A. V. Sedov
Radio times book of sporting dates,"Morrison, Ian"
Biomechanics in sport--a 1987 update,American Society of Mechanical Engineers. Winter Meeting
The jock empire,Glenn Dickey
The rise and fall of American sport,Ted Vincent
Thrill Sports in the Great Lakes Region,Bill Bailey
Vocabulario elemental do deporte,Paulino Novo Folgueira
"Outdoor adventures, San Francisco Bay Area",Rick Blick
Physical education and sport in the cause of humanism,"International Conference of Ministers and Senior Officials Responsible for Physical Education and Sport (2nd 1988 Moscow, R.S.F.S.R.)"
Vivere o morire,Alfonso Lamberti
Sport e diritto,Alfonso Lamberti
A century of sports at the Mount,Frank Zarnowski
Dirt on their skirts,Doreen Rappaport
Report of the Advisory Council on Sport and Recreation,Singapore. Advisory Council on Sport and Recreation.
The case of the basketball joker and other mysteries,Karen Gardner
al- Tarbīyah wa al-riyāḍah,Ghazāl Ḥamīd Abū Rayyā
Breitensport in der Schweiz,Martin Strupler
History of sport and physical education in the United States,Betty Mary Spears
Sports after 50,Ted Overton
Law in sport,Bernard Patrick Maloy
Parsis and sports and kindred subjects,H. D. Darukhanawala
Sports for sale,David A. Klatell
"50 Jahre Schweizer Wehrsport, 1936-1986",Willy Grundbacher
Lughati rusī-tojikii terminḣoi sport,N. Tursunov
Proceedings of the Second Conference of Ministers In-Charge of Youth Affairs and Sports in States & Union Territories held at Bangalore on 9-10 June 1987,"Conference of Ministers In-Charge of Youth Affairs and Sports in States & Union Territories (2nd 1987 Bangalore, India)"
"Games, sports, and exercises for the physically disabled",Ronald C. Adams
A woman's touch,David Canning Epperson
Hoosier sports heroes,Dale Ogden
Sport an Bord,Ingenieurhochschule für Seefahrt Warnemünde/Wustrow. Wissenschaftsbereich Studentensport. Kolloquium
Sport und Gesundheit in Schule und Verein,Regionaler Sportlehrerkongress Siegen (2nd 1987)
Entrenamiento deportivo,Luis Enrique Ortiz Astúa
Dove va lo sport italiano,Luigi Chierici
A career in-- professional sports,Jeff Savage
Passing show again,Joel Mervis
al- Alʻāb wa-al-riyāḍāt al-shaʻbīyah wa-dawruhā fī al-riyāḍah al-jamāhīrīyah,Abū Bakr Muḥammad Aḥmad Kuraymīd
L' almanach du sport algerien,Hamid Grine
Idræt og socialt arbejde i samspil,Lars Alrø Olesen
Made in Birmingham,Denis Howell
Strukturelle Aspekte des Hochleistungssports in der Bundesrepublik,Karl-Heinrich Bette
Förderungseinrichtungen im Hochleistungssport,Karl-Heinrich Bette
Mówione warianty wypowiedzi w środowisku sportowym,Jan Ożdżyński
Pretend you're a sports pro,Karen Bryant-Mole
Die Rolle des Sports bei der europäischen Einigung,Martin Klose
Taktik im Sportspiel,Klaus Roth
Das lukrative Werbegeschäft mit Sport und Fitness,Peter Lichtenauer
Coroebus triumphs,Sport Literature Association. Meeting
The sports lover's guide to Europe,Bill Morton
Der Wettkampf in der Alten Eidgenossenschaft,Walter Schaufelberger
Divided truths,P. Heinecke
The Norm Hitzges' historical sports almanac,Norm Hitzges
Getting into the game,Judith E. Greenberg
V interesakh vsestoronnego razvitii͡a︡ lichnosti,Valentin Sergeevich Filippovich
Street luge racing,"Ryan, Patrick"
To run with Longboat,Brenda Zeman
"Latvijas sporta vēsture, 1918-1944",Vilis Cǐka
Free sports memorabilia,Elizabeth B. Fulgaro
Organisations et fédérations sportives,Bernard Ramanantsoa
Great moments in southern California sports,Earl Gustkey
The athletes and athletic sports of Scotland,W. McCombie Smith
"Metodicheski materiali v pomosht na nizovii͡a komsomolski aktiv po problemite na masovata fizkultura, sporta i turizma",T͡Sentralen komitet na DKMS.
"Felice Hansch in sport, 1922-1934","Martin, Colin"
The economics of professional team sports,Henry G. Demmert
Athletics Enigmas,Alastair Aitken
A laboratory amnual for significant experiences in the psychological aspects of sport,Brent S. Rushall
Tribün cemaatinin öfkesi,Artun Ünsal
Erwachsenensport als Weiterbildung,Hans-Jürgen Schulke
Sports physiology,Richard W. Bowers
Statut social et fiscal des athlètes de haut niveau,Daniel Berthelot
Ḥuqūq-i varzishī,Ḥusayn Āqāʼīʹniyā
Le sport au Liban,Joseph Sacré
The sports equipment book,Michael Emberley
Is the moon in China just as round?,Jonathan Kolatch
The Guinness Book of Sporting Blunders,Cris Freddi
Athlētikē historia tōn Trikalōn,Vasileios D. Pelinkos
Topsport in het geding,Nicolaas Johannes Maria Nelissen
In de pas,André Swijtink
Life sciences,Maccabiah-Wingate International Congress (1990 Wingate Institute for Physical Education and Sport)
Suomi urheilun suurvaltana,Reijo Häyrinen
Polish sport,Zbigniew Chmielewski
La condition physique,Raymond Thomas
La préparation psychologique du sportif,Raymond Thomas
Jugendarbeit im Sport,Friedrich Mevert
Sports conditioning,Frank O'Neill
III Krajowa Konferencja Naukowa Polonijna Kultura Fizyczna,"Krajowa Konferencja Naukowa Polonijna Kultura Fizyczna (3rd 1985 Rogi, Gorzów Wielkopolski, Poland)"
Det frivillige og ulønnede lederarbejde,Bjarne Ibsen
Danskernes idrætsaktivitet,Bjarne Ibsen
The Special Olympics,Nancy Gilbert
Creative administration in physical education and athletics,Robert A. Pestolesi
It's time for sports trivia,John Boyle
Methoden der Fehleranalyse durch Bewegungsbeobachtung,Hartmut Baumann
Odd Moments in Sports,Joel H. Cohen
College athletic scholarships,Bob Mauro
The psychology of sport,"Grant, Robert W."
From A-Train to Yogi,Chuck Wielgus
Computerunterstützte Sportspielanalyse,Wolf-Dietrich Miethling
Donkey baseball & other sporting delights,Giles Tippette
II Krajowa Konferencja Naukowa Polonijna Kultura Fizyczna,"Krajowa Konferencja Naukowa Polonijna Kultura Fizyczna (2nd 1982 Rogi, Gorzów Wielkopolski, Poland)"
Zemli͡a molodosti,V. Kudri͡avt͡sev
I'll try anything once,Giles Tippette
"Bewegung, Handlung, Sport",Peter Weinberg
Funkt͡s︡ionalni izsledvanii͡a︡ v sporta i masovata fizkultura,Vesko Dushkov
Sports for everybody,Stefan Petrov
A bibliography of strength and basic muscle function in sport and industry,Nikki S. Robinson
Handbuch Freizeitsport (Beitrage Zur Lehre Und Forschung Im Sport),Siegfried Thielbeer
Spartan seasons II,Lynn Henning
Boston sports trivia,Bernard Corbett
"Sport und Geschäft, Professionalisierung im Sport",Harald Fischer
Sport und Spiel,Siegfried Laser
The sporting Ukraine,Igorʹ Zaseda
Werbung im und mit Sport,Axel Dreyer
Mezhdunarodnoe sportivnoe dvizhenie,A. O. Romanov
"Win, lose & Drew",Drew Litton
"Win, Lose & Drew Greatest Hits",Drew Litton
Bibliographie sélective sur les sports,Bibliothèque centrale de la ville et de la province de Liège (Belgium)
"Buḥūth al-Muʼtamar al-Dawlī--""al-Riyāḍah lil-Jamīʻ fī al-Duwal al-Nāmiyah""","Muʼtamar al-Dawlī: ""al-Riyāḍah lil-Jamīʻ fī al-Duwal al-Nāmiyah"" (1985 Jāmiʻat Ḥulwān)"
Winter sports verse,Williams Haynes
"Proceedings of the Alaska Sports Medicine, Fitness, and Recreation Annual Conferences","Alaska Sports Medicine, Fitness, and Recreation Conference (1984 University of Alaska, Anchorage)"
Sports Physiology,Edward L. Fox
Interval training; conditioning for sports and general fitness,Edward L. Fox
"I.T., interval training for lifetime fitness",Edward L. Fox
L' adolescent et les sports,Georges Durand
Playing the game,Kathleen E. McCrone
Sociology of sport,Paul Redekop
Mravnosť a športový kolektív,Rudolf Mandelík
Modern sports administration,James G. Mason
Van onze reporter ter plaatse,Jan Cornand
Henry Chaplin; a memoir,Edith Vane-Tempest-Stewart
We Are a Team/somos Un Equipo,Sharon Gordon
Somos Un Equipo/ We Are a Team,Sharon Gordon
Physical and psychological effects of athletic competition on children and youth,Vern Seefeldt
Effektivität und Effizienz in der Rehabilitation,Klaus Schüle
Turn- und Sportstätten Ende 1955,Germany (West). Statistisches Bundesamt.
Red gold,Grigori Raiport
Athletics at Boston College,Nathaniel John Hasenfus
Chwaraeon,Tim Hammond
Sports for the handicapped,"Allen, Anne"
Leibesübungen und volkstümliches Treiben in Halle an der Saale,Hans-Georg John
Computersimulation zur Entwicklung sportmotorischer Techniken,Rüdiger Preiss
Heir to a dream,Pete Maravich
Paintball,Joanne Mattern
Bulgarian sport,Stefan Petrov
Self-hypnosis,John G. Kappas
Nauchnye osnovy sporta vysshikh dostizheniĭ i podgotovki sportivnykh rezervov,V. N. Baranov
The athlete's garland,Wallace Rice
"Muʼtamar al-Riyāḍah lil-Jamīʻ, 15-17 Mārs 1984","Muʼtamar al-Riyāḍah lil-Jamīʻ (1984 Cairo, Egypt)"
"Buḥūth al-muʼtamar, 15-17 Mārs 1984","Muʼtamar al-Riyāḍah lil-Jamīʻ (1984 Cairo, Egypt)"
A documentary analysis of competitive track and field for women at Tuskegee Institute and Tennessee State University,Nolan A. Thaxton
Who's on first?,Jack Mabley
Active sports,Arnold Mitchell
Psychophysiologie sportlicher Belastung,Manfred Schrode
Sport in der Psychiatrie,Gloria Bornkamp-Baake
Sporting art in eighteenth-century England,Stephen Deuchar
Sport et existence,Paul Ducros
The directory of athletic scholarships,"Green, Alan"
Zum Phänomen des kontralateralen Transfers,"Kuhn, Werner"
Histoire illustrée des sports et de l'éducation physique en Algérie de 1946 à 1962,Louis Sigala
Sportsdigte,Jørgen Leth
Perfect windsurfing,Ernstfried Prade
Theoretical foundation of sport science as a scientific discipline,Herbert Haag
Talking a good game,Spencer K. Wertz
"Polen, Türken, Sozialisten",Diethelm Blecking
Wirtschafts- und verkehrsgeographische Auswirkungen von Sportveranstaltungen hohen Publikumsinteresses,Hartmut Baumann
English sports und deutsche Bürger. Eine Gesellschaftsgeschichte 1800-1939,Christiane Eisenberg
The games the Indians played,Sigmund A. Lavine
La réussite sportive,Raymond Thomas
Histoire du sport,Raymond Thomas
The Bulgarian Olympic Committee,Dimitŭr Karalampiev
Sports Hall of Oblivion,C. Hershberger
Enciclopedia deportiva boricua,Jaime Varas
La verdadera historia de los deportes puertorriqueños,Jaime Varas
Ideologie und Wissenschaft in der Sportsoziologie der DDR,Willi Lutz
Fjalor anglisht-shqip i termave të sportit,Gazmend Goci
Der Sport am Scheideweg,Alois Koch
Inhumaner Hochleistungssport,Alois Koch
The legal implications of barriers to entry into the professional team sports market under North American competition law,Kevin Patrick McGuinness
Accidents happen,Ann Courtenay Edmonds Welch
The super camper caper,John Himmelman
How different sports rate in promoting physical fitness,President's Council on Physical Fitness and Sports (U.S.)
Hot dogging and snow boarding,Robert W. Guthrie
Lichnostʹ v sporte,"Bludov, I͡U. M."
Sportivnye suveniry,V. N. Ilʹinskiĭ
Lo sport,Guido Panico
"Research in the history, philosophy, and international aspects of physical education and sport: bibliographies and techniques",Earle F. Zeigler
Sportliche Betätigung und Persönlichkeit,Hans-Gerhard Sack
Zur Psychologie des jugendlichen Leistungssportlers,Hans-Gerhard Sack
Ilustrovaný sportovní slovník příruční,Karel Tauš
Sprechen im Sportunterricht,Detlef Kuhlmann
Grasmere's giants of today,Rex Woods
The arts of sport and recreation,Derek Stanford
My lucky hat,"O'Malley, Kevin"
Evaluation von Lehr- und Lernprozessen im Sport,Herbert Haag
Sportphilosophie,Herbert Haag
Mass physical education and sport in Bulgaria,Krum Vasilchev
Play,Patricia Lakin
Red Stockings and Out-Of-Towners,Stanford J. Layton
It's a sporting life,Jim Webster
Sportistŭt i negovite ideali,Dimitŭr Vŭtov Kalchev
Sporting royals,Nicholas Courtney
The making of high-performance athletes,Debra A. Shogan
Śnieżne i błękitne stadiony,Aleksander Rymkiewicz
Pasión deportiva,Manuel Joaquín Báez Vargas
Vsë o sovetskikh olimpiĭt͡s︡akh,B. N. Khavin
"Korporat͡s︡ii͡a︡ ""Sport""",Slavcho Kŭnchev
Bowled over!,Frank Keating
Gents and players,Frank Keating
Sport and recreation liability and you!,Brian W. Robertson
ICHPER proceedings,"ICHPER World Congress (24th 1981 Manila, Philippines)"
Sports als Therapie,Hermann Rieder
Personalizing physical education and sport philosophy,Earle F. Zeigler
Bewegungslehre des Sports,Hermann Rieder
Physical education and sport philosophy,Earle F. Zeigler
Desporto e política,Noronha Feio
The great American sports book,Thomas C. Jones
Nemet͡sko-russkiĭ sportivnyĭ slovarʹ,S. M. Vaĭt͡sekhovskiĭ
You're the judge!,John M. Fotiades
The parent's guide to kids' sports,Lee R. Schreiber
365 amazing days in sports,Eric Sherman
Seven Lifetime Sports,Jerry Clark
Šport a právo,Jozef Prusák
Výběr sportovních talentů,Miloslav Kodým
Alphabet of African animals,Laura Gates Galvin
Indagine speciale su alcuni aspetti delle vacanze e degli sports della popolazione,Istituto centrale di statistica (Italy)
"A picture of the manners, customs, sports, and pastimes of the inhabitants of England",Jehoshaphat Aspin
Task Force on Academic Achievement of Student-Athletes,"University of Maryland, College Park. Task Force on Academic Achievement of Student-Athletes."
Sportsprache in der Romania,"Joachim Born, Maria Lieber"
Erfahrung als Bildungskategorie,Martin Giese
樂山市體育志,China). Ti yu ju Leshan Shi (Sichuan Sheng
Effektivität und Effizienz öffentlicher Sportförderung,"Erich Thöni, Martin-Peter Büch, Elmar Kornexl"
崇庆县体委志,Chongqing Xian ti yu yun dong wei yuan hui
The proceedings before the Court of Arbitration for Sport,"Antonio Rigozzi, Michele Bernasconi"
Sport integriert,"Axel Horn, Jens Keyssner"
"Universitätszentrum Obergurgl, Internationales Zentrum für Forschung, Tagung und Sport",Ruth Jochum-Gasser
"Economic and employment characteristics of the sport, recreation, and fitness industries",Gary Prosser
La lingua dello sport in Italia è ancora fascista,Lorenzo Castellana
1990 sports census,Susan Quay
"Sport, Alltag, Kultur",Hans-Jürgen Schulke
Soziale Schichtung im Sport,Dieter Voigt
Sportsoziologie,Dieter Voigt
International sport,Sir Theodore Andrea Cook
Sport im Lebenslauf,Eli Frogner
Eine soziologische Untersuchung über Aggression im Sport,Eli Frogner
More sports bloopers,Phyllis Hollander
Sportliche und aussersportliche Jugendarbeit bei verschiedenen Angebotsträgern,Ekkehard Kappeler
Army vs. Notre Dame,James Caleb Beach
"Association football: Scotland v. England, 1872-1946 [i.e. 1947]",Chalmers Anderson
Champions in action,"Wolff, Paul"
Anglo-russkiĭ slovarʹ sportivnykh terminov,N       N Skorodumova
Now I'll tell one,Jack Strausberg
Grundlagen und Wesen der altjapanischen Sportkünste,Martin Filla
Fizicheskoe vospitanie i sport v SSSR,F. Legostaev
It's fun to keep fit,Frederick Bushnell Barton
No gold footballs,Warren N. Kellogg
Gorillas were my neighbors,Fred G. Merfield
"A recreation and sports handbook for playground, school, community and camp",Ferdinand John Lipovetz
"Recreation; a handbook of playground, school and adult recreation",Ferdinand John Lipovetz
The referee's wife takes time out,Katherine S. Lobach
Frank Leahy and the fighting Irish,Arch Ward
"Win, lose, or draw","Brown, Warren"
Rockne,"Brown, Warren"
Obair is luadhainn,Colm Ó Gaora
Popular sports,Frank Dudley Collins
The game-way to sports,Harry Atwood Reynolds
Over 150 free and nearly free freebies for sports fans!,Bruce M. Nash
The sports hall of shame,Bruce M. Nash
Life and sport in Aiken and those who made it,Harry Worcester Smith
The Golden Hurricane,Robert Rutland
Sportivnye igry,Mikhail Stepanovich Kozlov
Mathematik und wehrsport,Ernst Lampe
Les fêtes du muscle,Georges Rozet
Sporting days and sporting ways,Nicholas Lane Jackson
The control of football injuries,Marvin Allen Stevens
Think like a champion,Mike Shanahan
Troy,"Jennifer D. Day, Robert Giovannetti"
Tre kronor genom tiderna,Lars-Gunnar Björklund
Sportivnoe pravo,K. N. Gusov
Dang dai Zhongguo ti yu lun li jian gou yan jiu,Zhengwei Gong
Inkast,P. G. Fahlström
Spalding's official sporting rules,James Edward Sullivan
Sporting glory,"Victoria and Albert Museum, London"
Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura i sport v Rossiĭskoĭ Federat︠s︡ii,Russia (Federation)
Federalʹnyĭ zakon O fizicheskoĭ kulʹture i sporte v Rossiĭskoĭ Federat͡s︡ii,Russia (Federation)
The world's greatest athlete,Gerald C. Gardner
Women of sports.,Rachel Rutledge
Yankee for Life,Bobby Murcer
The next karate kid,B. B. Hiller
"Ethics, knowledge and truth in sports research",Graham McFee
Il diritto nello sport,Guido Valori
Elapsed time at the Olympics,Dianne Irving
Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura kak institut kachestva zhizni v uslovii︠a︡kh rossiĭskoĭ sot︠s︡ialʹnoĭ realʹnosti,V. A. Baranov
"The new book of rules, official and standard",Richard Kyle Fox
[Sports illustrated presents special commemorative issue publications].,
Manual of sporting rules,Ed James
Téarmaí cluichidheachta,Ireland. Dept. of Education
Ambrose Goes For Gold,Tor Freeman
"Aktualʹnye problemy fiziologii, fizicheskogo vospitanii︠a︡ i sporta",L. D. Nazarenko
"Le sport entre public et privé, frontières et porosités","Christophe Guibert, Société de sociologie du sport de langue française. Congrès international"
Sports law in Italy,"Colucci, Michele Ph. D."
Kiss 'em goodbye,Dennis Purdy
Different speeds and different needs,Gary Barber
Participation in sport,Matthew Nicholson
L'art et le sport,European Committee for Sports History. Colloque international
Xin shi dai Han Ying ti yu ci dian =,Tingquan Zhang
Reading our common wealth,National Book Trust
Biograficheskiĭ slovarʹ sfery fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta Ti︠u︡menskogo regiona,"Zuev, V. N. doktor pedagogicheskikh nauk"
Rivals,David Kenneth Wiggins
Ao yun lai dao Zhongguo,Shiming Luo
Verschenkter Lorbeer,Ferdinand Kösters
Copying it down,H. A. Dorfman
Globalization and football,Richard Giulianotti
Querpass,Andrei S. Markovits
The rookie,Janice Greene
Futbol i llengua,"Casals, Daniel"
El deporte en Occidente,José Luis Jiménez Salvador
Wow!,Bruce Foster
Sports for peace Mindanao,Deutsche Gesellschaft für Technische Zusammenarbeit
The Penguin book of South African sports trivia,David O'Sullivan
"Sport, media and society",Eileen Kennedy
All-star bathroom sampler,Max Brallier
Branded,Jason W. Lee
Heroes & ballyhoo,Michael K. Bohn
What Washington can learn from the world of sports,George Allen
Körper--Sport--Stress,Fachsymposium zur Salutogenese in Österreich (3rd 2006 Institut für Stressprophylaxe & Salutogenese)
Indian champions,Chitra Garg
Sports industry,John Greenwald
Not in our house!,Tom D. Freijo
Han dai ti yu =,Bingguo Liu
The greatest moments in sports,Len Berman
Excellences sportives,Jean-Michel Faure
Not in our house!,Tom D. Freijo
Madden NFL 09 Limited Edition Bundle,"Mojo Media, Inc. , VG Sports, Paul Gleason, Bernie Hayes, Ron Jackson, John Gaudiosi, Jon G. Robinson"
"Sport, életmód, egészség",Irén Acsai
A practical guide to sport management internships,"Miller, John undifferentiated"
Fundamentals of sport and exercise nutrition,Marie Dunford
Psychology gets in the game,Christopher D. Green
Ancient Roman sports and pastimes,Nicola Barber
Examining sports development,Michael F. Collins
Uncle John's bathroom reader sports spectacular,
"Aspekṭịm shel ""Modernah"" ba-""Shtẹtḷ"" be-Polin",Leʾah Eldor
Les langues du sport,Giovanni Dotoli
"O passado, o presente, e as perspectivas para o desenvolvimento de desporto em Moçambique",Alberto Graziano
Rules of the game,Matthew Mills Stevenson
Globalization and football,Richard Giulianotti
Le dimensioni collettive dello sport,Liana Maria Daher
"""Dopium fürs Volk?""",Hans Lenk
"Crossing sidelines, crossing cultures",Joel S. Franks
Power forward,Jason Glaser
Rivals!,Richard O. Davies
La vita e altri giochi di squadra,Candido Cannavò
The greatest moments in sports,Len Berman
Leading the way,"National Association of Fellowships Advisors. Conference, David Kenneth Wiggins, R. Pierre Rodgers"
Good game,Shirl J. Hoffman
Soccer by the numbers,Colleen Dolphin
I threw my brother out,Ted Scheu
Advances in applied sport psychology,Stephen D. Mellalieu
Trail riding,Martha Martin
Baseball by the numbers,Mary Elizabeth Salzmann
Psychology gets in the game,Christopher D. Green
I threw my brother out,Ted Scheu
Sports industry,John Greenwald
Sportivement politique,Alain Herbet
Biologiczne i społeczne podstawy wychowania fizycznego i sportu,Wojciech Czarny
Sport psychology,Arnold D. LeUnes
The great book of San Francisco Bay Area sports lists,Damon Bruce
The armchair companion to Chicago sports,Richard Lindberg
Wonders of bodily strength and skill,Guillaume Depping
Sport and foreign policy in a globalizing world,Steven J. Jackson
"For playground, field, and forest",Daniel Carter Beard
The book of athletics and out-of-door sports ...,"Bingham, Norman W[illiams] jr.,"
The 1992 Information Please sports almanac,Mike Meserole
Outdoor games for all seasons,Daniel Carter Beard
Zhongguo Aolinpike yun dong tong shi =,Lequan Cui
Banjo-Kazooie,Russel Murray
Greek athletic sports and festivals,E. Norman Gardiner
Slide show,Steven Hoffman
The complete sports dictionary,"Sullivan, George"
Sport eye,Allen Spencer Tenney
Out-door sports,
"Handbook of summer athletic sports, comprising","Whittaker, Fred,"
Our boys; what they can do and how to do it,"Stoddart, William,"
LeBron James,Shanya Worthy
Geleneksel spor dallarının geliştirilmesi,Devlet Planlama Teşkilatı (Turkey)
Weird moments in sports,Bruce Weber
Out-door sports for boys (and girls),Lynds E. Jones
The book of athletics,Paul Withington
Boys' own book,"Clarke, William"
"The saloon keeper's companion, and book of reference, for saloon keepers, proprietors of hotels, and sporting men",Addison V.] Newton
Ourdoor sports and games,Claude Harris Miller
The reliable book of outdoor games,"Chadwick, Henry"
Philosophy of sport,Alun Hardman
Estatuto do torcedor,Luiz Flávio Gomes
Una grande annata,Giancarlo Montaldo
Marketing ovale,Antonio Pagano
Handbuch Evaluation im Sport,Alexander Woll
Sport v Respublike Komi,E. E. Shomysova
Sports in America,Janet Podell
Sports et médias,Michaël Attali
Sportsmanship,Nick Hunter
La paix par le sport,Joël Bouzou
Level playing field for all?,Leanne Doherty
Hot hand,Alan Reifman
The rule book,Diagram Group
Soldiers' games,
All that remains,Bruce Brooks
Spiel und Kommunikation in der Sekundarstufe 2,Klaus Bertelsmann
Introduction to sport management,Mark S. Nagel
The 100 sporting events you must see live,Robert Tuchman
"Words with wings, an instructional guide for improving English communication skills",Denver Public Schools.
Persuasion of my days,H. A. Dorfman
Uma bela jogada,João Henrique Areias
La santé par le vélo,E. A. Maury
Droit du sport,Frédéric Buy
Board sports,Isabel Thomas
La lingua francese dello sport,Stefano Santavenere
Erinnerungen an Carl Diem,Michael Krüger
What it means to be an Aggie,Rusty Burson
Am Ball der Zeit,Rebekka Ladewig
Physisches Selbstkonzept im Sport,Maike Tietjens
Aretism,"Heather Lynne Reid, Mark Holowchak"
Roger Federer,Anne K. Brown
Ṭhāna tvaṅʻʺ phratʻ sanʻʺ lā khaiʹ ra so ʼāʺ ka cāʺ choṅʻ rvakʻ khaiʹ mhu myāʺ nhaṅʻʹ cāʺ reʺ sū e* bhava ʼa tveʹ ʼa kruṃ,Moṅʻ Moṅʻ
Le sport ne sert pas qu'à faire des champions!,Jean-Philippe Acensi
Kukka taep'yo simnihak,Pyŏng-hyŏn Kim
Qi wen hua yu Zhongguo zao qi ti yu,Jinglong Wang
Zhongguo gu dai ti yu fa zhan shi,Lequan Cui
Ripensare lo sport,Giuseppe Sorgi
Marketing ovale,Antonio Pagano
Sport et travail,Claude Sobry
Stadium Philosophers - Οι φιλόσοφοι των γηπέδων,"Kostas Pallis - Giotis Panagiotas - Nikos Papanagnou (Κώστας Πάλλης, Γιώτης Παναγιωτάς, Νίκος Παπανάγνου)"
The sacred origin and nature of sports and culture,Ghazi bin Muhammad Prince of Jordan
Cool sports parties,Karen Latchana Kenney
Management strategies in athletic training,Richard Ray
Becoming native in a foreign land,Gillian Poulter
Dang dai Beijing ti yu shi hua,Shan Jin
Scorecasting,Tobias J. Moskowitz
"Images de sport, de l'archive à l'histoire",Françoise Bosman
The sports and pastimes of American boys,"Chadwick, Henry"
Una grande annata,Giancarlo Montaldo
The best of figure skating,Kathy Allen
Handbuch Sportrecht,Martin Nolte
"Ausnahmen von den EU-Grundfreiheiten im Bereich des Sports nach der ""Deliège""-Konzeption",Remus Muresan
Athletics and out-door sports for women,
Ice hockey,Bill Gutman
All that remains,Bruce Brooks
The boy's own book,"[Clarke, William]"
40 shenot sporṭ be-Yiśraʾel,Uriel Simri
Yadʻan sporṭ 1982,Uriel Simri
"Festivals, games, and amusements",Horace Smith
Spin it figure skating,Paul C. Challen
Swing it golf,Paul C. Challen
What to do and how to do it,Daniel Carter Beard
Swing it golf,Paul C. Challen
The Boys' life book of sports stories,Jackson V. Scholz
Baseball and lesser sports,Wilfrid Sheed
Sport und Sozialisation,Filip Mess
Sportsource,"Anderson, Bob"
Il mito del record,Franco Nocchi
Lo sport in Vaticano,Roberto Calvigioni
Professionelle Fussballspieler in der internationalen Rechnungslegung,Jens Hackenberger
Athletes,Ruth Silverman
Estudos brasileiros sobre o esporte,Manoel José Gomes Tubino
Sport w Szczecinie w latach 1996-2007,Zbigniew Szafkowski
Ėstafeta,Aleksandr Kuleshov
Sŭp'och'ŭ ent'ŏt'einmŏnt'ŭpŏp,Chae-ok Chang
Unlikely saviors,Lindsay W. Huddleston
Zirväyä aparan yol,"Aliyev, Heydar, Qabil Mehdiyev"
Fussball in Afrika,Daniel Künzler
Places we play,Mike Cronin
Boy's and girl's book of sports,George Pond Daniels
Strategie per il business dello sport,Paolo Bedin
Gedda e lo sport,"Conferenza nazionale dei presidenti territoriali del CSI (2006 Oropa, Italy)"
"Kinder heute, Bewegungsmuffel, Fastfoodjunkies, Medienfreaks?",Hans Peter Brandl-Bredenbeck
"Kinder heute, Bewegungsmuffel, Fastfoodjunkies, Medienfreaks?",Hans Peter Brandl-Bredenbeck
Crashing Augusta,Jonathan Littman
Talent identification and development in sport,"Joseph Baker, Jörg Schorer, Steve Cobley"
Crashing Augusta,Jonathan Littman
The barnstorming Hawaiian Travelers,Joel S. Franks
Palembang road to SEA Games 2011,Ajmal Rokian
Russkiĭ sportivnyĭ diskurs,E. G. Malysheva
USSR on the sports orbit,
"Soviet sport, questions and answers",
The renegade sportsman,Zach Dundas
S ulybkoĭ o sporte,
225 godina športa u Hrvatskoj,Zdenko Jajčević
"Društvo, nasilje i sport",Dragan Koković
The sports nostalgia quiz book,Zander Hollander
Sportworks,Pat Cupples
Tortoise Football,Giles Andreae
Athletic sports for boys,Marian S. Carson Collection (Library of Congress)
The enduring legacy of the Detroit Athletic Club,Kenneth H. Voyles
Mental toughness,Michael Sheard
There is an I in team,Mark de Rond
Sports psychiatry,David R. McDuff
The comprehensive guide to careers in sports,Glenn M. Wong
Coping and emotion in sport,David Lavallee
Sport na poverke,I︠U︡riĭ Ilʹinskiĭ
Les valeurs de l'olympisme,Michaël Attali
Legal liability in the gymnasium,
Les Stations de sports d'hiver,
Timber!,Lew Freedman
Timber!,Lew Freedman
Sport et relations internationales (1900-1941),"Riordan, James"
European cultures in sport,
Sport under Communism,James Riordan
[Sport vo vsi︠e︡ vremena goda,F. S. Gruzdev
Power up!,Dave Branon
Boston park and recreation and fox 25 reception to celebrate the 25th anniversary of the U.S. youth games ...,Boston (Mass.). Parks and Recreation Dept.
The British olympics,Martin Polley
El tramposo de BMX,Jake Maddox
The Basket ball,Esmé Raji Codell
Zhong wai ti yu jiao liu yu Beijing Ao yun hui =,Bin Hao
Olympic smiles,
Sport pedagogy,Kathleen M. Armour
"The curious, captivating, unusual history of sports",Lucia Raatma
Ralph Ellison papers,Ralph Ellison
Don's Century,Indra Vikram Singh
The great book of Boston sports lists,Andy Gresh
The international politics of sport in the 20th century,Jim Riordan
Zashchishchai︠a︡ chestʹ rodiny,
Pi︠a︡tʹ  kolet︠s︡ pod kremlevskimi zvezdami,N. G. Tomilina
Psychospołeczne uwarunkowania rozwoju sportowego w okresie dorastania,Maciej Tomczak
The Lincoln library of sports champions,
"Invincible, Indiana",Nate Dunlevy
Social psychology in sport,David Lavallee
A story of Soviet sport,
Korean leisure,Erwei Dong
Rio de Janeiro,Carla Rodrigues
Heads up!,Dave Branon
Becoming a true champion,Kirk Mango
Big brave Daddy,Smiljana Coh
The social organization of sports medicine,"Dominic Malcolm, Parissa Safai"
Bolʹshai︠a︡ ėstafeta,N. Kolesnikova
Sportivnai︠a︡ rabotosposobnostʹ,
Mr. Punch's book of sports,
Fizicheskoe vospitanie i sport studentov,
Materialy nauchno-metodicheskoĭ konferent︠s︡ii prepodavateleĭ Litovskogo gosudarstvennogo instituta fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury,
Ėstafeta,Aleksandr Kuleshov
"Edinai︠a︡ vsesoi︠u︡znai︠a︡ sportivnai︠a︡ klassifikat︠s︡ii︠a︡, 1985-1988",
Sport uchashcheĭsi︠a︡ molodezhi,A. A. Viru
Sportyvni vysoty Ukraïny,
Biologicheskoe obosnovanie fizicheskogo vospitanii︠a︡ i sportivnoĭ tekhniki uchashchikhsi︠a︡,A. A. Viru
Osnovy sportivnogo masterstva,A. A. Viru
Putian Shi ti yu zhi,Putian Shi ti yu zhi bian zuan wei yuan hui
Putian Shi ti yu zhi,Putian Shi ti yu zhi bian zuan wei yuan hui
Ėstafeta,Aleksandr Kuleshov
Sports law in Portugal,Rui Botica Santos
Kritik olahraga Sumohadi Marsis,Sumohadi Marsis
Sŭp'och'ŭ ent'ŏt'einmŏnt'ŭpŏp,Chae-ok Chang
Shandong min jian ti yu,Shaoying Lan
Barron's sports injuries handbook,J. P. R. Williams
"Boys' own book of sports, birds, and animals",
Körper- und Einbildungskraft,Gunter Gebauer
The GAA,Mike Cronin
Being safe on wheels,Susan Kesselring
Fizkulʹtura i sport Belarusi,Viktor Ivanovich Anikin
Fair and foul,D. Stanley Eitzen
Athlete performance and injuries,"João H. Bastos, Andreia C. Silva"
Sport public relations,G. Clayton Stoldt
Sport public relations,G. Clayton Stoldt
Sport and democracy in the ancient and modern worlds,Paul Christesen
Athlete performance and injuries,"João H. Bastos, Andreia C. Silva"
Fair and foul,D. Stanley Eitzen
Sport beyond television,Brett Hutchins
Sport beyond television,Brett Hutchins
Sports around the world,John Nauright
The Los Angeles Angels of Anaheim,"Stewart, Mark"
Debrett's guide to Britain,
The Oakland A's,"Stewart, Mark"
Keep your eye on the ball,Sandra Donovan
Sociology of North American sport,George H. Sage
Sport i religioznye organizat︠s︡ii,
Ethical behavior in sport,Herb Appenzeller
Heart of iron,Kyle Garlett
Olympic marketing,Alain Ferrand
Ti yu xin guan nian,Liji Chen
Isindi,
Tsiyonut shel sheririm,Ḥagai Ḥarif
Le muscle et la plume,Antoine Blondin
Społeczne i kulturowe aspekty sportu,Jerzy Kosiewicz
The history of Polish sports and the Olympic movement,Iwona Grys
Sports law,Angelo Veljanovski
Dream jobs in sports marketing,Heather Moore Niver
Jeff Gordon,Laurie Collier Hillstrom
The cultural politics of post-9/11 American sport,Michael L. Silk
Girls and sports,Laura K. Egendorf
Sports finance and management,Jason Winfree
The book of sport,
Ice hockey and curling,Robin Johnson
Sport w Breslau,Sławomir Szymański
Elementy filozofii i teologii sportu,"Kowalczyk, Stanisław ks"
Rehabilitation techniques in sports medicine,William E. Prentice
Psikhofiziologii︠a︡,E. P. Ilʹin
Made to be broken,Allen St. John
"Klinicheskie, matematicheskie i inzhenernye problemy sportivnoĭ medit︠s︡iny",
The sports immortals,Associated Press.
Razvitie fizkulʹtury i sporta v Turkmenistane,
Biological and pedagogical problems of physical education and sport,
Games Persians play,Willem M. Floor
The social organization of sports medicine,"Dominic Malcolm, Parissa Safai"
The Seattle Mariners,"Stewart, Mark"
Sports and exercise nutrition,Frank I. Katch
Better than the best,"Walter, John C."
A cláusula penal nos contratos dos atletas profissionais de futebol,Rodrigo Spinelli
Beneath the Mā̄ori moon,Malcolm Mulholland
Les sportifs français dans la grande guerre,Gilbert Andrieu
Les sportifs français dans la grande guerre,Gilbert Andrieu
Ti yu xue li zhi tan jiu,Wenmei Dong
Wir gegen uns,"Martin, Anne Dr, Barbara Hammerschmitt"
Wir gegen uns,"Martin, Anne Dr, Barbara Hammerschmitt"
Handbuch Sportbiomechanik,"Albert Gollhofer, Müller, Erich Dr. phil"
Handbuch Sportbiomechanik,"Albert Gollhofer, Müller, Erich Dr. phil"
Soldier athletes,Glenn Stout
The sports insider,Jack Ralston
Famous firsts in sports,John Jakes
Tackling bullying in athletics,Meline M. Kevorkian
Belorusskie olimpiĭt︠s︡y,
How they reached the top,
Tartumaa spordileksikon,"Enn Mainla, Johannes Miller, Indrek Kilk"
"""Wir wollten einfach unser Ding machen""",Kai Reinhart
Sports,Jennifer Howse
Onderzoeksmethoden voor sportstudies,Chris Gratton
Zhong Ying Han ti yu ci dian =,Honglie Tian
Athletics and out-door sports for women,
"Olimpijczycy i paraolimpijczycy województwa zachodniopomorskiego, Pekin 2008",Jerzy Eider
When bad things happen to bad people,Cynthia Voigt
"Bad Girls, Bad Girls, Whatcha Gonna Do? (Bad Girls)",Cynthia Voigt
Psikhofiziologicheskie osobennosti uchebnoĭ i sportivnoĭ dei︠a︡telʹnosti,E. P. Ilʹin
"Su ""Dinamo"" emblema",
The last boys picked,Janet Sasson Edgette
Passion for skiing,Stephen L. Waterhouse
Passion for skiing,Stephen L. Waterhouse
For The Love Of The Packers An Atoz Primer For Packers Fans Of All Ages,Mark Anderson
The 50 Most Dynamic Duos In Sports History Baseball Basketball Football And Hockey,Robert W. Cohen
The Race To Transform Sport In Postapartheid South Africa,Ashwin Desai
On This Day In Sport,Ian Trent
Fun Facts For The Sports Lovers,Lee Warren
Notable sports figures,Dana R. Barnes
Roberto Mancini A Biography,Luca Caioli
Tennis,Carla Mooney
Sport And The Social Significance Of Pleasure,Bob Rinehart
Sports Illustrated Kids Year In Sports 2009,Sports Illustrated For Kids
David Boons Funniest Sporting Moments Hilarious Mishaps And Moments From Our Favourite Sports,David Boon
Immortals Of British Sport,Ian Hewitt
From Balti Pies To The Biggest Prize The Rebirth Of Manchester City,Steve Mingle
Introducing Sport Psychology,Arnold LeUnes
Rory Mcilroy The Biography,Frank Worrall
Entrenamiento en balonmano,Juan Antonio Garci a Herrero
Babars Celesteville Games,Laurent de Brunhoff
When Bobby Met Christy The Story Of Bobby Beasley And A Wayward Horse,Declan Colley
Baseball And Social Class Essays On The Democratic Game That Isnt,Ronald E. Kates
A Book Of Heroes Or A Sporting Halfcentury,Simon Barnes
The Smurf Olympics,Yvan Delporte
Pediatric Sports Medicine,Dilip R. Patel
The Negotiable Golf Swing How To Improve Your Game Without Pictureperfect Form,Joseph Laurentino
World Sporting Scandals,Tony Adams
101 Spiritual Lessons For Coaches And Athletes,Rodney Gaines
Now You Know Big Book Of Sports,Doug Lennox
Cross Game,Mitsuri Adachi
My Sport Book,Dick Bruna
The Best American Sports Writing 2009,Glenn Stout
Sport Psychology,David Tod
Fenway A Fascinating First Century,Sports Illustrated
So Long Shea,Ralph Kiner
Acing Depression A Tennis Champions Toughest Match,Hilaire Richey Kallendorf
Laidback Skier For Skiers Riders Snowflakes Of All Ages,Colleen Smith
Historic Photos Of University Of Georgia Football,Patrick Garbin
150 Heroes People In Sport Who Make This A Better World,Richard Lapchick
Catholic Perspectives On Sports From Medieval To Modern Times,Patrick Kelly
The Newberg Report 2011 Bound Edition Covering The Texas Rangers From Top To Bottom,Chuck Greenberg
Just Call Me John The Leadership Story Of John Gagliardi,David Weeres
Ballers Of The New School Race And Sports In America,Thabiti Lewis
Whats It All About Ralphie My Story,Gary Robertson
Ambush Marketing And The Megaevent Monopoly How Laws Are Abused To Protect Commercial Rights To Major Sporting Events,Andre M. Louw
Denver Nuggets ... media guide,Denver Nuggets (Basketball team)
Enciclopedia de los deportes,
Sporturi s Œi jocuri,Neil Jameson
Whites Sports Almanac 20062007,John White
Sports Legends A History Of Minnesota Sports,Phil Tippin
Gone Pro North Carolina Stories Of The Carolina Tar Heels Who Went On To Play In The Pros,Tim W. Jackson
Howard B Wigglebottom Learns About Sportsmanship Winning Isnt Everything,Susan F. Cornelison
The Impact Of Technology On Sport Ii,Franz Konstantn Fuss
The great book of Los Angeles sports lists,Steve Hartman
Tim Tebow Playing With Purpose,Mike Yorkey
Fly and Spin Fishing for River Smallmouths,Bruce Ingram
Sports Illustrated Kids Big Book Of Why,Time Inc Home Entertainment
Billie B. Brown,Sally Rippin
The Art of Sports Photography,Marc Aspland
Intelligent Robotics Systems Inspiring The Next 16th Fira Roboworld Congress Fira 2013 Kuala Lumpur Malaysia August 2429 2013 Proceedings,Khairuddin Omar
The Wild Within Simon Yates,Simon Yates
The Prince Of Tennis The Prince Vs The Child Of The Gods,Takeshi Konomi
Two Sports Myths and Why Theyre Wrong,Jason Winfree
Scholastic Year In Sports 2010,Scholastic Inc.
Boat to Boardroom,Alex Alley
Hockey,Dave McMahon
Dude Wheres Your Helmet,David A. Duncan
The Alltime Biggest Sports Jerks And Other Goofballs Cads Miscreants Reprobates And Weirdos Plus A Few Good Guys,Michael Freeman
"In Your Face 3D
            
                Sports Illustrated Kids",David E. Klutho
Played In London Charting The Heritage Of A City At Play,Simon Inglis
An Indian Summer Of Cricket Reflections On Australias Summer Game,Malcolm McGregor
Phillies Fun And Games A Trivial Account Of Phillies History,Dale Ratermann
Jockocracy Queering Masculinity And Sport,Keith Gilbert
Krper Sport Und Religion Zur Soziologie Religiser Verkrperungen,Robert Gugutzer
A Door In The Ocean A Memoir,David McGlynn
Language Sex And Social Structure Analysing Discourses Of Sexuality,Jodie Clark
"Robocup 2010
            
                Lecture Notes in Computer Science  Lecture Notes in Artific",Eric Chown
Sportology Extremely Important Questions And Answers About Sport From The Science Museum,Glenn Murphy
Called Out But Safe A Baseball Umpires Journey,Al Clark
Swimming With Dr Johnson And Mrs Thrale Sport Health And Exercise In Eighteenthcentury England,Julia Allen
Consumer Behaviour In Sport And Events Marketing Action,Daniel C. Funk
3d Sports Blast,David E. Klutho
101 Sports Not To Try,Adam Russ
Ripleys Sports Believe It Or Not,Believe It or Not! Ripley's
Der Deutsche Olympische Sportbund In Der Zivilgesellschaft Eine Sozialwissenschaftliche Analyse Zur Sportbezogenen Engagementpolitik,Sebastian Braun
Hooey Higgins Goes for Gold,Steve Voake
"The Cultural Politics of Lifestyle Sports
            
                Routledge Critical Studies in Sport",Belinda Wheaton
The Holy Trinity Of American Sports Civil Religion In Football Baseball And Basketball,Craig A. Forney
Intellectual Property Law In The Sports And Entertainment Industries,Patrick K. Thornton
Sport In Capitalist Society A Short History,Tony Collins
Capitalism And Sport Politics Protest People And Play,Michael Lavalette
Introduction To Sport Marketing,Aaron C. T. Smith
Nate El Grande Ataca De Nuevo,Lincoln Peirce
Fifa,Alan Tomlinson
Nutritional ergogenic aids,
The Sports Doping Market Understanding Supply And Demand And The Challenges Of Their Control,Letizia Paoli
Hockey Hotshots Young Stars Of The Nhl,Steele Tyler Filipek
"Plunketts Sports Industry Almanac 2010
            
                Plunketts Sports Industry Almanac",Jack W. Plunkett
In Bod We Trust Brian Odriscoll The Biography Of Irelands Greatest Rugby Hero,Marcus Stead
The New Rules Of Marathon And Halfmarathon Nutrition A Cuttingedge Plan To Fuel Your Body Beyond The Wall,Matt Fitzgerald
Sportonomics,Gavin Newsham
Archie Comics Spectacular,Archie Superstars
Secrets Of A Champion Studentathlete A Reality Check,Obadele Thompson
Outdoor Adventure And Social Theory,Elizabeth Pike
Becoming A Sport Psychologist,Paul McCarthy
Routledge Handbook Of Sport Communication,Paul Mark
"Routledge Handbook of Sport Gender and Sexuality
            
                Routledge International Handbooks",Jennifer Hargreaves
Ambush Marketing In Sports Theory And Practice,Gerd Nufer
Total Offence,Robert Rayner
Wisdomwalks Sports,Dan Britton
Cyclists Britain In A Box Britains Best Cycling Guide On Pocketable Cards,Arnold Robinson
Go Team Spongebob,Molly Reisner
Post-Olympism?,
The Game Of Golf,Willie Park
Scholastic Year In Sports 2013,"James, Jr. Buckley"
Opening His Legs And Showing His Class The Funniest And Daftest Sports Quotes Ever,Adrian Brady
Sport And Art An Essay In The Hermeneutics Of Sport,Andrew Edgar
Joe Mauer,Brian Howell
The Green umbrella and other sports stories,
Psychology gets in the game,
The Mizzou Fans Survival Guide To The Sec,Steve Richardson
Match Fixer,Neil Humphreys
Sport And Peace,Brian Wilson undifferentiated
Who Would Win A Fight Between Muhammad Ali And Bruce Lee The Sports Fans Book Of Answers,Nicholas Hobbes
Nike,Kelley Murray Skoloda
Sport education,Dawn Penney
The encyclopaedia of sport and games,Henry Charles Howard
The Heart Of A Coach Playbook Daily Devotions For Leading By Example,Fellowship of Christian Athletes
X Play Nation Of Action Sports Game Changers,Alex Striler
Chasing the game,"Davies, Peter journalist."
Winter Sports Records,Dan Diamond
The 1896 Olympic Games Results For All Competitors In All Events With Commentary,Bill Mallon
Till Death Or Fly Fishing Do Us Part When Your Passion Collides With Hers Can The Relationship Be Far Behind,Thomas R. Pero
Sport Time And Society The British At Play,Dennis Brailsford
Aqa A2 Physical Education,Symond Burrows
Shouldve Gone Tae Specsavers Ref,Allan Morrison
Sporting Legends Of Ireland,Turtle Bunbury
Sports Illustrated 2011 Almanac,Sports Illustrated
Sporting Lives Sport Heroism And The North Of England,Stephen Wagg
"Your Body Battles a Broken Bone
            
                Body Battles",Andrew N. Harris
Asian Americans In Sport And Society,C. Richard King
In Your Face 3d The Best 3d Book Ever,David E. Klutho
Novak Djokovic The Sporting Statesman,Chris Bowers
Dont Waste Your Sports,C. J. Mahaney
The Social Impact Of Sport Crosscultural Perspectives,Ram N. Spaaij
Mark Rosens Book Of Minnesota Sports Lists A Compilation Of Bests Worsts And Headscratchers From The Worlds Of Baseball Football Basketball Hockey And More,Mark Rosen
Wayne Gretzky Greatness On Ice,Jessica Morrison
Stephen F Austin State University Jacks,Archie P. McDonald
The Ultimate Unofficial Chicago Cubs Puzzles Trivia,Dale Ratermann
Exploring Sport And Exercise Psychology,Judy L. Van Raalte
Revision Express AS and A2 Physical Education and Sport,Michael Hill
Last King Of The Sports Page The Life And Career Of Jim Murray,Ted Geltner
AQA AS Physical Education Student Unit Guide New Edition,Sue Young
One Game At A Time Why Sports Matter,Matt Hern
"Sport
            
                World in Infographics",Ed Simkins
Euphoria and Exhaustion,Nikolaus Katzer
Hook And Shoot,Jeremy Brown
The Thoughts F Chairman Moore Teyve Kicked It Away Aain,Brian Moore
Heart Of A Student Athlete All Pro Advice For Competitors And Their Families,Karl Mecklenburg
MMA Training Manual,MMA Worldwide
Fascia in Sport and Movement,Amanda Baker
Skippers Knot Guide,Heinrich Bauermeister
The 1906 Olympic Games Results For All Competitors In All Events With Commentary,Bill Mallon
Playing With Purpose Inside The Lives And Faith Of 27 Great Football Basketball And Baseball Stars,Mike Yorkey
The Negro Leagues Chronology Events In Organized Black Baseball 19201948,Christopher Hauser
Genetics and sports,
Btec Level 3 National Sport,Adam Gledhill
The Sociology Of Sports Coaching,Paul Potrac
Btec Level 3 National Sport,Jennifer Stafford-Brown
The Unofficial Alabama Trivia Puzzles  History Book,Dale Ratermann
That Summer at Boomerang,Phil Jarratt
Sport And Film,Se N. Crosson
The Metaphysics Of Pingpong Table Tennis As A Journey Of Selfdiscovery And The Spinning Ball As Our Planet Earth,Guido Mina
Droit du sport,Frédéric Buy
Sport and social mobility,R. F. J. Spaaij
Eesti spordi taskuentsüklopeedia,Tiit Lääne
Obrazovatelʹnai︠a︡ i ozdorovitelʹnai︠a︡ rolʹ fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta v vuze,"Mezhdunarodnai︠a︡ nauchno-prakticheskai︠a︡ konferent︠s︡ii︠a︡ ""Obrazovatelʹnai︠a︡ i ozdorovitelʹnai︠a︡ rolʹ fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta v vuze"" (3rd 2010 Moscow, Russia)"
Ruwād al-riyāḍah fī Miṣr,al-Sayyid Faraj
Proses pembahasan rancangan undang-undang tentang sistem keolahragaan nasional,Indonesia. Dewan Perwakilan Rakyat
I'm running to win,Ann Kiemel Anderson
Off the bench and into the game,Ryan Walter
Anti-Doping-Bundesgesetz 2007,Austria
Great sports hoaxes,"Sullivan, George"
The new junior illustrated encyclopedia of sports,Willard Mullin
Handbuch Sportrecht,Martin Nolte
"The sports junkie's book of trivia, terms, and lingo",Harvey Frommer
Cultura e contemporaneidade na educação física e no desporto,Congresso de Educação Física e Desporto dos Países de Língua Portuguesa (9th 2002 Universidade Federal do Maranhão)
The Christian philosopher,Thomas Dick
Girls play to win softball,Marty Gitlin
"Table tennis among Jews in Poland, 1924-1949",Wiesław Pięta
21 shi ji Zhongguo she qu ti yu,Yuanyan Gu
Šaljive športne prigode,Rajko Šugman
"L'Église, le sport et l'Europe",Laurence Munoz
The Oxford Stamp and other essays,
Raporty i szkice o kulturze fizycznej i zdrowotnej w perspektywie humanistycznej,Wojciech J. Cynarski
Les sports,Jean de Brunhoff
Got game,
Mongolyn u̇ndėsniĭ bȯkhiĭn tu̇u̇khėn khurluud,B. T︠S︡ogtbaatar
Zhongguo gu dai ti yu shi ge xuan =,Jinhua Lu
"Sport, Soziologie und Erziehung",Michael Quell
Taking sport seriously,Peter Donnelly
Trajectory determination and analysis in sports by satellite and inertial navigation,Adrian Wägli
Sports traveler Chicago,Anbritt Stengele
Sports technology,Stewart Ross
Quo vadis Hochschulsport?,Arne Göring
Anthropologie und Sport,Klaus Lotz
Anthropologie und Sport,Klaus Lotz
The sportsman's dictionary,
Sporting days and sporting ways,
Training nutrition,
EFT for sports performance,Gary Craig
"Sport, culture and society",Grant Jarvie
The juju rules,Hart Seely
Dang dai Zhongguo ti yu li yi ge ju yan hua yan jiu,Linlin Cheng
Anti-Doping-Recht,Georg Brandstetter
Keeping fluid levels up,Robert J. Reber
Manual of physical exercises,"Wood, William of New York"
Health care for the female athlete,Marjorie J. Albohm
Khela Gurū,Rameśa Dave
"La recherche en sciences sociales du sport, quelle(s) utilité(s)",Société de sociologie du sport de langue française. Congrès international
The ESPN uncyclopedia,Gary Belsky
"Report of the Commissioner appointed under the Public Inquiries Act, respecting Ontario Athletic Commission",Ontario. Ontario Athletic Commission
Big book of sports quotes,"Eric Zweig, Chris McDonell"
Jokes about sports,Judy A. Winter
Sports in Soviet Latvia,
Psychologie in Training und Wettkampf,Karl Adam
"Basic Coaching Skills, Building Leadership in Youth Sports","Richard Rhodes, Steven Hayward"
Dynamics of a journey to conflict prevention and peace in Israel and Palestine via an Olympic sport,Geoffrey Victor Whitfield
"Sport, politics and society in the Arab world",Mahfoud Amara
Dynamics of a journey to conflict prevention and peace in Israel and Palestine via an Olympic sport,Geoffrey Victor Whitfield
Animal sports,Jim Gigliotti
Social and psychological issues in sports,Brendan M. O'Connor
Bounce the balls and they will come,Betty Wiseman
You must play to win!,Donna J. Newberry
Dream jobs in sports management and administration,Jeri Freedman
Współpraca sportowa w regionach warmińsko-mazurskim i kaliningradzkim w latach 1956-2006,Jerzy Urniaż
Tang dai ti yu wen hua shi,Junqi Wang
Sportförderung in Deutschland,Merten Haring
This book's got game,Hans Hetrick
The internationalization of European sports teams and the issue of national citizenship,Heike C. Alberts
African Americans in sports,Carla Mooney
Organizational culture and identity,"Aaron Smith, Bob K. Stewart, Gervase A. Haimes"
Football fever,John Foster
Mehrperspektivischer Sportunterricht,"Peter Neumann, Eckart Balz"
The greatest coach ever,John Wooden
The Oxford handbook of sports economics,"Leo H. Kahane, Stephen Shmanske"
Hana-Kimi,Hisaya Nakajō
Girls play to win swimming & diving,Paul Hoblin
The Protestant ethic and the spirit of sport,Steven J. Overman
Sports of the Times,"Gene Brown, Arleen Keylin, Daniel Lundy"
Mental practice in sport,Boris Blumenstein
Physics of baseball & softball,Rodney Cross
Adventures afloat and ashore,Parker Gillmore
Mizoram sports chanchin,Zoliana Royte
Sports law in Turkey,Anil Gürsoy
Sport as a business,Harald Dolles
The sports show,David Eugene Little
Biomechanische Leistungsdiagnostik,"Rainer Ballreich, W. Baumann"
Sport and international understanding,
The hidden mathematics of sport,Rob Eastaway
Winged words on Chantrey's Woodcocks,
Sports biomechanics,Roger Bartlett
Sports biomechanics,Roger Bartlett
"Guide to sports journalism, 2008",John Vigah
Sessional paper no. 3 of 2005 on sports development,Kenya
Madhyapradesa ke janapadiya khelagita,Kapila Tivārī
Research methods for leisure and tourism,Anthony James Veal
Amazing young sports people,Mandy Loader
Historia del deporte en Colombia en el siglo XX,Salvador Nazzar Nazzar
Amazing young sports people,Mandy Loader
Historia del deporte en Colombia en el siglo XX,Salvador Nazzar Nazzar
A history of Polish sport,Wojciech Lipoński
Practical ethics in sport management,Angela Lumpkin
L'argent dans les concours du monde grec,Brigitte Le Guen
Anthropologie de l'athlétisme en Afrique de l'ouest,Yaya Koné
Desporto e actividades de lazer,Instituto Cultural de Macau
NSCA's guide to tests and assessments,National Strength & Conditioning Association (U.S.)
"Die Auswirkungen der ""Besonderheiten des Sports"" auf die Anwendung von Verfahrensgrundsätzen in sportgerichtlichen Verfahren am Beispiel des Fussballs",Volker Michael Ströbele
Mizoram sports chanchin,Zoliana Royte
Berkshire Encyclopedia of Extreme Sports,Douglas Booth
The greatest coach ever,John Wooden
Sports trivia devotional,David Veerman
Du brauchst Bewegung!,Wolfgang Schuster
Sports and athletes,Laura K. Egendorf
Take time for paradise,A. Bartlett Giamatti
Zhongguo jing ji ti yu jue qi de zhi du kuang jia he si xiang ji chu,Chunxian Liu
Sport psychology,"Cox, Richard H."
The County gentleman and Land & water,
Stamina training for teen athletes,Shane Frederick
Urheilukirja,Tuomas Kyrö
The Daily tar heel,
The little book of sports,Wallace Rice
Outing,
Outing,
Intima samhällsvisioner,Fredrik Schoug
British sports & games,John S. Marr & Sons
Come to Win,Venus Williams
Me thode de nutrition,Olivier Lafay
Baily's magazine of sports and pastimes,
The New York Clipper annual for 1899,"Eldred, George, E."
Athletic sports and recreations for boys...,John George Wood
Arbeit und Sport,Klaus W. Tofahrn
O país dos jogos consentidos,João Alves da Costa
Best sports stories,Irving T. Marsh
Recreation,
101 offensive basketball drills,George Matthew Karl
"Sport in die Boere-krygsgevangenekampe tydens die Anglo-Boereoorlog, 1899-1902",F. J. G. Van der Merwe
"Militarism, sport, Europe",J. A. Mangan
Becoming a Supple Leopard,Kelly Starrett
Podgotovka i Łunogo ti Łazheloatleta,Leonid Samoi lovich Dvorkin
Handbook of sport psychology,
Old Boston boys and the games they played,James D'Wolf Lovett
The Olympic textbook of science in sport,
Multilingual lexicon for Universiade sports,Robert L. Busch
Foul play,
Great athletes,Rafer Johnson
The complete book of the Winter Olympics,David Wallechinsky
Zakład Antropologii Sportu w 60-leciu akademickiego nauczania wychowania fizycznego,Zbigniew Drozdowski
Leaves from the records of St. Hubert's Club,George E. Bulger
Antropologia a kultura fizyczna,Zbigniew Drozdowski
The Random House book of sports stories,"L. M. Schulman, Allen, Thomas B."
"Army and navy athletic training, comp. for the use of K. of C. athletic directors",Knights of Columbus
The American sporting manual ...,F. H. Brunell
Neuromuscular aspects of sport performance,Paavo V. Komi
Statistical thinking in sports,
"Gordis', Moi Gorod!",Fedir Trokhymovych Morhun
Encyclopedia of world sport,
Sports illustrated for kids year in sports 2004,
"History of Sport in Canada, revised Edition",
"Sports in America, 1920-1939","Buckley, James"
The Sportsman's directory and year book,"Pond, Frederick Eugene"
Sport and spirituality,
Build It and the Crowds Will Come,William O. Beck
"Aspekṭịm shel ""Modernah"" ba-""Shtẹtḷ"" be-Polin",Leʾah Eldor
Sport participation,Anthony D. Farelli
The Philly fan's code,Michael Tanier
Atlas do esporte no Brasil,Lamartine Pereira da Costa
Myths and milestones in the history of sport,Stephen Wagg
"Up close, and in your face with the greats, near-greats, and ingrates of sports",Roy Firestone
Latinos in U.S. sport,Jorge Iber
Modern sports law,"Anderson, Jack LLM"
Leis do desporto,Portugal
"Sport, violence and society",Kevin Young
Recreational sports,Clifford Lee Brownell
Sports law,Simon Gardiner
Law for recreation and sport managers,Doyice Cotten
Managing sport finance,Robert Wilson
Sports,Brian Howell
Sometimes they even shook your hand,John Schulian
ESPN sports century,Michael MacCambridge
Sports culture and sociology,Scott Witmer
Otbor legkoatletov--prygunov i sprinterov--na nachalʹnykh ėtapakh sportivnoĭ podgotovki,G. I. Kovalʹchuk
Psikhologii︠a︡ sorevnovatelʹnoĭ dei︠a︡telʹnosti sportsmena,G. D. Babushkin
All that remains,Bruce Brooks
Ethik im Sport,"Elk Franke, Karl-Heinrich Bette"
Sustainability and sport,"Jill Savery, Keith Gilbert"
The Auburn Tigers,"Stewart, Mark"
Games people play: Mexico,R. Conrad Stein
"Sørvágs ítróttarfelag 100 ár, 1905-17. mars 2005",Erhard Jacobsen
"Migration, Integration und Sport",S. Braun
The Scribner encyclopedia of American lives,Arnie Markoe
"""Then Wayne said to Mario--?""",Kevin Allen
Games people play: Italy,Miles Harvey
Zhang Xueliang yu ti yu,Jinhua Che
Brot und Spiele,Manfred Koch
Memuary fotografa Prezidenta,Dmitriĭ Donskoĭ
Recht sportlich,Wolfgang Berger
Sport and the law,Laura Donnellan
Historia polskiego sportu,Piotr Żak
Nearfall,Joe Reasbeck
Norsk idrettsleksikon,Tom A. Schanke
The Sports Illustrated 1992 sports almanac and record book,Sports Illustrated
Barron's sports injuries handbook,J. P. R. Williams
Awaken the Olympian within,John Naber
The guide to careers in sports,Len Karlin
The Sporting news chronicle of 20th century sport,Ron Smith
The sports scholarships insider's guide,Dion Wheeler
"Sørvágs ítróttarfelag 100 ár, 1905-17. mars 2005",Erhard Jacobsen
200 años del espectáculo,María Cristina García Cepeda
Tecnologia SESI de investimentos no esporte,Serviço Social da Indústria. Departamento Nacional
Spartakovskie ispovedi,Igorʹ Rabiner
Major problems in American sport history,Steven A. Riess
The Girls' book of outdoor life,
Alex Rodriguez,Michael V Uschan
Social issues in sport,Ron Woods
Hockey as a religion,Olivier Bauer
Games people play: England,William Lychack
Spitzensport und Studium,Carmen Borggrefe
Personal best,James Barry
Menschen in Bewegung,Arbeitsgemeinschaft für Sportpsychologie in der Bundesrepublik Deutschland. Tagung
The courage to believe,Craig Morton
"Exercise, science and fitness","Burke, Edmund J."
Lob des Sports,Hans Ulrich Gumbrecht
Sports before your eyes,Phil Hirsch
Rhythms of the game,Bernie Williams
Foot et politique,Antoine Grynbaum
Money in sports,Nick Hunter
Catching heat,Jim Leyritz
Hammond's travel encyclopedia of America,"Jordan, E. L."
Encyclopedia of sports and athletics,Jack L. Murray
Athletics and the heart,Richard Rost
The ethics of sports,M. J. McNamee
Zenta sporttörténete,László Táborosi
Il mito del record,Franco Nocchi
"Pin bo li cheng, hui huang cheng jiu",China. Guo jia ti yu zong ju
Mike and Mike's rules for sports and life,Mike Greenberg
Soccer in Eastern Europe,Mike Kennedy
Hank Greenberg,Mark Kurlansky
Kōiki Kantōken ni okeru supōtsu bijinesu o kaku to shita atarashii chiiki kasseika no arikata ni kakaru chōsa hōkokusho,Japan. Kantō Keizai Sangyōkyoku. Kikakuka
La aventura deportiva de un pueblo en guerra,Juan Antonio Mestre Sancho
Justicia deportiva,Norberto O. Outerelo
110 per cent,Michael Winkler
The Bears' blitz,Highlights for Children
Greatest feats,Sports Illustrated
High-tech Olympics,Nick Hunter
Ein Bolzplatz für Bouaké,Willi Lemke
The most famous woman in baseball,Bob Luke
Quatre décennies sur cinq continents,Réjean Tremblay
Sportivnye obshchestva i dosug v stolichnom gorode nachala XX veka,I. B. Khmelʹnit︠s︡kai︠a︡
They said it!,Patrick McDonnell
Sports Illustrated 2006 almanac,Sports Illustrated Editors
Sport in contemporary society,D. Stanley Eitzen
Die Leihgabe von Berufssportlern,Michael Berkemeyer
Vsebine gibalne/športne vzgoje v predšolskem obdobju,Rado Pišot
Massage for sport performance,Michael McGillicuddy
Soccer in South America,Mike Kennedy
Teaching cues for sport skills for secondary school students,Hilda Ann Fronske
The year the Red Sox won the Series,"Ty Waterman, Mel Springer"
The Art of Personal Competition - How to become a key team player,Allan P. Sand
The Art of Team Coaching - How Sun Tsu would Coach Coaches,Allan P. Sand
Beden kitabı,"Sempozyum, Türk Kültüründe Beden (2007 İstanbul, Turkey)"
Sport in Australia,Wray Vamplew
Official rules of sports & games,Reginald Moore
Sports signs,Harley Hamilton
"Army hockey, 1904-1947",United States Military Academy. Public Information Office
al- Riyāḍah wa-al-shabāb,Ḥasan ʻImād
Measurement,Emily Sohn
Sport psychology,Mark H. Anshel
Dispositions et pratiques sportives,Société de sociologie du sport de langue française. Congrès international
Sport and exercise psychology,Aidan P. Moran
Football,Brian Howell
"Hi, sport!",Joan Wade Cole
Fitness for health and sports,Patricia G. Avila
Los mitos esenciales del deporte español,Antonio Rivero Herraiz
Mudawwanat al-tārīkh al-riyāḍī,Ibrāhīm ʻAllām
Zenta sporttörténete,László Táborosi
Economics of sport,Ming Li
Different speeds and different needs,Gary Barber
Tarbiyat-i pahlavānī,Ismāʻīl Shafīʻī Sarvistānī
You can do it!,Lauren Catuzzi Grandcolas
Economics of sport,Ming Li
Basketball's 1-4 motion offenses for men's and women's basketball,Harry L. Harkins
Bargaining with baseball,William B. Gould
Nori ŭi yŏksa minjokhak,Tsuneo Sōgawa
Gangway for Navy,Morris A. Bealle
The Georgetown Hoyas,Morris A. Bealle
Kings of American football,Morris A. Bealle
"The history of football at Harvard, 1874-1948",Morris A. Bealle
Advances in motivation in sport and exercise,Glyn C. Roberts
"The Psychology of Losing - Tricks, Traps & Sharks",Allan P. Sand
Lo sport in Vaticano,Roberto Calvigioni
"Body, mind, and sport",John Douillard
Sports Illustrated 2008 Almanac,Sports Illustrated Editors
The Philly fan's code,Mike Tanier
The sportsman,Dhani Jones
100 campeones,Richard Edward Lapchick
A Cherokee ball-play and duel,W. A. Thompson
Opportunities in sports and athletics careers,William Ray Heitzmann
Born to run,Mark Phialas
All those mornings-- at the Post,Shirley Povich
Internationale Sportevents im Umbruch?,"Internationales Hamburger Symposium ""Sport und Ökonomie"""
Atletas y ciudadanos,Xavier Pujadas i Martí
Sportista,Andrei S. Markovits
Sports and entertainment marketing,
Le Sport en France et à l'étranger,"Vaux, Charles Maurice baron de"
"Áfram, hærra!",Þorgrímur Þráinsson
Stare ai giochi,Mauro Valeri
"Sportinformatik--gestern, heute, morgen","Jürgen Perl, Josef Wiemeyer, Arnold Baca, Martin Lames"
Wissenstransfer im deutschen Spitzensport,"Martin Lames, Claudia Augste"
Sports law in France,Jean-Yves Foucard
The Oxford dictionary of sports science and medicine,Michael Kent
Sports publicity,Joseph Favorito
"Sport, exercise and social theory",Gyözö Molnár
Sports zone,Sarah L. Schuette
Battle on the Hudson,Tim Sullivan
Numbelievable!,Michael Ferraro
Not till the fat lady sings,Michael Rosenberg
Paixão nacional revisitada,Alvaro Dias
Miracle mud,David A. Kelly
Gumanitarnye aspekty uchebnykh dist︠s︡iplin organizovannoĭ fizicheskoĭ aktivnosti,T. M. Elkanova
Les usages politiques du football,"André Gounot, Denis Jallat, Michel Koebel"
Leitfaden zum Anti-Doping-Recht,Martin Platte
Epidemiology of injury in adventure and extreme sports,"Travis W. Heggie, Dennis John Caine"
Mediação entre as ciências sociais e a educação física,"Hugo Rodolfo Lovisolo, Sebastião Josué Votre, Adriano Rosa da Silva"
Huizhou ti yu wen hua gai lun =,Lei Jia
Sport i sportsko pravo,Mehmed Kenović
Ti yu xing zheng fa xin lun,"Mengsheng Jiang, Huan Ma, Jianying Song"
"Cattolicesimo, ginnastica e sport",Daniele Bardelli
Yun dong yi shu lun,Tingli Zhai
Fa zhan yu kun huo,Haiping Zhong
Szczeciński sport w latach 2008-2010,Zbigniew Szafkowski
Eddie,
Regulación laboral del trabajo deportivo en Europa y América,Miguel Cardenal Carro
Chosŏn minjok ch'eyuk kwa minsok nori,Chung-mo Han
The two Koreas and the politics of global sport,Brian Bridges
Xin nong cun jian she bei jing xia wo guo cun luo nong min ti yu de li lun yu shi zheng yan jiu,Qingshan Hu
British sports,
Droit et coupe du monde,Mathieu Maisonneuve
Peraturan Menteri Negara Pemuda dan Olahraga nomor 193 tahun 2010 tentang organisasi dan tata kerja Kementerian Pemuda dan Olahraga,Indonesia. Kantor Menteri Negara Pemuda dan Olahraga
"Giochi, sport tradizionali e società",Anna Maria Pioletti
"Russko-angliĭskiĭ, anglo-russkiĭ slovarʹ-spravochnik sportivnoĭ terminologii",L. P. Bondarenko
World Series,Alan Cho
"Sports, bodies, identities and organizations",European Association for Sociology of Sport. Conference
La Fédération des sections sportives des patronages catholiques 1898-1998,Jean-Marie Jouaret
The best Boston sports arguments,Jim Caple
Le sport et l'éducation physique au Burundi,"Forum national sur le sport au Burundi (2006 Gitega, Burundi)"
Zhui xun fa zhi de jing shen,Zhongguo fa xue hui ti yu fa xue yan jiu hui
"Nauchno-prakticheskiĭ kommentariĭ k Federalʹnomu zakonu ot 4 dekabri︠a︡ 2007 g. no. 329-FZ ""O fizicheskoĭ kulʹture i sporte v Rossiĭskoĭ Federat︠s︡ii""","T. I︠A︡ Khabrieva, V. L. Mutko"
The Oxford companion to sports and games,
Sakha torut oonnʹuulara =,A. S. Fedorov
Soccer in Central America,Mike Kennedy
The encyclopaedia of sport,
The Encyclopaedia of Sport - Vol. I,"Henry Charles Howard, Hedley Peek, Frederick G. Aflalo"
An encyclopaedia of rural sports,
The effects of a physical activity intervention on the self-concept and behavior of fifth-grade boys,
"John Tortes ""Chief"" Meyers","Young, William A."
Athletic sports,
Athletic sports,
"Światowe igrzyska polonijne, 2006-2009",Zbigniew Szafkowski
Carrier Ethernet,Mehmet Toy
bien-être et loisirs,"Maguy Hélène Berthoin, M.-Th. Leplâtre, J. Montorsier"
Legendi na bŭlgarskii︠a︡ sport,Asen Minchev
Routledge handbook of sport management,"Robinson, Leigh"
Juden im Sport während des Nationalsozialismus,Lorenz Peiffer
World cup,David Whitfield
Sports encyclopedia North America,
"Zhi du bian qian, cheng shi lin xuan, shi chang kai fa",Bingshu Zhong
A realidade da práctica deportiva en Galicia,Constantino Arce
Leistung und Moral,Eckhard Meinberg
Evidence-based applied sport psychology,Roland A. Carlstedt
"Munkirāt, khel aur kūd",Muḥammad Maʻṣūm Qāsimī
Lacrosse,
Le sport et ses évènements face au droit et à la justice,Patrick Mbaya
Contests in contexts,Hjorleifur Jonsson
Barnomai rushdi tarbii︠a︡i jismonī va varzish dar shaḣri Dushanbe baroi solḣoi 2011-2013,Dilshod Qurbonov
"Sport, democracy and war in classical Athens","Pritchard, David Dr"
Nashville sports history,William L. Traughber
Playing with purpose,Mike Yorkey
Tarbut ha-guf be-Erets-Yiśraʼel bi-teḳufat ha-Mishnah ṿeha-Talmud,Yeḥiʻam Shoreḳ
Ästhetik und Politik,René Wiese
Droit du sport,"Gérald Simon, Catherine Labrusse-Riou, Didier Truchet"
Header,Paul Hoblin
Against all odds,Glenn Stout
İstanbul'un 100 spor kulübü,Hacı Hasdemir
How to play the game,Jean Henry
Encyclopedia of world sport,
Sport und Stadt,"Holger Fuhrmann, Christine Fuhrmann, Petra Kamphausen"
Americans at play,Alison Stein Wellner
Sports and physical education in Turkey in the 1930s,Eugene M. Hinkle
Sports rules encyclopedia,
The Sports fan's ultimate book of sports comparisons,
Every boy's book,Edmund Routledge
Guo ji ti yu zhong cai yan jiu,"Zhang, Chunliang, 1976-, Xiangshu Liu"
British sports,
Modern and traditional Korean games & sports,Karl Randall
Debrett's guide to Britain,
Futbol i llengua,
Security management for sports and special events,Stacey A. Hall
Sports injuries,
Glitz capsule,Bob Lynch
Zhongguo shao shu min zu ti yu wen hua tong lun =,Yuan Rao
Sportunterricht aus Schülerperspektive,"Theis, Reiner PD Dr. phil"
Sportwissenschaft 2.0,"Marco Danisch, Jürgen Schwier"
Mathematics and sports,Joseph A. Gallian
The sportsman's library,
The sportsman's dictionary,
The sportsman in Ireland,
Sport,C. M. van Stockum
The sportsman in Ireland,
Kiŏk ŭl kongyu hara! sŭp'och'ŭ Han'guksa,Hak-kyun Kim
Entāteinmento-hō,"Shigehiko Kanai, Zen Tatsumura"
al-Riyāḍah fī al-Sūdān,Ṣalāḥ al-Dīn Muḥammad ʻUthmān
Contests in contexts,Hjorleifur Jonsson
The Out of door library,
The Out of door library,Dudley Allen Sargent
"Światowe igrzyska polonijne, 2006-2009",Zbigniew Szafkowski
Kınık geçmiş zaman kayıtları,Eyüp Eriş
Soccer in Western Europe,Mike Kennedy
Sport in the context of social and cultural changes,"Jerzy Kosiewicz, Monika Piątkowska"
A century of Boston sports,
Športové hry starej Bratislavy,Igor Machajdík
Aomen sheng shi zhi lü,Minru Yao
Nikkei baseball,Samuel O. Regalado
Psychological skills in sport,"Boris Blumenstein, Iris Orbach"
Ti yu yun dong she hui xue,Shuyuan Xu
2009 nian Shanghai Shi ti yu she hui ke xue yan jiu cheng guo bao gao =,Chen Yu
Internationale Beziehungen aus der Perspektive nationaler Öffentlichkeiten,"Paul Pachernegg, Christine Pichler, Christine Pilz, Dieter Reicher, Daniel Semper"
"Il corpo, il confine, la patria",Elena Tonezzer
"Il corpo, il confine, la patria",Elena Tonezzer
Sport pedagogy,Kathleen M. Armour
Russko-nemet︠s︡kiĭ sportivnyĭ slovarʹ,E. S. Vaĭt︠s︡ekhovskai︠a︡
New sport and exercise psychology companion,"Tony Morris, Peter C. Terry"
"Really, really bad sports jokes",
The Big Book of World Cup Cricket - 1975-2011,Indra Vikram Singh
Ti yu zhe xue yan jiu,Tao Yu
Otázky sportovního práva,Jozef Čorba
Upravljanje sportskom organizacijom,Muhamed Delić
O desporto em Portugal,Alberto Manuel Trovão do Rosário
Sports and the law,Paul C. Weiler
Hatvan város sporttörténete,"Varga, László."
Advanced theory and practice in sport marketing,Eric C. Schwarz
100 trailblazers,Richard Edward Lapchick
YaMalā ʼItyop̣yā gabaréwoč sport baʻāl,
Min zu chuan tong ti yu xue =,Shaoying Liu
The gamer,
Imun nashim  ba-sporṭ ha-heśegi,Eṿah Ḥalavovsḳi
Willi Daume und die Entwicklung des Sports in der Bundesrepublik Deutschland zwischen 1945 und 1970,Jan C. Rode
Marian S. Carson collection of manuscripts,Marian S. Carson
Sports law in India,Mohammad Naseem
"Nutrition for health, fitness, & sport",Melvin H. Williams
I segni del corpo,"Raffaella Scelzi, Vincenzo Pellicani, Patrizia Calefato"
Planet sport,Kath Woodward
Long run to freedom,John Nauright
Experiential learning in sport management,Susan Brown Foster
Sport and Christianity,"Wissenschaftliches Symposium ""Zur christlichen Sicht des Sports"" (2007 Akademie des Bistums Mainz)"
Women and sports,Laura La Bella
Moments in sports,Associated Press
Jogos de identidade,Victor Andrade de Melo
Pure sport,John Kremer
ha-Olimpeyadah ha-Natsit,Richard D. Mandell
The Twentieth century treasury of sports,"Al Silverman, Brian Silverman"
Sportswit,Lee Green
The role of sports in the formation of personal identities,"John Hughson, Clive Palmer, Fiona Skillen"
Barbaric sport,Marc Perelman
Barbaric sport,Marc Perelman
Gendai no supōtsu kenkō sangyō no arata na kadai to sono taiōsaku ni kansuru chōsa kenkyū,Supōtsu Kenkō Sangyō Dantai Rengōkai
"Sport, Herzgrösse und Herz-Kreislauf-Dynamik",Siegfried Israel
"""Spartak"" i spartakovt︠s︡y",
"O sport, you are life!",
"Juvenile pastimes, or, Sports for the four seasons",
Sports stories,
The Sports illustrated 2000 sports almanac,
Understanding sport,"Horne, John"
Understanding sport,"Horne, John"
Sport psychology insights,Robert J. Schinke
Great book of Penn State sports lists,Matthew Pencek
The football corporations,William Heyen
Zhong wai ti yu min su wen hua,Qi Sheng
Przestępstwo korupcji w sporcie,Renata Żurowska
Vine a morirme!,Raúl Mayo Santana
My great sporting memories,Lorcán O'Rourke
Puerto Rico en los Juegos Centroamericanos,Victor de la Rosa
La chimie et le sport,Minh-Thu Dinh-Audouin
Etica e sport,Giovanni Scanagatta
The physics of sports science projects,Robert Gardner
The Norton book of sports,George Plimpton
Sports law in Slovakia,Tomáš Gábriš
Nick Bakay's tale of the tape,
Sports law in South Africa,André Louw
Le modèle sportif français,Sandra Montchaud
Valori e modelli nello sport,Renato Grimaldi
Strength and conditioning for team sports,Paul Gamble
1000 deportistas cubanos,Pierre Maraval
Ustawa o sporcie,Wiktor Cajsel
Jing ji ti zhi zhuan gui shi qi Zhongguo jing ji ti yu yun xing yan jiu,Yanling Li
Min zu ti yu lun ji,"Quan guo shao shu min zu chuan tong ti yu yun dong hui ke xue lun wen bao gao hui (8th 2007 Guangzhou Shi, China)"
Hunan ti yu shi zi liao,Xingguo Luo
Sport e razzismo,"Giornata di studio Ma che razza di integrazione!, l'educazione e il fenomeno del razzismo nello sport (2010 Campobasso, Italy)"
Viaggio nello sport italiano,Michele Uva
Hofstra athletics,Christopher R. Vaccaro
Hofstra athletics,Christopher R. Vaccaro
Sport under Communism,Mike Dennis
Amazing but true sports stories,Phyllis Hollander
Sports shorts,Glenn Liebman
Now listen here,Chris Van Wyk
Group dynamics in sport,Albert V. Carron
Die Würde des Sports ist unantastbar,Sven Güldenpfennig
"Houston's sporting life, 1900-1950",Mike Vance
Contemporary issues in sports economics,Wladimir Andreff
Nutrition for sport and exercise,Marie Dunford
Physiological tests for elite athletes,"Rebecca K. Tanner, Christopher John Gore"
Gênero e esporte,Jorge Dorfman Knijnik
Beidseitiges Training im Sport,Tino Stöckel
"Helmets, masks & goggles",Mary Elizabeth Salzmann
"Theology, ethics and transcendence in sports","S. J. Parry, Mark Nesti, Nick Watson"
Fast break to line break,Todd Davis
The Wonderful world of sport,
Rassledovanie podkupa uchastnikov i organizatorov professionalʹnykh sportivnykh sorevnovaniĭ i zrelishchnykh kommercheskikh konkursov,A. F. Volynskiĭ
Lex sportiva: what is sports law?,"Robert C. R. Siekmann, Janwillem Soek"
Recent developments in the economics of sport,Wladimir Andreff
Os sports e as cidades brasileiras,Victor Andrade de Melo
Sports law,Adam Epstein
L'arbitrage des litiges sportifs,Mathieu Maisonneuve
Oranje boven!,Mart Smeets
Opgeruimd,Mart Smeets
The best of Sports Illustrated,Sports Illustrated Editors
Stanovlenie professionalʹnoĭ subʺektnoĭ pozit︠s︡ii spet︠s︡ialista po fizicheskoi kulʹture i sportu,S. N. Begidova
Zhongguo ti yu,Zhongguo ke xue ji shu xie hui. Xue hui xue shu bu
Handbook of sport marketing research,"Nancy L Lough, William Anthony Sutton"
The Oxford handbook of sport and performance psychology,Shane M. Murphy
Sport e multiculturalismo,Sabrina Granata
Lietuvos sporto enciklopedija,Asta Zaiceva-Stalmakova
Skill acquisition in sport,"Nicola J. Hodges, Williams, A. M."
The year the Red Sox won the Series,
"Esporte, poder e relações internacionais",Douglas Wanderley de Vasconcellos
Ethics in youth sport,"Stephen Harvey, Richard Light"
Physical culture and sport in Soviet society,Susan Grant
Cheerleading / Heather E. Schwartz,Heather E. Schwartz
Athletic insight's writings in sport psychology,Robert J. Schinke
ESPN guide to psycho fan behavior,"Warren St. John, Amir Blumenfeld"
Faire équipe,Pascal Duret
A corps majeurs,Stéphane Héas
Team physician manual,Lyle J. Micheli
Sportswomen at the Olympics,"Toni Bruce, Jorid Hovden, Pirkko Markula"
Statistika v sporte,V. V. Afanasʹev
Sports law in Norway,Bård Racin Meltvedt
Greko-rimskai︠a︡ borʹba v Dagestane,A. N. Omarov
"Fallen sports heroes, media, and celebrity culture",Lawrence A. Wenner
Circular no. 1,
The spectacle of sport,Norton Wood
Psikhologo-pedagogicheskoe obespechenie podgotovki dzi︠u︡doistov k sorevnovanii︠a︡m v sisteme mnogoletneĭ sportivnoĭ trenirovki,A. P. Shumilin
Sportivnoe pravo kak kompleksnai︠a︡ otraslʹ zakonodatelʹstva,A. V. Serdi︠u︡kov
Sportengagement und jugendliches Selbstkonzept,Katrin Eppinger
Not till the fat lady sings,
Not till the fat lady sings,Doug Flutie
Bury my heart at Cooperstown,Frank Russo
I'm just getting started,Jack McKeon
Reviewing the progress of the partnership between the United States Paralympics and the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs to promote adaptive sports,United States. Congress. House. Committee on Veterans' Affairs. Subcommittee on Economic Opportunity.
Sportivnai︠a︡ Mordovii︠a︡,K. V. Smorodin
Play practice,Alan G. Launder
Deadly hard-hitting sports,Jeff Savage
Igniting the flame,Jim Reisler
Shapes in sports,Oona Gaarder-Juntti
Best seat in the house,Mark Rosen
The global economics of sport,Chris Gratton
I segni del corpo,"Raffaella Scelzi, Vincenzo Pellicani, Patrizia Calefato"
African Americans in sports,Lisa Wade McCormick
Sports bloopers,
Extreme summer sports,Jim Brush
Athletes wanted,Chris Krause
Sindhu jūn rāndiyūn,ʻĀdilu Sak̲h̲īrāṇī
Sports law in Bulgaria,Boris E. Kolev
Il tribunale nazionale di arbitrato per lo sport,"Convegno ""Il Tribunale Nazionale di Arbitrato per lo Sport, Aspetti processuali e sostanziali"" (2010 Parma, Italy)"
Stanje i perspektive zagrebačkog sporta,"Stručni skup Stanje i perspektive zagrebačkog sporta (2001 Zagreb, Croatia)"
Filosofia dello sport,Emanuele Isidori
Filosofia dello sport,Emanuele Isidori
Ti yu qiang guo de zhan lüe yan jiu,"""Ti yu da guo xiang ti yu qiang guo mai jin de li lun yu shi jian yan jiu"" ke ti zu"
Mitologie dello sport,"Pierluigi Cervelli, Leonardo Romei, Franciscu Sedda, Roland Barthes"
Philosophie du dopage,"Jean-Noël Missa, Pascal Nouvel, Claude-Olivier Doron"
Players,Tim Harris
"Something about horses, sport and war",H. Strickland Constable
Bounce the balls and they will come,"Betty Wiseman, Betty Wiseman"
Social and psychological issues in sports,"Brendan M. O'Connor, Brendan M. O'Connor"
Take time for paradise,A. Bartlett Giamatti
Athletics challenges,Kevin Morgan
Zhongguo ti yu ke xue fa zhan yan jiu,Guo jia ti yu zong ju. Gan bu pei xun zhong xin
Weight training for the young athlete,Frederick C. Hatfield
Advanced windsurfing,Farrel O'Shea
The Physics of sports,Angelo Armenti
Der Weltsport und sein Publikum,Tobias Werron
"Hội nghị khoa học quốc tế ""Nghiên cứu khoa học phục vụ phát triển văn hóa, thể thao, và du lịch""","International Scientific Congress ""Scientific Research for Development of Culture, Sport, and Tourism"" (2009 Bắc Ninh, Vietnam)"
Practical skills in sport and exercise science,Ben Dascombe
Amazing sports photos,
100 athletes who shaped sports history,Timothy Jacobs
Professional sports organizations,Christian Schulz
"With Gun, Rifle and Bow",James Douglas
Nambuk tʻongil chʻeyuk ŭi pŏpchŏk kwaje,Minjok Tʻongil Chʻeyuk Yŏnʼguwŏn (Korea). Tae Tʻoronhoe
Research methods for sports studies,Chris Gratton
Economics of sport and recreation,Chris Gratton
Research methods for sport studies,Chris Gratton
Choke!,Tony Davis
Recreation bibliography,Russell Sage Foundation. Dept. of Recreation.
Bang the drum slowly,Mark Harris
Shearer Wonderland,Duncan Shearer
Sport in the City,Chris Gratton
Peaks and pines,"Lees, J. A."
An introduction to the philosophy of physical education and sport,Robert G. Osterhoudt
Pierre de Coubertin,Pierre de Coubertin
L'art et le sport,European Committee for Sports History. Colloque international
Erbfeinde und Hasslieben,Matthias Marschik
Tustuu tuḣa,D. D. Ėverstov-Dirinskėĭ
Sport und Sportrezeption,Gunnar Roters
"Sport, representation and evolving identities in Europe",Philip Dine
"Our national champions, 1987",David W. H. Ellis
Pulling the rip cord,Jeff C. Young
"Crossing sidelines, crossing cultures",Joel S. Franks
Olympia 1960,Tore Nilsson
Berättelse över Olympiska Spelen 1936,Erik Bergvall
NHL,Gunnar Nordström
"Sports in America, 1960-1969","Fischer, David"
Sports poems & mouse poems,John Foster
Geleneksel spor dallarının geliştirilmesi,Devlet Planlama Teşkilatı (Turkey)
Sports justice,Roger I. Abrams
The sportswriter who punched Sam Mcdowell,Bob Dolgan
"Introduction to physical education, excercise science, and sport studies",Angela Lumpkin
Meet the Dodgers,Mike Kennedy
Rodeo,Sue L. Hamilton
Nashville sports history,William L. Traughber
Meet the Yankees,Mike Kennedy
Meet the Red Sox,Mike Kennedy
Mana grāmīṇa krīḍalu,
The 2010 Commonwealth Games,Shalini Mishra
Körper--Sport--Stress,Fachsymposium zur Salutogenese in Österreich (3rd 2006 Institut für Stressprophylaxe & Salutogenese)
Jing ji ti yu yu ke ji chuang xin,
Imagery training,Bruce Hale
Sportgrodor,Lasse Anrell
Ethics and Sport,S.J Parry
Pro sports' greatest rivalries,Nathan Aaseng
The locker room mirror,Nathan Aaseng
Sports and entertainment,Peter Hicks
The Quorn hunt,Cecil.
BTEC National Sports Studies,Ray Barker
BTEC National Sport (Btec National Sport),Ray Barker
The Sportspages Almanac: The Complete Sporting Factbook,Matthew Engel
The Sportspages Almanac 1991,Matthew Engel
The sports date book,Harvey Frommer
Silp'ae rŭl turyŏwŏ malgo 1-tŭng e tojŏn hara,Hyŏn-sŏk Son
You're wrong and you're ugly,Sid Rosenberg
Rules for New York sports fans,Joe Benigno
Sports Illustrated college sports almanac,Sports Illustrated Books (Firm)
Der Beitrag des Sports zur Entfaltung der sozialistischen Persönlichkeit in der DDR,Patrick Litz
Esporte e cinema,Victor Andrade de Melo
Inside sport psychology,Costas I. Karageorghis
Sport e infanzia,Roberto Farnè
Raccontare lo sport,Francesco Pagnini
The anthropology of sport and human movement,Robert R. Sands
Les langues du sport,Giovanni Dotoli
Fair or foul,Christopher S. Kudlac
Sports law,Patrick K. Thornton
Mascot madness!,Andy Griffiths
Nashville sports history,William L. Traughber
100 questions & answers about sports nutrition and exercise,Lilah Al Masri
Taiwan ti yu shi,Miaoying Zhang
Base jumping,Sue L. Hamilton
Understanding and engaging humanity,Brad S. McAdon
Blue chips,Richard Woodley
NSCA's guide to sport and exercise nutrition,Bill Campbell
Athletic and sport issues in musculoskeletal rehabilitation,David J. Magee
Routledge handbook of sports development,Barrie Houlihan
The business of sports,Mark Conrad
Sport psychology,Bruce D. Geranto
Sports technology,Ron Fridell
Ti tan wang shi,Yong Fei
Xiang tu Zhongguo de yi shi xing shao shu min zu ti yu,Zhiqing Li
The contender,Robert Lipsyte
Case studies in coaching,Timothy M. Baghurst
Biologiczne i społeczne podstawy wychowania fizycznego i sportu,Wojciech Czarny
"Crossing sidelines, crossing cultures",Joel S. Franks
Social capital and sport governance in Europe,"Margaret M. Groeneveld, Barrie Houlihan, Fabien Ohl"
Stora ishockeyboken,Gregor von Konow
Dubbeln,"Thomas Alexanderson, David Bogerius"
Kungmin saenghwal chʻeyuk hwaltong chʻamyŏ siltʻae chosa,Korea (South). Chʻeyukpu
Different speeds and different needs,Gary Barber
The renegade sportsman,Zach Dundas
Rivals!,Richard O. Davies
The Sports illustrated 2002 sports almanac,Sports Illustrated Editors
Sports Illustrated Kids All Access,"Editors of Sports Illustrated, Aimee Crawford"
"Zhong wai ti yu yuan xiao xiao zhang lun tan, Aolinpike yu Beijing Ao yun guo ji lun tan wen ji =",Zhong wai ti yu yuan xiao xiao zhang lun tan (2003 Beijing ti yu da xue)
Han Fa Ying ti yu ci dian =,Yingmei Dang
"M.F. Siregar, matahari olahraga Indonesia",Brigitta Isworo Laksmi
"Sport, power, and society",Robert E. Washington
Xin shi dai Han Ying ti yu ci dian =,Tingquan Zhang
The 30 greatest sports conspiracy theories of all time,Elliott Kalb
The handbook on coaching perfection,Wes Neal
Different speeds and different needs,Gary Barber
Joshi supōtsu o kataru,Kinue Hitomi
Ėnt︠s︡iklopedii︠a︡ fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta Ti︠u︡menskoĭ oblasti,"Zuev, V. N. doktor pedagogicheskikh nauk"
Chuan tong ti yu yu za ji =,Qun Li
"Physical education, exercise, and sport science in a changing society",William H. Freeman
The sportswriter who punched Sam Mcdowell,Bob Dolgan
Sport and challenges to racism,Jonathan Long
Khȯkh tėngėriĭn oron ikh sportod,Shagdarzhavyn Magvan
The top 10 of sports,Russell Ash
Kirchliche Jugendarbeit und Sport,Wilhelm Schwendemann
Sŭpʻochʻŭ kyoryu wa  Hanbando pʻyŏnghwa =,International Seminar for Peace on the Korean Peninsula through Sports Interchange (2003 Korea Press Center)
The new sporting almanack,George Tattersall
When life was new,Horatio Hutchinson
The young folks' cyclopaedia of games and sports,John Denison Champlin
"Play, performance and power",Canadian Broadcasting Corporation
Stress management for sport,"Leonard D. Zaichkowsky, Wesley E. Sime"
Sports law,"Robert M. Jarvis, Phyllis Coleman"
The international dictionary of sports and games,J. A. Cuddon
On your mark,William L. Coleman
Foot and ankle injuries in sports,
American sports for the amusement of children,
Marketing of Olympic sport organisations,"Alain Ferrand, Luiggino Torrigiani"
African Americans in sports,David Kenneth Wiggins
Performance in endurance events,"Francois Peronnet, Guy Thibault, Marielle Ledoux, Guy Brisson"
What makes winners win,"Jones, Charlie"
Peak performance,"Clive Gilson, Mike Pratt, Kevin Roberts, Ed Weymes"
Nutrition for sport and exercise,Jacqueline R. Berning
The Olympic book of sports medicine,"Howard G. Knuttgen, Kurt Tittel"
Body by Weimar,Erik Norman Jensen
Sports marketing and the psychology of marketing communication,Lynn R. Kahle
Führerwettkampfordnung der Hitler-Jugend,
Testkultúra-elméleti és kutatás-módszertani alapismeretek,György Gyetvai
The Macmillan dictionary of sport and games,J. A. Cuddon
"XI Commonwealth Games, Edmonton 1978",Alberta. Alberta Education
More Than The Score,Matt Fulks
The Sports illustrated ... sports almanac,
Boyz 2 buddhas,David Forbes
Legal issues in sport and physical education management,John N. Drowatzky
Les champs d'ébats,Georges Hébert
Bewegungskulturen,Ronald Lutz
"Sport, leisure identities and gendered spaces","Sheila Scraton, Rebecca Watson"
A practical guide to Title IX in athletics,
Practical sports nutrition,Louise Burke
Designing effective instructional tasks for physical education and sports,"David C., Ph.D. Griffey, Lynn Dale Housner"
Private and commercial recreation,Arlin Epperson
Title IX in-house audit of athletic programs,
"Directory of scholars identifying with the history of sport, 1988",
Applying sport psychology,"Taylor, Jim, Gregory S. Wilson"
Imagery in sports and physical performance,"Anees A. Sheikh, Errol R. Korn"
Sports supplements,"Antonio, Jose PhD, Jeffrey R. Stout"
Flow in sports,"Susan A. Jackson, Mihaly Csikszentmihalyi"
Sports law,"Ray L. Yasser, James R. McCurdy, C. Peter Goplerud"
Sports et violences,Dominique Bodin
"American Bar Association Forum on the Entertainment and Sports Industries presents its 1994 Annual Meeting, current legal issues in sports law",
Team marketing report's 500 great sports promotion ideas,
"Coach, athlete, and sport psychologist","Peter Klavora, Juri Vrzesnevski Daniel"
Pukhan chʻeyuk charyo haejejip,Hang-nae Yi
Nutrition in exercise and sport,Ira Wolinsky
"The sports sector analysis report, 2003",
The best American sports writing of the century,"David Halberstam, Glenn Stout"
Psychology of motor behavior and sport,NASPSPA (Organization).
Physical education activities handbook for men and women,Dennis Keith Stanley
Psychological foundations of sport,"John M. Silva, Robert S. Weinberg"
White House sportsmen,Edmund Lindop
Sports shorts,Joseph Bruchac
"Chʻeyuk Hanʼguk, 1984",Korea (South). Chʻeyukpu
Pro sports halls of fame,Grolier Educational (Firm)
"2,000 sports quips and quotes",Glenn Liebman
The Badminton library of sports and pastimes,Alfred Edward Thomas Watson
PE connections,"Thomas M. Fleming, Lisa Bunting"
Collected papers on sports biomechanics,
Biomechanics of athletic movement,"Hochmuth, Gerhard Prof. Dr.-Ing. et paed. habil."
"Gender, sport and leisure",Alan Tomlinson
Körperkultur und Sport,
Exercise and sport science,"William E Garrett, Donald T Kirkendall"
The language of sport,Tim Considine
Women and sport,Dorothy V. Harris
Good sports,Rosen Publishing Group
Gannett news service,
Readings in human performance,H. T. A. Whiting
"Sport, physical activity, and the law","Neil J. Dougherty, Alan S. Goldberger, Linda Jean Carpenter"
"North American Society for Sport History directory of scholars, 1997",Ronald A. Smith
Epidemiology of pediatric sports injuries,Dennis John Caine
The athletic trainer's guide to strength and endurance training,"Denise Wiksten, Carolyn A. Peters"
Island sport directory,
"Skills, drills & strategies for badminton","Donald C. Paup, Bo Fernhall"
Women and sport,
Introduction to sports law in South Africa,
Taiwan ti yu shi,Miaoying Zhang
Teamwork,Fellowship of Christian Athletes
Being there,Eric Mirlis
Sport psychology,Arnold D. LeUnes
Science and racket sports,"Thomas Reilly, M. Hughes, A. Lees"
Assessment in sport psychology,"Robert M. Nideffer, Marc-Simon Sagal"
The Nazi Olympics,United States Holocaust Memorial Museum
Aolinpike yun dong,Zhaoxiang Wu
Winning spirit II,Shellie M. Frey
Detroit,Kyle W. Bell
The Popular Recreator.,Harry Houdini Collection (Library of Congress)
Mack McGinn's big win,Coleen Paratore
The sportsman's friend in a frost,Harry Hieover
The World's Greatest Athlete,Gerald C. Gardner
Young people's encyclopedia of sports.,
Play basketball like a pro,Nate LeBoutillier
Ley del deporte,Spain.
Šport v času tranzicije,Franci Božič
Sytuacja prawna sportowca wyczynowego,Andrzej Kijowski
Sports encyclopedia.,
Sportsman's encyclopedia,
Sports in America,Lynn Messina
The Sporting image,Paul J. Zingg
Sports illustrated for kids year in sports 2004,Si For Kids
The sweet spot in time,John Jerome
Incredible athletic feats,Jim Benagh
"Georgi Markov v ""24 chasa""",Georgi Markov
Issues in sports,Stephen Currie
Cheating,Stephen Currie
Cheating (Ripped from the Headlines),Stephen Currie
The handy sports answer book,Kevin Hillstrom
"El deporte en Almería, 1880-1939",Donato Gómez Díaz
Introduction to sport psychology,Robert J. Schinke
The biochemical basis of sports performance,Ron J. Maughan
Estudis d'implantació terminològica,F. Xavier Vila i Moreno
Ley de fomento y desarrollo del deporte,Argentina.
Globalizing sport,George Harvey Sage
Practical lessons on hunting and sporting,Knightley William Horlock
"Essais de psychologie sportive, 1913",Pierre de Coubertin
Athletic ability & the anatomy of motion,Rolf Wirhed
Thief!,Elizabeth Hutchins
NSCA's guide to sport and exercise nutrition,National Strength & Conditioning Association (U.S.)
Sports illustrated for kids year in sports 2006,Mary Varilla Jones
"Touchdowns, tip-offs & testimonies",Floyd Johnson
Visions of Allsport.,
"Lei de bases da actividade fí́sica e do desporto (Lei no. 5/2007, de 16 de Janeiro)",Portugal.
Sporting recollections,Finch Mason
Blue chips,Richard Woodley
Record breakers of pro sports,Nathan Aaseng
Undang-Undang Republik Indonesia nomor 3 tahun 2005 Tentang Sistem Keolahragaan Nasional,Indonesia.
Cuo wu de yun dong chang shi,"Zhang, Jian."
Positive Aikido,Henry Ellis
Sources of information on recreation,Russell Sage Foundation. Dept. of Recreation.
Economic impact assessment,Business Institute Charlottetown.
Ancient Roman sports and pastimes,Nicola Barber
White-water rafting,"George, Charles"
Colors of sports,Laura Purdie Salas
"Billiards, Bowling, Table Tennis, Pinball, and Video Games",Robert R. Craven
A New book of sports,
This island isn't big enough for the four of us!,Gery Greer
Ordinamento sportivo e calcio professionistico,Roberta Lombardi
L'évaluation de l'événementiel touristique,Jacques Spindler
Sports law in South Africa,André Louw
Trends in research,Michael J. Duncan
Ripley's believe it or not!,Geoff Tibballs
Fundamentals of sport and exercise nutrition,Marie Dunford
An introduction to windsurfing,Farrel O'Shea
Caught in a pickle,Ryan Jacobson
Dictionary of sports and games terminology,Adrian Room
Max n'aime pas perdre,Serge Bloch
Girls play to win basketball,Tom Robinson
Olympia 1952,Tore Nilsson
Sommar-Olympia 1948,Tore Nilsson
Learning culture through sports,"Sandra Spickard Prettyman, Brian Lampman"
Fair or foul,Christopher S. Kudlac
"Gold, silver and green","McCarthy, Kevin Ph. D."
Fat guys shouldn't be dancin' at halftime,Chet Coppock
The best Wisconsin sports arguments,Andy Kendeigh
"Information please almanac, atlas & yearbook, 1998",Borgna Brunner
The Penguin book of South African sports trivia,David O'Sullivan
Bŭlgarskii︠a︡t sport =,Khristo Meranzov
Sport in West Germany,John H. Price
Des patronages aux associations,Laurence Munoz
Nambuk tʻongil chʻeyuk ŭi pŏpchŏk kwaje,Minjok T'ongil Ch'eyuk Yŏn'guwŏn (Korea). Taet'ʻoronhoe
Authentic letters from upper Canada,Thomas William Magrath
Diritto dello sport,Agostino Guardamagna
Une main en trop,Paul Yonnet
Sporting Soldiers. South African troops at play during World War I,F. J. G. Van der Merwe
Native Americans in sports,C. Richard King
In It to Win It,Steven J. Lawson
Las deportivas mágicas,Christian Gálvez
The play of the week,Highlights for Children
No finish line,Marla Runyan
Fisiologi a del esfuerzo y del deporte,Jack H. Wilmore
Facts & dates of American sports,Gorton Carruth
Unofficial Dodgers Trivia Games And History,Dale Ratermann
"Jumble Celebration
            
                Jumbles",Tribune Media Services
Sports law,Patrick K. Thornton
CityEvents,Ward Rennen
Anni azzurri,Claudio Ferretti
Greatest Rivalries in Sports,Chris Dortch
Sport ataularynyn Łg oryssha-qazaqsha so zdi gi  =,To tenai dyn Łg Bazarbegi 
"Sport et société bourgeoise. Les associations sportives en Grèce, 1870-1922",Christina Koulouri
Extraordinary jobs in sports,Alecia T. Devantier
"Scientific evidence for musculoskeletal, bariatric, and sports nutrition",
Jack & Bobby,Leo McKinstry
samvetsrijan,Ravi bhoi
Vsi͡u︡ zhiznʹ za sineĭ ptit͡s︡eĭ--,N. N. Ozerov
Women Sport Society Further Reflections Reaffirming Mary Wollstonecraft,Patricia Vertinsky
Sports Illustrated 2013 Almanac,Sports Illustrated
The art of sport,Reuters Limited
Sport Management In The Middle East A Case Study Analysis,David Hassan
Not Dark Yet A Very Funny Book About A Very Serious Game,Mike Harfield
Markers,George Warren
Forever Hockeytown How The 2008 Red Wings Reclaimed The Stanley Cup,Triumph Books
A Childs Walk In The Wilderness An 8yearold Boy And His Father Take On The Appalachian Trail,Paul Molyneaux
Sporting Heroes Of Essex And East London 19602000,Phil Stevens
Sport Poems,Mary Colson
Advanced theory and practice in sport marketing,Eric C. Schwarz
Sport In Quotes,Ammonite Press
Batter Up Soccer Star 2 Books In One Over 50 Stickers,Random House
The Canadian book of games and other activities,Gordon Brandreth
300 Incredible Things For Sports Fans On The Internet,Paul Joffe
Gold Medal Diary Inside The Worlds Greatest Sports Event,Hayley Wickenheiser
Jews In The Gym Judaism Sports And Athletics,Leonard greenspoon
Beitr©Þge zur Physiologie maximaler Muskelarbeit,George Kolb
A history of sport in Wales,Martin Johnes
Summers In The Bronx Attila The Hun Other Yankee Stories,Ira Berkow
Dr Jack On Winning Basketball,Dr Jack Ramsay
The Economics Of The Super Bowl,Reagan Miller
Developing Game Sense Through Tactical Learning A Resource For Teachers And Coaches,Ray Breed
"Race, ethnicity, and football",Daniel Burdsey
Youre In The Front Row How To Kick Off Your Career In Sports Even If Youre Not A Star Athlete,Glenn Capeloto
For The Love Of The Tigers An Atoz Primer For Tigers Fans Of All Ages,Fred Klein
Rucks Pucks Sliders More Origins Of Peculiar Sporting Lingo,Bob Wilson
Bernie Ecclestone King Of Sport,Terry Lovell
Britains Most Eccentric Sports,Richard O. Smith
The Newberg Report 2010,Jamey Newberg
"Philosophy, risk and adventure sports",
Fair Game Myth And Reality In Sport,Eric C. Midwinter
Beckham The Future,Gwen Russell
Two Guys Read The Box Scores Conversations On Baseball And Other Metaphysical Wonders,Terrence N. Hill
Killer Bs The Boston Bruins Capture Their First Stanley Cup In 39 Years,Boston Globe
Research Process In Sport Exercise And Health Case Studies Of Active,Scott Fleming
Sport and postcolonialism,"John Bale, Mike Cronin"
For Jayhawks Fans Only Wonderful Stories Celebrating The Incredible Fans Of The Kansas Jayhawks,Rich Wolfe
How Figure Skating Works,Stephen MacEachern
Btec Level 3 National Sport,Ray Barker
This Sporting Life,"Emilie Buchwald, Ruth Roston"
Sports,Ferguson Publishing
Sporting dystopias,
"Spaltung, Zerschlagung, Widerstand",Reiner Fricke
Unique games and sports around the world,
World Wrestling Insanity presents Shoot first-- ask questions later,James Guttman
Achieving excellence,
Sport aerodynamics,
The Holy Father speaks to athletes,John XXIII Pope
Australia's sporting success,J. Bloomfield
Mind gym,
Kevin Pietersen Portrait Of A Rebel,Marcus Stead
Banner 17 Boston Celtics Return To Glory In A Magical Championship Season,Boston Globe
"Sport, Policy and Politics",Barrie Houlihan
El entrenador de e xito,Rainer Martens
Entrenamiento mental,Terry Orlick
The Best American Sports Writing 2010,Peter Gammons
Look Inside Sports,Rob Lloyd Jones
Sport In Cork A History,Donal O'Sullivan
Pediatric practice,"Dilip R. Patel, Donald E. Greydanus"
Routledge Handbook Of Sports Performance Analysis,Anta3nio Jaime De Eira Sampaio
Weekends To Brag About 100 Adventures In Britains Great Outdoors,Chris Nye
Sports Mad,Alison Hawes
Im Good At Sport What Job Can I Get,Richard Spilsbury
Michael Owen My Story The Autobiography Of The British Lions And Wales Rugby Legend,Michael Owen
Hottest Nascar Machines,K. C. Kelley
Die Fehlentscheidungen der Fu©ballschiedsrichter,Horst Hilpert
How Not To Be A Professional Footballer,Paul Merson
Brain and body in sport and exercise,
Sports law,Gordon I. Kirke
The Chicago Blackhawks,"Stewart, Mark"
Saint Benedict's Rule for fair play in sports,"Haeg, Larry Jr"
Varsity sports at Indiana University,Cecil K. Byrd
Straight writes and jabs,Thomas Hauser
Sports industry,John Greenwald
Sports in America,Stephen Meyer
The great life,"Sid Evans, P. J. O'Rourke, Holly George-Warren"
Girls play to win figure skating,Chros McDougall
Trent Frayne's allstars,Trent Frayne
A handbook for Sports Halls of Fame and Sports Museums,Canadian Association for Sports Heritage
Thru the smoky end boards,
The Oakland Raiders,"Stewart, Mark"
The New York Rangers,"Stewart, Mark"
The New York Jets,"Stewart, Mark"
The Detroit Lions,"Stewart, Mark"
Careers in pro sports,"Cordner Nelson, Ruth C. Rosen"
Slam dunk jokes for kids,"Phillips, Bob"
Values of the game,"Bradley, Bill"
We lived the game,Dick Denny
A literature of sports,Tom Dodge
Bernie's best,Bernie Miklasz
The Blue Bistro,Elin Hilderbrand
All sorts of sports,Linda B. Ross
The hard way,"Will Balliett, Tom Dyja"
Tony Hawk's Pro Skater 2,Richie Plantain
This sporting life,"Emilie Buchwald, Ruth Roston"
Alpine and freestyle skiing,Kylie Burns
Tim Tebow,Jenny Mackay
Snowboard,Joseph Alan Gustaitis
The Pittsburgh Penguins,"Stewart, Mark"
Exercise will hurt you,Steven J. Barrer
Crocodiles play,Robert Heidbreder
I know basketball,Annabelle Tometich
Michigan sports trivia,Chip Mundy
Forsaken 64,Andy Roberts
A Portrait of Dorian Yates,"Dorian Yates, Peter McGough"
Sports skills,Beverly L. Seidel
Baseball and philosophy,Eric Bronson
A Concise history of sport in Canada,Don Morrow
Entertainment and sports law,Graham Henderson
The ultimate guide to weight training for gymnastics,Robert G. Price
Twenty-five columns twenty-five,Edward H. Reeve
Sports culture,Ernest Cashmore
Run to starlight,"Martin H. Greenberg, Joseph D. Olander, Patricia S. Warrick"
Sports and the law,Charles Quirk
Cheating,Stephen Currie
Physiology of sports,Thomas Reilly
Physical therapy for sports,
Sports on the edge,Susan Schott Karr
Joy in Mudville,Bob Raczka
Safety sense,
Sports and exercise nutrition - 4. ed.,"Victor L. Katch, William D. McArdle, Frank I. Katch"
World Cup 2010,Steven D. Stark
The Smurf championship games,Peyo
"Historic sports pages, 1882-2002",Globe Newspaper Co
"Le Sport, jeu et enjeux?",Donald Guay
ABC sports,
Encyclopedia of sports science,John Zumerchik
The 1995 Information please sports almanac,Mike Meserole
Sports of our times,Dave Anderson
I can play,Betsy E. Snyder
A kind of grace,Ron Rapoport
Tony Hawk's Pro Skater 3,Doug Walsh
Baby loves sports,R. D. Rojas
"Statutory and documentary supplement to Cases, materials and problems on sports and the law",
The Illustrated Sports Record Book,"Z. Hollander, D. Schulz"
Ethics in sport,"William John Morgan, Klaus V. Meier, Angela Jo-Anne Schneider"
Tony Hawk's Pro Skater 3,Doug Walsh
Cool baseball facts,Kathryn Clay
Contemporary leadership in sport organizations,David Scott
"Fly like an eagle, and other stories",Elizabeth Van Steenwyk
Jews in Sports (Uh! Oh!),Joseph Hoffman
Show jumping,Robin Johnson
Hiking New York,Rhonda Ostertag
Fiery fullback,
Issues in sports,Maryann Hudson
Versuch einer Encyklopädie der Leibesübungen,Gerhard Ulrich Anton Vieth
The Toronto Maple Leafs,"Stewart, Mark"
"Think, eat and move better --",Micheal Clark
Tony Hawk's Pro Skater 3,BradyGames
Acute topics in sport nutrition,Manfred Lamprecht
Greatest rivalries in sports,"Lee, Tony (Sportswriter)"
Derek Jeter in the Community,Matt Anniss
Se busca delantero,Frauke Nahrgang
Hotair,Gary Alan Price
Pac-Mania,Editors of Consumer Guide
Recreation,
Crazyball,Barry Wilner
"Biathlon, cross-country, ski jumping, and nordic combined",Kylie Burns
Just for kicks,Robert Rayner
The Encyclopædia of sport & games,
Double play,Sara Cassidy
Basic Stream Flies How To Choose Fish Tie Them,Jim Schollmeyer
Sports And The Third Reich History Uniforms Insignia And Awards,Rob Newbrough
The Book Of Sports Virtues Portraits From The Field Of Play,Tommy Edwards
The Challenges Of Modern Sport To Ethics From Doping To Cyborgs,Jose Luis
Sexual Diversity and the Sochi 2014 Olympics,Helen Jefferson Lenskyj
"The Prince of Tennis Vol 40
            
                Prince of Tennis",Takeshi Konomi
Yuan Weimin yu ti tan feng yun,Yuanshan
Olympic Games,Pierre de Coubertin
Will It Make the Boat Go Faster,Harriet Beveridge
The mammoth book of world sports,Noam Friedlander
Symposium on special considerations in sports medicine,
Applied sport psychology,Jean M. Williams
Bibliografia fizičke kulture,
Sport psychology interventions,Shane M. Murphy
Oxford dictionary of sports science and medicine,Michael Kent
Sportzeitschriften und Sportzeitungen,
Sports,Pierre-Marie Valat
True champions,Mike Towle
Eddie,Ed Koch
"Sport, culture, and ideology",Jennifer Hargreaves
"University of Colorado financial, state-funded student financial assistance programs, and NCAA audits, fiscal year ended June 30, 1989",Colorado. Office of State Auditor
Sport and women,"Ilse Hartmann-Tews, Gertrud Pfister"
The book of rules,"Facts on File, Inc"
Traumatologie des Sports,
"Sport, Dienst an der Gesellschaft","Paul Jakobi, Heinz Egon Rösch"
Sports psychology in performance,"Butler, Richard J."
Rules of the game,Diagram Group
[Sports illustrated presents publications],
Sports injuries,Freddie H. Fu
Sport Safety Training,American National Red Cross
Sports safety series,Chauncey A. Morehouse
Des mythes sportifs,Louis Jolin
"Critical postmodernism in human movement, physical education, and sport",Juan-Miguel Fernandez-Balboa
Zhongguo ti yu,
Advances in nutrition and top sport,"F. Brouns, E. A. Newsholme"
Primary care sports medicine,
Advances in applied sport psychology,"Stephen D. Mellalieu, Sheldon Hanton"
"Antinoüs, estudo de cultura athletica",Fernando de Azevedo
Freizeitsport,
Sports stories you'll have a ball with,"Megan McDonald, Nancy Poydar"
Intercollegiate athletics and academic progress,John E. Stecklein
Sports structures in Europe,Albert Remans
Sports and the American Jew,Steven A. Riess
Sport injuries course,J. David Bergeron
Sports and athletics,
Sports and physical education in India,
"Các Luật và Pháp lệnh trong lĩnh vực văn hóa, xã hội, giáo dục, thẻ̂ thao, du lịch, khoa học công nghệ và môi trường",Vietnam
Risk management in sport,Herb Appenzeller
The Wonderful world of sport,
Sport in Europe,J. A. Mangan
"Advances in sport, leisure and ergonomics","Reilly, Thomas"
Skill acquisition in sport,"Williams, A. M., Nicola J. Hodges"
Wissenschaftstheoretische Beiträge zur Sportwissenschaft,Klaus Willimczik
Sports injuries of the shoulder,Thomas A. Souza
Sport management field experiences,"Jacquelyn Cuneen, M. Joy Sidwell"
Sports injury research,"John P. Albright, Frank R. Noyes"
Coping with sports injuries,Jane Crossman
Strategic and performance management of Olympic sport organisations,"Jean-Loup Chappelet, Emmanuel Bayle"
Orígenes del deporte madrileño,
Sports-induced inflammation,"Joseph A. Buckwalter, Stephen L. Gordon"
Terminologia da educação física e desportos,Otávio Augusto Anibal Cattani Fanali
Lietuvos sporto žinynas,A. Bertašius
Sports in Canada,Morris Kenneth Mott
Meyers kleines Lexikon,Gerhard Kwiatkowski
Aggression in the sports world,Gordon W. Russell
Geschichten vom Sport,Heinz Egon Rösch
Women and exercise,"Mona M. Shangold, Gabe Mirkin"
Sport and international politics,"Riordan, James"
Case studies in sport psychology,Robert J. Rotella
The Lincoln library of sports champions,
Sport in America,National Association for Physical Education of College Women
"Contemporary sport, leisure, and ergonomics","Thomas Reilly, G. Atkinson"
The Scientific view of sport,"Helmut Baitsch, Ommo Grupe, Dietrich Kurz"
Handbook of sports economics research,John Fizel
Physical education and kinesiology in North America,Earle F. Zeigler
Fitness in American culture,Kathryn Grover
Advances in sport and exercise psychology measurement,Joan L. Duda
The future development of amateur sport in P. E. I.,Sport P.E.I. Planning Committee.
Principles and practice of primary care sports medicine,"William E. Garrett, Donald T. Kirkendall"
Sports women,Marlene Adrian
Sports and the law,D. Ross Clark
Observations on the Soviet/Canadian transpolar ski trek,"Roy J. Shephard, A. Rode"
Great moments in sports,Mark Mulvoy
Serious sport,J. A. Mangan
Principles and practice of sport management,"Carol A. Barr, Mary A. Hums"
Stress management for sport,"Leonard D. Zaichkowsky, Wesley E. Sime"
Values in sports,"American Association for Health, Physical Education, and Recreation. Division for Girls and Women's Sports"
Safety in parks and recreation,
Overtraining in sport,Mary Louise O'Toole
Structural and physiological aspects of exercise and sport,"Warren Russell Johnson, E. R. Buskirk"
Who's who in physical culture,
The decay of bulldogism,George Frederick Gundelfinger
Training: scientific basis and application,Albert W. Taylor
"Motor development, adapted physical activity, and mental retardation",Adri Vermeer
Handbook on the economics of sport,"Wladimir Andreff, Stefan Szymanski"
The best of intentions,Sandra S. Yamate
Issues in contemporary athletics,James Harry Humphrey
Principles of safety in physical education and sport,Neil J. Dougherty
Law and sport in contemporary society,Steve Greenfield
Les sports en France,Jean Paul Ollivier
The sport scientists,Gary G. Brannigan
Case studies in sport marketing,Brenda G. Pitts
Winning is everything and other American myths,Thomas A. Tutko
Twelve sport immortals,Sports Performance Orthopedic Rehabilitation and Training (Association)
"Mental stress, mental concentration & nutrition",Frederick C. Hatfield
Indigenous games and martial arts of India,
Learning culture through sports,"Sandra Spickard Prettyman, Brian Lampman"
Wyniki sportowe w nowożytnych igrzyskach olimpijskich,Zbigniew Drozdowski
Der Sport Brockhaus,F.A. Brockhaus Wiesbaden (Firm)
American sport,Peter Levine
"Health, sports performance, and nutrition",Frederick C. Hatfield
Current research in sports biomechanics,"B. van Gheluwe, John Atha"
Jian zheng Aolinpike,"Mingxin Tang, Bing Zhang"
Indiana sporting life,Ray E. Boomhower
Pushing The Limits: A Chapter Book (True Tales: Sports),Melissa McDaniel
Pushing the Limits,Melissa McDaniel
Fractured focus,Richard Edward Lapchick
"Sports, fitness and the law",Dick Moriarty
"Media, sports, & society",Lawrence A. Wenner
Physical activities for fitness and fun,Robert B. Gantt
De la A a la Z con los deportes,Rafael Cruz-Contarini
"Dandies, eh?",
Nutrition in exercise and sport,Ira Wolinsky
The joys of sport,"Stevenson, William Yorke"
Ready 2 Rumble Boxing,Douglas Perry
Boys' own book of indoor & outdoor sports,John Uncle
WWF Attitude,BradyGames
Sports law,Gordon I. Kirke
Oxford textbook of sports medicine,Mark Harries
The Exile book of Canadian sports stories,Priscila Uppal
Not just a game,"Harvey, Jean"
Girls and sports,Karen Miller
University of Michigan,Alan Goldenbach
Natalie Coughlin,Barbara Sheen
The New York times encyclopedia of sports,Gene Brown
Sports math mania!,Lorraine Jean Hopping
[Sports illustrated presents special collector's edition publications],
Sportsguide Solar,
"Cátedras universitarias de tema deportivo-cultural, 1973",
Sports,Maria Birmingham
Symposium on injuries in sports,James A. Nicholas
Voices,
Fanatic : ten things all sports fans should do before they die,Jim Gorant
Albert Pujols,Rob Rains
The future of peak performance nutrition,Frederick C. Hatfield
Subway Series Reader,Pete Hamill
The young pitcher,Zane Grey
Why me? Why not Joe McGuff?,Joe McGuff
The wizard of odds : how Jack Molinas almost destroyed the game of basketball,"Charles Rosen, Charley Rosen"
Physical therapy for sports,
Brady Brady et la fille torpille,Mary Shaw
Board games,"Adam Beechen, Artful Doodlers"
Action pages!,Sydney Millar
"Who's who in Canadian sport, volume 3",Bob Ferguson
"You lose some, you lose some","Eric Furman, Lou Harry"
Principles and practice of sport management,"Carol A. Barr, Mary A. Hums"
Shaping the superman,J. A. Mangan
Sport and the color line,David Kenneth Wiggins
Peanuts all-stars,Charles M. Schulz
Baseball field guide,"Dan Formosa, Paul Hamburger"
Svu nghiuep & chuyuen tình nhzung ngôi sao thte thao,Hùng Đno
Laboratory manual to accompany rehabilitation techniques for sports medicine and athletic training,William E. Prentice
A century of sports,Time-Life Books
Competing with character,Kevin Kush
A century of Philadelphia sports,"Rich Westcott, Edward G. Rendell"
Elmélet a gyakorlatért,
Körperkultur und Sport,"Jaro Schafrik, Wolfgang Wonneberger"
A selected list on sports and occupations for boys,Wisconsin Free Library Commission
"Sport, culture and advertising","Steven J. Jackson, Andrews, David L."
"Physical culture, power, and the body","Jennifer Hargreaves, Patricia Anne Vertinsky"
Michael Jordan scrapbook,"Bradley, Michael, Bruce Herman, Roland Lazenby, Marty Strasen, Saul Wisnia"
Principles of safety in physical education and sport,Neil J. Dougherty
Sport in Africa : essays in social history,"William J. Baker, J. A. Mangan"
Sport in America,David Kenneth Wiggins
Tales from the Texas Tech Sideline,"Spike Dykes, Dave Boling"
Sports medicine and physiology,
Sports immortals,"Jim Platt, James Buckley"
Practical exam preparation guide of Clinical skills for athletic training,"Herb Amato, Christy D. Venable, Steven L. Cole"
Déterminants psychologiques de la performance,"Georges Rioux, Edgar Thill"
Design for sports,Akiko Busch
Psychology of sport,
Government and the sports business,Roger G. Noll
Not just another games book,
Athletes,Anita Yasuda
Literature/myth,
Sports,Francois Fortin
Sports of the Times,"Fischer, David"
Rules of the game,Diagram Group
Physical activity and the social sciences,W. Neil Widmeyer
Shawn Michaels,Tim O'Shei
Sandlot Peanuts,Charles M. Schulz
Salt Lake 2002 : an official book of the Olympic Winter Games,"Lee Benson, Susan Eston Black"
Playing in the zone,Andrew Cooper
Handbook of research on sport psychology,"Robert N. Singer, Milledge Murphey"
[Take ten books,Liz Parker
Sporting stories & jokes,
The Compass Book,"Mike Harris, Diane Harris"
The Athlete's shoulder,"James R. Andrews, Kevin E. Wilk"
Sports and recreational activities,"Dale P. Mood, Frank F. Musker, Judith E. Rink"
I like sports,"Muriel L. Dubois, Barbara M. Parramore"
Rehabilitation of the foot and ankle,V. James Sammarco
Sales success in sports marketing,Lori K. Miller
Polonijna kultura fizyczna,Zbigniew Drozdowski
Sports classics,Howard Siner
Sports,Ian Graham
2007 ESPN sports almanac,"Gerry Brown, Mike Morrison"
"Anthropology, sport, and culture",Robert R. Sands
Famous names in sport,Jack Dove
The Concise encyclopedia of sports,Gerald Newman
Developmental sport and exercise psychology,Maureen R. Weiss
Case studies in applied sport psychology,Ralph A. Vernacchia
Lerninhalte der Sportarten,Erwin Niedermann
"Signifyin(g), sanctifyin' & slam dunking",Gena Caponi-Tabery
Das Neue Sportlexikon,
The business of sport and leisure,
Feet first,
Hoop shot,Glen Downey
Enter at your own risk,Elizabeth Siegel
Games of survival,Johnny Issaluk
Stomp it!,Debbie Nyman
Live Albom IV (Live Albom),Mitch Albom
The great Delaware sports book,Doug Gelbert
Sports New York,"Schwartz, Steven"
The best American sports writing 2008,"Glenn Stout, William Nack"
Psychobiology of physical activity,Edmund O. Acevedo
Cátedras universitarias de tema deportivo-cultural 1973,
Sport and physical activity in the modern world,J. Richard Polidoro
The upper extremity in sports medicine,Elliott B. Hershman
"Tanulmányok a TFKI kutatásaiból, 1979",
Sonny Sixkiller's tales from the Huskies sideline,"Sonny Sixkiller, Bob Condotta"
Sports Illustrated 50th anniversary book,Sports Illustrated
Les Sports,Jean Bobet
The Cultural context of physical education,
Untersuchungsmethoden in der Sportpsychologie,
Aspekte von Lehre und Forschung,Stephan Starischka
Real-resumes for sports industry jobs,Anne McKinney
Sports physical therapy,
Workout recovery & nutrition,Frederick C. Hatfield
Shoulder injuries,"Jeffrey E. Falkel, Timothy C. Murphy, Terry R. Malone"
The 2001 ESPN Information please sports almanac,"Gerry Brown, Michael Morrison"
Ed Pinckney's tales from the Villanova hardwood : the story of the 1985 NCAA champs,"Ed Pinckney, Robert Gordon"
Tanked!,William H. Black
To the Xtreme,Joe Layden
The Sports illustrated yearbook 2001,Sports Illustrated.
Encyclopedia of international sports studies,"Roger Bartlett, Chris Gratton, Christer Rolf"
Out of the shadows,David Kenneth Wiggins
Grundbegriffe der Sportspiele,"Hugo Döbler, Günter Schnabel"
Tips on training,
Sport psychology in practice,Mark Andersen
Sports in America,William Dudley
Experiencing sport,John H. Kerr
Making sense of sport,Ernest Cashmore
The sports rules book,Human Kinetics (Organization)
"Encyclopedia of physical education, fitness, and sports",Thomas Kirk Cureton
Counseling in sports medicine,Richard Ray
Sports psychology in action,"Butler, Richard J."
Snowboarding,Dan Wakeham
Sports nutrition : enhancing athletic performance,Bill Campbell
Der Sinn in der Gymnastik und der Unsinn im Sport,Ernst Klotz
Mens sana in corpore sano,Gunnar Frostell
All those mornings ... at the post,"Shirley Povich, Lynn Povich, Maury Povich"
The ESPN Pro Football Encyclopedia First Edition (ESPN Pro Football Encyclopedia),"Gary Gillette, Matthew Silverman, Pete Palmer, Sean Lahman"
The athletic life in its relation to degenerative changes in the cardiovascular system,Robert Emmet Coughlin
K©œrperkultur der Frau ...,Rahel Hirsch
Holy Goals For Body And Soul Eight Steps To Connect Sports With God And Faith,Thomas John
Sportsbiz,Stephen Aris
Dei giuochi olimpici della Grecia e dei circensi in Roma,I. C. S.
The Greatest Moments in Sports Upsets and Underdogs,Len Berman
Ride of your life,"Lyn St. James, Steve Eubanks"
The philosophy of sport,P. McBride
R©·glement d'escrime,
"Bradfield v. Radley cricket, 1853-1911",T. Steele
Grand slam!,
Health science projects about sports performance,Robert Gardner
Motson's National Obsession,"Adam Ward, John Motson"
Throw Like a Girl,"Shelley Frost, Ann Troussieux"
The encyclopædia of sport & games,
Peterson's Sports Scholarships & College Athletic Programs (3rd ed),
We Learned to Ski,"Harold Evans, Brian Jackman, Mark Ottaway"
The baseball almanac,Dan Schlossberg
Let the games begin,Ralph Mellanby
Canadian sports sites for kids,Christopher MacKinnon
Careers in Sports (Careers Series),Salem Press
The Mud Flat Olympics,James Stevenson
Lost,
"Annual outing of the employees of Burroughs Wellcome & Co., Dartford, July 14th, 1900",Burroughs Wellcome and Company
Qi lai zuo yun dong,
Spector's pins of the world,Judy Gold
"Theagenes oder wissenschaftliche Darstellung der Gymnastik, Agonistik und Festspiele der Hellenen",Johann Heinrich Krause
Lichaamsontwikkeling in verband met geestelijke werkkracht,B. ten Have
Sports jokes!,Michael Dahl
Atari Flashback,"Bill Loguidice, Ken Schmidt, Dan Herrera, Geson Hatchett, Mitchell Lucas"
"Country contentments: or, The husbandmans recreations",Gervase Markham
Great moments in sports,Rita Golden Gelman
The boy's modern playmate,John George Wood
1000 facts on sports,Christopher Rigby
Sports,
Mind-body Maturity,Louis Diamant
"Bulls, bears, and other sports",
Race-horses past and present,I.F. Raimondi
The Scottish Sports Quiz,Martin Greig
The best American sports writing 2001,"Glenn Stout, Bud Collins"
"Team Alberta, 1990 Western Canada Summer Games",Team Alberta
Ti yu chao liu =,
Search for the Perfect Golf Club,"Tom Wishon, Tom Grundner"
Robert Griffin III in the Community,Matt Anniss
"Annual f©®te of the employees of Burroughs Wellcome and Company, held at the Wellcome Club & Institute, Dartford, July 20th, 1901",Burroughs Wellcome and Company
Gymnastik f©ơr die Jugend,Johann Christoph Friedrich Guts Muths
Wie ist Radfahren gesund?,Martin Siegfried
Lance de sorte,Micael Herschmann
Einweihung des Wellcome Clubs und Instituts,Burroughs Wellcome and Company
Idrottsboken,Gunnar Frostell
Willard Mullins Golden Age Of Baseball,Willard Mullin
Canadian football,John F. Edwards
Speed skating,Joseph Alan Gustaitis
Sports and leisure careers,Geoff Barker
Fenomeno sportivo e ordinamento giuridico,
Sports and athletes,Christine Watkins
Sport physiology course,Brian J. Sharkey
A policy for government direction in sport for Prince Edward Island 1992,"Prince Edward Island. Dept. of Tourism, Parks and Recreation. Sport and Recreation Branch."
Steeplechase,Martha Martin
The sports 100,Associated Press
Measuring time at a race,Dianne Irving
Zdorovyĭ obraz zhizni i fizicheskoe vospitanie studentov i slushateleĭ vuzov,A. V. Karasev
al-Andiyah wa-shaghl waqt al-farāgh,
Vierter,
Taiwan yuan zhu min de chuan tong ti yu yan jiu,Zhilie Chen
Biyomekhaniḳah shel sporṭ,ʻAmos Gilʻad
Rules for coeducational activities and sports,
Mongoru no supōtsu =,
Sportsathon,Vic Braden
Snowshoeing,Steven A. Griffin
Maʻaśeh ha-ba be-ḥazon,Yeḥiʼel A. Eliʼash
Exploring sport and fitness,"Ben Oakley, Simon Rea"
(Ki-meʻaṭ) kulam mesumamim,Uriel Simri
Sports law and regulation,"J. Gordon Hylton, Paul M. Anderson"
Muscular Christianity,"Tony Ladd, James A. Mathisen"
Euskal jokoa eta jolasa,
Coaching science,"Terry McMorris, Tudor Hale"
"Sports, juju, and human factor development",C. G. Mararike
The sporting life,"Anderson, Nancy F."
Sports and entertainment management,"Ken Kaser, John R Brooks"
Kungmin chʻeyuk hwaltong chʻamyŏ siltʻae chosa,
Istorija srpske atletike,
Fair play,Robert L. Simon
Handbuch Sportspiel,"Andreas Hohmann, Michael Kolb, Thomas Alkemeyer"
Umjigim kwa kŏnʼgang,Suk-cha Kim
The 100 Greatest Moments in St. Louis Sports,Bob Broeg
Helden und Idole,"Matthias Marschik, Georg Spitaler"
Jockularity,Brad Kirkland
Chŏntʻong muye,Uri Madang Tʻŏ (Firm : Korea)
1001 stupid sports quotes,Randy Howe
Don't bring that up!,Bob Broeg
All-star bathroom sampler,Max Brallier
Tairyoku supōtsu ni kansuru seron chōsa,Japan. Naikaku Sōri Daijin Kanbō. Kōhōshitsu
Zhongguo shao shu min zu chuan tong ti yu gai lan,Lizhu Chen
"Sports in America, 1970-1979",Tim Seeberg
O normativnykh pravovykh aktakh Rossiĭskoĭ Federat︠s︡ii v oblasti fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta,
Da Kinshasa a Las Vegas via Wimbledon,Rino Tommasi
Gradonačelnici u patikama,Veselin Drljević
PUNCH! Why Women Participate in Violent Sports,Jennifer Lawler
Maḥatsit rishonah,Arye Kanfer
Ensiklopedia olahraga Indonesia,Andi Mulya Fakhri
Team work,George Ancona
Sea kayaking in Florida,"David Gluckman, Mark Gluckman"
The ultimate guide to sport event management and marketing,Stedman Graham
Il parco del Foro Italico,"Luca Masia, Dario Matteoni"
Sport aerodynamics,Helge Nørstrud
Sport and American society: selected readings,George Harvey Sage
"Sport, theory, and social problems",Eric Anderson
Tairyoku supōtsu ni kansuru seron chōsa,Japan. Naikaku Sōri Daijin Kanbō. Kōhōshitsu
Intermittent hypoxia,Lei Xi
Digital sport for performance enhancement and competitive evolution,"Nigel Pope, Forster, John"
Catálogo de los deportes y juegos motores tradicionales canarios de adultos,
Führerwettkampfordnung der Hitler-Jugend,
I hope I don't strike out! and other funny sports poems,"Bruce Lansky, Stephen Carpenter"
Winning is a choice,"Paul Meier, Jim Hiskey"
Sunday Baseball,Charlie Bevis
Kukche pigyo chʻeyukhak,"Tae-sik Kim, Chae-yŏn Kim"
Sport bah̲ebratasabāwit ʼItyop̣yā,Ethiopia. YaSportenā yaʼakāl māśalṭañā komišen.
Nambuk chʻeyuk kyoryu e taehan kungmin ŭisik chosa,
Antikes Olympia,
The Best American Sports Writing,Michael Wilbon
The Unofficial Ducks Football Trivia Puzzles  History Book,Dale Ratermann
New York Giants Pride,Arthur Pincus
It Aint Over Til Its Over by John Marlowe,John Marlowe
"Routledge Handbook of Sports Technology and Engineering
            
                Routledge International Handbooks",Aleksandar Subic
Olympic Poems 100 Unofficial,Brian Moses
Court and Bowled,James Wilson
Good sports : a large print anthology of great sports writing,Judith Leet
A Question Of Sport Quiz Book,David Ball
A Year Of Sport Travel,Lonely Planet
Strategic Sports Event Management,Guy Masterman
Henry Cooper The Authorised Biography,Robert Edwards
Sport Politics And Society In The Land Of Israel Past And Present,Galily Yair
Playing With Purpose Inside The Lives And Faith Of Top Nba Stars Including Kevin Durant Kyle Korver Jeremy Lin And More,Mike Yorkey
"Inauguration of the Wellcome Club and Institute, Dartford, Kent, England, 1899",Burroughs Wellcome and Company
Sport in the ancient world from A to Z,Mark Golden
Nice guys finish last,Leo Durocher
Fore's sporting notes & sketches,
"Sport, physical education, recreation","Commonwealth Conference on Sport, Physical Education and Recreation (6th 1978 Edmonton, Alta.)"
Taking sport seriously,Peter Donnelly
Sports and society,"Robert Lipsyte, Gene Brown"
The real 100 best baseball players of all time-- and why,Kenneth A. Shouler
Watching Sport,Stephen Mumford
"The complete sportsman; or, country gentleman's recreation ...",Thomas Fairfax
The game : a novel,"John Brancato, Michael Ferris"
A Good Caddie is Hard to Find,Charles M. Schulz
American sport culture,Wiley Lee Umphlett
Life and sport in China,Oliver George Ready
The complete idiot's guide to Canadian sports history and trivia,Malcolm G. Kelly
Private eye Colemanballs 11,"Barry Fantoni, Larry"
Arete,"Miller, Stephen G."
Mike and Mike's rules for sports and life,"Mike Greenberg, Andrew Chaikivsky"
Fore's sporting notes & sketches,
The Sports book,"Min S. Yee, Donald K. Wright"
Greatest moments in sports history,Various
Favre,Joe Funk
Grosset & Dunlap's all-sports world record book,David S. Neft
The prince of tennis,Takeshi Konomi
Body language,Gerald Lyn Early
And to think I got in free!,Jim Taylor
Fathers & sons,
Ball game math,Katie Marsico
Figure skating,Joseph Alan Gustaitis
Becoming a supple leopard,Kelly Starrett
Sports Management,"Aaron Smith, Bob Stewart"
Sport and society in ancient Greece,Mark Golden
Extreme wakeboarding,A. T. McKenna
The Foxhole Court (All for the Game #1),Nora Sakavic
Skydiving,"William H. Fitzsimons, Bill FitzSimons"
Anxiety in sports,"Dieter Hackfort, Charles Donald Spielberger"
What to do about athletic injuries,"Fahey, Thomas D."
Hiking New Hampshire,Larry Pletcher
The athlete's guide to sponsorship,Jennifer E. Drury
"Home run heroes : Mark McGwire, Sammy Sosa, and a season for the ages",Sports Illustrated.
Hideaway hollow and other sports stories,
The best of Sports illustrated 2002-2003,
The best of Sports illustrated 2001-2002 season,
"Bigger than the game : Bo, Boz, the punky QB, and the making of the modern athlete in the eighties",Michael Weinreb
Gestión parlamentaria de la Comisión de Deportes,Santiago Rodríguez Bornert
Disc Golf Course Design,
"Scholastic Year in Sports 2012
            
                Scholastic Year in Sports","James, Jr. Buckley"
"Sport History and Heritage
            
                Heritage Matters",Jason Wood
A evolução do esporte no Brasil,Fernando de Azevedo
Standard catalog of sports memorabilia,Tom Mortenson
Hardcore Wrestling!,"Phantom of the Ring, Tyler Christian, Dean Cavanaugh, Mike Lano"
What's the call?,Sports Illustrated
Sports in America,Oliver Trager
Sport in the socio-cultural process,Mabel Marie Hart
Weird races,K. C. Kelley
WCW Nitro,Anthony Pena
Dartmouth athletics,"Bartlett, John H."
Voices of sport,Marv Albert
How to market your student athlete,Robert L. Scott
Playing with the boys,Eileen L. McDonagh
Gladiadores,
Sports and Entertainment Marketing,"Ken Kaser, Dotty Boen Oelkers"
Berkshire Encyclopedia of World Sport,Karen Christensen
In the zone,"Murphy, Michael"
Sarkozy côté vestiaires,Bruno Jeudy
Ways for boys to make and do things,"Charles M. Skinner, Thomas Williamson, Robinson, John, Virginia Smith, C. E. Taylor, H. E. King"
The Native American identity in sports,Frank A. Salamone
Are players' unions good for professional sports leagues?,Thomas Riggs
Introduction to the philosophy of sport,Heather Lynne Reid
Sun-Up to Sun-Down,Tom Franklin
Motivation and emotion in sport reversal theory,John H. Kerr
Baily's magazine of sports and pastimes,
1080 Degree Snowboarding,Big Game Hunters
Diccionario terminológico de los deportes,"Castañón Rodríguez, Jesús"
Rural sports,
Western field,"Olympic Club (San Francisco, Calif.)"
The Secret Lives of Sports Fans,Eric Simons
Mongolyn tu̇u̇khiĭn ėrt ėdu̇gėėkh 33 domogt bȯkh,Shiĭrėvdorzhiĭn Nasanbat
"Dictionnaire international, du sport et des sciences naturelles, en anglais, français, allemand, avec les termes techniques pour la chasse, la peche, les courses, les jeux et exercises athlétiques, et les sciences naturelles. = The international dictionary, for naturalists and sportsmen, in English, French, and German, containing the terms used in hunting, shooting, fishing, &c., natural history, and the sciences, by Edwin Simpson-Baikie. = Internationales Wörterbuch, für Naturfreunde und Jäger, Englisch, Franzïsisch, Deutsch, enthaltend alle bei der Jagd, Fisherei, dem Pferderennen, sämmtlichen Spielen, so wie bei den gestammten naturwissenschaften vorkommenden technischen ausdrücke",Edwin Simpson-Baikie
American turf register and sporting magazine,
"Guan nian, zu zhi yu shi jian",Dingguo Lin
The Tar heel,
National police gazette,Clara Mulholland
Safety Sense at Play,Heward Grafftey
The New sporting magazine,
Constitution by-laws and rules of order,Montreal Amateur Athletic Association
"It's a Good Game, Dear Dragon (New Dear Dragon) [Paperback]",Margaret Hillert
Normas gerais sobre desporto,Irany Ferrari
99 tokoh olahraga Indonesia,Antara (Organization)
Der Stellenwert und die Entwicklung der Spiele in der Antike,Nicole Vinci
Der Stellenwert und die Entwicklung der Spiele in der Antike,Nicole Vinci
"Expressives und geregeltes Verhalten über Lebensführung, Lebensstile, Körperlichkeit und Sport",Anton Sterbling
Tendent︠s︡ii︠a︡ razvitii︠a︡ sportivnykh igr v sovremennom sporte,"M. D. Ashibokova, M. Kh Kodzheshau"
Sportivnoe pravo v Respublike Belarusʹ,D. V. Domorat︠s︡kiĭ
"The Sportsman's cabinet, and town and country magazine",
The sporting chronicle annual--,
Scholarship,Joe Safdie
The Badminton magazine of sports and pastimes,Alfred Edward Thomas Watson
A prospectus for the expansion of the intramural programs for men and women,University of Illinois (Urbana-Champaign campus). College of Physical Education. Dean's Committee on Intramural and Corecreational Sports
Forest and stream,
Die Fair-Play-Initative [sic] des deutschen Sports,Manfred Lämmer
Borʹba klassicheskai︠a︡ i volʹnai︠a︡,N. M. Galkovskiĭ
History of provincial government services in sport and recreation part IV : 1970-1975,Michael Dinning
"A "" Pink 'un"" remembers",John Bennion Booth
al- Musābaqāt wa-aḥkāmuhā fī al-sharīʻah al-Islāmīyah,Saʻd ibn Nāṣir ibn ʻAbd al-ʻAzīz Shithrī
The Olympic movement and its future,"Olympic Congress (10th 1973 Varna, Bulgaria)"
Anthologie des textes sportifs de l'antiquité,"Berger, Marcel"
Yumrukoyunu terimleri sözlüǧü,Nihat Işitman
Die soziologie des sports,Heinz Risse
Impact of ambush marketing on sponsor identification,Seema Gupta
Duaḥ ha-Kenes ha-artsi ha-sheni li-psikhologyah ule-sotsyologyah shel ha-sporṭ ṿeha-ḥinukh ha-gufani,Kenes ha-artsi li-psikhologyah ule-sotsyologyah shel ha-sporṭ ṿeha-ḥinukh ha-gufani (2nd 1985 Mekhon Ṿingaiṭ le-ḥinukh gufani ṿeli-sporṭ)
40 shenot sporṭ be-Yiśraʼel,Uriel Simri
Boleiros do cerrado,Fernando Fedola de Luiz Brito Vianna
Minsok nori chongnyu,Uri Madang Tʻŏ (Firm : Korea)
"Tìm hiểu Luật thể dục, thể thao","Trịnh, Thị Thanh Hương"
Haykakan sportě ew marmnakrtʻutʻyuně Osmanyan Kaysrutʻyunum,Gaĭk Demoi︠a︡n
II congresso de direito do desporto,Ricardo Costa
Comissão Especial do Esporte,Minas Gerais (Brazil). Comissão Especial do Esporte.
David Beckham (Sports Heroes and Legends),Ken Pendleton
Situationsanalyse des Hochschulsports,
Ti yu yi shu,
Hiking Zion and Bryce Canyon National Parks (Regional Hiking Series),Erik Molvar
Athletics in America.,Arnold William Flath
Psychology of sports,"Jitendra Mohan, N. K. Chadha"
Zur Situation des Spitzensportlers,Norbert Schulz
Sport marketing,George R. Milne
Georgia Outdoor Activity Guide (Outdoor Activity Guide Series),Carol Thalimer
The replacements,"Keanu Reeves, Dylan Sellers, Vince McKewin, Howard Deutch"
Farewell to sport,Paul Gallico
Best by the Numbers: Who Wore What With Distinction [Hardcover] (Sporting News),Ron Smith
Sport et société,Lord Killanin
Le Sport--à corps perdu,Jean-Paul Callède
The Boy's modern playmate,John George Wood
Dishonored games,"Vyv Simson, Andrew Jennings"
High stakes,"Timothy Jon Curry, Kent Schwirian, Rachel A. Woldoff"
"Phillips Academy, Andover, on diamond, track and field",Frank L. Quinby
Atlanty,
Sportschau,Jens Bartels
Blades of glory,"Jacobs, John, Craig Cox, Jeff Cox, John Altschuler, Josh Gordon"
The history and development of physical education and sports in the Philippines,Regino R. Ylanan
Bay state youth sports guide: resources for sports injury prevention,Massachusetts. Dept. of Public Health
The book of sport,"Patten, William"
Research methods in athletic training,Brent A Arnold
La tutela della salute nelle attività motorie e sportive,Carlo Bottari
Es una regla,"Hollie J. Endres, Jeri S. Cipriano"
Fan mai Aoyun,Shiding Li
Olimpiĭskoe dvizhenie i sot︠s︡ialʹnye prot︠s︡essy,"Russia) Konferent︠s︡ii︠a︡ ""Olimpiĭskoe dvizhenie i sot︠s︡ialʹnye prot︠s︡essy"" (11th 2002 Moscow"
Le sexe et le sport,Tristan Alric
Not at any price,"Vincent, J. Bartimo , Rosalind , P. Muller"
Sport,"Rochelle Le Roux, S. J. Cornelius"
Sailboarding,Bob Italia
Inventory of ASEAN traditional games and sports,ASEAN Committee on Culture and Information
"Sabonis, Marčiulionis, Zelkevičius ir kiti",Jurijus Volochovas
Diritto sportivo,Mario Sanino
Sport i zakonodatelʹstvo,R. G. Gostev
Afrique francophone et développement du sport,Colloque international de management du sport (1st 2002)
Diritto del lavoro sportivo,Maria Teresa Spadafora
Mexican Americans and sports,"Jorge Iber, Samuel O. Regalado"
Hiking the SuAsCo watershed,"Jill PhelpsKern, Jill Phelps Kern"
Sports et loisirs dans les colonies,Evelyne Combeau-Mari
Intégration par le sport,"Marc Falcoz, Michel Koebel"
Les fédérations sportives,Grégory Mollion
Tre kronor,Bobby Byström
Sport und Recht,Oliver Arter
"Bestandesklima, Energiehaushalt und Evapotranspiration eines neotropischen Bergregenwaldes",Thomas Motzer
Hot number,Carly Phillips
Sportivnai︠a︡ ėnt︠s︡iklopedii︠a︡ Belarusi,"Henadzʹ Pashkoŭ, I︠U︡. L. Sivakov"
Olimpiĭskai︠a︡ idei︠a︡ dli︠a︡ Rossii,V. S. Rodichenko
Evaluation of the Australia-Papua New Guinea Silver Jubilee Sports Program,Richard Guy
Idrett og juss,Gunnar-Martin Kjenner
Activités physiques et sportives,France. Direction des journaux officiels
El derecho deportivo,Marta Lora-Tamayo Vallvé
Le sport en questions,"Pascal Duret, Dominique Bodin, Christophe Brissonneau"
La Giustizia sportiva,Paolo Moro
Codice dell'ordinamento sportivo,"Pasquale Stanzione, Giovanni Sciancalepore"
Dream and conquest,Comitê  Olímpico Brasileiro
Pratique de finance,Jean-Paul Louis Minquet
Chonrima Choson no jinmin taiiku,Korea (North)
"Internationale Olympische Akademie, IOA",Norbert Müller
Supōtsu no kagaku,
"Sporting boundaries, sporting events and commodification","Dikaia Chatziefstathiou, Andrea Kathryn Talentino"
Oregon Tech Athletic Legacy 1947-2012,Kathy Yates
Improving sports safety,"United States. Congress. House. Committee on Energy and Commerce. Subcommittee on Commerce, Manufacturing, and Trade"
Jian ming ti yin mei ci dian,"Jingming Wen, Zhongliang Tong, Pu Ruan"
Ti yu lun wen xuan,China. Guo jia ti wei. Zheng ce yan jiu shi
Ti yu wen xian jian suo yu li yong,Jinghua Zhou
Nachisu Doitsu no supōtsu,"Krause, Gerhard Dr"
Ilbon ŭl kkŏktŏn nal,Chip Kim
Taehan Chʻeyukhoe sa,Taehan Chʻeyukhoe
Ti yu yun dong xin li,Jianzhou Li
Subventionierung des Sports,Peter Josef Tettinger
Góðir gulir dagar,Helgi Jacobsen
Chʻeyuk charyo mongnok,Korea (South). Chʻeyuk Chŏngbo Charyosil
Lei Pelé e legislação desportiva brasileira anotadas,Marcilio Cesar Ramos Krieger
L'Europe garante de l'éthique sportive?,
Aspectos sociológicos do desporto,Salomé Marivoet
Ukraïnsʹkyĭ sport,Oksana Vat︠s︡eba
Mi-saviv la-kadur,Eran Sela
Pratiques sportives et identités locales,Thierry Terret
Today in history,"Woman's Rights Convention (1851 Akron, Ohio)"
Frankfurter Waldstadion,"Bauer, Thomas"
Die Gewährleistung der öffentlichen Sicherheit und Ordnung bei Grosssportveranstaltungen,Franz-Peter Stümper
"Kommentariĭ k Federalʹnomu zakonu ""O fizicheskoĭ kulʹture i sporte v Rossiĭskoĭ Federat︠s︡ii""",N. A. Ignati︠u︡k
Bewegingsruimte,Hugo van der Poel
Sportivno-pedagogicheskai︠a︡ informatika,A. I. Fedorov
Skrytá cesta k vítězství,Svatava Maria Kabošová
Piemonte,Beppe Conti
Plan d'activite ministerielle 2000-2004,Youth and Sports Vanuatu. Ministry of Education
Sports in Japan,
"Problemy fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury, sporta i turizma",S. S. Dobrovolʹskiĭ
Mezhdunarodnyĭ sportivnyĭ arbitrazh,A. M. Brilliantova
Sporto terminų žodynas,S. Stonkus
Living the gold-medal life,"Mary Lee Tracy, Ginny McCabe"
Terminologii︠a︡ sporta,"F. P. Suslov, D. A. Tyshler"
Wybrane psychologiczne aspekty aktywności sportowej,Tadeusz Sankowski
Diritto dello sport,Massimo Coccia
Il risarcimento del danno nello sport,Mario Conte
The regulation of markets for team sports,Henrik Horn
100 unforgettable moments in pro baseball,Bob Italia
Spirituality of sport,Susan Saint Sing
Quest handbook,Boy Scouts of America
The official snack guide for beleaguered sports parents,Dawn Weatherwax
"A compendium of national reports on laws affecting sport in countries having acceded to the European Cultural Convention : Strasbourg, January 1999",Council of Europe
Lietuvos Respublikos Kūno kultūros ir sporto strategija 2000-2012 m.,Lithuania. Sporto taryba
"Kalmyt︠s︡ko-russkiĭ, russko-kalmyt︠s︡kiĭ slovarʹ sportivnykh terminov",N. N. Ubushaev
A club for all seasons,Andy Collins
Pakistan sports,
Sports and physical education in India,
Wettkampfsport,Detlef Kuhlmann
Belboghli Turkiston kurashi,N. Kh Azizov
Ti︠a︡zhelye krylʹi︠a︡,Alekseĭ Samoĭlov
Applied exercise and sport physiology,"Terry J. Housh, Dona J. Housh, Herbert A. Devries"
Answer Guy,"Brendan O'Connor, Neil Fine, Gary Belsky"
Mayo Clinic sports health & fitness,
Sociologjia e sportit,
Samoa,Sports and Cultural Affairs Samoa. Ministry of Youth
Hale men of Fordham,Fred Feddeck
Den folkliga idrotten,Mats Hellspong
Kroppen i focus,Lars-Henrik Schmidt
Sportvereine im Vergleich zu anderen Formen des Freizeitsports,Marijana Pfeiffer-Karabin
C.S. Titus,
A study to integrate tourism and sports in Manitoba,Matrix Management
Los irritantes privilegios en el deporte,"Pablo A. Ramirez, Corregidor, Ram&iacute, Pablo A. Rez"
Urheilu ja historia,Vesa Vares
Staying Positive in a Negative World (Faith Library),Kenneth E. Hagin
What It Means to Believe with the Heart (Faith Library),Kenneth E. Hagin
Department of the Environment,Northern Ireland. Comptroller and Auditor General
Futbolda Türk-Rum,Yücel Hatay
Fair play?,Pete Lunn
A touch of magic,John Gascoyne
Les jeux traditionnels en Europe,"Jean-Jacques Barreau, Guy Jaouen"
Multiculturalità e sport,Panathlon International. Congresso
Il senso del movimento,Gabriele Gravina
Sport et genre,Thierry Terret
Der Konflikt zwischen Sport und Umwelt dargestellt am Beispiel der Entwicklung des Golfsports im Raum Brandenburg-Berlin,Roland Baartz
Krasnyĭ led,E. A. Penʹkovskiĭ
Ėstetika fizicheskikh uprazhneniĭ,L. D. Nazarenko
"Zhonghua Renmin Gongheguo ti yu shi, 1949-1999","Weimin Yuan, Zhijian Li"
Balocchi d'Olimpia,Maurizio Sessa
Être une femme dans le monde des hommes,Christine Mennesson
Min zu chuan tong ti yu fa zhan de wen hua shen shi,Gang Wang
Đấu trường vinh quang,Nhà xuất bản Trẻ
Introduction to sociology of sport,Okey Ogu
"L'Équipe, 60 ans",Gérard Ejnès
La leçon de sport,Jean-Philippe Acensi
Spektrum des Sportrechts,Klaus Vieweg
Perspektivy ispolʹzovanii︠a︡ solodki goloĭ v praktike sportivnykh trenirovok,N. G. Beli︠a︡ev
"Deporte, poder e identidad en Centroamérica",Chester Urbina Gaitán
Festschrift für Volker Röhricht zum 65. Geburtstag,"Volker Röhricht, Georg Crezelius, Heribert Hirte, Klaus Vieweg"
Akta Pembangunan Sukan 1997 (Akta 576) dan peraturan-peraturan,Malaysia
The fall festival auction,Superior Sports Auctions
Proyecto de Ley sobre creación de sociedades anómimas deportivas profesionales,Marcelo Venegas Palacios
40 años con el deporte aragonés,Vicente Merino González
Documento final,"Conferência Nacional do Esporte (1st 2004 Brasília, Distrito Federal, Brazil)"
Atenas 2004,Oscar Valporto
Community sport counts,Victoria. Department for Victorian Communities
Comentários sobre o código brasileiro de justiça desportiva com enfoque no futebol,Marcus Frederico Donnici Sion
Traços históricos da educação física no Amazonas,Guilherme Pinto Nery
Estatuto de defesa do torcedor e legislação correlata,Brazil. Congresso Nacional. Câmara dos Deputados
Rottenberg and the economics of sport after 50 years,"Sloane, Peter J."
Sportlik Eesti,Estonia. Kultuuriministeerium
The Wildcats,Michael P. Connolly
Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura i sport,VER! Harry Potter 20th Anniversary: Return to Hogwarts 2021 P E L I C U L A Online HD
Presencia del deporte en el cine español,Joaquim Romaguera i Ramió
A hivatalos labdarúgás piacai,Krisztina András
Reflexiones acerca de la evolución del hecho deportivo,José Luis Domínguez
A sport és az üzlet kapcsolata,Krisztina András
Märkte und Organisationen im Sport,"Egon Franck, Horst-Manfred Schellhaaß, Bernhard Frick, Martin-Peter Büch"
The great Philadelphia sports debate,Glen Macnow
Lamartine,Richard Alix
Hē doxa tou athlētismou,
Sovremennai︠a︡ russkai︠a︡ sportivnai︠a︡ terminologii︠a︡,V. R. Bogoslovskai︠a︡
Physiology of sport and exercise,"Jack H. Wilmore, David L. Costill"
O desporto nos tribunais,José M. Meirim
Saturday commentary,Clem Oluwole
Um olhar sociológico sobre o desporto no limiar do século XXI,Universidade Técnica de Lisboa?) Jornadas de Sociologia do Desporto (3rd 1999 Faculdade de Motricidade Humana
"Kadursal, zeh lo raḳ miśḥaḳ",Noah Klieger
Zhejiang Sheng ti yu zhi,Zhejiang Sheng ti yu zhi bian zuan wei yuan hui
To Huntington we pledge,Walter A. Bowser
Viaggio nello sport attraverso i secoli,Maria Aiello
Gli effetti delle decisioni dei giudici sportivi,Claudio Franchini
Boʻeṭet ba-muskamot,Raḥel Ifergan
Russkai︠a︡ sportivnai︠a︡ leksika,I. G. Kozhevnikova
Proceedings of NUGA Forum 2002,Nigerian University Games Association. Forum
Lo sport nell'Italia antica,"Giuseppe Andreassi, Assunta Cocchiaro"
Multi-disciplinary approach to human kinetics and health education,"Veronica C. Igbanugo, B. O. Ogundele"
"Lithuanian Association ""Sport for all.""","Lietuvos Asociacija ""Sportas visiems."""
Introduction to physical education and sport,"Marilyn M. Buck, J. Thomas Jable, Patricia A. Floyd"
Min zu ti yu lun ji,China) Quan guo shao shu min zu chuan tong ti yu yun dong hui ke xue lun wen bao gao hui (7th 2003 Yinchuan Shi
"Sports and recreation in Hedgeville and Browntown, Wilmington, Delaware",Thomas Duszak
Memória social dos esportes,Clara Emília Sanches Monteiro de Barros Malhano
Legislación deportiva,Alvaro Carreño Carreño
"Chelovek v mire sporta : novye idei, tekhnologii, perspektivy","Mezhdunarodnyĭ kongress ""Chelovek v mire sporta: novye idei, tekhnologii, perspektivy (1998 Moscow, Russia)"
Liikunnan yhteiskunnallinen perustelu,Liikunnan ja Kansanterveyden Edistämissäätiö
La machinerie sportive,Jean Marie Brohm
Stair CLG Chonnacht,
Sport history,F. J. G. Van der Merwe
Sport und Recht,Martin Nolte
Sport i turizm v Bashkortostane za semʹ let gosudarstvennogo suvereniteta (1990-1997 gg.),R. A. Ai︠u︡pov
Ti yu zhi zi Rong Gaotang,Lingxiu Li
Eesti spordi biograafiline leksikon,"Henn Saarmann, Erlend Teemägi"
Madrid y el deporte,Lucas de Haro
Fitness,Frederick C. Hatfield
Le sport au Burkina Faso,
Bai nian Zhong wen ti yu tu shu zong hui,Caixia Liu
Qualitative Forschungsansätze in der Sportpädagogik,"Detlef Kuhlmann, Eckart Balz"
Wpływ uprawiania sportu przez kobiety na ich biologię w wieku dojrzałym,Elżbieta Rostkowska
Český sport,Michal Ninger
Profesiĭna pidhotovka maĭbutnikh fakhivt︠s︡iv fizychnoho vykhovanni︠a︡ ta sportu,L. P. Sushchenko
Sot︠s︡ialʹnoe zakonodatelʹstvo,"I︠U︡. A. Tikhomirov, V. N. Zenkov"
Die Ökonomie des Sports in den Medien,"Thorsten Schauerte, Jürgen Schwier"
Er shi yi shi ji Zhongguo shao shu min zu ti yu,Yangxi
Handbuch eLearning,"Christoph Igel, Reinhard Daugs, Thomas Abel"
Nanjing ti yu zhi,Nanjing Shi di fang zhi bian zuan wei yuan hui
Jiangxi Sheng ti yu zhi,"""Jiangxi Sheng ti yu zhi"" bian zuan wei yuan hui"
S'accomplir ou se dépasser,Isabelle Queval
Suchasni problemy fizychnoho vykhovanni︠a︡ ta sportu shkoli︠a︡riv i studentiv Ukraïny,V. V. Buhai︠e︡nko
Où va le sportif d'élite?,"Franck Nicolleau, Paul M. Anderson"
Attività sportive e responsabilità dell'organizzatore,Giuseppe Liotta
Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura i sport,V. P. Solomin
"Turismo, ocio y deporte",Spain) Congreso Español de Sociología (8th 2004 Alicante
"I Encontro Nacional sobre Legislação Esportivo-Trabalhista, Lei no. 9.615-98",Encontro Nacional sobre Legislação Esportivo-Trabalhista (1st 2000 Tribunal Superior do Trabalho)
O esporte como indústria,Istvan Karoly Kasznar
"Once we played, now we teach",N.Y.) Jordan Elbridge Central School District (Jordan
"""Let a dead horse rest,"" and other great guffaws from the world's top sports figures",Loran Smith
Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura i sport--osnova zdorovogo obraza zhizni,
Sport et presse en France,Evelyne Combeau-Mari
Der Sportteil im Wandel,Daniel Beck
Game Changer,Sierra Hill
Sports et société,Christian Pociello
I dar bogov--,Valerii︠a︡ Kuzʹmenko-Titova
Ampol's Australian sporting records,"Pollard, Jack."
The Ampol book of Australian sporting records,"Pollard, Jack."
Sports' toughest games,John Devaney
Ampol's sporting records,"Pollard, Jack."
How Do You Spell Win?,"Robert Collins - undifferentiated, Dena Chapman"
Estado y deporte,Antonio Aguilera Fernández
Oban united in sport,Alan Hill
Camp Yuck,Leslie McGuire
Tackling Dummies,Bobby Vernon
Birth to millennium,Mike Toth
One man's dream,Frank White
Sporting slip-ups and goalmouth gaffes,"Stephen Blake, Andrew John"
Gridless,Mathew Boyer
Guide des sources pour l'histoire du sport en Languedoc-Roussillon,Association pour la promotion des archives en Languedoc-Roussillon.
Teach Yourself To Swim - Floating Relaxed,Dr. Pete Andersen
Studien zur Gleichgewichtsfähigkeit im Sport,Dieter Teipel
Le sport,Dominique Voisin
Game 163,Denny Dressman
"Sport Management, Volume 1, Second Edition","Russell Hoye, Aaron Smith, Matthew Nicholson, Bob Stewart, Hans Westerbeek"
Classic Rock Climbs No. 5,"Neil J. A. Sloane, Paul Nick"
Wildcat gridiron guide,Tim Fitzgerald
"Salut, les sportifs!",Martine Latulippe
Corky,Corky Simpson
Teach Yourself To Swim Advanced Workout Skills,Dr. Pete Andersen
Top 10 Worst Injuries in Football,David Aretha
Dicionário jurídico do desporto,José M. Meirim
Sportswatching,"Steve Pinder, Robert Steen"
"Petrol, bait, ammo, & ice",H. G. Nelson
Sport's great all-rounders,"Holder, James (Law consultant)"
Adrenaline Adventure,Jeff C. Young
Segurança e seguranças desportivas,José M. Meirim
Still crazy -- about sport,Colin Walsh
Super Mamie,Claude Clément
"Super sport factfinder, South African & international",Anton Berkovitz
South Africa and international sports factfinder,Anton Berkovitz
Fore!,"Hopkins, John"
Sports in literature,Bruce Emra
La responsabilità civile per le attività sportive,Vittorio Frattarolo
L' ordinamento sportivo nella giurisprudenza,Vittorio Frattarolo
Don't skate near the Liftlock and other sports stories about Peterborough,Don Barrie
Les Grands moments du sport,n/a
The Balls.ie guide to life,
Men Who Played The Game,Mike Rees
Duke Blue Devils,McMinn
The glory of Washington,"Jim Daves, Tom Porter"
Sam's First Soccer Practice!,Samina Parkar
Greatest sports heroes of all times,"Paul J. Christopher, Alicia Marie Smith"
Lucas joue au football,Clémence Masteau
The sports day,"Ladybird Books, W. Murray"
Delphoi és a Pythia sportversenyei,"Maróti, Egon"
Bibliographie zum antiken Sport und Agonistik,"Maróti, Egon"
Katekholaminy i kortikosteroidy pri myshechnoĭ dei︠a︡telʹnosti,A. A. Viru
Uulyg ch nuraakh khu̇chtėn,Lkhamyn Khaĭdav
Min zu ti yu ji jin,
Lo Sport nel mondo antico,
România la Jocurile olimpice,
Supōtsu shakaigaku kōgi,Sadao Morikawa
Sport psychology in theory and practice,
A! Taehan Ming̕uk,"Sŏk-hwan Yi, Mun-sŏng Pak"
La sociologie d'intervention,Denis Bernardeau Moreau
Chiiki supōtsu-ron,"Tanada, Shinsuke"
Chʻeyuk sahoehak,Hong-jong Yi
"Conclusions from work undertaken and texts approved by the CDDS, 1978-1986",
"""Bungei shunjū"" ni miru supōtsu Shōwa shi","Bungei Shunjū, Kabushiki Kaisha"
Kulturgut oder Körperkult?,"Hermann Bausinger, Ommo Grupe"
Kukka taep'yo ŏmŏni ŭi kido,Tŏk-sin Yun
The Giant makes the team,Linda Koons
A passion to win,Lou Nanne
"Loka kheḍāṃ, loka shugala ate mele-tiuhāra",Kulawanta Kaura
Che 24-hoe Sŏul Ollimpʻik kinyŏm hwabo,Kangwŏn-do (Korea)
Für einen besseren Sport,"Ommo Grupe, Hartmut Gabler, Ulrich Göhner, Hermann Bausinger"
Violence in sports,Paul Bowker
"Pakistan sports achievements in Asia, 1947-2013","Ali, Muhammad (Sports Journalist)"
Sport w przedwojennej Warszawie,Aleksandra Janiszewska
Crossmediale Kommunikation und Verwertung von Sportveranstaltungen,"Internationales Hamburger Symposium ""Sport, Ökonomie und Medien"" (12th 2012 Hamburg, Germany)"
Le marketing des fédérations sportives,Christopher Hautbois
Sports and entertainment of the 2000s,Carla Mooney
Tübinger Texte zum Sport,Ommo Grupe
The art of joint locking,Arlo Welty
Motorcycle racing,Lori Polydoros
"Kỷ yếu Hội nghị triển khai công tác văn hóa, thể thao và du lịch năm 2011","Vietnam. Bộ văn hóa, thể thao, và du lịch"
Heritage games,Shabnam Sultana
Ein Leben in Bewegung,Heinz-Egon Rösch
Champions of the barrio,R. Gaines Baty
Dictionary,Herbert Haag
Anti-Doping-Bundesgesetz 2007,Austria
Early professional baseball and the sporting press,R. Terry Furst
Spectator guide,"Commonwealth Games. (19th 2010 Delhi, India)"
100 godina na olimpijskim igrama,Đorđe Perišić
Quest for glory,Michael Marnewick
Gone pro Florida,Steve Rajtar
Duchowy wymiar cierpienia sportowców wyczynowych,Adam Podolski
Nothing finer,Wilt Browning
Direito desportivo & esporte,Instituto de Direito Desportivo da Bahia
1922,"João Manuel C. Malaia Santos, Victor Andrade de Melo"
Mais do que um jogo,"Simpósio Internacional ""Esporte, Colonialismo e Pós-Colonialismo em Países Africanos de Língua Oficial Portuguesa"" (2010 Rio de Janeiro, Brazil)"
Evaluation of the strategy for Norway's culture and sports cooperation with countries in the South,"Kim Forss, Nora Ingdal, Stein-Erik Kruse, Ananda S. Millard"
A labdaháztól a Népstadionig,Miklós Zeidler
Idrætspolitik i komparativ belysning,Henning Eichberg
Sportunfallprävention aus rechtlicher Sicht,Judith Natterer Gartmann
Vuvuzelanation,Zapiro
Irha Kim Sang-gu Kyosu hwagap kinyŏm nonchʻong,Sang-gu Kim
"'86, '88 Ollimpʻik chʻeyuk insa chʻongnam",Ollimpʻik Chʻeyuk Insa Chʻongnam Pʻyŏnchʻan Wiwŏnhoe
Tech's luck,Murray Silver
Core workouts,Z. B. Hill
Philosophy of sport,"R. Scott Kretchmar, Peter M. Hopsicker"
Professional and collegiate sports,Thomas M. Miller
Kukche pŏp kwa hamkke ingnŭn Tokto hyŏndaesa,Chae-min Chŏng
Nihon no supōtsu-kai wa bōryoku o kokufuku dekiru ka,Sadao Morikawa
"Supōtsu, taibatsu, Tōkyō Orinpikku",Masayuki Tamaki
100 memorable sporting moments,Peter Joyce
"Bot salup kānchattang patibat phǣn phatthanā kānsưksā læ kīlā 5 pī khang thī VI, 2006-2010 læ phǣn phatthanā kānsưksā læ kīlā 5 pī khang thī VII, 2011-2015","Laos. Kasūang Sưksāthikān, Kilā, læ ThammakānLaos"
Transnational law of sports,James A. R. Nafziger
Società sportive e tessuto civile in Italia,Veruska Verratti
Unione è forza,Felice Fabrizio
Guangdong ti yu 40 nian,
Shadowbrook events guide,Marilyn Martin
70 años de hazañas deportivas,Cristóbal Guerra
A ginga e o jogo,Armando Nogueira
Studencheskoe sportivnoe dvizhenie Prikamʹi︠a︡,M. V. Igoshev
Tolkovyĭ slovarʹ russkogo sportivnogo zhargona,A. A. Elistratov
Zhongguo jin dai ti yu shi zi liao,
From the press box,Peter Byrne
Ti yu she hui xin li xue,Jinzhu Huang
Shi wu kuai jin pai,"He, Huixian, Renchen Li"
Sŭpʻochʻŭ mijualkojual,Hyang-nyŏl Yi
Han Yang-sun Kyosu hoegap kinyŏm nonmunjip,Yang-sun Han
Środowisko społeczne a działalność sportowa,
Soziale Probleme im Spitzensport,Jürgen Schiffer
Sport i pravo,A. V. Iglin
Sports in California,Book Club of California
Supōtsu to kyōiku no rekishi,
Ying Han ti yu ci hui,Beijing ti yu xue yuan. Wai yu jiao yan shi
Kang zhan shi qi pei du ti yu shi liao,
La Valutazione nello sport dei giovani,
"Lejŏ, yŏhaeng, sŭpʻochʻŭ",Chungang Ilbosa
Sport in the context of social sciences,"Wojciech J. Cynarski, Jerzy Kosiewicz, Kazimierz Obodyński"
Einbindung des nationalen Sportrechts in internationale Bezüge,"Dieter Reuter, Christoph Wilhelm Vedder"
Le scienze dello sport,"Scienze dello sport, il Laboratorio atriano (Conference) (2012 Atri, Italy)"
"""Sarbielši""",Aka Morčʻilaże
Disappearing acts,Kelly Ann Riley
21st century jocks,"Anderson, Eric"
Ukraïnsʹkyĭ sport pid nat︠s︡ystsʹkoi︠u︡ svastykoi︠u︡ (1941-1944 rr.),Volodymyr Hinda
World beaters,"Wilton Dyer, Fitzroy Nation"
Sport w II RP,Iwona Grys
21-segi esŏ munhwa wa yesul ŭl para poda,Kyu-hyŏng Kang
"Bewegung, Semiotik, Training","Eberhard Hildenbrandt, Jürgen Giessing"
Sport als Element des Kulturtransfers,"Lorenz Pfeiffer, Mosche Zimmermann"
Siegen um jeden Preis,Giselher Spitzer
Masters of the games,Joseph Epstein
Sport v Moskve v XIX--nachale XX veka,A. L. Batalov
Tradit︠s︡ionnoe fizicheskoe vospitanie i igry udėgeĭt︠s︡ev,V. I. Prokopenko
STEM in sports,Tim Newcomb
Sporting times,Kath Woodward
Sports law in Ireland,Laura Donnellan
Sport sociology,Andrew Yiannakis
Alʹmanakh (1924-1984) Karpatsʹkoho leshchetarsʹkoho kli︠u︡bu,Olʹha Kuzʹmovych
The Lincoln library of sports champions,
Zhai qu wang guan di ren,Jiashan Tao
Mongolyn t︠s︡uut,T︠S︡ėėnzėngiĭn Galbadrakh
Beiträge zur niedersächsischen Sportgeschichte,Arnd Krüger
Chʻeyuk kaeron,Pyŏng-chʻŏl Han
Techniki relaksacyjne przydatne dla sportu,Zbigniew Drozdowski
Chun feng hua yu mu ti tan,"Zhaoxiong Yu, Zhi Pei, Sheng Jiang"
Teoretyczne podstawy psychologii sportu--psychologia sportu jako nauka,Zbigniew Drozdowski
Jin pai cong 0 dao 15,"Guang Lu, Xiaolan Zhang"
Gefährdeter Sport,Helmut Digel
Mêlée générale,Laurent Sébastien Fournier
Magyar olimpiai lexikon 1896-2002,László Rózsaligeti
Supōtsu jiko no hōmu,Nihon Bengoshi Rengōkai. Supōtsu Entāteinmentohō Sokushin PT
O canto dos meus amores,Armando Nogueira
O vôo das gazelas,Armando Nogueira
Sports in Aligarh,
"Laṅgaḍī, lagoryā, viṭīdāṇḍū yā kheḷāñce niyama",
"Ley del deporte, educación física y recreación",Ecuador
"Oda Mikio, supōtsu shiryō mokuroku",Mikio Oda
"Tempo libero, loisir e sport","Nico Bortoletto, Everardo Minardi"
"Undong saengni, kyŏnggi chongmok, hakkyo chʻeyuk mit kitʻa, 1964-yŏn-1987-yŏn",Chʻŏl-bin Pak
Driving the green,Kevin Markham
Long teng Yangcheng,Lang He
Wissenskommunikation und Wissensmanagement im Leistungssport,Manfred Muckenhaupt
O Desporto na poesia portuguesa,
La responsabilità sportiva,Margherita Pittalis
İstanbul'un 100 spor olayı,Behram Kılıç
Sports and nationalism in Latin/o America,"Héctor D. Fernández l'Hoeste, Robert McKee Irwin, Juan Poblete"
Colectânea de legislação sobre desporto,"Serra, Carlos Jr"
Agon,Lino Bugeja
Sportsmanship,Lucia Raatma
Ulusal gençlik ve spor politikası belgesi,Turkey. Gençlik ve Spor Bakanlığı
Eser sahibi hakları ve rekabet politikası ekseninde spor yayınları,İbrahim Emre Bayamlıoğlu
Zhongguo ti yu di feng feng yu yu,
Spor müsabakalarının yayın hakları,Ahmet Türkmen
The science of a carve turn,Nelson Yomtov
Pride in the parish,Paul Gannon
O desporto que os tribunais praticam,José M. Meirim
Spiritualized recreation,Jessie L. Embry
Emerging trends and innovation in sports marketing and management in Asia,"Ho Keat Leng, Noah Yang Hsu"
Bangladesh sports directory,Anupam Hossain
Sports as soul-craft,"Marcus, Paul"
Repensando o esporte brasileiro,"Manoel José Gomes Tubino, Alvaro Melo Filho"
Sport as a spiritual practice,Richard A. Hutch
Taxation of international sportsmen,Karolina Tetłak
Sport und Spiel bei den Germanen,Matthias Teichert
They won one!,Rebecca Felix
Shenyang Shi ti yu zhi,
"A history of Lehigh University's athletic extra-curriculum, 1866-1998",Courtney Michelle Smith
Sports law in China,Junxin Kang
Justiça desportiva e o acesso ao poder judiciário,Hudson Luiz França Mancilha
Jesse Crosse,Michael J. Moran
Pola dan petunjuk pelaksanaan memasyarakatkan olah raga dan mengolahragakan masyarakat,Indonesia. Menteri Koordinator Bidang Kesejahteraan Rakyat.
Sociologie(s) du sport,"Gilles Vieille Marchiset, Anne Tatu-Colasseau"
Quick questions in heat-related illness and hydration,Rebecca M. Lopez
Faith in the fast lane,Chad Bonham
Wo guo da xue ti yu wen hua yan bian de jie shi xing mo xing yan jiu,Lijun Zhou
Mexican American baseball in Orange County,Richard Santillan
Local legends II,Ron Eaton
al-Riyāḍah fī al-Islām,Muḥammad ibn Aḥmad al-ʻAbdī Kānūnī
Olympisme et guerre froide culturelle,Jérôme Gygax
Sơ thảo lịch sử thể dục thể thao Việt Nam,"Nguyễn, Văn Hiếu (Sport editor)"
Nizbrdo do vrha,Bože Šimleša
Sportunterricht als Erziehungsgeschehen,Claus Krieger
Tiger beat,Sam King
International sports marketing,
Verlorener Kampf,Helmut Digel
"""Dieser Vergleich ist unvergleichbar""","Anke Hilbrenner, Dittmar Dahlmann"
Supōtsu-ken to fushōji shobun o meguru hō jitsumu,Daiichi Tōkyō Bengoshikai. Supōtsu-hō Kenkyū Bukai
Rossiĭskĭ i zarubezhnyĭ opyt sistematizat︠s︡ii zakonodatelʹstva o sporte,A. A. Solovʹev
Mongolyn u̇ndėsniĭ sur kharvaa,Kh Choĭzhilzhav
Pāk nagrī,Muḥammad Salīm Baṭ
"Lege kerken, volle stadions",Ruud Stokvis
"Le sport, un art de vivre",Marc van den Bossche
Chuch'e ŭi ch'eyuk sasang iron,Sang-hwa Ch'oe
Hawktales,Jim Brennan
Dream jobs in sports scouting,Marty Gitlin
Dream jobs in sports refereeing,Larry Gerber
Dream jobs in sports finance and administration,Marty Gitlin
Zhongguo gu dai ti yu xiang mu zhi zhi min jian ti yu,Bin Wang
Khaṣkhaṣat al-andiyah al-riyāḍīyah fī al-Mamlakah al-ʻArabīyah al-Saʻūdīyah,Asʻad ʻAbd al-Raḥmān Khamīs
Huan shou du ti yu xiu xian quan fa zhan ce lüe yan jiu,Zhiyun Ma
Wo guo ti yu zhong cai fa lü zhi du yan jiu,Fangfang Zhang
The rise of the phoenix,Peter Joyce
Maša dvajsetega stoletja,Marjan Rožanc
Sporting times,Boria Majumdar
The Indian board game survey,"Ranjit Kumar Bhattacharya, Irving L. Finkel, Lok Nath Soni"
Patologie współczesnego sportu,Marzena Tomczak
Kultura fizyczna i sport w zwierciadle nauk społecznych,"Wojciech J. Cynarski, Jerzy Kosiewicz, Kazimierz Obodyński"
Ti yu fa zhan zhan lue lun wen xuan,China. Guo jia ti wei. Zheng ce yan jiu shi
Pisateli na stadiona,"Andreĭ Guli︠a︡shki, Stancho Simeonov Stanchev, Chavdar Atanasov Dobrev"
"Sport, corps et sociétés de masse","Colloque ""Sport, corps, régimes autoritaires et totalitaires"" (2011 Paris, France)"
Masovata fizicheska kultura i sportŭt v selata,
Sport et contrat de travail,Abdoulaye Sakho
Modelirovanie leksicheskoĭ oppozitivnosti v sportivnom diskurse,S. V. Strugova
Droit des associations sportives,Abdoulaye Sakho
Sports law in the United Kingdom,Simon Gardiner
Sŭpʻochʻŭ wa chŏngchʻi,Kwang-hŏn Ko
Kamchatka sportivnai︠a︡,I︠U︡riĭ Ronzhin
Ėtnosport,Alekseĭ Krylasov
Wychowanie fizyczne i sport w 40-leciu PRL,Zbigniew Drozdowski
Zhongguo jian er jin jun Ya yun hui,Korea) Asian Games (10th 1986 Seoul
O sostoi︠a︡nii i tendent︠s︡ii︠a︡kh razvitii︠a︡ fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i massovogo sporta v Rossiĭskoĭ Federat︠s︡ii,P. A. Vinogradov
Kokumin undō bunka no sōzō,
Systems theory approach to using statistics in social sciences,
Sport et révolution,Béchir Jabbès
STEM in sports,"Buckley, James Jr"
South African Sport Directory,South Africa. Department of Sport and Recreation
"German sports, doping, and politics",Michael Krüger
al-Tarbiyah al-badanīyah wa-al-riyāḍīyah,Algeria
Sports marketing,"Davis, John A."
O indivíduo e o esporte,Osmar de Oliveira
Histórias e memórias do esporte em Minas Gerais,Carlos Fernando Ferreira da Cunha Junior
Cuántos y cómo somos,Juan José Calvo
Supōtsu shinkō taisaku ni kansuru gyōsei kansatsu kekka hōkokusho,Japan. Sōmuchō. Gyōsei Kansatsukyoku
Sports on the map,Alix Wood
Ėstafeta pokoleniĭ i pobed,B. A. Sechenov
Best bike rides Minneapolis and St. Paul,"Johnson, Steve"
Şike,Ersan Şen
Periodized sport psychology,Brian Risk
Los bohemios de Villa Crespo,Raanan Rein
El palin,Carlos López von Vriessen
Les yeux du stade,Florence Pizzorni-Itie
Código del deporte boliviano,
Aufmerksamkeit und Energetisierung,Erwin Hahn
Sport in Bremen und Bremerhaven,
Naḥwa tafsīr jamāhīrī lil-riyāḍah,ʻAbd al-Laṭīf Khalīfah Būkar
Forskning i bevægelse,Anne Lykke Poulsen
Latvijas II Olimpiāde Ventspilī,Dainisʼ Caune
Derecho del deporte,
Les poètes et le sport,
Les origines du sport ouvrier en Europe,Pierre Arnaud
"Fotosport, 1970-1990",
My sporting life,Willis Hall
The Encyclopaedia of sports & games,"Lokesh Thani, Yograj Thani"
World of sport,-
Sport in contemporary society,D. Stanley Eitzen
C'era una volta lo Stadio Olimpico,Silvano Olezzante
Beyond Cook's gardens,"Harris, Norman"
Marie-Thérèse Eyquem,Florys Castan Vicente
Origins of kinanthropometry,
Tolkovyĭ slovarʹ sportivnykh terminov,
Shocker handbook,Kirk Seminoff
Nambuk taniltʻim kusŏng kwallyŏn (1984-1991) Nambuk chʻeyuk hoedam kyŏlgwa pogo (chonghap),Korea (South). Nambuk Hoedam Samuguk
Ehrenamtlichkeit und Hauptamtlichkeit in Sportvereinen,"Heinemann, Klaus"
"Frisch, frank, fröhlich, Frau",Eva Herzog
Harassment in sport,
Critique de la modernité sportive,Jean Marie Brohm
Chapter 5 Critical research on Black sporting experiences in the United States,Billy Hawkins
Futekiōji,Kiyoshi Suzuki
Sport and leisure,Central Office of Information
The Oxford book of Australian sporting anecdotes,"Richard I. Cashman, Graeme Kinross-Smith"
Youth sport,Paul de Knop
Sŭpʻochʻŭ sahoehak,"Hong-gyu Pak, Hong-ik Chŏng, Hyŏn-jin Im"
El Ayer del deporte argentino en el Archivo General de la Nación,
Podstawowe problemy badawcze w naukach kultury fizycznej,
"Sport, spettacolo e tempo libero",
Gakkō itsukasei to shōgai supōtsu,
Xi bei pin kun di qu xue xiao ti yu fa zhan yan jiu,Quanhong Zhong
Sport und Umwelt,"Paul Kirchhof, Horst Hagen, Jochen Taupitz"
Subsídio para elaboração de um plano nacional de desenvolvimento cultural e desportivo,
Zhaotong Shi shao shu min zu ti yu zi yuan kai fa li yong yan jiu,Dou An
Hua qiao Hua ren yu Aolinpike,Zhonghua quan guo gui guo Hua qiao lian he hui
"Reglamentos deportivos ""Alrigon""",
La faillite du sport français,Luis Fernandez
L'emprise sportive,Robert Redeker
Le test de féminité dans les compétitions sportives,Anaïs Bohuon
Die Sprache der Bewegung,Monika Fikus
Idrott och motion i Sverige,Sweden. Statistiska centralbyrån
Rječnik olimpijskih i paraolimpijskih športova,"Anuška Nakić, Ljiljana Ujlaki Šubić"
Supōtsu,Tokuhisa Tanaka
"Dirigentes, decencia y wines",Dante Panzeri
Khel khilāṛī aur Pākistāniyat,Muḥammad Ikrām Hoshiyārpūrī
Erzurum kış sporları tarihi (1915-2011),Murat Küçükuğurlu
Hyllade kroppar,Cattis Grant
Sport als Wirtschaftsbranche,Holger Preuss
World Games 1989 Karlsruhe,"Max Triet, Peter Pretsch"
Girls play to win volleyball,Chros McDougall
Sport and leisure histories,Dave Day
Top dogs,Hairy Growling
Deporte y ciencias sociales,"Juan Branz, José Garriga Zucal, Verónica Moreira"
Movimenti collettivi e culture sociali dello sport europeo,Nicola Porro
"Pio X, le Olimpiadi e lo sport",Quirino Bortolato
Panorámica de la práctica fisica y deportiva en Gipuzkoa,Silvia Arribas
"1901-2011, società ginnastica educativa Sempre Avanti!","Franco Vannini, Gilberto Veronesi"
"Mussolini, il primo sportivo d'Italia",Andrea Bacci
Psicologia dello sport,Sara Binazzi
Sport und Soziale Arbeit in der Zivilgesellschaft,Germany) Sport und Soziale Arbeit in der Zivilgesellschaft (Conference) (2012 Bad Boll
Die Dopingrepublik,Klaus Blume
Die Zwanziger Jahre,Theo Zwanziger
Sporṭ ba-hagirah,Yehuda Carmi
Appropriating live televised football through talk,Cornelia Gerhardt
ʻOd 250 maʻagalim,Uri Ofeḳ
250 maʻagalim,Uri Ofeḳ
"""Lei Pelé""",Alvaro Melo Filho
Novo regime jurídico do desporto,Alvaro Melo Filho
Nova lei do desporto,Alvaro Melo Filho
Sport- und Kultursponsoring,
Desporto na nova Constituição,Alvaro Melo Filho
Bulgarian olympic team,
"Sbornik ot normativni dokumenti, reshenii︠a︡, ukazanii︠a︡, naredbi, nauchni publikat︠s︡ii i opit otnosno masovata fizkultura i masovii︠a︡ sport",
Dictionnaire des grands oubliés du sport au Québec,Gilles Janson
"El Deporte y la recreación en Chile, 1973-1989",
Student professional development manual,
SAPA hwaltong podo charyo moŭm,Pusan Sahoe Chʻeyuk Sentʻŏ
Films and sports in India,
"Sport, Umwelt, Lebenshilfe",Helmut Altenberger
Add life to your years,
Sports and exercise in midlife,"Stephen L. Gordon, William E. Garrett"
Zai Nihon Daikan Taiikukai shi,Chae Ilbon Taehan Chʻeyukhoe
Tribal sports and martial art of Orissa,"Panda, Saroj Kumar (Physical education teacher)"
Niqābat al-mihan al-riyāḍīyah,Aḥmad Manīsī
"Szkice z teorii i historii wychowania fizycznego, sportu i turystyki","Wojciech J. Cynarski, Andrzej Nowakowski, Stanisław Zaborniak"
Sport in de stad,"Mark van den Heuvel, Remco Hoekman, Hugo van der Poel"
Weird animal sports,S. B. Watson
Weird sports of the world,S. B. Watson
Weird sports moments,K. C. Kelley
Legenda rossiĭskogo sporta,E. I︠U︡ Volkova
Tri nachala,Valeriĭ Kharlamov
The Boy's own treasury of sports and pastimes,
Out for a Duck,Ian Valentine
Hiking Colorado's summits,"John Drew Mitchler, Dave Covill"
Articles de sport,Jacques Perret
Backpacking Kentucky,Valerie L Askren
Sport and HIV,Health Education Authority (Great Britain)
Les terribles et merveilleuses raisons pour lesquelles je cours de longues distances,Oatmeal
Just Like Me,Kelly Park
Sécurité en tête au jeu,Heward Grafftey
BTEC first,Kirk Bizley
Board sports,Michael Hurley
Géographie du sport,Jean-Pierre Augustin
"Sport, géographie et aménagement",Jean-Pierre Augustin
Dynamic duos,Matt Higgins
East Anglian sporting days,Derek Johnson
A legend in his time,Ruby Fields Cox
The Hope You Can Have,Fifi Baiden
Pure Survival,Samuel T. Heart
Cómo lidiar con el fracaso,Kelli L. Hicks
Sportspiel und Sozialisation,Klaus Cachay
Sport und Gesellschaft,Klaus Cachay
Reflexions Sur L'Economie Du Sport,Jacques Fontanel
"Sportsman's slang; a new dictionary of terms used in the affairs of the turf, the ring, the chase and the cock-pit, with those of bon-ton and the varieties of life","Badcock, John"
Sporting activities,Clive Gifford
Enjeu!,Patrick Bruno
"Viens, on va jouer à la marelle",Carola von Kessel
Les commotions cérébrales dans le sport,Dave Ellemberg
"Historia del Club España de Torreón desde su fundación, 1918 a 1995",Homero H. del Bosque Villarreal
The effects of glasnost and perestroika on the Soviet sport system,"Kim, Il-sŏng"
Coup franc!,Patrick Bruno
Disseny I Esport,Salvador Giner
Physical and sport education for Victorian schools,Victoria.
La démiurgie dans les sports et la danse,Nancy Midol
Sports funding guide,Tom Traynor
Das Ganze der Gymnastik oder Ausführliches Lehrbuch der Leibesübungen. Nach den Grundsätzen der bessern Erziehung zum öffentlichen und besondern Unterricht,Johann Adolph Ludwig Werner
Food for sports,Neil Morris
Comprehensive Asian Fighting Arts,"Donn F. Draeger, Robert W. Smith"
Great Australian Sports Champions,Peter Fitzsimons
Panther Gorge,"Kevin B. MacKenzie, Tony Goodwin, Don Mellor"
The Coaches' Little Playbook,George Hetzel
L'argent dans le sport,Philippe Verneaux
Rimshots,"Smith, Charles R. Jr"
Right to play,Jesse Goossens
Good sports,Sandy Roydhouse
Emparons-nous du sport,Gilles Janson
"Cio,Fifa : Le Sport Mortifere (Chine,Afrique du Sud...","Vassort, Maillard"
Za cenę życia,Bogdan Tuszyński
Asociaciones y sociedades deportivas,Mercedes Fuertes López
Relive Patriots History,Bob Hyldburg
Xini 2000,Jinjun Wang
Informationseinrichtungen im Sport,Arnd Krüger
Fede e sport,Carlo Mazza
"Awa, supōtsu no bugaku",Awa Taiikushi Kenkyūkai
Sports in America,Peter Stine
100 Jahre Altona 93,Norbert Carsten
Der Freizeitsportleiter,Horst W. Opaschowski
Hundra år i idrottens tjänst,Ulf Pettersson
Der Sportverein,"Heinemann, Klaus"
Einführung in die Ökonomie des Sports,"Heinemann, Klaus"
"Cara regione, ti scrivo",Marcello Sajeva
Tendencje rozwoju sportu,Zbigniew Drozdowski
Wsparcie społeczne w działalności sportowej,Zbigniew Drozdowski
Akhunabā likalu pareṃ,
Irha Kim Sang-gu Kyosu chŏngnyŏn tʻoeim kinyŏm nonchʻong,Sang-gu Kim
Sports et environnement,
The sporting word,Desmond Lynam
D.C. sports heroes,
Jiangsu ti yu jin gu lu,
Comunidade esportiva brasileira,
"Sinopse dos dados sobre despesas em educação, cultura e desporto",
Antología del deporte del Estado de México,Everardo Navas Molina
Eesti sport läbi aegade,Juhan Mandre
Drugs and sports,Stewart C. Clark
Asif,Mekhon Ṿingaiṭ le-ḥinukh gufani
European Athletic Coaches' Conference,European Athletic Coaches' Conference
EU-Recht und Sport,Walter Tokarski
"Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura, sport i zdorovʹe naselenii︠a︡ Dalʹnego Vostoka",A. V. Lupandin
Un autre club sportif pour le XXIe siècle?,Union nationale des clubs universitaires
"Benfica, 90 anos de glória, 1904-1994",António Manuel Morais
Gestion sportive et gestion financière du football,Doudou Ndoye
"Sport, relations sociales et action collective","Jean-Pierre Augustin, Jean-Paul Callède"
Erholungsforschung,Rainer Wieland-Eckelmann
Sports,"Deborah Cannarella, Jane Fournier"
Fizkulʹtura i zdorovʹe studentov,
Shandong sheng zhi,Shandong sheng di fang shi zhi bian zuan wei yuan hui
Sports legends on success,"FitzPatrick, Bill"
Sansong Kim Yong-gil Kyosu hwagap kinyŏm nonmunjip,Yong-gil Kim
Het gebeurt overal in den lande,Harry Oltheten
De functies en betekenissen van sport,Paul de Knop
Russkiĭ turist,A. V. Silkin
"Ein Blick in Österreichs Militär-(Sport-)Geschichte, 1848 bis 1938",Kurt Ahammer
Esperienze internazionali nel marketing sportivo,"Sergio Cherubini, Marco Canigiani"
Ming ren jiao wang lu,"Jihua Zhang, Lin Mu"
Économie du sport,Bénédicte Halba
Supōtsu shisō no tanjō,Yoshitaka Ban
Irgun mifʻale sporṭ ṿe-ḥinukh gufani,Uriel Simri
"""Sokil-Batʹko""","Ihor Hurhula, Anna Blahitka"
La culture du sport au Québec,"Jean-Pierre Augustin, Claude Sorbets"
Gendai seikatsu to supōtsu,Yūkō Kusaka
Nihon kindai supōtsu-shi no teiryū,Masaru Kōzu
Psychologie und körperliche Bewegung,"Fuchs, Reinhard"
Sport und Gesellschaft,Simon Geissbühler
I︠U︡vileĭnyĭ alʹmanakh z nahody 50-richchi︠a︡ dii︠a︡lʹnosty,
UNISPORT,
"Olimpinio sajūdžio Lietuvoje ištakos, raida, problemos",
Synergetik und Systeme im Sport,"Jan Peters Janssen, Andreas Wilhelm"
Omangia te oma roa,
"Sport--Aktivitäten, Interessen und Motive",
Lietuvos kūno kultūros ir sporto istorija,
Ti tan bo xing juan,
The Council of Europe's work on sport in 1994,Council of Europe
Ítróttasamband Føroya 50 ár,Poul Andreasen
"A review of sports promotion activities of the Department of Business, Economic Development, and Tourism",Hawaii. Legislature. Office of the Legislative Auditor.
Huszonhét magyar népi játék,Károly Falvay
Theodore Strong Van Dyke,"Wild, Peter"
"Taiiku, supōtsu-shi ni miru senzen to sengo","Hiroaki Ōkuma, Hisashi Sanada"
The future of post-human sports,Peter Baofu
The Modern playmate,
Research on emotions in sport,Dieter Hackfort
"20 Jahre Bundesinstitut für Sportwissenschaft, 1970-1990",
Intermittent high intensity exercise,Donald Macleod
KGB igraet v shakhmaty,Boris Gulʹko
"Sport, soziale Arbeit und Fankulturen",Detlef Kuhlmann
Görele'de spor ve Görelespor (1923-2011),Ahmet Yaşar İmamoğlu
Supōtsu no minshuteki hatten no tame ni,Nihon Kyōsantō. Shuppankyoku
Funktionen von Emotionen im Sport,"Dieter Hackfort, Sabine Rethorst"
Slovenski šport v mednarodnem prostoru po letu 1991,Rajko Šugman
Kroppen eller knoppen,Rolf Jonsson
Competition issues related to sports,Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development
Henʼyōsuru gendai shakai to supōtsu,Nihon Supōtsu Shakai Gakkai
Il Piacere del corpo,"Mario Pancera, Guido Vergani"
Tianjin tong zhi,Tianjin shi di fang zhi bian xiu wei yuan hui
Clinical sports nutrition,"Louise Burke, Vicki Deakin"
Undōbu katsudō no arikata ni kansuru chōsa kenkyū hōkokusho,Chūgakusei Kōkōsei no Supōtsu Katsudō ni Kansuru Chōsa Kenkyū Kyōryokusha Kaigi
Kinder- und Jugendliteratur zu Sport und Spiel,Rolf Gessmann
Ti yu zhi,Hunan sheng di fang zhi bian zuan wei yuan hui
L'athlétisme français,Stéphane Caristan
"Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura, sport i turizm na Dalʹnem Vostoke Rossii",S. S. Dobrovolʹskiĭ
Doping und Anti-Doping in der Bundesrepublik Deutschland 1950 bis 2007,Michael Krüger
Jing ji ti yu xing fa gui zhi wen ti yan jiu,Yuchuan Guo
Me encanta el fútbol americano,Ryan Nagelhout
Me encanta la gimnasia,Ryan Nagelhout
I love basketball,Ryan Nagelhout
Me encanta el baloncesto,Ryan Nagelhout
Kubanʹ--gandbolʹnai︠a︡ derzhava,V. T. Anfinogenov
Sahoe chʻeyungnon,Yong-gil Kim
Reconstruction of South African sport,Cheryl Roberts
Sport has never been modern,Kalle Jonasson
Nutrition in olympic combat sports,Stefan Pettersson
Supōtsu to iu bunka,
Treue zum Stil,Uwe Flick
"Ho hellēnikos athlētismos stē Smyrnē, 1890-1922",Andreas Baltas
Supōtsu no shinrigaku,
Supōtsu roppō,Japan
The Makers of Australia's sporting traditions,Michael McKernan
Zhonghua Renmin Gongheguo ti yu shi jian bian,Xiumei Li
101 ways to run the option,Tony DeMeo
Fundamentals of entertainment & sports law,Pennsylvania Bar Institute
Passat i present de l'educació física a Barcelona,
Fan Freedom and Community Protection Act of 1995,"United States. Congress. House. Committee on Commerce. Subcommittee on Commerce, Trade, and Hazardous Materials."
Zhongshan shi ti yu zhi,
A delphoi Pythia sportversenyeinek győztesei,Egon Maróti
EG-rätten och svensk idrott,Sweden. Inrikesdepartementet
"Récréation, re-création","Jean-Michel Dewailly, Claude Sobry"
A-Z sport-kódex,Peter Hofmann
Më të mëdhejtë e sportit shqiptar--,Kastriot Ahmati
Šport in družba,Mojca Topič Doupona
The U.S. sports nutritionals market,Packaged Facts (Firm)
Sports illustrated classic pictures,
The history of the Waiakea Pirates Athletic Club and the Yashijima story (Waiakea Town),Richard I. Nakamura
Shuo bu jin de Ma Junren,Jingran Zhang
Furyo seikatsu to supōtsu,Rie Yamada
"Sport-Culture forum, Olympic Museum, Lausanne 6-7 June 1997",Switzerland) Sport and Culture Forum (1997 Lausanne
O esporte em Pernambuco,Fernando Menezes
Pesquisa de esporte,Instituto Brasileiro de Geografia e Estatística. Coordenação de População e Indicadores Sociais
Sportlervermittlung und Sportlermanagement,"Luca Ferrari, Jochen Fritzweiler, Christian Jenny, Urs Scherrer"
A history of Māori tennis,Aotearoa Māori Tennis Association
Le istituzioni sportive italiane,Francesco Bonini
Sport e società,"Giancarlo Battistini, Paolo Dell'Aquila, Paolo Zurla"
Il corpo e la sua arte,Rosella Frasca
Discorso sul corpo,Pierluigi Palmieri
Aolinpike pin pai,Bingshu Zhong
The man in the arena,George E. Condon
Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura i sport v formirovanii zdorovogo obraza zhizni naselenii︠a︡ Rossii,V. N. Popkov
Doitsu chūsei kōki no supōtsu,Kazuhiko Kusudo
Sportjog,Tamás Sárközy
100 mgnoveniĭ sporta,Anatoliĭ Bochinin
Za yi,Panxi Guo
Coleção Mauá,Brazil). Núcleo de História e Memória Mauá (São Paulo
XVII Simpósio de Educação Física e Desportos do Sul do Brasil,"Simpósio de Educação Física e Desportos do Sul do Brasil (17th 2005 Ponta Grossa, Paraná, Brazil)"
Dominica's sports profile,
Olympisches Laub,Gabriel Laub
Dopingsport-im Brennpunkt der Ethik,Eckhard Meinberg
Dicionário enciclopédico Tubino do esporte,Manoel José Gomes Tubino
Economie politique du sport professionnel,Jean-François Bourg
Zidane président,Pierre Julien
"Who's who of Indian gold medallists in international sports events, 1928-1986",
Ti yu zhi,"""Ti yu zhi"" bian xie zu"
Latvijas sporta leg̕endas,Arnis Terzens
Sport management in Australia,David Shilbury
Z dziejów kultury fizycznej w Polsce,Stanisław Zaborniak
Russko-angliĭskiĭ sportivnyĭ slovarʹ,I. V. Nechaev
Xin shi qi nong cun ti yu fa zhan li lun yu shi zheng yan jiu,Jiaxin . Zhu
Wang Meng jiang jun ti yu yuan,Dinghua Wang
Sport in high modernity,Gunnar Breivik
"Sports sciences sociales. Histoire, sociologie et prospective",Christian Pociello
Sfide,Simona Ercolani
Healthway sport/arts/racing sponsorship guidelines,Healthway (Organization)
Sportästhetik,Tim Nebelung
1958-2008,Jizhong Wei
Gong he guo ti yu,Zhong gong zhong yang wen xian yan jiu shi. Di er bian yan bu
Sport colonial,André Jean Benoît
Kummalliset kansanhuvit,Risto Etelämäki
"Ideologische Einflüsse in der empirischen Sozialaforschung im Sport, aufgezeigt am Beispiel der Untersuchung von Sportvereinen",Werner Pitsch
Sportivnyĭ Kazakhstan,Ȯmīrzaq Zholymbetov
Estratégia de revitalização do desporto,
19 secondes 83 centièmes,Pierre-Louis Basse
Sport economics after fifty years,Plácido Rodríguez
Ley no. 2874/06 del deporte,Paraguay
Sport and substance use in the Nordic countries,"Alberto Bouroncle, Sari Rauhamäki"
Being the Best,Denis Waitley
Russko-azerbaĭdzhanskiĭ sportivnyĭ slovarʹ,S. S. Ḣu̇sei̐nov
PE for you,"John Honeybourne, Michael Hill, Jon Wyse"
Axiological dimensions of sport,"Jerzy Kosiewicz, Kazimierz Obodyński"
Brady Brady et l'équipe Alpha,Mary Shaw
El deportista en el mundo,Ramón Aguilar Ros
Si chou zhi lu ti yu wen hua lun ji,Lanzhou li gong da xue. Si chou zhi lu wen shi yan jiu suo
Talking balls,"John Bishop, Tiki Dickson"
International sports competition,Adeyemi Oladimeji Phillips
Fitness survival guide,Carol Lynette Christensen
Sporting Scotland,"John Burnett, Burnett"
A boy and his balls,Chuck Wanninger
Eros/Hercule,Alain Fleischer
Pirmie latvieši pasaules sporta virsotnēs,Z. Mežavilks
"D'un sport perverti au ""sport plaisir""",Jacques Personne
Manuale degli sport olimpici,Vezio Melegari
The Coaches' guide to sports nutrition,"Dan, Ph.D. Benardot, Walter R. Thompson"
Sports law,"Michael J. Cozzillio, Mark S. Levinstein, Michael R., Sr. Dimino, Gabe Feldman"
Psicologia do esporte,
Sport e ideale atletico,
Código Brasileiro de Justiça Desportiva,"Paulo Marcos Schmitt, Alberto Puga Barbosa"
School children and sport in Ireland,Tony Fahey
Les logiques spatiales de l'innovation sportive,"Jean-Paul Callède, André Menaut"
Sportkultur,Hermann Bausinger
"Julius ""Juller"" Hirsch 1892 Aachen-1943 Auschwitz",Swantje Schollmeyer
Financement des clubs sportifs et stratégie des collectivités territoriales,Jean-François Bourg
Possibilmente freddi,Douglas Mortimer
Ying Han shuang xiang ti yu ci dian,"Yuting Zhang, Lan Han"
Key Themes in Youth Sport,Ken Green
Soziale Bedingungen des Spitzensports,Roman Horak
"Sports illustrated, special issue",
Taking a knee,Steve Davis
Jose - Return of the King,Harry Harris
Reuters century of great British sport,Mike Newlin
The art of coarse sport,Michael Frederick Green
Shen hua yu jing ji,Yixin Wang
Ladies first,Ken Rappoport
Cai fu di liu bo,Liangzhong Li
Lexique Anglais / Francais Des Sports Olympiques English / French Lexicon of Olympic Sports Summer Games,INSEP Publications
Next man up!,Columbus Dispatch
Little Joe's big race,"Andy Blackford, Tim Archbold"
Sports imitated,Steve Lavapies
Buffalo thunder,"Smith, Billy Dr"
Local legends,Ron Eaton
Club Universitario de Córdoba,
Biomécanique du sport et de l'exercice,"ADRIAN BURDEN, PAUL GRIMSHAW"
Outdoor sports and games,Claude Harris Miller
Polvonnoma,Tursun Ali Muḣammad
"Juegos, fiestas y diversiones",Angel López Cantos
Crónicas y reportajes,Héctor Palau
Psikhologicheskie osnovy v fizicheskom vospitanii i sporte,E. N. Gogunov
New Zealand's top 100 sports history-makers,Joseph Romanos
Temas de direito do desporto,José M. Meirim
"Británicos, deporte y burguesía en una ciudad atlántica",Antonio S. Almeida Aguiar
Desporto a direito,José M. Meirim
Sport,A. O. Chubarʹi︠a︡n
Zvezdy bez grima,L. E. Grinin
Latvijas I Olimpiāde Ventspilī,Jānis Erenbergs
Il diritto sportivo nel contesto nazionale ed europeo,Chiara Alvisi
Handbuch Sportpsychologie,"Maike Tietjens, Strauss, Bernd, Dorothee Alfermann"
Lo sport che cambia,Istituto nazionale di statistica (Italy)
Lei de bases do desporto,Portugal
Sports in Japan,Akira Ōno
Tokubetsuten kisou!,Tomoyuki Higuchi
Sŭpʻochʻŭ wa pŭraendŭ pʻawŏ,Kungmin Ch'eyuk Chinhŭng Kongdan (Korea)
L'energia del sacro,Marco Martini
E-kkapʻe ŭi sigye nŭn chajŏng ŭl karikʻiji annŭnda,Se-ung Hong
Visão de jogo,"Luiz Henrique de Toledo, Carlos Eduardo Costa"
al-Riyāḍah wa-al-kashshāfah lil-banāt fī al-madāris wa-al-jāmiʻāt,ʻAbd al-Raḥmān ibn Saʻd ibn ʻAlī Shithrī
Summer sport,Priscila Uppal
Quel che resta di Coppi,Andrea Maietti
Op'ŏ k'ŏt,Hŭi-jun Chŏng
"Le sport colonial à Madagascar, 1896-1960",Évelyne Combeau-Mari
Playing fields,Mariann Vaczi
Understanding racial portrayals in the sports media,Daniel B. Coogan
Dang dai Zhongguo ti yu gai shu,Xiaolong Liang
Natal também civiliza-se,Márcia Marinho
Pakistan sports,Mukhtar Bhatti
"Gender, sport, and development in Africa",Jimoh Shehu
Han hua xiang shi zhong de ti yu huo dong yan jiu,Pu Liu
Sport in Ireland,"Kelly, James"
Připraven k práci a obraně vlasti!,"Jan Kalous, František Kolář"
Kamus istilah olahraga populer di Indonesia,Aip Syariffudin
Ōzumō rimenshi,Hideki Nishimura
Biomechanics,"Marlene Adrian, Helga Deutsch"
Khelagāṃva Chattīsagaṛha,Kamaleśa Gogiyā
Las reglas y características de todos los deportes,Silvia Ferretti
Sports in American culture,
"Sbornik ot normativni dokumenti, reshenii︠a︡, ukazanii︠a︡, naredbi, nauchni publikat︠s︡ii i opit otnosno masovata fizkultura i masovii︠a︡ sport",
"Testnevelés, sport, oktatás",
Ti yu you piao ji jin,Baoxian Zhang
"Ni︠a︡koi problemi na masovata fizkultura, sporta i turizma v stolichnite uchebno-vŭzpitatelni zavedenii︠a︡",
Dehong shi ju shao shu min zu chuan tong ti yu gai lan,Yun Liu
"Od sokolskega do športnega društva Tržič, 1903-2003",Antonija Marin
Sayonara Kokuritsu Kyōgijō,
Identités sportives et revendications régionales (XIXe et XXe siècles),"Sébastien Stumpp, Denis Jallat"
Kubanʹ futbolʹnai︠a︡,Igorʹ Gaĭdashev
"Pukhan sŏn'gun ch'eyuk ŭi kiwŏn yŏn'gu, 1945-1970-yŏn",Sŏng-bo Hong
Mizo infiamna,
Dang dai Zhongguo ti yu,"Gaotang Rong, Caizhen Zhang"
Dansk og international sportsret,"Jens Evald, Lars Halgreen"
Fizicheskata kultura i sportŭt po mestozhiveene,
Beijing ti yu xin zi,"Hong Gao, Li Feng"
Shao shu min zu chuan tong ti yu yi shu bian qian yan jiu,Changyi Zhao
Wacky sports,Tony 'Anthony' Tallarico
Kokusaika jidai no supōtsu kōryū,Gaimushō Taigai Supōtsu Kōryū Jōhō Sentā (Japan)
ha-Makabiah ha-14,Israel) Makabiyah (14th 1993 Ramat-Gan
ha-Makabiah ha-15,Israel) Makabiyah (15th 1997 Ramat-Gan
Sport 5,Yaron Ṭelpaz
Sports illustrated kids stats!,Justin Tejada
The Licensing letter's sports licensing report,Emily Scardino
"Sounders FC, authentic masterpiece",Mike Gastineau
Als Jude im deutschen Fussball,Arthur Heinrich
Antike Spitzensportler,Wolfgang Decker
Sportkonsum in Deutschland,Christian Alfs
Legislación deportiva dominicana y estudio comparado,Heriberto Morrison
Masovata fizicheska kultura i sport v sot︠s︡ialisticheskite strani,
Cong ling dao shi wu,"Huisheng Fang, Xunsheng Wang, Tingquan Zhang"
Zhongguo gu dai ti yu,Wenliang Shao
"Tenth anniversary publication of Directorate of Sports and Cultural Affairs, Panaji, Goa",
Supōtsu gijutsu no shakaigaku,Rei Sugawara
Schulsport und Sportspiele,Ralf Brand
Jia ting wen hua sheng huo zhi shi,Nei Menggu ren min chu ban she
Manual de direito desportivo,Mariana Rosignoli
Undong kyŏnggi kyuchʻik,Pyŏng-gi Sŏn
Favelasport,"Claudia de Freitas Lopes Costa, Carlos Alberto Figueiredo da Silva"
Arena carioca,Rubeny Goulart
Sport wyczynowy w polityce państwa 1944-1989,Artur Pasko
Talentudvikling i sport,Niels Nygaard Rossing
"Jugend, Migration und Sport","Ulrike Burrmann, Michael Mutz, Ursula Zender"
Saishin supōtsu daijiten,Tomio Suzuki
Recreation & sport,
"Bibliography of monographs and periodical titles on South African sport, physical education, and recreation up to December 1980",
Die Spiele gehen weiter,"Frank Becker, Ralf Schäfer"
Nat︠s︡ionalno sŭveshtanie po problemite na propagandata na masovata fizkultura i masovii︠a︡ sport,
Supōtsu gabanansu jissen gaidobukku,Supōtsu ni Okeru Guddo Gabanansu Kenkyūkai
Zhongguo di xuan feng,"Kun Lu, Jun Liang, Qiuhuai Zhang, Li Wang"
Lo Sport tra natura e cultura,"Massimo Canevacci, Vincenzo Padiglione, Maurizio Panunzio"
Sport et nationalité,Gérard Simon
About sports,Tony 'Anthony' Tallarico
Diao diao,Guangxia Jin
Yun dong yu ti li tiao jie,Qingkang Tong
Vulnerability and exposure,Rob Cover
Sport und Werbung,Arnold Hermanns
Siweisilin bei shang shan guang di ming zi,Xipeng Fu
Sports in Rumania,
A Comparison of national and international sport policies,Alberta. Recreation Development Division
Prázdniny se šlehačkou,Petr Hora
Megaeventos esportivos no Brasil,Arlei S. Damo
"Arbitragem e mediação em propriedade intelectual, esportes e entretenimento","Luciano Benetti Timm, Luiz Gustavo Meira Moser"
Direito desportivo,Gustavo Lopes Pires de Souza
Direito desportivo,Angelo Vargas
Sŭpʻochʻu ŭi yŏksa,Pyŏng-gi Sŏn
Sŭpʻochʻŭ sajŏn,Pyŏng-gi Sŏn
Fun and games in old Europe,"Endrei, Walter."
O poder dos jogos e os jogos de poder,Nelma Gusmão de Oliveira
"Futebol, direito de todos",César Martins Schunemann
Temas atuais de direito desportivo,Mauricio de Figueiredo Corrêa da Veiga
"Bibliografía de los estudios realizados en Chile sobre educación física, deporte y recreación",
Hong guan tiao kong shi ye xia de ti yu zheng ce fa gui li lun yu shi jian wen ti yan jiu,"Yuming Dong, Bingqiang Li"
Wo men xu yao shen me yang de ti yu,Zhengwei Gong
Ci hai,
Physical education resource book for secondary schools,Hope Knudson
"Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura, zdorovʹe, professionalʹnai︠a︡ aktivnostʹ trudi︠a︡shchikhsi︠a︡",
Ti yu ji zhe shou ce,
Hiroshima supōtsu-shi,
Shōkai Supōtsu kihonhō,Nihon Supōtsu Hōgakkai
Komyuniti supōtsu no kadai,Taiiku Shakaigaku Kenkyūkai (Japan)
Ichiryū kyōgisha no shakaigaku,Taiiku Shakaigaku Kenkyūkai (Japan)
Ti yu da ci dian,Jiao yu bu Ti yu da ci dian bian ding wei yuan hui (China)
Kan Mizo infiamnate,J. Thanchungnunga
Sport et capitalisme de l'esprit,Nicolas Oblin
Kooperation oder Kontrolle?,Christoph G. Grimmer
Los Juegos indígenas y otras diversiones,Guillermo Emilio Magrassi
Za povishavane na obshtestvenata funkt︠s︡ii︠a︡ na fizicheskata kultura i sporta,
Sport in der Deutschen Demokratischen Republik,Friedrich-Ebert-Stiftung
Informazione sportiva e violenza,Domenico F. A. Elia
Lo sport alla Grande Guerra,Sport alla Grande Guerra (Conference) (2014 Istituto geografico militare)
Histoire des organisations sportives communistes de France au XXe siècle,Fabien Sabatier
"Idræt, kulturpolitik og planlægning",
Tōsō no rinri,Tetsunosuke Ōnishi
Ti yu xin li xue jian bian,Zhongyuan Ding
Le Sport dans la Creuse d'hier et d'avant-hier,
"La Politique culturelle, sportive et patrimoniale en Guadeloupe",
Frei spielen,Matthias Marschik
Gendai supōtsu wa Kanō Jigorō kara nani o manabu no ka,Kōichi Kiku
Man zu chuan tong Molezhen,Guoxue Na
Jingchu wu shu yu jing ji,Bing Lu
Zhongguo jin dai ti yu shi,"Ti yu yuan xi jiao cai bian shen wei yuan hui (China). ""Zhongguo jin dai ti yu shi"" bian xie zu"
Samfundets idræt,"Klaus Eskelund, Thomas Skovgaard"
"Des défis et des hommes / Musée national du sport ; directeur de publication, Marie-Christine Grasse",Musée national du sport (France)
Undō seiri eiseigaku sui,Akinobu Yoshida
Ti yu ke xue yan jiu xian zhuang yu zhan wang 2005-2007,Zhongguo ti yu ke xue xue hui
Wacky throwing sports,Alix Wood
Sport in der DDR,
Sport a volný čas,
Supōtsu undō no kadai,
Ao yun hui yu Zhongguo,
"Taiiku, supōtsu ni kansuru 10-nenkan no zasshi bunken mokuroku",Nichigai Asoshiētsu
Sports Technology and Innovation,Vanessa Ratten
Sport a változó világban,
Sports law in Hungary,András Nemes
Tělesná výchova a sport,
Ti yu bao gao wen xue xuan,"Zhao, Lihong, Guang Lu, Fuxing Xiao"
Progresivnoto fizkulturno i sportno dvizhenie v Ki︠u︡stendilski okrŭg,
Bakom kulisserna,Tore Brännberg
Dalaidrottens historia,Birgitta Dandanell
Historia del deporte en Tuxtla,Tito Maza
Derecho deportivo,"Julio Santiago Solís Gózar, Olga Lucía Camacho Gutiérrez"
A mulher brasileira e o esporte,Jorge Dorfman Knijnik
Gestão do esporte no Brasil,"Leandro Carlos Mazzei, Flávia da Cunha Bastos, Fernando Castro Maroni"
Psychologie sportu,
Great sporting headlines,Ian Wooldridge
Shikastʹnāpaz̲īrān,Ḥasan Nāyibʹāqā
Banking on leisure,
Gesellschaftliche Funktionen des Sports,
Dictionnaire des sports,Ian Pickup
"Sbornik ot normativni dokumenti, reshenii︠a︡, ukazanii︠a︡ i naredbi otnosno masovata fizkultura i masovii︠a︡ sport",
Jing ji ti yu fan zui de xing fa gui zhi yan jiu,Jie Sun
Sportsman's encyclopedia,
The Book of athletics,
Tendent︠s︡ii︠a︡ razvitii︠a︡ sportivnykh igr v sovremennom sporte,"M. D. Ashibokova, M. Kh Kodzheshau"
Formirovanie resursnogo obespechenii︠a︡ massovoĭ fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta,M. I. Zolotov
Ėmot︠s︡ionalʹnai︠a︡ napri︠a︡zhennostʹ v sportivnoĭ dei︠a︡telʹnosti,B. P. I︠A︡kovlev
Ėryn gurban naadan,B. D. Sandanov
Olympiakoi Agōnes kai dikaio,Geōrgia Giannakourou
Microcosmi sportivi,Gianmarco Navarini
Rossiĭskiĭ sport i olimpiĭskoe dvizhenie na rubezhe XIX-XX vekov,Aleksandr Sunik
La riforma del CONI,"Sergio Cherubini, Claudio Franchini"
"Histoire du sport, XIXe-XXe siècles",Dominique Lejeune
Análisis presupuestal del deporte en México,Antonio Sánchez Sierra
Sport und Medien,"Horst-Manfred Schellhaass, Peter Duvinage"
Odpowiedzialność dyscyplinarna w sporcie,Andrzej J. Szwarc
Bo xiang dian feng,Henan Sheng ti yu ji zhe xie hui
Ḳeren Tel-Ḥai,"Jewish Cultural Reconstruction, Inc. (New York, N.Y.)"
ha-ʻIsuḳ bi-feʻilut sporṭivit ṿeha-biḳur be-taḥaruyot sporṭ,Israel. Lishkah ha-merkazit li-sṭaṭisṭiḳah
Per sport e per business,Marco Braghero
Los derechos de imagen en el ámbito del deporte profesional,Alberto Palomar Olmeda
ESPN,
Istorii︠a︡ razvitii︠a︡ fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta v Udmurtii,N. A. Solovʹev
"Empereurs, reines et champions",Hans Vandeweghe
A coeur et à piques,Marcel Hansenne
Mayo Clinic sports health & fitness,
Schüler im Sportunterricht,Wolf-Dietrich Miethling
Pädagogik des Leistungssports,"Robert Prohl, Harald Lange, Heinz Denk"
Subjekt v ideologiji (športa),Roman Vodeb
Protivostoi︠a︡nie ili sotrudnichestvo,A. I. Avrus
Seier'n er vår,Dag Vidar Hanstad
Geschichte des DDR-Sports,Günther Wonnenberger
Sportivnai︠a︡ slava Prikamʹi︠a︡,"Panachev, V,D"
Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura v kontekste nepreryvnogo obrazovanii︠a︡,V. M. Stupnikov
Deporte... y +,Enrique Arnaldo Alcubilla
Argentino de Quilmes,
Fujian Sheng Fuzhou Shi ti yu zhi,Fuzhou Shi ti yu yun dong wei yuan hui
The sportsman's world,Jack Samson
Puraṇi Asamara khela-dhemāli,
Šport skozi psihoanalizo,Roman Vodeb
Ti yu jiu fen de duo yuan hua jiu ji ji zhi tan tao,Shuli Guo
Herzfrequenzvariabilität im Sport,Kuno Hottenrott
For hills to climb,Aamir Ali
Whatever happened to Dexter Park,Henry W. Schramm
Celebrate Westwood,Corrine P. Hudgins
Liikettä Venäjän Karjalassa,Hannu Itkonen
Derecho del deporte,Eduardo Barrachina Juan
A Amazônia,"Jefferson Jurema, Rui Garcia"
Wychowanie fizyczne i sport w badaniach naukowych,"Sławomir Drozdowski, Eugeniusz Wachowski"
Changde Diqu zhi,Changde Shi ti yu yun dong wei yuan hui
What am I playing?,Pamela Zagarenski
ASFAA 2000,ASFAA
Legislación deportiva,Spain
Sport in contemporary African society,"Lateef O. Amusa, Abel L. Toriola"
"Esport, societat i autonomia",
Beden eğitimi ve spor yayınları bibliografyası,H. Murat Şahin
Crónicas del deporte regional,Orlando Arrieta Meléndez
Sportivnai︠a︡ slava Kubani,Administrat︠s︡ii︠a︡ Krasnodarskogo krai︠a︡. Departament po fizicheskoĭ kulʹture i sportu
Gordostʹ nat︠s︡ii,M. S. Tkhaĭt︠s︡ukhov
Gli sport,Stefano Jacomuzzi
XX vek v sportivnoĭ istorii Stavropolʹi︠a︡,V. A. Kriunov
Razvitie fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta na Dalʹnem Vostoke,S. S. Dobrovolʹskiĭ
Diccionari del Barça,Antoni Closa i Garcia
Hermeneutika sportu,
Novosibirsk sportivnyĭ,I. A. Nosov
Izhevsk sportivnyĭ,I︠U︡riĭ Ozhegov
Off and running,Girl Scouts of the United States of America
"Jean Guimier, 1913-1975",Gérard Couturier
Geschichte des Sports in Bayern,Julius Bohus
Aspectos socio-antropológicos del deporte,Pedro García Avendaño
Al leis dos espectáculos e direitos autorais,António Xavier
How 2BN SID,Steve Shutt
Diritto sportivo,Mario Tortora
Saggi di diritto sportivo,
Prelomno obdobje slovenskega športa 1988-1994,Rajko Šugman
The surrendered Christian athlete,Brant C. Tolsma
Sport und Kommerz,"Franz Jaeger, Winfried Stier"
"National sports participation survey, 1997",
Sport als populäre Kultur,Jürgen Schwier
[Sports illustrated for kids books publications],
Kesytetyt kehot,Jyri Puhakainen
Athletries,"Anne Reese, Irini Vallera-Rickerson"
Le sport malade de ses contradictions--,France) Université sportive d'été (16th 1999 Lyon
Sportbeleidsontwikkeling 1945-2000,Wim de Heer
Diez años de conferencias académicas José María Cagigal,AIESEP World Conference
"Sport, society & culture in New Zealand",Brad Patterson
Ideološke paradigme v športu,Roman Vodeb
Specificity of strength and power training effects,Jan Hoff
Tran/sport,Mirko Bogataj
Istorii︠a︡ fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta v Ti︠u︡menskom regione 1863-2000 gg,L. A. Belous
Khuan Antonio Samaranch--ot Moskvy do Moskvy,"I︠U︡riĭ Luzhkov, V. G. Smirnov, A. V. Morgunov"
Pop-Sport-Kultur,"Schmidt, Robert"
"Australian sport, a profile",
Investing in sport,SPARC (Organization : N.Z.)
L'importante è vincere,Aldo Aledda
Farmakologicheskoe obespechenie v sisteme podgotovki sportsmenov,Galina Aleksandrovna Makarova
The book on sports nutrition,James T. Bell
Vom Kaiserberg zur Olympiade,Ralf Heuser
"Le CIO à Lausanne, 1939-1999",Pierre Morath
"Kultur, Sport, Bildung","Symposium ""Kultur, Sport, Bildung"" (1998 Schloss Rauischholzhausen)"
Teoreticheskie osnovy professionalʹno-tvorcheskogo razvitii︠a︡ lichnosti spet︠s︡ialista fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta,S. N. Begidova
Miloš Crnjanski,Boško Đ. Stanišić
Zhonghua wen hua shi wan ge wei shen mo,Cunsheng Fan
Tiao zhan ji xian,Junzhong Chen
The history of Royal Air Force Rugby 1919-1999,John Mace
"Monitoring fizicheskogo razvitii︠a︡, fizicheskoĭ podgotovlennosti razlichnykh vozrastnykh grupp naselenii︠a︡","Vserossiĭskai︠a︡ nauchno-prakticheskai︠a︡ konferent︠s︡ii︠a︡ ""Monitoring fizicheskogo razvitii︠a︡, fizicheskoĭ podgotovlennosti razlichnykh vozrastnykh grupp naselenii︠a︡"" (1st 2003 Nalʹchik, Russia)"
Ti yu she tuan shi ti hua chu lun,Zhonghuai Xu
Det skæve træ,Verner Bruhn
Inleiding tot sporttoerisme,Gert J. L. Scholtz
La psicologia dello sport tra performance e benessere,Liliana Bal Filoramo
La professionnalisation des organisations sportives,Pascal Chantelat
Le sport et ses affaires,"Pascal Duret, Patrick Trabal"
The illustrated encyclopedia of sport,"François Fortin, Denis Fourny"
"Sport, XX vek",B. Bazunov
Du guerrier à l'athlète,"Nicolas Bancel, Jean-Marc Gayman"
Ti︠u︡rkskie narodnye tradit︠s︡ii fizicheskogo vospitanii︠a︡,Kh. Kh Baĭmurzin
Problemy fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta na Altae,N. F. Trubnikova
Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura i sport v sovremennom obshchestve,S. S. Dobrovolʹskiĭ
Profili attuali di diritto sportivo e nuova legge antidoping,Gianluca Gambogi
Kumpulan dokumen olahraga nasional dan internasional,
"Échec scolaire, l'exclusion et la pratique sportive",Pierre Therme
La administración de la sociedad anónima deportiva,Mario Varea Sanz
Chosŏn chʻeyuksa kyojae,Chŏng-hi Kye
Di 1 jie shan bao yi shu ji ti neng jing ji,Taiwan sheng li mei shu guan
Sport aus drei Jahrtausenden,Max Triet
Voprosy teorii i praktiki fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta,K. M. Batorov
Ningxia ti yu zhi,Ningxia ti yu zhi bian shen wei yuan hui
Diritto penale dello sport,Alessandro Traversi
Rechtsfragen der Vereinsstrafe,Christoph Fuchs
Los impuestos del deporte,Luis María Cazorla Prieto
Principles of safety in physical education and sport,Neil J. Dougherty
Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura i sport v I︠A︡kutii v gody Velikoĭ Otechestvennoĭ voĭny,V. P. Kochnev
Psikhologicheskai︠a︡ sovmestimostʹ i srabatyvaemostʹ v sportivnoĭ dei︠a︡telʹnosti,G. D. Babushkin
Temas desportivos,Fernando Roboredo Seara
Sportivnai︠a︡ politika Rossii,"Isaev, A. A."
Tilstandsrapport for norsk idrett,Yngve Eikrem
"Problemy fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury, sporta i zdorovʹi︠a︡ na Dalʹnem Vostoke",Valeriĭ Pavlovich Kargapolov
Ėtnografii︠a︡ tradit︠s︡ionnogo sporta u narodov Severnogo Kavkaza,K. U. Taĭsaev
Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura i sport v ėksklavnom regione Rossii,V. K. Pelʹmenev
Solo per sport,Gianfranco Benincasa
Solo per sport,Ettore Frangipane
"Sport, Scotland and the Scots","Grant Jarvie, Burnett, John"
"Geliebt, verehrt, vergöttert",Gabi Langen
Idman,Ceyhun Näsibov
Simposium de Kinantropometría,Venezuela?) Simposium de Kinantropometría (1990? Caracas
Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura i sport--zdorovʹe naselenii︠a︡ Rossii,I︠U︡. V. Vorozhko
Puti optimizat︠s︡ii prot︠s︡essa fizicheskogo vospitanii︠a︡ i sportivno-massovoĭ raboty v vuzakh Respubliki Belarusʹ,
Breitensport in Ostdeutschland,Universität Greifswald. Wissenschaftliche Tagung
India's highest sports awards and those who won them,
"Problemy sovershenstvovanii︠a︡ olimpiĭskogo dvizhenii︠a︡, fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta v Sibiri",I︠U︡. V. Vorozhko
Sovremennye problemy razvitii︠a︡ fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i biomekhaniki sporta,I︠A︡. K. Koblev
Lietuvos sporto organizacijos,Jolanta Lapinskienė
GirlSports basics national evaluation,Shannan McNair
Fizkulʹtura i sport v sovremennykh uslovii︠a︡kh,"G. D. Babushkin, I︠U︡. V. Vorozhko"
Economie du sport et entrepreneuriat,Dieter Hillairet
"Razvitie fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta v Respublike Sakha (I︠A︡kutii︠a︡) v nachale XXI veka: sostoi︠a︡nie, problemy i perspektivy, 21-22 fevrala 2001 g.","Respublikanskai︠a︡ nauchno-prakticheskai︠a︡ konferent︠s︡ii︠a︡ ""Razvitie fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta v Respublike Sakha (I︠A︡kutii︠a︡) v nachale XXI veka: sostoi︠a︡nie, problemy i perspektivy"" (2001 I︠A︡kutsk, Russia)"
Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura i zdorovyĭ obraz zhizni,V. I. Goncharov
Capurso,Gino Pastore
Il marketing sportivo,Sergio Cherubini
"Ti yu xin wen xuan, 1949-1999",Chaoren Guo
The Economic impact of sport events,Claude Jeanrenaud
Nekateri vidiki financiranja in organiziranosti športa v Sloveniji,Jakob Bednarik
The world of girls & sports,Justin Borus
Ocherki istorii fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta Pskovskogo krai︠a︡,D. A. Beli︠u︡kov
Istorii︠a︡ fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta Pskovskoĭ gubernii v kont︠s︡e XIX--nachale XX vv,Dmitriĭ Beli︠u︡kin
Spitzensport und Beruf,Carmen Borggrefe
Ti yu fa xue gai lun,Xiaoyong Tan
Die Deutsche Frage in Kirche und Sport,
Panem et sportenses?,Jacques Lemaire
21-seiki o mezashita supōtsu kenkōzukuri katsudō ni kansuru chōsa kenkyū hōkokusho,Nihon Shisutemu Kaihatsu Kenkyūjo
Ti yu ren lei xue yan jiu fang fa,Yue Wang
Sports and games in the open,A. B. Frost
Die Sportbranche und ihre Geldströme,
Fiestas y juegos en Puerto Rico (siglo XVIII),Angel López Cantos
Igry i sosti︠a︡zanii︠a︡ ėvenov,G. V. Robbek
Das Deutsche Sportmuseum,Manfred Lämmer
Il Gene dello sport,Gene Gnocchi
"Nel nome del padre, del figlio e dello sport",Franco Esposito
Psicologia e sport,Giuseppe Ferrari
Gender issues in sport,
The Boy's modern playmate,John George Wood
Føroyar framá,Uni Arge
Etnisite ve spor,Metin Kılıç
Zhongguo shi cheng zhang,Guanjianxiansheng
Entre o requinte e o tribofe,Victor Andrade de Melo
The ultimate book of sports lists,Andrew Postman
Dicionário de educação física e esporte,Valdir J. Barbanti
História do esporte no Brasil,"Mary Del Priore, Victor Andrade de Melo"
Exercise psychology,Gershon Tenebaum
"Pucks, clubs, and baseball gloves",Jill Kalz
The modern Melbourne Cup,Danny Power
Milano capitale dello sport,Enrico Landoni
al-Niẓām al-qānūnī lil-qaḍāʼ al-riyāḍī al-duwalī,ʻAdnān Aḥmad Walī ʻAzzāwī
Pugni chiusi e cerchi olimpici,Sergio Giuntini
Körperkultur,Axel Horn
Géopolitique du sport,Pascal Boniface
Contrato de trabajo deportivo y el derecho de opción unilateral del club,Hassel Aguilar Sosa
Sovetskiĭ sport,Alekseĭ Ananʹev
Fragebogen zum Athletenverhalten in kritischen Wettkampfsituationen (FAV),Sören D. Baumgärtner
Spor hukuku,Fehmi Üçışık
Sports and Coaching,Sports and Coaching: Pasts and Futures (Conference) (2011 Manchester Metropolitan University's Institute for Performance Research)
al-Jarīmah al-riyāḍīyah bayna al-qānūn al-jināʼī wa-al-qānūn al-taʼdībī lil-Jāmiʻah al-Malakīyah al-Maghribīyah li-Kurat al-Qadam,Ḥafṣah Mūminī
The boys from Corbin,Gary P. West
Varzish-i shahrvandī,Mujtabá Yazdānī
Understanding sports law,"Aspatore, Inc"
al-Istithmār wa-al-taswīq al-riyāḍī fī al-Mamlakah al-ʻArabīyah al-Saʻūdīyah,Fahd ibn Muḥammad Bānī
al-Masʼūlīyah al-jināʼīyah fī iṣābāt al-malāʻib al-riyāḍīyah wa-taṭbīqātuhā fī al-Mamlakah al-ʻArabīyah al-Saʻūdīyah,Muḥammad ibn ʻAlī Qaddādī
The huddle,Shawn Brower
How Malaysia never reached the World Cup,Lucius Maximus
Formando el cuerpo de una nación,Monserrat Sánchez Soler
Sŭp'och'ŭ-pŏp,Sŏk-chŏng Son
Sport-Sponsoring,Walter Ruda
Dream jobs in sports law,Kathy Furgang
Aufwachsen mit Sport,Erin Gerlach
Interesse público e regulação estatal do futebol no Brasil,Márcia Santos da Silva
"Zibo Shi ti yu zhi, 1950-2002","Anlu Zhang, Dunpu Wang"
Unforgettable,Joseph Romanos
"I︠U︡rist v oblasti sporta, shou-biznesa i reklamy",I. V. Ponkin
33 zvezdy sporta,Aleksandr Kruzhkov
"Shestai︠a︡ mezhdunarodnai︠a︡ nauchno-prakticheskai︠a︡ konferent︠s︡ii︠a︡ ""Sportivnoe pravo--perspektivy razvitii︠a︡""","Russia) Mezhdunarodnai︠a︡ nauchno-prakticheskai︠a︡ konferent︠s︡ii︠a︡ ""Sportivnoe pravo--perspektivy razvitii︠a︡"" (6th 2012 Moscow"
Sports,Geoff Tibballs
"Beweging in beleid, beleid in beweging",Jeroen Scheerder
Sport en beweegmanagement in de Lage Landen,Steven Vos
Lezioni di diritto sportivo,Giuseppe Liotta
Supōtsu no shakaigaku,Yoshiaki Kameyama
Bangladesh playing,Kausik Bandyopadhyay
Cleveland's bitter pill,Joseph Congeni
Sport psychology,"Gershon Tenenbaum, Robert C. Eklund"
"The Irish and the making of American sport, 1835-1920",Patrick R. Redmond
Sport żydowski w przedwojennej Warszawie,Radosław Rokicki
Sport in de wereld,Trudo Dejonghe
Singapore on the couch,Yong Lock Ong
al-Aḥādīth al-wāridah fī al-luʻab wa-al-riyāḍah,Ṣāliḥ ibn Furayḥ Bahlāl
Povijest delničkog športa,Željko Laloš
Życie sportowe w Drugiej Rzeczypospolitej,Krzysztof Szujecki
İstanbul'un 100 sporcusu,Hacı Hasdemir
Events und Sport,Wissenschaftliche Konferenz Eventforschung (4th 2012 Technische Universität Chemnitz)
Replay,Photosport (Firm)
Sports neurology,Barry D. Jordan
Greek athletics,Jason König
Guiyang bai nian ti yu tu lu = Guiyang bainian tiyu tulu,Guiyang Shi di fang zhi bian zuan wei yuan hui. Ban gong shi
"Educação física, esporte e diversidade",Marco Paulo Stigger
Ti yu da quan,Yiqi Lin
K-sports,Hŭi-bok Wŏn
Sportlandschaften,Noyan Dinçkal
"Huskies, in pursuit of excellence",Francis Mitchell
Fatti di gloria,Fabio De Santis
La valigia dello sport,Alessandro Mastroluca
Du sport ouvrier au sport oublié?,Jean-François Davoust
"Arab games, Doha 2011",Qatar) Dawrat al-Alʻāb al-ʻArabīyah (2011 Dawḥah
Idrottsjuridik,Johan Lindholm
Eesti politsei sport läbi ajaloo,Henno Linn
Kyrgyzstan-- dene tarbii︠a︡ zhana sport ėnt︠s︡iklopedii︠a︡sy,Kabyl Makeshov
Fī al-masʼalah al-kurawīyah,Sāmī Ḥalābah
"Comentários ao Estatuto do torcedor (Lei no̲. 10,671/2003)",Milton Jordão
Agadah she-haitah be-emet,Roʻi Shiling
Hyŏndae sŭp'och'ŭ pŏphak,Tu-hyŏn Kim
Direito do trabalho desportivo,"Alexandre Agra Belmonte, Guilherme Augusto Caputo Bastos"
Confessions sportives,Martin Leclerc
The main event,Richard O. Davies
Zhongguo gu dai ti yu shi,
Zhonghua ti tan si shi chun,
Game changers,Marty Mulé
Spor hukuku,Recep Gülşen
Ti yu mi yu,Lian Zhao
Concorsi sportivi e propaganda politica in età ellenistica,Diva Di Nanni Durante
Milano nello sport,Gino Cervi
Playing to win,"Gordon, Michael (Journalist)"
Direito desportivo e conexões com o direito penal,"Leonardo Schmitt de Bem, Rosario de Vicente Martínez, Albin Eser"
Futebol & relação de consumo,Antonio Rodrigues do Nascimento
Yun dong yu le zai Guangdong,Huiji Qin
Sŭp'och'ŭ pŏphak yŏn'gu,Ki-yŏng Yŏn
Physical education and sport,
Psicologia dello sport,
The art of motivation for sports,Jim Hinkson
New Zealand Sports Hall of Fame,Maria Gill
He Long yu zhan dou ti gong dui,
Spitzensport im Licht des Europäischen Kartellrechts,Jonas Hail
Guizhou shao shu min zu ti yu yan jiu,Guizhou Sheng min zu shi wu wei yuan hui
A Knockout of Sports Jokes (Joke Book),Bill Stott
Chʻeyuk haengjŏnghak,Sin-bok Kang
Taḣavvulot dar varzishi Tojikiston,Mirzosafar Shamsiddinov
Dreams & nightmares,M. Wasim
Zhongguo jin dai ti yu shi,
Le sport contre la société,"Clément Hamel, Simon Maillard, Patrick Vassort"
Internationale Aspekte und Perspektiven des Sports,"Walter Tokarski, Jürgen Buschmann"
Historias irrepetibles del deporte,Juan Carlos Álvarez
Der Sport im Recht der Europäischen Union,Benjamin Eichel
Direito desportivo no limiar do século XXI,Alvaro Melo Filho
Ci hai,
Mladezhta i olimpizmŭt,
Direito desportivo atual,Alvaro Melo Filho
1936,Vicent Sampedro Ramo
O desporto na ordem jurídico-constitucional brasileira,Alvaro Melo Filho
Levi horog,Lev Kreft
Gunman on campus,Kim Etingoff
Strategies in sports marketing,Manuel Alonso Dos Santos
Korrupt︠s︡ii︠a︡ i sport,G. S. Goncharenko
Muzhchina i zhenshchina v sporte vysshikh dostizheniĭ,F. A. Iordanskai︠a︡
PRimus - Psychosoziale Ressourcen in Kinder- und Jugendsport,Ralf Sygusch
Developing responsible contributors,Matt Garrett
The econometrics of sport,"Plácido Rodríguez, Stefan Késenne, Jaume García"
Weirdest moments in sports,Marty Gitlin
Analysis and method of teaching the basic techniques of team sports for girls,Percy Margaret Gill
Magnesium and red blood cell fragility following heavy exercise of moderate duration in untrained teenage boys,Christina Scribner Reiter
Sport in the Soviet Union,Victor E Louis
"Canada's part in the 1954 British Empire and Commonwealth Games, Vancouver, British Columbia, Canada, July 30th to August 7th",British Empire and Commonwealth Games Association of Canada
NEMA standard floodlight layouts for floodlighting sports areas,National Electrical Manufacturers Association. Floodlighting Section.
Athletics in theory and practice,Ernest W. Hjertberg
"To establish an athletic commission to regulate boxing, sparring, and wrestling exhibitions",United States. Congress. House
"Athletic field and gymnasium at Howard University, District of Columbia",United States. Congress. House. Committee on the District of Columbia
Authorize boxing in the District of Columbia,United States. Congress. House. Committee on the District of Columbia
To authorize amateur boxing in the District of Columbia,United States. Congress. House. Committee on the District of Columbia
"To authorize wrestling in the District of Columbia, and for other purposes",United States. Congress. House. Committee on the District of Columbia
Director of gymnastics and instructor of swordsmanship at the United States Military Academy,United States. Congress. House
Social history of nineteenth century sport,British Society of Sports History. Inaugural Conference
Fan Freedom and Community Protection Act of 1996,United States. Congress. House. Committee on the Judiciary
Yovel ṿa-maʻlah,Joseph Yekutieli
"Jeux, sports et divertissements des rois de France","Carré, Henri"
Olympic and Amateur Sports Act Amendments of 1998,"United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation."
United States Olympic Committee Reform Act of 2003,"United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation."
"Amateur Sports Integrity Act, S. 718","United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation."
Biomechanics in sports,International Symposium on Biomechanics in Sports.
Business plans and budgeting,Sports Council.
Financing projects,Sports Council.
Organized professional team sports,United States. Congress. House. Committee on the Judiciary
"Prize fighting, etc",United States. Congress. House. Committee on the Judiciary
Arjuna awardees,K. R. Wadhwaney
"Governing body leadership, coaching & officiating award schemes",Central Council of Physical Recreation.
Game rules and morality,Joyce H Weiblen
The effects of crowding and observation of athletic events on spectator tendency toward aggressive behavior,Joseph X Lennon
Art and sport,John W Healy
The 1988 Calgary Olympic Winter Games : report on the participation of the Government of Canada =,Canada. Minister of State for Fitness and Amateur Sport.
Highlights of the 1976 fitness and sport survey,Canada. Fitness and Amateur Sport Branch.
U.S. participation in the 1980 summer Olympic games,United States. Congress. House. Committee on Foreign Affairs
The cross-cultural analysis of sport and games,Gu nther Lu schen
Teaching individual and team sports,Raymond Talmadge DeWitt
Old sporting prints,"Nevill, Ralph"
Interstate transportation of pictures of prize fights,United States. Congress. House. Committee on Interstate and Foreign Commerce
"Professional sports antitrust bill, 1964",United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on the Judiciary. Subcommittee on Antitrust and Monopoly.
Safe practice in physical education,British Association of Advisers and Lecturers in Physical Education.
"The use of hypnosis in athletics in American colleges, universities and high schools",Wilfred M. Mitchell
Tax information for sponsors of contests and sporting events,United States. Internal Revenue Service.
"Proceedings of the Biomechanics Symposium, Indiana University, October 26-28, 1989","Biomechanics Symposium (1980 Indiana University, Bloomington, Ind.)"
Boxing matches in Hawaii,United States. Congress. House. Committee on the Judiciary
Targeting sporting change in Ireland,Ireland. Department of Education.
"Proceedings, University of British Columbia, Vancouver, B.C., June 24th to 26th, 1979",Canadian Symposium on the History of Sport and Physical Education (4th 1979 University of British Columbia)
Professional and amateur sports protection,United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on the Judiciary
History of school physical education and sports promotion movement,International Seminar of Physical Education and Sports History (1978 Tokyo)
100 aastat Eesti raskejõustikku,Lembit Koik
Nashe soobshchestvo nabiraet silu i temp,"B. Rogatin, A. N. Efimenko"
Harry M. Stevens live auction,
Kyoryū gaikokujin ni yoru Kōbe supōtsu kotohajime kō,"Tanada, Shinsuke"
Drawing a crowd,"Bill Gallo, Phil Cornell"
Greatest pictures,Morin Bishop
Regulation & dispute resolution in sports,Pennsylvania Bar Institute
Le sport français dans l'entre-deux-guerres,"Jean-Philippe Saint-Martin, Thierry Terret"
"Száz éve már, több is talán--",Bálint Klósz
Toldot ha-Makabiyot,Moshe Lerer
Deporte y sociedad,"Pablo Alabarces, Roberto Di Giano, Julio Frydenberg"
American Work-Sports,Frank Zarnowski
Winter Classic,"Russ Cohen, Michael del Tufo"
Let the Games Begin!,"Maya Ajmera, Michael Regan, Global Fund for Children (Organization)"
Pami͡a︡tniki prirody Severnoĭ Osetii,K. P. Popov
Calling,Barry Blanchard
Sports Leadership Playbook,Mike Voight
Body and Soul,Loic Wacquant
"Sport, Philosophy, and Good Lives",Randolph Feezell
"SPORT, GAME OR HOBBY? LOW INTERMEDIATE BOOK WITH ONLINE ACCESS",BeaverSimon
Commonwealth Games,Marc Keech
Peadar Cowan,Tom Hunt
"Grandma, Guess What?","Carol Westfahl, Paul Strode"
Depth Psychology and Sport,David Burston
"Running for My Life, Winning for CMT (kindle)",Christine Wodke
National Pastime,Gus Schumacher
in Depth Guide to Sports,Daniël Hak
Fair play,Manfred Lämmer
Prince in Pinstripes,Joe Palumbo
Buzzer Beaters and Memorial Magic,Barry Goheen
Muhammad Ali,Carrie Golus
Research Methodologies and Sports Scholarship,"James Skinner, Terry Engelberg"
NASCAR Designed to Win,
Sport in England and the U.S.A,Giuseppe Ragazzini
Long Shots,"Bronwyn Sell, Christine Sheehy"
Pistol Shooting Sports,Ken Adcock
NFL 1970,Ian S. Kahanowitz
Ivy Dreams,Jill Eisnaugle
Commission We Had to Have,David Trodden
BS Beginning Figure Skating,
Brock at Bathurst,Bev Brock
"Art, Culture, and Sports","Jon Richards, Ed Simkins"
Archie Jackson,David Frith
Rod Marsh,Rod Marsh
AFL Record Season 2020,Michael Lovett
My Fighting Life,Ivan Rukavina
Totem Poles of Ouyen United,Paul Daffey
On the Take,"Tony Joel, Mathew Turner"
Surfing for England,Jason Goldsmith
Playing with the FIELD,Merv Keane
Running for a Cause,Kaye Nutman
Scorned,Marie Long
First Ten Days,Yaakov Haber
BTEC Nationals Sport Student Book 1 + Activebook,"Adam Gledhill, Richard Taylor, Louise Sutton, Matthew Fleet, Chris Manley"
Switch Pitchers,Norman German
Reef Smart Guides Grand Cayman : (Best Diving Spots),"Peter McDougall, Ian Popple, Otto Wagner"
Expedition Britannic,"Rick Ayrton, Scott Roberts, Yannis Tzavelakos"
Diffusion des sports et impérialisme anglo-saxon,Sébastien Darbon
Golden Age of Montauk Sportfishing,"Bill Akin, Joe Gaviola"
Lacrosse in Action,"John Crossingham, Katherine Kantor"
La educación física en la legislación española (1900-1980),Rafael Bravo Berrocal
Rough Habit,Ken Linnett
Biker's Tale,John Hellemans
American Sporting Periodicals,M. L. Biscotti
BS Beginning Backpacking,
International Surfing Symposium,Rob Hales
Chronicles of Soccer in Australia,Peter Kunz
Sport A Short Introduction,"Peter Donnelly, Jay J. Coakley"
Sport,"Peter Donnelly, Jay J. Coakley"
Oikeudellistuva urheilu,Heikki Halila
Egypt's Football Revolution,Carl Rommel
Athlete in the Ancient Greek World,Reyes Bertolín Cebrián
"Blunders, Gaffes and Own Goals",Adrian Brady
Jim Thorpe,
Doug Flutie,
John Taffin's Book of the .44 Caliber,John Taffin
Method a Golf Success Strategy,D. Swing Meyer
Annotierte Bibliographie zum Sport im alten Ägypten,Wolfgang Decker
Satchel Paige at the State Fair,"Linda Paige Shelby, China Smith"
Proskater,"Amari Bingham, Tamira Butler-Likely, Niquey"
This Is Don Jitsu Ryu Book One,Professor Don Jacob
Nigth Games,Bob Dries
Sports,Elizabeth Nonweiler
First Lions of Rugby,Sean Fagan
Ethnosport,Alexey Kylasov
Peter Von Danzig Fightbook,"Christian Henry Tobler, Dierk Hagedorn"
Business Day Sport,"M. Keohane, Gary Lemke"
Doing Real World Research in Sport Studies,"Andy Smith, Ken Green, Ivan Waddington"
Surfing and the Philosophy of Sport,Daniel Brennan
Isla Vista Crucible,Reilly Ridgell
Ski Inc,"Chris Diamond, Andy Bigford"
Sports Diplomacy,Stuart Murray
La conquête du sport,Donald Guay
Crevasse Rescue Pocket Guide,The Mountaineers Books
English Gentlemen and World Football,"Chris Bolsmann, Tony Mason"
"Higher, Further, Faster",Stewart Ross
Conversations with Coach Wooden,"Gary Adams, Chase Utley, Eric Karros, Dave Roberts"
Fan Activism Protest and the State,Andrew Hodges
Sports Engineering and Computer Science,Luo Qi
a to Z of Football Collectibles,Carl Wilkes
Under Your Nose; Great Philadelphia Sports Stories You've Never Heard,Matt Leon
This date in sports history,Floyd Conner
Ten,Gordon Thomson
1000 facts on sport,Christopher Rigby
Mark Stephens Yoga Adjustments Deck,Mark Stephens
Tiempo libre y actividades deportivas de la juventud en España,Manuel García Ferrando
Deporte y sociedad,Manuel García Ferrando
Aspectos sociales del deporte,Manuel García Ferrando
"Los españoles y el deporte, 1980-1995",Manuel García Ferrando
Flyer'd up! Trivia Facts and Anecdotes for Fans of the Orange and Black,Brian Startare
Postmodernidad y deporte,Manuel García Ferrando
Stand Up,
Press Box,Red Smith
"Sports, Leisure and Games in Korea",Seung-Jae Lee
Following the General,Terry Hutchens
The Sarajevo Olympics,Jason Vuic
Historical Sociology of Japanese Martial Arts,Raul Garcia
Kingdom's Bounty,Christopher Reeve
History and Development of Taekwondo,Udo Moenig
Sports and the law in Canada,"Barnes, John barrister-at-law"
One Hundred Smiles,"Taylor, Peter"
World Football Domination,"Anthony Ranieri, Jamie Warren"
Servicestrategie als Basis Einer Zukuenftigen Marketingkonzeption fuer den Mittelstaendischen Facheinzelhandel am Beispiel der Sportartikelbranche,Frank Fenner
Kultur und Sport im Bundesverfassungsrecht,Martin Bauer
Rational Emotive Behaviour Therapy in Sport and Exercise,"Martin Turner, Richard Bennett"
Collision Course,William A Cook
Study Skills in Sport Studies,Tara Magdalinski
Corruption in Sport,"Lisa Kihl, Stephen Moston"
"Olympic Games, Social Legacies, and Urban Exclusion",Jacqueline Kennelly
Financial Management,Et Al Brown
Expedition,Christine Fagan
British Sporting Literature and Culture in the Long Eighteenth Century,"Sharon Harrow, Eugenia Zuroski Jenkins, Lynch, Jack"
Elite Youth Sport Policy,"Elsa Kristiansen, Milena M. Parent, Barrie Houlihan"
Gender Testing in Sports,"Sandy Montanola, Aurelie Olivesi"
Stillpower,Garrett Kramer
Essentials of Team Building,"Daniel W. Midura, Donald R. Glover"
Playing Pro Basketball,Martin Gitlin
Sports Top Tens,Sandy Donovan
Why Always Me?,Frank Worrall
"Totally Epic, True and Wacky Soccer Facts and Stories","Jon Stollberg, Puck"
Hoosiers All! : Indiana High School Basketball Team,Emerson Houck
First Season,
La motivation du sportif de compétition,Robert J. Vallerand
2020 Rugby Almanack,"Clive Akers, Adrian Hill, Campbell Burnes"
Kai prabyla sporto žvaigždės,Rimvydas Delkus
Gyvieji protokolai,Rimvydas Delkus
Yellow & Black,Konrad Marshall
Cambridge National Level 1/2 Sport Science,"Mike Murray, Ross Howitt"
Cambridge National Level 1/2 Sport Studies,"Mike Murray, Ross Howitt"
Only Fools and White Horses,Colin Skeath
Unbewusste Informationsverarbeitung - ein Thema Fuer Die Sportwissenschaft?!,Armin Kibele
The world's toughest races,Ali Clarke
Sportsvision,"Thomas A. Wilson, Jeff, Ph.D. Falkel"
Exploring Sports and Society,K. Spracklen
Nascita di un movimento,Luigi Martini
Sport and PE,"Kevin Wesson, Nesta Wiggins, Graham Thompson, Sue Hartigan"
Book of Speed for Martial Artists,David Howell
"Oxford Encyclopedia of Sport, Exercise, and Performance Psychology",Edmund O. Acevedo
Sport in Britain,Great Britain. Foreign and Commonwealth Office.
Social Entrepreneurship in Sport,Vanessa Ratten
2019 New Zealand Cricket Almanack,"Francis Payne, Ian Smith undifferentiated"
An organizational stress review,David Fletcher
"Sports, enjeux et accidents",Luc Collard
Whistling Irishman,Colleen Hroncich
Sport-O-Rama,"Benoit Tardif, Benoit Tardif"
Sports injuries,Sarah Lennard-Brown
Úr Føroya ítróttarsøgu,Árni Dahl
Squat,James T. Speirs
MySearchLab with Pearson EText -- Standalone Access Card -- for American Sports,"Benjamin G. Rader, Pamela Grundy"
Advances in Sports Research,Esther S. Linton
Fiona and Friends,Elizabeth Cummings
Ball Game Math,Katie Marsico
Rivals,Phil Gifford
Bass Wars,Nick Taylor
Sport,Ron Palenski
Against All Odds,"Slattery Media Group, Slattery Media Group, Slattery Media Group"
Rapport fait au nom de la Commission des finances chargée d'examiner le projet de loi portant fixation du Budget général de l'exercice 1937,France. Assemblée nationale (1871-1942). Chambre des députés. Commission des finances.
Ultimate sport fact & quiz book,Peter Sterling
Baseball for Kids,Adam C. MacKinnon
To Olympiako pneuma,Elsē Spatharē
Our sporting times,"David Miller, Will Carling"
On the Jump of the Ancient Pentathlon,Jannis Mouratidis
Famous American athletes of today,"Al Hirshber, Joe McKenney"
Sports Law,"Champion, Walter T., Jr."
BTEC First Sport,"Harris, Bob, Ramela Mills"
Inside the NFL,
Deadly Hard-Hitting Sports,Jeff Savage
Curiosidades del deporte,Alberto Yáñez
One Goal Achieved,Blackhawks Publishing Staff
Elk Tactics,"Don Laubach, Mark Henckel"
"Amira Can Catch, New Kid in School","Kevin Christofora, Dale Tangeman"
Bowls,Ian Schuback
Sports in Society,"Coakley, Pike"
Innovative Writings in Sport and Exercise Psychology,Robert J. Schinke
Fox Swift Takes on the Unbeatables,"David Lawrence, Jo Gill, Cyril Rioli"
Cambridge Technicals Level 3 Sport and Physical Activity,"Helen Bray, Scott Chapman, Alister Myatt, Annette Short, Suzanne Bointon"
Game Misconduct,Nathan Kalman-Lamb
Story of the Philadelphia Eagles,Jim Gigliotti
Fly Fishing Kentucky,"J. Thomas Schrodt, Valerie Askren, Christine Schrodt"
Ice Climber's Guide to Michigan's Upper Peninsula,"Matt Abbotts, Jon Jugenheimer, Bill Thompson"
On the Considerable Talents and Diversity of Mr. John Montgomery Ward,Jerome Wallerstein
Lead Like a Pro,Matthew Raidbard
After Jackie,Jeffrey S. Copeland
Lessons for WOLFPACK FANS,Professor Wolf
Hockey Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
Summary of Dean Karnazes's a Runner's High,I. R. B. Media
Lessons for TAR HEELS,Caroline Rosemary
1972,"Steve Bence, Bob Welch"
Legends of Pro Wrestling Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
David Boon's big book of great sporting jokes,David Boon
Roland Palmedo,Philip Palmedo
Olympic Japan,"Andreas Niehaus, Max Seinsch"
From TV Mountain / Snow Park to Missoula / Montana Snowbowl,Stan Cohen
My Journey from Boxing Ring to Boardroom (e-Book),Hector Colon
Story of the Las Vegas Raiders,K. C. Kelley
Story of the New England Patriots,Jim Gigliotti
Vom Burschenturnen zur Wissenschaft der Körperkultur,Norbert Gissel
British Sporting Periodicals,M. L. Biscotti
Noki,Douglas Farrago
Distant Finish,Steven Decker
Mediterranean Spain,Imray
Historia de la Serie Hípica Del Caribe 2009-2019,Juan Carlos Feijoo Gonzalez
Magic of Mentorship,"Freddy McGaver, Russ Hellickson, Susan Carlson"
När idrotten kom till Lund,"Blom, K. Arne"
50 Reasons to Hate Golf and Why You Should Never Stop Playing 6-Copy Counter Display,"Fred Fruisen, Chris Rodell"
Belhamel,James McGough
High School Coaching Mastery,David Smith
Jackie Robinson Lived on My Block,Bryant Johnson McInnis
Houston Texans Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
My First Skateboard Jonas Meets Jack,Karl Watson
Baltimore Ravens Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
Carolina Panthers Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
San Francisco 49ers Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
Arizona Cardinals Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
Los Angeles Chargers Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
Indianapolis Colts Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
Los Angeles Rams Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
Seattle Seahawks Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
Jacksonville Jaguars Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
Las Vegas Raiders Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
Atlanta Falcons Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
Love of the Game,Shayne McClendon
Story of the Los Angeles Chargers,K. C. Kelley
"I AM d-1, How to Conquer the World of Travel Basketball","Meadows, Chris, Sr., Chris Meadows"
Contrato de emprêgo desportivo no direito brasileiro,José Martins Catharino
Medal with Mouse Ears (ebook),Mary Townsend
Medal with Mouse Ears,Mary Townsend
East Aegean,Imray
River Nene,Imray Laurie Norie & Wilson Ltd
Phenom,"Jack Shniderman, Bruce Miles"
Story of the Miami Dolphins,Jim Gigliotti
Story of the Los Angeles Rams,K. C. Kelley
Record Breaking Betty,Tracy Blom
Story of the Dallas Cowboys,Jim Gigliotti
"Running for My Life, Winning for CMT",Christine Wodke
Intangibles,Monte Dutton
Chicago's Sweetest '16,Steve Corman
PGA Centennial,"Billy Detlaff, Jack Nicklaus, Annika Sorenstam, John Steinbreder"
"Way of Martial Arts for Kids, 2nd Edition","Kris Wilder, Lawrence Kane"
3200 Islas Baleares Chart Pack Wiro Bound,Imray
Mediterranean Almanac 2021/22,Imray
Chart 1 Eastern Caribbean,Imray
Overseas Famous,Kevin Owens
River Great Ouse and Its Tributaries,Imray
Club Pro Guy's Other Black Book,"Club Pro Guy, Paul Koehorst"
"Warrior Nutrition by Dr. Herman R. Barnes, D.C.",Herman Barnes
Firehead,"Dear Athletes, Cristin Dent"
Boxing,"Watanabe Yujiro, Koriyama Kokichi, Eric Shahan, Keith Vargo"
Last Crusade,"Nathan Lawrence, Thai Little, Matt Biolos"
Tennis Nuggets,Charles Young
-30-,"Randall L. Schroeder, Harold P. Kurtz, David Kurtz"
Little Book for Dads,Adams Media
From Coin Toss to Championship,Richard Schabowski
TheSummit Hiker and Ski Touring Guide,Mary Ellen Gilliland
So You Want to Be a Great Volleyball Coach,"Tod Mattox, Don Patterson"
100 Miles to Destiny,Willis McCarthy
Gilmore Years,Al Thompson
President's Bible,"Bunch, John Edward, 2nd, Christin Chapman"
"Warrior Psychology by Dr. Herman R. Barnes, D.C.",Herman Barnes
"Warrior Post-Training & Post Competition Recovery by Dr. Herman R. Barnes, D.C.",Herman Barnes
"Travel Ball Warrior by Dr. Herman R. Barnes, D.C.",Herman Barnes
"Spiritual Warrior by Dr. Herman R. Barnes, D.C.",Herman Barnes
Stadiums,Virginia Loh-Hagan Edd
Old Alaska II,Jim Reardon
Junior Year - Part II,G. Younger
Illegal Motions,Zoe Dawson
Action Camera Underwater Video Basics,"Jeff Goodman, Kip Evans"
Toss of the Coin,Richard Schabowski
Keys to the Batter's Box (ebook),Shawn Powell
Do It for Chappie,Richard Swaine
All Heart : The Baseball Life of Frank Torre,Cornelius Geary
Courage in Her Cleats,"Kim Chaffee, Alexandra Badiu"
Glory of Purple,Francis Fitzgerald
Baseball America 2022 Prospect Handbook Digital Edition,The Editors The Editors at Baseball America
Baseball America 2022 Prospect Handbook,The Editors The Editors at Baseball America
Franklin Field Saturdays,"Ted Gilmore, Dwayne Booth"
Bill Wuesthoff - Smooth and Fast! Nuff Said,Robert Birmingham
Ultimate Seattle Mariners Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Ladies' Catskill,Sherry Skramstad
Ultimate Baltimore Orioles Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Refuge Bouldering,Ryan Sheldon
Where They Were Then,Scott Reiss
Eldorado Canyon,Steve Levin
Shelf Road Rock,Rick Thompson
The Complete Handbook of Pro Basketball 1982,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Baseball 1987,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Pro Football 1982,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of College Football 1977,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Hockey 1976,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Hockey 1978,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Hockey 1981,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Pro Basketball 1984,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Baseball 1984,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Pro Basketball 1981,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Pro Basketball 1996,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Pro Basketball 1979,Zander Hollander
Cam's Cars,Just Right Reader
Story of the Arizona Cardinals,Jim Whiting
World's Great Golf Courses,Chris McLeod
Remembering the 1957 Algoma Penguins,Dennis Sell
Flag Football Feature Film,Bridgestone Multimedia Group
Story of the Jacksonville Jaguars,Jim Whiting
Story of the San Francisco 49ers,Jim Gigliotti
"Buddha's CHANGE YOUR DRIVING DISTANCE, CHANGE YOUR LIFE",Edward Sarkis Balian
"Losing Vision, Not Dreams",Noah Malone
We're Talking Baseball in New Athens,New Athens Historical Society
Mis-Shifting,Robert Birmingham
Stadium,K C Kelley
Deaflympic Games,rafael pinchas
Big Blue Days,Robert E. Jauron
"Educazione fisica, sport e giornalismo in Italia",Gigliola Gori
Gli Etruschi e lo sport,Gigliola Gori
Last at-Bat of Shoeless Joe,Granville Wyche Burgess
Kareem Abdul Jabbar,Phil Pepe
Great comebacks in sport,Phil Pepe
Horse Packing the Right Way,"Palmer, James R., Jr., Connie Kerbs, Clark Kelly Price"
Ziel Vor Augen,"Carsten Baumgart, Heinz Blatz, Stefan Eckhard, Volker Niggemeier"
Climber's Journal,"Karen Chen, Nico Marceca, April Davidson"
Women of Climbing Calendar 2022,Women of Climbing Calendar
Baseball America 2022 Almanac,The Editors The Editors of Baseball America
Fans-See This!,"Mark Bloom, Mark Wilson"
On and off the Bench,Markell Raphaelson West
TRIing TIMES,"Valerie Haller, Katie Zaferes"
Story of the New York Jets,Jim Gigliotti
Story of the New York Giants,Jim Gigliotti
My Football Season,Karleen Tauszik
The Complete Handbook of Baseball 1974,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Baseball 1982,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Pro Football 1983,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Pro Football 1975,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Pro Football 1981,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Pro Basketball 1985,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Pro Basketball 1983,Zander Hollander
Wrestling Price Guide #3,Beckett Collectibles Inc.
Passion for Promotion,Gene Church
Long May You Run,. . . Koenig
Story of the Atlanta Falcons,Jim Whiting
Story of the Washington Redskins,Jim Gigliotti
The Complete Handbook of Pro Hockey 1976,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Soccer 1978,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Pro Hockey 1979,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Pro Hockey 1975,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Soccer 1976,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Soccer 1980,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Pro Hockey 1982,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Pro Hockey 1977,Zander Hollander
Scouts' Honor,Craig Sesker
Pitcher's Moment,"Fritz Buckallew, Christopher Cockrum"
The spirit of the game,Basil Joseph Mathews
Dear Brother Patrick,Matt Drayer
Comprehensive Guide for Coaching Children How to Ski,Herbert Naito
How to Prepare for Your Child's First Ski Lesson,Herbert Naito
Junior Golf,David Smith
Game I Love,"Dick Vitale, Dick Weiss, Howie Schwab, Jay Wright"
Spectacular Sports : Motocross,Michelle Lee
Ultimate Newcastle United Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Ultimate Ohio State Buckeyes Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Ultimate Chelsea FC Trivia Book,Ray Walker
MORE PARS! Long Game Tips,Christina Ricci
Ultimate Indianapolis Colts Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Ultimate Minnesota Vikings Trivia Book,Ray Walker
MORE PARS! Short Game Tips,Christina Ricci
Ultimate Manchester City FC Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Your FIRST PAR! a Newer Golfer's Guide,Christina Ricci
Ultimate New York Knicks Trivia Book,Ray Walker
The Complete Handbook of Pro Football 1986,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Baseball 1981,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Baseball 1975,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Pro Football 1980,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of College Basketball 1981,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Pro Football 1977,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Pro Basketball 1975,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Baseball 1985,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Pro Basketball,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of Baseball 1980,Zander Hollander
One Woman's Olympic Journey,Bill Ryan
Tributary,Joshua Bergan
Story of the Denver Broncos,K. C. Kelley
Story of the Indianapolis Colts,Jim Whiting
Hawk Splits Sky,"Ted Mancuso, Debbie Shayne"
First 100 Years of America's Stadium,Rose Bowl Legacy Foundation
Mystery Horse at Oak Lane Stable (e-Book),Kerri Lukasavitz
The Official N.F.L. Guide 1973,Zander Hollander
Offshore High,Herb McCormick
The Complete Handbook of Pro Football 1994,Zander Hollander
Madison Square Garden,Zander Hollander
Official John Wayne Handy Book of Bushcraft,"Billy Jensen, Richard Phipps, Editors of the Official John Wayne Magazine, Check Freedman, Moron Eel"
"The Groundhopper Guide to Soccer in England, 2021-22 Eidtion",Paul Gerald
"Groundhopper Guide to Soccer in England, 2021-22 Edition",Paul Gerald
"Groundhopper Guide to Soccer in England, 2019-20 Edition",Paul Gerald
Baseball America 2022 Directory,The Editors The Editors at Baseball America
Alessandra,Victor Barahona
How to Sail an Optimist Sailboat,"Øyvind Bordal, Magne Klann, Loretta Moerbe"
Art of Kicking JOURNAL,Eric Piccione
Ronnie and His Grit,"Leslie Harter, Jonathan Sundy"
"Groundhopper Guide to Soccer in England, 2020-21 Edition",Paul Gerald
Step by Step Guide,Kenyatta McKinney
Light at the Edge of the Field,Bill Meissner
All My Scuba Diving Shit,Alice Devon
My Roberto Clementa,Rick Hilles
Baseball Life Matters and the Team of the Ages,"Goodwin, Richard, Sr."
Deflympic Games and the Jews,Rafael Pinchas
The Complete Handbook of College Basketball 1979,Zander Hollander
The Complete Handbook of College Football 1978,Zander Hollander
"140 Great Hikes in and near Palm Springs, 25th Anniversary Edition",Philip Ferranti
We Like Sports,Pam Holden
NASCAR behind the Scenes,Mark Stewart
Economics of Competitive Sports,"Plácido Rodríguez, Stefan Késenne, Ruud Koning"
Scratched,Marie Long
Secrets to Goal-Setting,"Dan Zadra, Bob Moawad"
Pocket Full of Sports Memories,"Theresa Maiuri Dean, Rhonda Lucadamo, Terri Dew"
International Sporting Events and Human Rights,Zack Bowersox
Brutal,Ron Palenski
For the Record Classroom Collection,"Tyler Omoth, Anthony Wacholtz, Shane Frederick"
"A Good Place To Stop, 60 Seasons with Max and the Jayhawks",Max Falkenstien
And My Father Ws There,Noah McCaffrey
Max and the Jayhawks,Max Falkenstien
Meeting a Muay Boran Master,"Kev Scheepers, Evita Ramparte, Olesya Nabieva"
Eagles Soar When Warriors Rise,Monaco
Big Bat,"Eric Van Wyngarden, Brad Rolffs"
Positivity Tribe in the Locker Room,"Christopher Wirth, Fred Quartlebaum, Motivation Champs"
"Jesus, Michael & Mamba","John Teter, Michael Thomas"
Washington Golf,"Dan Raley, Tom Cade"
Trail to Gold,U.S. Olympic Women Cross-Country Skiers 1972-2018
Iced-Qa 2019,"Yulia Hendri Yeni, Handoko, Elizabeth Campbell-Dorning"
Over the Ropes Volume #1,"Jay Sandlin, Antonino Cosentino, Francesco Segala"
Isles of Scilly,"Graham Adam, Royal Cruising Club Pilotage Foundation, Imray"
Chwaraeon a hamdden =,Great Britain. Welsh Office.
"Rarajípari, la carrera de bola tarahumara",Fructuoso Irigoyen Rascón
Du bist wie dein Sport,Reinhard Stelter
FIELDHOUSE - 2nd Edition,"Scott Novosel, Sam Sharpe"
"Complete guide to football, basketball & hockey memorabilia",Mark K. Larson
Almanach du sport,Jean Durry
El contrato de esponsorización deportiva,Juan Antonio Landaberea Unzueta
Jurisprudencia deportiva,Juan Antonio Landaberea Unzueta
Next Stop Adventure,Matt Gauck
Outdoor Adventures,Julie Lundgren
Book of Wildly Spectacular Sports Science,Sean Connolly
"To Imogene, a Flagstaff Love Letter","Myles Schrag, Julie Hammonds"
Crazy Gang,Marc Wilkinson
Player Safety,Mango Media Staff
Spectacular Golf Arizona,LLC Panache Partners
Steroid Era,Mango Media Staff
"Grigor, the Competitive Tyrannosaur Who Roared and ROARED","Alanna Wohlrab, Phil Wohlrab"
Motocourse 2013-2014,"Michael Scott, Neil Spalding, Mat Oxley"
Cultural History of Sport,"Wray Vamplew, John McClelland, Mark Dyreson"
"Origin of Crystal Palace FC, Volume 2",Steve Martyniuk
Journey to the Ring,"Phil Jackson, Andrew Bernstein"
Autocourse 2013-2014,"Tony Dodgins, Mark Hughes, Maurice Hamilton"
Big Three,"Mango Media Staff, Associated Press Staff"
Steroid Era,"Mango Media Staff, Associated Press Staff"
World Cup,Mango Media Staff
Slow Car Fast,"Ryan K Zummallen, Sarah Bennett, Aaron Sanchez"
WWE Pop Quiz Trivia Deck,Eric Gargiulo
Wunderteam Österreich,Johann Skocek
Sportgrössen der Nation,Johann Skocek
De la belle aube au triste soir,"Montaignac, Christian."
Cheerleading,Holly Karapetkova
Video Technology in Refereeing,"Manuel Armenteros, Anto J. Benitez, Miguel Ángel Betancor"
Federal policy for hosting international sport events : policy tenets and assessment guide =,Sport Canada.
Sport Canada's policy on Aboriginal peoples' participation in sport,Sport Canada.
Federal policy for hosting international sport events,Sport Canada.
Politique de Sport Canada sur la participation des autochtones au sport,Sport Canada.
60 Tennisstrategien Und Mentale Taktiken,Joseph Correa
Bowl the Maidens Over,Louise Zedda-Sampson
"Origin of Crystal Palace FC, Volume 3",Steve Martyniuk
Sports and games,Walter Camp
Picturing America's Pastime,"National Baseball National Baseball Hall of Fame, Randy Johnson"
Athlete Activists,"Stephanie Ready, Morris Katz"
The book of sports and games,Walter Camp
Princess Golf Handbook,Bobbi Boldon
World Rallying 125 Years,"Santos, Francisco, Martin Holmes, Jose Barros Rodgrigues"
Other Side of the Fence,"Bill Warner, William Jeanes, Sam Posey"
The Obvious Isn't... in Baseball,Winston J Perez
Lights Out,Robert Anasi
Soccer,Holly Karapetkova
A brochure of high class sporting events in America,N.Y.) Biltmore (Hotel : New York
Sports Illustrated 1992 Sports Almanac,Sports Illustrated.
Actas Congreso Científico Olímpico 1992,"Congreso Científico Olímpico (1992 Málaga, Spain)"
Body Temple,Gene James
Rhyme & Rhythm,Sarah J. Donovan
New Orleans Saints Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
Pittsburgh Steelers Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
Olympic Courage,Sean Hutchison
New England Patriots Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
What Is Your Headgear?,Anna DiGilio
Hearts and Souls of Special Olympics,"Ruth Spinelli, Alean Skinner"
President of Pandemonium,Luke G. Williams
The Football Thesaurus 2e,Jesse Goldberg-Strassler
Bloody Knuckles and Broken Noses the Evolution of Martial Arts in America,Kent Mortimer
Swiss Winterland,Deborah L. Stevenson
My Homerun Life,E. J. Sitler
Burn,Ginger Scott
Akil the Buccaneer,Akil Coleman
Judging Hunters and Equitation WTF,"Julie Winkel, Tricia Booker"
Lean Lock,Brian Tennyson
How to Coach Basketball,G. H. Phipps
All-Stars Hockey,na
Ballparks Forever,Ira Rosen
Memories from the Mike,Baseball Hall of Fame
Worth Book of Softball,Paul Dickson
Reef Smart Guides North Florida,Ian Popple
Voodoo Ball,C. P. Mortensen
Basketball Books for Teen Boys,Callisto
Hail to the Victors 2021,"Seth Fisher, Mgoblog Inc"
Sport and the European Avant-Garde (1900-1945),"Andreas Kramer, Przemysław Strożek"
Phänomenologie und Sportpädagogik,Jörg Thiele
"Körpererfahrung, Bewegungserfahrung, leibliche Erfahrung",Jörg Thiele
Ultimate Guide to Squatting,Charles R. Poliquin
Cincinnati Bengals Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
Voices of the NHL,Elana Yavetz
Freddy Loves Sports,"Gary Thrapp, Tim Read"
Wild Card,Ashley Munoz
Fishing Chronicles Series,Lane Walker
Ballooning Life,"Carvalho, Joseph, 3rd"
This Is Don Jitsu Ryu - Book Two,Don Jacob
Shero's Dreamcatcher,Linda Mason
New York Jets Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
El contrato de trabajo deportivo,Hassel Aguilar Sosa
Uncommon and Unfinished,"Ben Troupe, B. J. Bennett"
Minnesota Vikings Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
One Splendid Season,Phil Rosenzweig
UTV Guide to Washington State 3rd Edition,Paul Sterley
My Baseball Season,Karleen Tauszik
Fly Rod Schoolmaster,Richard Landerman
Journey of a Winner,Valerie Daniels-Carter
Backcountry Skiing Bozeman and Big Sky,Ben Werner
Applied Strongman,"Charles Poliquin, Art McDermott, Kim Goss"
Tennessee Titans Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
Tri in Paradise (EPUB),Jerlyn Thomas
Denver Broncos Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
Mental Game,Derek Mueller
Wreck,Ginger Scott
Maroon & White,Harriet E. Michael
George Varnell,"Jeff Burlingame, John Hughes"
Revolution in the bleachers,Steve Moore
10 Essential Thoughts for Winners,J. Terry Johnson
Mercury,Margaret Goldstein
Life in the Slow Lane,Arthur E. Martin
30 Day Reset Journal,Priscilla Tallman
Goalies,Lynn M. Stone
Playmakers,Lynn Stone
Jeff Gordon AP,Jenna Fryer
Sportvereine im Übergang,Jürgen Baur
Great Men Die Twice,"Kram, Mark, Jr."
I Can Draw Sports,Tony Tallarico
Why American Soccer Isn't There Yet,Shane Stay
Penalty,Josh Massoud
So You Think You Know Baseball,The National Baseball Hall of Fame and Museum
Game Won,Steven Wagner
Lipstick Football Journal,Diana Weynand
Egg Shaped Ball,"Laura DiNovis Berry, YaYa Designs"
30 Day Return to Play Journal,Priscilla Tallman
Fantasy Football Winning Strategies,Jackson Michael
One of the First,"Ralph Stokes, Chris McKinney, Sylvester Croom"
Minnesota Duck Decoys,"Lodermeier, Doug, Sr., Johnson, Warren, Jr., Steven Knutson"
Minnesota Duck Calls,"Lodermeier, Doug, Sr., Johnson, Warren, Jr., Steven Knutson"
Kansas State Wildcat handbook,Tim Fitzgerald
Pro Football Sports Betting Tracker,Eric Pannell
Courageous Camila,"Giselle Carrillo, Naibe Reynoso, Maria Tuti"
Bargain Boats and Budget Cruising,Todd Duff
Jeff Gordon,"Jenna Fryer, Associated Press Staff"
Action Sports,Kelli Hicks
Red Raiders,Norval Pollard
Philadelphia Eagles Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
Player Safety,"Mango Media Staff, Associated Press Staff"
Cauliflower Chronicles,Marshal Carper
Big Three,Mango Media Staff
WWE Hardcover Ruled Journal,WWE
Miami Hurricanes,Barry Jackson
World Cup,Mango Media Staff
Egret's Plumes,"Archibald Rutledge, James A. Casada, Rivers,  Jacob F., III, Stephen Chesley"
"Ready, Set, Squash!","Sonya Sasson, Wael El Hindi, Elena Critelli"
Burgundian Poleaxe,Jason Smith
Baseball Hall of Fame,Brenda Knight
Grand Cayman,Ian Popple
Memories from the Microphone,"Curt Smith, Brooks Robinson"
My Softball Season,Karleen Tauszik
Student Preparation for Academic and Athletic Recruiting for College : SPAARC Your College Recruiting Pathway,James Romano
My Soccer Season,Karleen Tauszik
Akil and Jafari Vol. 3,Ayura Ayira
"We Appreciate Your Interest, However","Brenden Clarke, Aisha McAdams"
Akil and Jafari Vol 1,Ayura Ayira
Padel Pour les Débutants,Rusty Godson
Akil and Jafari Vol. 2,Ayura Ayira
Inspiration from Olympic Athletes for Students,Maryanna Young
Padel Für Anfänger,Rusty Godson
Pádel para Principiantes,Rusty Godson
Reef Smart Guides Northwest Florida : (Best Diving Spots in NW Florida),"Peter McDougall, Ian Popple, Otto Wagner"
60 Years of Shooting the NFL,Michael Zagaris
Akil and Jafari Vol.4,Ayura Ayira
Bringing the House Down,"Stefano Pelinga, Clinton Lechich, Marina Medvedeva, Paul Thomas Fuselier"
My Hockey Season,Karleen Tauszik
Robotic Golf,Larry Carpenter
Eli Dreams of New York,Stephen Hardin
Michael Visits the Dentist,Stephen Hardin
Temper Tom,Stephen Hardin
German Body Comp Program,"Kim Goss, Bowen Works, Christine Bettencourt, Reg Bradford"
Winning the Arms Race,"Nick Beldecos, Kim Goss, Harris, David, Milos Sarcev, Reg Bradford"
Home Sweet Dome,"Craig Sesker, Doug Newhoff"
So You Think You Know Baseball,National Baseball Hall of Fame
Miami Dolphins Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
"Go, Team!","Laura Baker, Siski Kalla"
Tampa Bay Buccaneers Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
Washington Football Team Word Search,Greater Heights Publishing
Choreography of the Masses,Gert Kähler
Get Set!,"Laura Baker, Siski Kalla"
SAVAGE Revolution,"Randy Sullivan, Frans Bosch"
When Hockey Stops,"Lee M. J. Elias, Christie Casciano Burns, Rose Mary Casciano Moziak"
Sport Technology,Stewart Ross
"Nikephoros Beihefte, Bd. 13",Wolfgang Decker
Le sport dans l'antiquité,Wolfgang Decker
Die physische Leistung Pharaos,Wolfgang Decker
Sport in der griechischen Antike,Wolfgang Decker
Character in Sports,Free Spirit Publishing
EU in International Sports Governance,Arnout Geeraert
Playtime Ball Sports,Anne Giulieri
Aspects du sport à la Réunion,Yves Chateaureynaud
Sport,
Sport development strategy,Alberta. Recreation Development Division
Sportives Dans Leur Genre ?,"Monica Aceti, Christophe Jaccoud"
Training Mission Two,"W. Hock Hochheim, Margaret Eden"
Breaking Out,Lise MacTague
Junior soccer,Frank Rowe
Les secrets de la réussite des champions,François Allaire
Classic after-dinner sports tales,Jo Rice
The world of sport examined,Paul Beashel
Sport et francophonie,Monique Pontault
The kid who missed the bus,Matt McCoy
Ti yu jing ji xue,Michael Leeds
"Datblygiadau ym myd chwaraeon, hamdden a thwristiaeth yn ystod yr 20fed ganrif",Philip Star
Getting off the ground,Sue Walker
On Wisconsin!,"Don Kopriva, Jim Mott, Dan Kopriva"
"Official rules of sports & games, 1995-96",Tony Pocock
Thrust,Rachel Spangler
The complete South African guide to sports nutrition,"Louise Burke, Shelly Meltzer, Justin Durandt, Nicola Scales"
Het zout van Afrika,Marc Broere
Physical activity for patients,"Archie Young, Mark Harries"
The Picador book of sportswriting,"Nick Coleman, Nick Hornby"
Great American sports heroes,"Peggy Anderson, Kyle Miller"
Guess what kind of ball,"Karen Evans, Kathleen Urmston"
Last Ride of the Iron Horse,Dan Joseph
Spectacular Sports : Playing Like a Girl,Monika Davies
Yankee Stadium,Alfred Santasiere
Yankee Stadium,Mark Vancil
BTEC first sport,Jonathan Sutherland
"A VOS MARQUE, PRETS, SANTE ! 5E EDITION",Richard CHEVALIER
Sportfolio Allsport,Allsport
The Tao of Yiquan,Jan Diepersloot
"Exercise, sports and health",Henry Schulz
Alex fait du sport,Hanne Türk
Extreme winning,Pat Williams
"Le maintien et le mouvement sexlatéral et proportionnel de l'homme sain des deux sexes et de tout âge en gymnastique, natation, patinage, escrime, promenade, jeux, cyclisme, canotage, équitation",J. Happel
Athletic sports and recreations for boys,John George Wood
"Essai sur l'équitation, considérée sous les rapports hygiénique, thérapeutique et pathologique",Louis Victor Napoléon Pitron
The official price guide to sports collectibles,Tom Hudgeons
A. Alekhine,"Pablo Morán, Frank X. Mur, Dale A. Brandreth"
The real story of a high school coach,Michael Miragliuolo
A question of sport quiz book,N/A
Study guide to accompany Mathews and Fox's The physiological basis of physical education and athletics,"David A. Cunningham, Donald H. Paterson"
Sports Illustrated Basketball's Greatest,The Editors of Sports Illustrated
"Dude Perfect 101 Tricks, Tips, and Cool Stuff",Dude Perfect
DC sports,"Chris Elzey, David Kenneth Wiggins"
Road to glory,"Tom Cheek, Howard Berger"
Football impetigo,Henry George Armstrong
Sportspeak,W. G. Coppell
El juego de pelota,Silvestre Lacoma Mirallas
Modern athletics,H. F. Wilkinson
"Constitution, by-laws, faculty rules and Ohio Conference rules governing the Athletic Association of the Ohio State University",Ohio State University
Le sport dans la Rome antique,Jean-Paul Thuillier
Enduring words for the athlete,Margaret Miller
"Professional and development issues in leisure, sport and education","Elizabeth Murdoch, Stanley Parker"
Täflan är lifvet,Leif Yttergren
Summer Olympic games,"Raymond C. Clark, Michael Jerald"
The Sunday Times chronicle of twentieth century sport,"Chris Nawrat, Steve Hutchings, Greg Struthers"
All about Gaelic football,"Tom Fitzpatrick, Jerry Grogan"
The management of athletics in public schools,"Fletcher, George Ed.D."
"The Groundhopper's Guide to Soccer in England, 2018-19 Season",Paul Gerald
TWO thousand questions and answers,ANON
Écoles! À l'action!,Alberta. Alberta Learning. Direction de l'éducation française
Hoi gymnastikoi agōnes tōn archaiōn Ellēnon ...,Antōnios Dēmētriou Keramopoullos
De Roland Garros à Marcel Cerdan,Emmanuel de Waresquiel
"Mickey Mantle, the American dream comes to life","Mickey Mantle, Lewis Early, Douglas A. MacKey"
The sportsman's dictionary,University of Glasgow. Library
Physiological aspects of sports and physical fitness,American College of Sports Medicine.
Leaper,"Charles Gaines, Monte Burke"
The Courage book of great sporting teams,"Chris Rhys, Bill Beaumont"
Sport business management,Lori K. Miller
Sales success in sports marketing: A step by step guide to sales success in the sports industry,Lori K. Miller
Sport,Émilie Beaumont
Incredible sports facts,Florence H. Munat
Les qualités physiques et l'entraînement,"Bouchard, Claude."
Les derniers de la classe,Max-Henri Boulois
Sovetska͡ia fizkulʹtura,A. A. Zikmund
Pearson Canada supplemental cases in marketing,Cindy Stewart
"Independent Carolina Baseball League, 1936-1938","R. G. Utley, Scott Verner"
No Way! Spectacular Sports Stories (Grade 7),Monika Davies
Game Maker,"Brian Hanni, Rob Petera"
Philosophy Sport and the Pandemic,"Jeffrey P. Fry, Andrew Edgar"
Senin Adamin Gol Diyo,Elif Congur
American Alpine Journal 2015,Dougald Macdonald
Corres como una niña [Próxima aparición],
Sport for sport,Spencer Harris
"Beaudy - Skills, Drills and the Path to the Top",Rikki Swannell
Sports Dates Book,Harvey Frommer
OCR Sport Examined,"Paul Sibson Beashel, Andy Sibson, Johnn Taylor"
"Skateboarding (Maurer, Tracy, Radsports Guides.)",Tracy Maurer
Herio!,Meinir Wyn Edwards
Sports roots,Harvey Frommer
Türk Sporunun Usta Mimari Atatürk,"Yasar Can Tümerdem, n/a"
Futbolun Baronlari,Cihan Oskay
BTEC National sport,"Richard Burley, Barry W. Ryan, Ernst Schute"
1835.6 Miles In a Marathon Runner's Shoes,Autumn Michelle
The Ultimate West Ham United Trivia Book,Ray Walker
The top 10 of everything in sports,Gary Gramling
Manuel du sportif blessé,"L. Peterson, P. Renström"
The measurement of cohesion in sport teams,"W. N. Widmeyer, Lawrence R. Brawley, Albert V. Carron"
The sporting life,"Davis, Susan E."
Spotlight on sports stars,Randal C. Hill
The ultimate guide to weight training for tennis,Robert G. Price
Galaxy,Tammy Gagne
New York City FC,Joanne Mattern
Sally Loves ... to Swim!,Jody Mackey
Tales from Oregon State sports,"Jeff Welsch, George P Edmonston"
Triathlete,Ascher Halden
"""Figuring"" modern sport",Eric Dunning
Sports laws,Diagram Group
Strength and conditioning for sport,Clive Brewer
A-Town Crowned - Atlanta Braves World Series Champions,KCI Sports Publishing
Youth sports leadership development manual,Capt. Rick Morgan
Sports ministry today,Elliot Johnson
Burguesia y gangsterismo en el deporte / Bourgeoisie and gangsterism in the sport,Dante Panzeri
Essays on Sport,Joseph Epstein
"Era, 1947-1957",Roger Kahn
Izmir Spor Tarihi,Collective
Tessin,"Iwona Eberle, Christoph Hurni"
Ticino,"Iwona Eberle, Christoph Hurni"
"Tessin : Lacs, Rivières et Cascades","Iwona Eberle, Christoph Hurni"
Routledge Handbook of Sport Fans and Fandom,"Danielle Sarver Coombs, Anne C. Osborne"
Triathlon,Bill Lund
Weightlifting (Extreme Sports),Bill Lund
Cy's Perfect Day,"Walters, John, Rob Peters"
Kansas City Chiefs ABCs And 1-2-3s,Rob Peters
Backyard games,Jack Kramer
History of American Sporting,Ralph Bandini
Fishing the Canadian Rockies,Joseph Ambrosi
Inside the game,Chris Cochrane
Documents and statutory supplement to Sports and the law,Paul C. Weiler
Sport e giuochi,Carlo Bascetta
Dokumentation sportwissenschaftlicher Forschungsprojekte (1976/77) in Europa,
Karnoprawne funkcje reguł sportowych,Andrzej J. Szwarc
Ögonblicket jag aldrig glömmer,Wilhelm Engdahl
Sport e società,
Elektroenzephalografie im Sport,Elena Borisovna Sologub
Psicología de la educación física y del deporte,P. A. Rudik
Kennzeichenschutz für Veranstaltungen,Mark Stefan Lerach
Vyāyāma jñānakośa,
Fanpost-Studie,
Anthropotechniken im Sport,Anthropotechniken im Sport (Conference) (2010 Technische Universität Darmstadt)
Who's who in sports in Malaysia and Singapore,Thomas R. P. Dawson
"Sport, culture et répression",
Urheilumme kasvot,
Sports & jeux de week-end,Jean Pierre Bousquet
Documentation of the first symposiums on sports organisation and management,"Killanin, Michael Morris Baron, Edward Wieczorek"
Sport--rekreacja--turystyka w spółdzielczości pracy,Zbigniew Drozdowski
Sport und Touristik in der Familie,"Hans Behnke, Edelfrid Buggel"
Erlebnis und Bewährung in der Gesellschaft für Sport und Technik,
Sportstatistik,"Eva Krause, Erika Schultz"
Lezioni di psicologia dello sport,Annamaria Meterangelis
Términos deportivos de origen extranjero,Edmundo Loza Olave
Calorieëntafels,Helmut Spitzer
Le sport en otage,Jean-François Bourg
L' argent fou du sport,Jean-François Bourg
"Tineretul, factor de schimbare",
"20 years of Czechoslovak physical training, 1945-1965",
It's a jungle out there,Ricky Nixon
Sport Inc.,"Edmond Warner, Anonymous"
Das Olympia-Sportbuch,
Revolusi keolahragaan melaksanakan amanat penderitaan rakjat Indonesia,Soekarno
Man and sport,
Membangun manusia Indonesia baru,
"La Situation de l'éducation physique, des sports et des loisirs, 1960 à 1970",Robert Bourassa
The Christian and sport,
Jeux et sports,Colette Becker
Metodología y análisis de la política pública,Eloy Altuve
Chosŏn ch'eyuksa,Sahoe Kwahak Ch'ulp'ansa
Aḥkām kurat al-qadam fī al-fiqh al-Islāmī,Mūsá ibn Ḥamzah ʻAlī ʻAsīrī
Sport en or,Renaud de Laborderie
The History of the San Antonio Spurs,
Normativnoe pravovoe obespechenie sfery fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta v Rossiĭskoĭ Federat︠s︡ii,Russia (Federation)
Strategii︠a︡ formirovanii︠a︡ zdorovogo obraza zhizni sredstvami fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i massovogo sporta,"Vserossiĭskai︠a︡ nauchno-prakticheskai︠a︡ konferent︠s︡ii︠a︡ ""Strategii︠a︡ formirovanii︠a︡ zdorovogo obraza zhizni sredstvami fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i massovogo sporta, opyt, perspektivy razvitii︠a︡"" (2011 Ti︠u︡menʹ, Russia)"
Selected problems in sports safety,
Participation and excellence,City of Dublin Vocational Education Committee. Sports and Cultural Council
Urheiluvuosi '73 - HBL:s idrottsbok '73,
Olympische Spiele,"Rainer Kirsch, Manfred Wolter"
Sport in the USSR,
Beiträge zur Sportpsychologie,
Sports in China,Ren min ti yu chu ban she
Il Traguardo intermedio,"Bruno De Marchi, Gianni Brera"
"You yi di yi, bi sai di er",Guanhua Shi
Faszination Sport,Horst Schubert
Sportul în aforisme,
Zîmbete la umbră,"Giuseppe Navarra, George Zarafu"
Športové hry,
Psychomotorik und sportliche Leistung,"Karl Feige, Hermann Rieder, Erwin Hahn"
Sport in der Bundeswehr,
Körperkultur und Sport,
Dang dai Zhongguo ti yu she hui fen ceng li lun yan jiu,Hong Zhang
Sport in unserem Leben,Dieter Wrobel
The Lincoln library of sports champions,Art Berke
God sportivnyĭ,Aleksandr Alekseevich Dobrov
Sport in der Weiterbildung,
Sport et société,Jean Marie Brohm
Ri Han ti yu ci hui,
Concepts of physical education and sport sciences,Uriel Simri
Let's discover sport and entertainment,
Rules for coeducational activities and sports,
"The Humanistic and mental health aspects of sports, exercise, and recreation",
Hinter der weissen Linie,
Brooklyn's Sportsmen's Row,Lucas Rubin
Basque pelota,Olatz González  Abrisketa
The challenge,Reinhold Messner
"The Senior Olympics, preventive medicine with findings pertaining to health and longevity",C. Antonio Provost
Het feest van list en bedrog,Herman Chevrolet
Toward an understanding of human performance,"Burke, Edmund J."
Safety in individual and dual sports,Chauncey A. Morehouse
Administration and supervision for safety in sports,Chauncey A. Morehouse
Safety in team sports,Chauncey A. Morehouse
Relevant topics in athletic training,"Burke, Edmund J."
Min zu chuan tong ti yu wen hua xin lun,Jian Liu
Tax information on sponsors of contests and sporting events,United States. Internal Revenue Service.
Yunnan shao shu min zu chuan tong ti yu,Yuncong Guo
Volkssporten en kinderspelen in Vlaanderen,Marc Laenen
Pistes pour le sport,Archives départementales du Val-de-Marne.
Sport v SSM,
A la découverte du sport,
Sozialisation durch Sport,"Evangelische Akademie (Tutzing, Germany)"
Memorandum für den Aufbau der Nationalen Sporthochschule in Teheran (Iran) ; von L. Diem ... [et al.].,Liselott Diem
Der Sportfunktionär,Wolfgang Edler
III Conferência Nacional do Esporte,"Conferência Nacional do Esporte (3rd 2010 Brasília, Distrito Federal, Brazil)"
Sport und Leibeserziehung zwischen Spätkapitalismus und Frühsozialismus,Josef N. Schmitz
Every boy's book,Edmund Routledge
"Abstracts, III",
"PON VIII, Jakarta '73",
Lo Sport nella storia e nell'arte,Roberto Vighi
Irish-American Athletic Club of New York,Patrick R. Redmond
Sports safety,Charles Peter Yost
Uluslararası Spor Tahkim Mahkemesi C.A.S.,Kısmet Erkiner
"Sporun sosyolojisi, sosyolojinin sporu",Ahmet Talimciler
Physical education and sports in the Socialist Republic of Romania,
Analyse économique du sport,Jean-François Bourg
Das Kleine Buch vom Sport,
Biomechanics of sport,Thomas P. Martin
Sport et développement social au XXe siècle,
Sport,
"Tūrpu Gōdāvari Jillā, jānapada āṭalu",En̲ Paktavaccala Reṭṭi
Fiziologia și biochimia educației fizice și sportului,
Clasificația sportivă unică a Republicii Moldova,Ion Cebanu
"Klimmzüge, Abgänge und Aufschwünge",Felix Weber
Bob Breitbard,Dan Fulop
Instant replay,Jimmy Tomlin
Physical education and sport in the Jewish history and culture,Uriel Simri
Le Sport en France,
Sport versus art,Christopher Thurman
The indigenous games of the people of the coastal region of Kenya,Mwangi Peter Wanderi
Reflections,Syed Khalid Mahmood
Physical education and sports in Finland,Joel Juppi
"Sport, v kotorom my zhivem",S. Tokarev
Urheilutieto,
Leggere lo sport,Francesca Petrocchi D'Auria
International compilation of sports historical documents,"G. Wonneberger, K. Liebold"
Du movement navétane,Ismaïla Mbengue Fall
Tranches de culture de Senghor à Wade,Mame Birame Diouf
Kamus lengkap olah raga,
Con el deporte no se juega,Caloi.
A companion to sport,"Andrews, David L., Ben Carrington"
Africa's World Cup,"Peter Alegi, Chris Bolsmann"
Health's highway,R. J. Mecredy
"A picture of the manners, customs, sports, and pastimes, of the inhabitants of England, from the arrival of the Anglo-Saxons down to the eighteenth century. Selected from the ancient chronicles. And rendered into modern phraseology",Jehoshaphat Aspin
Crossing the High Divide,Sallie Varner
Acquisition and Perfortmance of Sports Skills,Terry McMorris
The Cultural Turn in Sport Psychology,Robert J. Schinke
Sporting Gender Women Athletes And Celebritymaking During Chinas National Crisis 193145,Yunxiang Gao
Minnesota Sports Trivia,Joel Rippel
The pedestrian's record,J. Irvine Lupton
Lets Go Bows,Melody Toth
United States of America Today Sports Atlas,H.M. Gousha (Firm)
Homo sportivus,Philippe Simonnot
Talk Sports like a Pro,Jean M. McCormick
Sport and society in modern France,Richard Holt
"Discussion et responsabilité / Karl-Otto Apel ; traduit de l'allemand par Christian Bouchindhomme, Marianne Charrière et Rainer Rochlitz",Karl-Otto Apel
Biking (Recreational Sports),Paul Mason
Mathematics in sport,Dave Kirkby
"Philosophy and the Science of Exercise, Health and Sport",Mike Mcnamee
Giant Book of Sports,M. Davis
Sports and recreation,David Ritchie
Pray Ball! The Spiritual Insights of a Jewish Sports Fan,James Gordon
Sport in New Zealand Society,Chris Collins
Sport und Industriegesellschaft,"Krockow, Christian Graf von"
Bases Loaded II,"F. X. Nine, A. L. Singer"
Consumer Guide to Tennis Equipment,Consumer Guide editors
Invisible Sports Magic Picture Book,Steven James Petruccio
I Love Sports,Steven James Petruccio
Body & Soul,Loic Wacquant
Europe at play,Lebert Howard Weir
"Major League Champions, 1871-2001 (American Sports History, 22)",Thomas W. Brucato
Sport in Numbers,Keith Smith
Biorhythm Sports Forecasting,Bernard Gittleson
"Sport, Culture and History",Stoddart
The Best St. Louis Sports Arguments (Best Sports Arguments),Bryan Burwell
The Soccer Machine,David Bedford
Oppikoululaisten fyysinen aktiivisuus ja liikuntaharrastukset IV,Risto Telama
"The ""Sunday Times"" Sporting Century",Alan English
Sunday Times Great Sporting Moment,Alan English
"Johnny Bright, Champion","Warrick Lee, M.D. Barrett"
Sport assignments,Paul Beashel
San Francisco Giants,Brian Murphy
Science and Football III,T. Reilly
Sports Performance,Southmayd
Jock Jokes,Pat Williams
True Sports Stories (True Stories S.),Tim Lardner
Science in Elite Sport,F. Ludescher
Recreation and the law,Stephen Bird
Sport and society,Graham Scambler
N.F.L. Report 1985,N.F.L. Properties
Super Sports Stars 1999,Richard Brenner
N.F.L. Report 1990 (N F L Team Report),N.F.L. Properties
N.F.L. Report 1989,N.F.L. Properties
N.F.L. Teambook 1986,N.F.L. Properties
Scholastic Visual Sports Encyclopedia,Mary Varilla
Mir narodnogo sporta,M. T. Tanikeev
Ot baĭgi do Olimpiady,M. T. Tanikeev
The Story of the Toronto Blue Jays,Michael Teitelbaum
Exercise Prescription - The Physiological Foundations,Kate Woolf-May
Amateur Sports Act of 1978,"United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportaion."
"Catalogue of books on angling, shooting, field sports, natural history, the dog, gun, horse, racing and kindred subjects",George B. Raymond
Kaimo sporto Kelias,Juozas Klimas
Sulphurous acid and sulphites as food preservatives,C. E. Calm
Popular amusements for in and out of doors,Nelle M. Mustain
Sporting spectacle,"Fawcett, William."
Before I forget,Henry Rose
L'e ́ducation physique à l'école secondaire ..,Amaury Robert Théard
Longenscheidts Sprachführer für den Sportsmann,Wolfgang Otto Frohberg
"Sporting and colored plate books illustrated by Alken, Rowlandson, Leech, the Cruikshanks, & others",George Campbell Smith
A sportsman of limited income,John A. Bridges
The H book of Harvard athletics 1852-1922,John Adams Blanchard
"Training, conditioning and the care of injuries",Walter E. Meanwell
Os Jogos Populares,"Cabral, Antonio"
"Memoirs of Sir Claude Champion de Crespigny, bart","Champion de Crespigny, Claude Sir, bart."
Manipulative treatment of athletic injuries to joints,"St. Clair, Floyd P."
"Martha Doyle, and other sporting memories",Richard E. Danielson
Sport attitudes and practices of representative Americans before 1870,Louise Jordan Walmsley
French sports neologisms ..,Armstead Otey Grubb
U.S. sports rule book,"Crewdson and Custer, publishers, Chicago."
"Sport, physical training and womanhood",Stephan Kurt Westmann
My fifty years of sport,Charles Fennelly Van der Byl
Anthology of sporting verse,Edward Bolland Osborn
I leap before I look,David Haig-Thomas
"""Newcomb"" ..",Clara G. Baer
Brennpunkte des deutschen Sports,Cigarettenfabrik Muratti.
"Fair play und der ""englische Sportgeist""",Hans Indorf
"Official languages in the Canadian sports system / project co-ordinator, Mary Lee Bragg",Canada. Office of the Commissioner of Official Languages.
Régimen electoral de las federaciones deportivas andaluzas,Antonio Millán Garrido
Keep fit and like it,Dudley B. Reed
Visual aids for teaching sports,Therese Powdermaker
Full tilt,Foxhall Keene
Balancing the box-score and other comments on accuracy in reporting of sports events,"Dill, William Adelbert."
Der Weg voran!,Hans Praesent
Mallet & hounds,Addison Geery Smith
A dynamic analysis of the standing vertical jump,Paul Herbert Gerrish
"Scarlet, blue and green",Duncan Fife
... Sporting books,"Gee, Ernest R., bookseller, New York."
The ring tournament in the United States,Esther J. Crooks
"The Country club, 1882-1932",Frederic Haines Curtiss
The Boy scouts book of outdoor hobbies,Franklin K. Mathiews
"Fun and work for future farmers, F.F.A",L. L. Scranton
Leaves from my unwritten diary,"Preston, Harry John Sir"
The book of major sports,"Hughes, William Leonard"
The cross-cultural analysis of sport and games,"Bianchi, Nicomede"
Deck sports,Marcus Hansen Feddersen
The recreation manual,Virgil Kenneth Brown
Der aberglaube im sport,K. Wehrhan
Catalogue of the library of the late John Gerard Heckscher ..,John Gerard Heckscher
Forty two years on the tiger gridiron,Herbert Warren Taylor
"Le Sport, faut-il des surhommes?",Hubert Lucot
Recreation manual and suggestions for recreation programs,Indiana. Governor's Commission on Unemployment Relief.
Der sieg,Günter Mamlok
Encyclopedia of sport thrills,Jack C. Dawson
The greatest sports stories never told,Bruce M. Nash
Champions against odds,Al J. Stump
Sport in Zahlen,Walter Radunski
The Lonsdale anthology of sporting prose & verse,"Parker, Eric"
Jerry Dalrymple and His Tulane 1931 Green Wave National Champions,John Kent Boyd
"Plaza y la marathon. por A. Acevedo Hernandez y Juan Galvez Rivas: historia completa de la marathon en Chile con datos desde los araucanos y especialmente de Manuel Plaza, con numerosas fotografías","Acevedo Hernández, Antonio"
La delincuencia en el deporte,Carlos Broudeur
The Black Knights of West Point,James Stewart Edson
The spectators guide,Maurice James Griffin
Fitness and injury in sport,Simon Sidney Knight
El delito deportivo ante el sistema jurídico-penal guatemalteco,Héctor Paredes Luna
A Maxton book about sports,Lawrence T. Dresser
Sport und Record,Maria Kloeren
Die Sportverletzung im schweizerischen Strafrecht,Albert Brunner
Chempiony Evropy,Gavriil V. Korobkov
My lifetime in sports,"Barton, George A."
The sportsman's calendar,"Lawrence, John"
Recreation for girls and women,Ethel Bowers
Great moments in Stanford sports,Pete Grothe
Dansk idræt gennem 50 aar,Dansk idræts-forbund.
Das Bilderbuch des Skiläufers,Arnold Fanck
The wonders of ski-ing,Arnold Fanck
Wunder des Schneeschuhs,Arnold Fanck
"""Going back""","Murray, Archibald Gordon Jr."
Sport,"Delgado, José María"
57 years on Pittsburgh gridirons,Raymond A. Byrne
Sports riddles,Joseph Rosenbloom
Athletic injuries and their treatment,O. L. Clough
A sportsman's miscellany,"Sowerby, Arthur de Carle"
The world's best sports riddles and jokes,Joseph Rosenbloom
The sports of colonial Williamsburg,William Clinton Ewing
The National ski patrol system manual,National Ski Association of America. National Ski Patrol System.
English sport,Alfred Edward Thomas Watson
The year's sport,Alfred Edward Thomas Watson
A sporting and dramatic career,Alfred Edward Thomas Watson
The book of sport,"Patten, William"
Athletics at Dartmouth,Horace Gibson Pender
"Leaves, from the records of St. Hubert's Club",George Ernest Bulger
Books on summer sports and pastimes,Chicago Public Library
Sport and Leisure in Victorian Scotland,George Washington Wilson
The evolution of sports and the cultural implications of physical education,Ramy B. Deschner
Do sports not drugs,Lawrence J. Pugliese
Men of mark in the world of sport in New Zealand,Joseph Chadwick
Play the game,Mitchell Vaughan Charnley
L' innovation sportive,Dieter Hillairet
"De ludis privatis, ac domesticis veterum liber unicus ..",Jules César Boulenger
The sportswoman's library,Frances E. Slaughter
Sporting reminiscences,Thomas Haydon
The English in the Middle Ages,James Frederick Hodgetts
All Sports Puzzle and Quiz Book,George Sullivan
Student Study Guide To Accompany Nutrition For Fitness And Sport (Nutrition and Sport),WILLIAMS
Ready-to-use outdoor recreations spot illustrations,David Carlson
Undo seirigaku,Yutaka Tochihara
Bibliographie sportive,"Contades, Gérard de comte"
Norsk idrett,Bernard Enjolras
Der sport im altertum,Bruno Schröder
A wayfarer's log,"Alexander, Alexander"
Hiking Virginia,Randy Johnson
Athletic scholarships,Andy Clark
A Sporting Double,Dept.of Education & Science
The sportsman in Canada,Frederic Tolfrey
Brady Brady and the B Team (Brady Brady),Mary Shaw
The Baseball Hall of Fame,Bert Randolph Sugar
Exercices corporels,Aloïs Landtwing
Fiche d'activité de la Direction de la jeunesse et des sports,Mayotte. Direction jeunesse et sports.
"Memoirs of Sir Claude Champion de Crespigny, bart","Champion de Crespigny, Claude Sir, Bart."
A wayfarer's log,"Alexander, Alexander"
The boy's book of sports and games,Uncle John pseud.
Athletic leaders of CMU,Heather A. Fuller
Guyanese masters of sport,Mike Baptiste
"Colburn's kalendar of amusements in town and country, for 1840",Henry Colburn
"The sportsman's library; or, Hints on the hunter--hunting--hounds--shooting--game--sporting--dogs--fishing--&c., &c","Mills, John novelist."
Sport et philosophie,Yves Vargas
Preparing for sporting success at the London 2012 Olympic and Paralympic Games and beyond,National Audit Office
The gentlemans recreation,Richard Blome
Handbook of athletic sports,Ernest Bell
50 jaar nationaal sportbeleid,Dolf Pouw
"Inquiry, BBC radio, autumn 1972",British Broadcasting Corporation
Idstone papers,"Pearce, Thomas Rev."
Leistungssteigerung durch Hypnose und autogenes Training im Sport,"Frank, Rainer"
Psychologische Untersuchungen über die Verfassung von Zuschauern bei Fussballspielen,Oda Dombrowski
"Dritte Europäische Sportjugendleiter-Konferenz, 22-25 April 1974, Nationaal Sport Centrum Papendal, Arnhem =","European Conference of Sports Youth Leaders Arnhem, Netherlands 1974."
Kampen om gullet,Victor Johansen
Spiel und Sport der Indianer in Nordamerika,Basel. Schweizerisches Turn- und Sportmuseum.
Sport und prozessunabhängige Qualifikationsmerkmale,Siegfried Meyer
Sport und Arbeitsteilung,Karin Rittner
Recreation and athletics at Johns Hopkins,George Wilson Shaffer
Inns of sport,James Wentworth Day
King George V as a sportsman,James Wentworth Day
The Caledonian games in nineteenth-century America,Gerald Redmond
DJ,Derek Johnstone
The development of sport in Western Australia,Investigating Committee into the Development of Sport in Western Australia.
Mentale conditie in de sport,Delphine van Ordorp-Ariëns Kappers
Russko-angliĭskiĭ slovarʹ-razgovornik =,Aleksandr Vsevolodovich Gavrilovet͡s
Los perdedores,Vicente Leñero
Zvezdnyĭ chas chempionov,I͡Uriĭ Aleksandrovich Darakhvelidze
The TSD athletic almanac,E. Conley Akin
Elementy filozofii i teologii sportu,Stanisław Kowalczyk
Trim's arena,Hal Trim
The winning edge,National Sports Psychology Conference Buffalo 1973.
A report on sports and recreation in New Brunswick,New Brunswick. Dept. of Youth.
Nestor Kraly's Amazing sports records & other oddities,Nestor Kraly
Educazione fisica e sport nel Rinascimento italiano,Marisa Marcelli
Deutscher Sport 1952-1972,Willi Daume
Histoires d'un siècle de sport,Guy Benamou
Come walk with me,Ralph Hubbell
Technique du sport,Jean Antoine Dauven
Technique des sports,Jean Antoine Dauven
Best Sports Stories 1982,Irving T. Marsh
Best Sports Stories 1979,Irving T. Marsh
Best Sports Stories 1983,Irving T. Marsh
Jugend und Freizeit-Sport,Hans-Gert Artus
Sport e record ..,Elios Alfredo Ferraresso
Union catalogue of periodicals,Physical Education Association of Great Britain and Northern Ireland.
Here's how in sports,Erwin G. Morrison
Leis do sistema desportivo,Portugal.
That's the way the ball bounces,Gene Elston
"Theses and dissertations related to comparative/international education, physical education, sport, and dance",Myrtis E. Herndon
Grand slam,Robert Clinton Richardson
Cricket in the writings of James Joyce,Geoffrey Keane Whitelock
L' acte tactique en jeu,Friedrich Mahlo
The shaping of western society,John M. Good
The pictorial encyclopedia of sports,Frank G. Menke
Sport tales and anecdotes,Frank G. Menke
The new encyclopedia of sports,Frank G. Menke
Biomechanik in der Sportpraxis,Hans Söll
Angst im Sport,Marion Boisen
Actes du 7e symposium canadien en apprentissage psycho-moteur et psychologie du sport,Canadian Psycho-Motor Learning and Sport Psychology Symposium Université Laval 1975.
Africa and the Olympic games =,Ernst Naumann
A directory through the African sport,Ernst Naumann
Yorkshire East Riding,J. Fairfax-Blakeborough
African sports,Ernst Naumann
Sports,Library of Congress. Division for the Blind and Physically Handicapped.
A sportszociológia néhány kérdése,"Schiller, János."
De sociale determinanten van het sportgedrag bij de jeugd,M. Marivoet
Problemen in de jeugdsport,M. Marivoet
Sportul arădean,Gheorghe Nicolăiță
Regeln und Sprache des Sports,Rainer Wehlen
Wortschatz und Regeln des Sports,Rainer Wehlen
"Sportmedizin, Arbeits- und Trainingsgrundlagen",Wildor Hollmann
Sportovní anekdoty,Anna Reinišová
Pointers on athletics,Red Reeder
Sports lexicon,K. V. Panikker
Research on man in motion,K. Venkateswarlu
British proceedings of sports psychology,British Society of Sports Psychology. Conference
A dictionary catalogue of the library of sports in the Racquet and Tennis Club,"Racquet and Tennis Club, New York. Library."
Some games of Asia,M. L. Grimberg
"Report of the Lagos State Sports Advisory Committee on the reorganisation of sports at all levels in Lagos State, submitted to the Lagos State Commissioner for Education & Community Development","Lagos State, Nigeria. Sports Advisory Committee."
Heilsport in der Orthopädie,Gerhard Lekszas
Say it ain't so!,Mac Davis
Applying Psychology To Sport (Applying Psychology To...),Barbara Woods
The giant book of sports,Mac Davis
Olahraga Indonesia,Sorip Harahap
Proceedings of the Pre-Olympic Seminar on the History of Physical Education and Sport in Asia,"Pre-Olympic Seminar on the History of Physical Education and Sport in Asia Netanya, Israel 1972."
Idrott som social aktivitet,Ingvar Kinnrell
Lineamenti di storia dell'educazione fisica e dello sport,Maurizio Pepe
Le sport,Jean Antoine Dauven
O livro negro do penalty,Otelo Caçador
Champions all; 12 stories of famous sports heroes,Ken Lane
Selected guide to sports and recreation books,Susan Nueckel
Olympic games and India,"Sanyal, Saradindu"
Punjab sports and who's who,M. L. Kapur
"Európa bajnokság, 1966",Zoltán Subert
Sozialisation im Sport,"Kongress für Leibeserziehung (6th 1973 Oldenburg, Germany)"
Sports & games the Indians gave us,Alex Whitney
Körperschönheit und körperkultur,Hans Waldemar Fischer
Ne prosto sport,Robert Rozhdestvenskiĭ
"Public opportunities and facilities for leisure time recreation, amusement and instruction in American cities",Chicago (Ill.). Municipal Reference Library.
Giant book of sports,Samuel Nisenson
A magyar sportnyelv története és jelene,Zoltán Bánhidi
Historia del deporte asturiano,Melchor Fernández Díaz
L' économie du sport en France,Chantal Malenfant-Dauriac
Coaching van topsportteams,J. M. Janbroers
Sports in the Nation's Capital,"Ainsworth, Robert G."
The rôle of physical education and sport in the education of youth,"International Conference of Ministers and Senior Officials Responsible for Physical Education and Sport (1st 1976 Paris, France)"
Spartan saga,Lyman L. Frimodig
Sports books for children,Barbara K. Harrah
75 Jahre Hannoverscher Sportverein von 1896 e.V,Hannoverscher Sportverein von 1896.
Rivivere nei ricordi,Ciro Chiarini
Sport in Wien,Kurt Jeschko
Sotavammaisurheilu 1945-1975,Veikko Laiho
Las grandes hazañas del deporte,Alejandro Martí
Great moments in sports,Jane Duden
"Eficacitatea practicării exercițiilor fizice, turismului și sportului de masă",Efrem Cherteș
Burned to life,Mel Kenyon
Diagnóstico de educação física : desportos no Brasil / [Fename],Fundação Nacional de Material Escolar (Brazil)
Putʹ k garmonii,Valentin Efimovich Li͡ashenko
The great American spectaculars,Jack Barry Ludwig
Games of fear and winning,Jack Barry Ludwig
The makings of an Olympic champion,"Wright, Russell"
Encyclopedia of sport,Graham Pearson
Training,Harold Mellerowicz
Coaching competitive team sports for girls and women,Hally Beth Poindexter
Chaud business,Charley Michaelis
Complete guide to prevention and treatment of athletic injuries,"Brown, B. J."
Medizinisch-psychologische Probleme der Wettkampfvorbereitung,Manfred Steinbach
The Finnish top-level athlete of 1971,Simo Mäkelä
Sport im Aufgabenfeld der Kirche,Franz Enz
"Riot, revelry, and rout","Burnett, John"
Sport psychology,"Cox, Richard H."
It was like this,Harold V. Ratliff
Motivation im Sport,"Kongress für Leibeserziehung (5th 1970 Münster in Westfalen, Germany)"
Great men and moments in sports,"Esquire, inc."
"Dragging, Driving & Basic Customizing",Tom MacPherson
West of Broadway,Joe Diehl
A guide to judo throwing technique,Takumi Ōhashi
Idrett og fritid,Ørnulf Hodne
Eckersall of Chicago,James Andrew Peterson
Sport international,"Harvey, Charles"
"Go, Indians!",Moss Hall
Sport and health,International Conference on Sport and Health Oslo 1952.
Dictionnaire des sports,Édouard Seidler
Den store idrettsordboka,Olav Hem
Igre na tromeđi,Siniša Nestorović
Dichter deuten den Sport,Karl Schwarz
Amateur Sports Act,"United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation. Subcommittee on Consumer Affairs, Foreign Commerce, and Tourism"
The prevent-system for football injuries,J. V. Cerney
Report of the Task Force on Sports for Canadians =,Canada. Task Force on Sports for Canadians.
"No ifs, no ands, a lot of Butts",Ed Thilenius
Lifetime sports,Walter Lewis Cook
Sports stamps,Carl-Olof Enhagen
All-Time Greatest Alabama Sports Stories (Fire Ant),Benny Marshall
Aspects médico-légaux de la médicine du sport [par] Jean Vacher ... avec la collaboration de Henri Périe ... Jean-Michel Fourré ... Préface de M. Crespin ..,Jean Vacher
Sports in Hungary,József Vető
"History of athletics at Maryville College, 1866-1968",Ken D. Kribbs
Action!,Albert L. Lavin
A history of relations between the National Collegiate Athletic Association and the Amateur Athletic Union of the United States (1905-1963),Arnold William Flath
Das Ruhe- und Belastungs-EKG bei Sportlern,Lev Alekseevich Butchenko
Oxford Reading Tree: Stage 10: TreeTops Non-fiction,David Clayton
Secretos de campeones,"Miller, William H."
Die Zukunft des Sports,Horst W. Opaschowski
The Tibo Committee report on Ghana sports,Ghana. Tibo Committee.
Ėto budet na Spartakiade,Aleksandr Abramovich Svetov
Funny thing about sports,"Russell, Fred"
I'll go quietly,"Russell, Fred"
I'll try anything twice,"Russell, Fred"
Tom Harmon's book of sports information,"Thomas Dudley Harmon, Tom Harmon"
Sports et jeux d'adresse,Henry René d' Allemagne
"Liability for accidents in physical education, athletics, recreation",Howard Clinton Leibee
Amerikanskiĭ sport na sluzhbe reakt͡s︡ii,A. Kuleshov
Sport and leisure,International Council of Sport and Physical Education. Working Party: Sport and Leisure.
Literaturverzeichnis Freizeitsport,Horst W. Opaschowski
Neue Trends im Freizeitsport,Horst W. Opaschowski
Introduction au sport,Michel Clare
Fifty-two years of sport,Ernest A. Bland
Fifty years of sport,Ernest A. Bland
Pirmoji Lietuvos tautinė olimpijada,Lietuvos tautinė olimpijada (1st 1938 Kaunas)
Mark of the oarsman ..,Malcolm R. Alama
A diplomat off duty,"Lindley, Francis Sir"
Famous American athletes of today,Harold Kaese
"Your health, today and tomorrow",James S. Nicoll
Örök ifjúság,Ferenc Mező
"Please sir, Iv̓e broken my arm",Alexander Steel Graham
Sports and mental health,"Moore, Robert A."
The home owner's complete outdoor handbook,Emanuele Stieri
Highlights of Soviet sport,Aleksandr Alekseevich Dobrov
Youth and the sports,Li͡uben Bozhev
Sportgeschichte aus erster Hand,Hilde Barisch
A royal salute,Brinley E. Matthews
The world of sport,Robert Erskine Shaw Chalmers
El deporte en Venezuela,Foro El Deporte en Venezuela (1965 ? Universidad Central de Venezuela)
Proceedings,"National Conference on Olympic Development Washington, D.C. 1966."
Mascot Mike of Notre Dame,Leila Brechenser Rostiser
Lima y el toreo,Antonio G. Garland
Red Top,Robert Frederick Herrick
Handbook of physical activities for men,Ramon W. Kireilis
Off and running,Bill Corum
Notre Dame football,James Caleb Beach
Guide for a vigorous voluntary sports program for ship and station,United States. Bureau of Naval Personnel. Special Services Division.
Sport in peace and war,Anthony Buxton
A selected annotated sports bibliography for secondary school students,Diana Lunn Cohen
Almost yesterday,Trevor Wignall
Missouri power football,"Devine,Dan."
Guide des sports,H Brahic
El deporte en el Siglo de Oro,José Hesse
Fizkulʹtura i sport v Gruzii,Mikhail Anfimovich Gorgadze
"Olympia, ein Vermächtnis der Griechen an die Nachwelt",Hermann Popp
Nieuwe wegen in de topsport,D. H. Grunwald
Hail West Virginians!,Kent Kessler
Sportinių terminų žodynas,Lietuvos Valstybinis kūno kultūros institutas.
Athletic injuries,Lynn O. Litton
Sports quiz,Lyle Brown
"Soviet sport, mirror of Soviet society",Henry W. Morton
Pʻizikuri kultura da sporti Sakʻartʻveloši Okʻtombris socʻialisturi revolucʻiis 40 clistʻavze,Mikhail Anfimovich Gorgadze
How to be a better athlete,Lindle Jarvis
Die Grenzen der menschlichen Leistungsfähigkeit im Sport,Adolf Henning Frucht
Professionalizm v sovetskom sporte,Sigizmund I͡Ulianovich Volk
Contemporary psychology of sport,"International Congress of Sport Psychology Washington, D.C. 1968."
Ringside seat at the circus,Larry Merchant
Attitudes toward physical activity as a function of religious affiliation,Donna Leonard
Supergoal,Billy Zeoli
Répertoire alphabétique de périodiques courants en kinanthropologie,Roch Meynard
"Jeunesse, sports, loisirs","France. Secrétariat d'Etat à la jeunesse, aux sports et aux loisirs."
"Physical performance, fitness, and diet",Donald R. Young
Vivir del deporte,Alfonso López Barrenquy
Trends in sports participation fact sheet,Sports Council (Great Britain)
Sports for all,Sports Council (Great Britain)
"Sign 'em up, Bucky",Bucky Woy
What happens to former athletes?,Henry J. Montoye
"Remarks by the honourable William G. Davis, Premier of Ontario, MacDonald Block, Queen's Park, Wednesday, December 6, 1972",William G. Davis
Einführung in die Sportpädagogik,Heinz Meusel
Los sport nella Grecia antica,Roberto Patrucco
ABC's wide world of sports quiz book,Larry Bortstein
Principalele momente ale activității de educație fizică și sport din județul Prahova intre anii 1835-1944,Ștefan Stuparu
"The best of Sport, 1946-1971",Al Silverman
Sports in Nepal,Shyam Bahadur K. C.
Methoden und Mittel zur psychischen Vorbereitung des Sportlers,Ema Geron
Doping als unlauterer Wettbewerb und Spielbetrug,"Faber, Alexander"
Sinners at the stadium,William Robert Fenton
"Public relations, promotions, and fund-raising for athletic and physical education programs",Robert T. Bronzan
Idrottens fysiologi,Rune Hedman
Sport et latéralité,Guy Azémar
Organizzazione e conduzione di società dilettantistiche,Federazione italiana giuoco calcio. Comitato regionale toscano.
Deporte y sociedad,Antonio Franco Estadella
Sportpolitik und Sportcurriculum,Willibald Weichert
Freizeit und Erwachsenensport,Dieter H. Jütting
Beanspruchung im Sport,Jürgen R. Nitsch
Weight training in athletics and physical education,Gene Hooks
"Youth, sports, recreation",People's Association.
Annals of American sport,John Allen Krout
The athletic director's handbook,Charles E. Forsythe
Fact sheet,Sports Council (Great Britain)
Physical fitness and its laboratory assessment,Conference on Laboratory Assessment of Physical Fitness Charles University 1968.
The great and the near great,Abe Goldblatt
Games for small lawns,Sid G. Hedges
Superstars of Sports,Randal C. Hill
EVERYTHING YOU WANT TO KNOW ABOUT SPORTS (Sports Illustrated for Kids),John Rolfe
Građanskopravna odgovornost sportista i sportskih organizacija,Dragan Kostić
I'm against 1970 tour,Sid Jackson
"Festivals, games, and amusements, ancient and modern",Horace Smith
Social investigation in physical education and sport,"Saunders, E. D."
Sport und Spiel in Südtirol,Josef Aussersdorfer
Unfallvorsorge,Erhard Ellwanger
Guide de cardiologie du sport,F. Plas
Infarktrehabilitation,Paul Gerhard Wienberg
Nos vimos en Puerto Rico,Juan Marrero
A magyar testnevelés és sport története,"Földes, Éva."
Idrottsjuridik,Anders Lindstedt
"Sport, Mensch und Gesellschaft",Evanglische Kirche in Deutschland. Kammer für Soziale Ordnung.
Yoga for athletics,Monica Lind Hathaway
Plumadas deportivas,Manuel Efraín Munive S.
Sportbiochemie,"I͡Akovlev, Nikolaĭ Nikolaevich"
Sport Schweiz Geschichte und Gegenwart,Louis Burgener
Play-off thrills,Joseph N. Bell
Nhaʻ 60 Mranʻ mā nuiṅʻ ṅaṃ ʼāʺ ka cāʺ sa muiṅʻʺ,Frank Haskin
Sport psychology,John Dobson Lawther
Der westdeutsche Sport in der Phase der Neugründung,Eduard Strych
El libro negro del atletismo español,Martí Perarnau
Bunte erregende Welt,Paul Laven
Les jeux dans l'éducation physique,E. Baissac
Look to the light side,Dave Stallworth
Deutscher Sport =,Deutscher Sportbund.
Net sports,Kelly Maloni
Super stars of sports,William Folprecht
"Minutes of the 7th congress of the Asian Games Federation, held in Djakarta on the 23rd August 1962",Asian Games Federation.
La  gymnastique volontaire,Gérard Fournier
Deporte,Biblioteca del Congreso de la Nación (Argentina). Departamento de Legislación Comparada
"J'ai vu, J'ai entendu",Édouard Hermès
Jetzt kommen die Chinesen,Rolf von der Laage
Sport in China,Rolf von der Laage
How to ride just about everything (except a horse),Paul Du Pre
The lonely heroes,Merv Harris
Frisbee,Stancil E. D. Johnson
The rise of sports in New Orleans,Dale A. Somers
Du sport et des hommes,Alexis Philonenko
Bypaths of glory,Tim Cohane
Gridiron grenadiers,Tim Cohane
Die Bildsprache des Sports im Deutsch der Gegenwart,W. Haubrich
50 golden years of sports,Robert Liston Burnes
Psychological behavior in sport,Richard B. Alderman
Mixed doubles tennis,Clark Graebner
Over the rim,Tom Meschery
Religion der Athleten,Martin Hörrmann
Individual sports; a textbook for teachers,Patricia Hale
Exercise and Sport in Feminist Therapy,Ruth L. Hall
The Tyne Oarsmen,Peter Dillon
Geschäft mit dem Massensport,Sepp Huber
Sydämeen kohdistuva kuormitus laturetkihiihdossa,Ilkka Vuori
Sports activities for men,Donald Rex Casady
Canada's sporting heroes,Sydney F. Wise
"Tvoi chempiony, Rossii͡a","Lʹvov, Mikhail Lʹvovich."
Leisure time expenditures,Dinoo Jal Taraporevala
Phonokardiographie in der Sportmedizin,R. D. Dibner
Service to sport,Howell Justin Evans
Derecho del deporte,Miguel Cantón Moller
Touchlines and Deadlines,Tom Eaton
Notes and memories of a sports reporter,E. H. Lacon Watson
Semblanzas deportivas (edición ampliada),Fontanarrosa
Lap of honour,"Harris, Norman"
Medische aspecten van de damessport,L. Broeckaert
Punainen olympia,Helge Nygren
"Sports champions of Fort Worth, Texas, 1868-1968",Flem Hall
Champions all,Sydney P. Todd
Vers une politique de promotion sportive,François Pidoux
Idrættens forræderi,Hans Lyngby Jepsen
All Those Mornings...at the Post,Shirley Povich
Kumiry navsegda,V. Vorobʹev
Black college sport,Ocania Chalk
Towering Texans,Harold V. Ratliff
""" I shook the hand ...""",Harold V. Ratliff
Autumn's mightiest legions,Harold V. Ratliff
"Frisch, fromm, fröhlich, frei",Wolfgang Conrad
The biomechanics of sport,Doris I. Miller
Scottish sports holidays,Scottish Council of Recreation.
"The 1968 Olympic Games; winter--Grenoble, summer--Mexico City",Australian Olympic Federation.
Comparative physical education and international sport,Myrtis Herndon
A wilderness of spite,John Cheffers
Trinidad and Tobago at the Olympics Games,Basil A. Ince
Sport-kritisch,Alex Natan
Sport and society,Alex Natan
The funniest moments in sports,Herman L. Masin
Sport in education and recreation,Linda Greenaway
The sports time machine,Dave Brase
"Not ""for men only"" --but almost",Corinne Griffith
Nozioni di medicina sportiva per gli arbitri di calcio,Sergio Pegreffi
La rééducation par l'équitation,Renée de Lubersac
No Sweat!,Michael Wale
Die französische Sportsprache,Peter Recke
Sports literature,James A. Bollas
Sport und Rasse,Lothar Gottlieb Tirala
50 let našem sportu,Josef Laufer
"Ohio State athletics, 1879-1959",James E. Pollard
"Sports fans of the world, unite!",Eddie Andelman
Orthopädie im Sport,Helga Schmidt
A new treasury of sports humor,Herman L. Masin
Treasury of sports humor,Herman L. Masin
Sports laughs,Herman L. Masin
Speaker's treasury of sports stories,Herman L. Masin
Sport for all,Ph Reville
Sport in Bulgaria,Ivan Delchev
"School, sport and leisure",L. B. Hendry
Sportul în reflecții cu haz și ... fără,Barbu Alexandru Emandi
Deporte y agresión,José María Cagigal
Sport et créativité,Florence Guillon
Jeux olympiques et jeu des hommes,Fernand Landry
II Sympozjum Biochemii Sportu na temat Biochemia stanów emocjonalnych wysiłku fizycznego i sportu,"Sympozjum Biochemii Sportu 2d Poznań, Poland 1974."
Ryzyko w sporcie,"Sawicki, Jerzy."
Sports safety II,"National Sports Safety Conference Chicago, Ill. 1976."
Leistungsmotivation und Wettkampfanalyse,"Steiner, Hans Dr. phil."
Biochemie pro posluchače fakulty tělesné výchovy a sportu,Dagmar Bartošová
CSU und Sport--Leistung und Programm,Christlich-Soziale Union.
The education of Steven Bell,Dan Theis
V Sympozjum Rola Rytmów Biologicznych w Wychowaniu Fizycznym i Sporcie,"Sympozjum Rola Rytmów Biologicznych w Wychowaniu Fizycznym i Sporcie 5th Poznań, Poland 1973."
Var bollen rund?,Stockholms stadsarkiv.
Ultimul obstacol,Ion Balaș
Aspekte van die sportfisiologie en die sportwetenskap,G. W. Van der Merwe
Betænkning om idrætten og friluftslivet,Denmark. Udvalget til klarlæggelse of idræts- og friluftslivets vilkår.
Fyziologie tělesných cvičení a sportu,Vítězslava Sobolová
Droit du sport,Jean-Christophe Lapouble
L' Union européenne et le sport,Alexandre Husting
Reminiscences of an old 'un,Frank Newton Streatfeild
Field sports of the month for poor sportsmen,T. W. E. Moreton
A Pink 'Un and a Pelican,Arthur M. Binstead
Die verfassungsrechtliche Bewertung des Kinderhochleistungssports unter Berücksichtigung des Jugendarbeitsschutzgesetzes und des Familienrechts,Andreas Pougin
Scientific proceedings,"International Symposium of Biomechanics in Sports (17th 1999 Perth, W.A.)"
Sport e vita buona,Fabio De Nardis
The long-range effect of television and other factors on sports attendance,Jerry N. Jordan
Luật thể dục thể thao và các văn bản hướng dẫn thi hành,Vietnam.
Giuochi e sports,Radio audizioni Italia.
Les sportifs et le droit,Jean Claude Germain
Sports centres & swimming pools,Felix Walter
Sunset from the main,Hugh Gray Martin
Le sport en noir et blanc,Bernadette Deville-Danthu
Instant Replay,Elizabeth Newman
Sports commentary,G. V. Wynne-Jones
Neaizmirstami sporta brīži un zvaigznes,Arnolds Šmits
A wayfarer's log,"Alexander, Alexander"
The green hawk,Aeres Twigg
Play day,Ethel Perrin
Deutsches sport lexikon,"Norman, Hippolyt von graf"
The Make and mend club,Howard Van Orden
H. R. H. the Prince of Wales's sport in India,Bernard Cuthbert Ellison
An athletic anthology,Henry Van Arsdale Porter
H. V.'s athletic anthology ..,Henry Van Arsdale Porter
Europe at play,Edmund Harry Tattersall
"Recreation series, number [one-six, eight-] ten ..",United States. Work projects administration. Michigan.
Hoofbeats,Warren T. Halpin
Sportcraft for all the year,Dale R. Van Horn
"Making grants efficiently in the culture, media and sport sector",National Audit Office
Sporta Latvija,Arnolds Šmits
La compétition en Grèce antique,"Durand, Marc."
"New games & sports for schools, clubs, & gymnasia","Alexander, Alexander"
Sport writing of today and selections from the best sport stories,Lawrence William Murphy
My sporting memories,Bernard John Angle
"Worte auf die Waage gelegt, auf die Schippe genommen",Kurt Weidemann
A treasury of sports humor,"Stanley, Dave"
Sport und Geschlecht,Sabine Kröner
Sport und Arbeitersport,"Wagner, Helmut"
Dictionar sportiv poliglot,Constantin Tudose
Backyard games,Nikki Schultz
Fit to play,Ian Duthie Adams
Elogiul efemerei performante,Dumitru Manoileanu
Elogiul efemerei performanțe,Dumitru Manoileanu
Sports and Entertainment (Legacies),Peter Hicks
Hallock's American club list and sportsman's glossary,Charles Hallock
How to make your team,Stanley Pashko
A time to play,Robert Wilfred Elliot
Careers in sports,Bob McGonagle
Der Sieg in Olympia und in den anderen panhellenischen Spielen,Horst Buhmann
Le sport militaire,France. Service central des sports des armées.
The super-athletes,David P. Willoughby
Risk management,"McGregor, Ian."
American boy's omnibus,Stanley Pashko
All roads lead to Wembley,Alastair Revie
México en los Juegos Olímpicos,Antonio Lavín Ugalde
"Memorias del deporte 2, Ecuador",Gabriela Paz y Miño
Athlētismos & koinōnika kinēmata,Nasos Bratsos
Gaborone 2014,Botswana) African Youth Games (2nd 2014 Gaborone
Políticas de esporte nos anos Lula e Dilma,"Wagner Barbosa Matias, Pedro Fernando Athayde, Fernando Mascarenhas"
Le marketing olympique,Alain Ferrand
Han dai xi nan ti yu wen hua qu yan jiu,Likai Qin
Taehan Min'guk sŭp'och'ŭ ŭi sumgigo sip'ŭn iyagi,Tar-yŏng Chang
Guntai to supōtsu no kindai,Kō Takashima
Istorii︠a︡ ukrainskogo futbola,I͡Uriĭ Soroka
A treasury of Notre Dame football,Gene Schoor
"Czas wolny, turystyka i rekreacja w perspektywie socjologicznej",Wojciech J. Cynarski
Athletic superiority of our new stocks,Charles Edward Woodruff
Ėtnosport,A. V. Kylasov
Il soldato e l'atleta,Paola Bernardini
Gui Dian Qian shao shu min zu chuan tong ti yu wen hua zi yuan diao cha yu kai fa li yong yan jiu,Wei Chen
El camino al cerro pelado,Alex Figueroa Cancel
Ti yu zhi,Lanping Baizu Pumizu Zizhixian (China). Ti yu yun dong wei yuan hui
Haciendo fierros en el boulevard,Alejandro Damián Rodríguez
Beijing gang xiang,Yijun Zhang
Shinema to shoten to sutajiamu,Kōtarō Sawaki
Batter up!,Sue Muller Hacking
The Complete Package for Children's Safety,Robert Bernardini
Oraşul Bălţi şi oamenii lui,Gheorghe Baciu
Future directions for performance related research in sports psychology,Lew Hardy
"Milon de Crotone, ou, L'invention du sport",Jean-Manuel Roubineau
Modelo e infraestructura deportiva en la UAA,Víctor Moreno Ramos
Legislación de espectáculos,J. de la Hoz Muñoz
"Olha, gente!",Lauro Quadros
Keeping Score: The Economics of Big-Time Sports,Richard G. Sheehan
Keeping score,Richard G. Sheehan
"Sports in America, 1940-1949",Phil Barber
Sport w Nowej Hucie,Łukasz Klimek
Rossiĭskoe sportivnoe oruzhie,Olʹga Borisovna Ivleva
Sportivnyĭ turizm v SSSR i Rossii,"Alekseev, A. A. (Writer on tourism and sports)"
Sport competition structures,Charles F. Cicciarella
Słowiańskie tradycje ludowych form kultury fizycznej na przykładzie wybranych narodów,Małgorzata Bronikowska
Philellēn,"D̲ora Katsōnopoulou, Elena C. Partida"
Guizhou Sheng shao shu min zu jie ri ti yu yan jiu,Lin Yang
Supōtsu toshi senryaku,Munehiko Harada
Shandong min su ti yu,Yukun Fu
New York,Thomas G. Aylesworth
Ti yu kao gu xue dao lun,Kang Chen
Making champions,Michael Jenkins
Sport - obshchestvo - politika,Konstantin Nuzhdenov
A comick book of sports,"Roth, Arnold"
Sportski spomenar,Miroslav Nešić
Gold Minds,Brian Miller
Koinōnia kai athlētismos stēn Hellada,"Giannēs Zaimakēs, Helenē Phournarakē"
Man zu ti yu wen hua lun gang,Lihua Chen
100 rokiv lʹvivsʹkoho olimpizmu,Ivan I͡Aremko
Hard-to-Beat Sports Records (Wild World of Sports),Barry Wilner
Efficiency walking and jogging,Gene R. Hagerman
The rhyming season,Edward Averett
Kreislauf und Atmung bei Arbeit und Sport,Ulrich Tibes
Social aspects of physical education and sport,ICHPER-Europe Congress (1st 1980-1981 Wingate Institute for Physical Education and Sport)
Suomen kuntourheilumitalit 1955-1980,Sven E. Lindqvist
Approaches to estimating the wider economic & social benefits resulting from sports participation,"Bovaird, A. G."
Sport v I͡U︡goslavii,A. Polekhin
A sense of pride,Roy M. Coe
Deaner,"Fisher, Mike"
Efficiency swimming,Gene R. Hagerman
Efficiency cycling,Gene R. Hagerman
Don't Shoot the Goalkeeper (Standpoints),Jonathan Croall
Sport v Československu,Rudolf Dušek
Guinness Sports Record Book 1988-89,David A. Boehm
Sponsoring och idrottsreklam,Per Hagstedt
Third and long,Neil Lomax
Atletami ne rozhdai͡u︡tsi͡a︡,Evgeniĭ Grigorʹevich Bogatyrev
"Sport and the Law Conference, October 11, 1981, Perth","Sport and the Law Conference (1st 1981 Perth, W.A.)"
Wen hua bao ku zhong di yi ke ming zhu,"Xu, Yongchang."
Take it to the limit,Julie Ridge
The pleasure of the game,Stanley Fillmore
The Best Minnesota Sports Arguments (The Best Sports Arguments),Bob Sansevere
Greavsie's sports quiz challenge,Norman Giller
Country New England sports and recreation,Anthony Hitchcock
Cartooning sports,Harriett E. Weaver
"""Prygai͡u︡shchai͡a︡ gazelʹ""--tavro rasizma",Igorʹ Marinov
Nihon supōtsu bunka shi,"Kimura, Ki"
Der Lizenzspieler im Bundesligafussball,Bernd Preis
The collected sporting verse of Will H. Ogilvie,Will H. Ogilvie
Scattered scarlet,Will H. Ogilvie
This Sporting Laugh,Norman Giller
Identification de sports nippo-malagasy,Georges Ramamonjy
La era de Trujillo,Fernando A. Infante
Urheilu ja verotus,Esko Linnakangas
Sports & anecdotes of bygone days,Charles Thomas Samuel Birch-Reynardson
Beyond heroes,A. J. Young
Curious Cornwall,Michael Williams
"Ehrengalerie, Persönlichkeiten und Meister des Sports in Niedersachsen",Kurt Hoffmeister
Betænkning om breddeidrætten i Danmark,Denmark. Breddeidrætsudvalget.
"Guido von Mengden, Generalstabschef des deutschen Sports",Hajo Bernett
Untersuchungen zur Zeitgeschichte des Sports,Hajo Bernett
Sportpolitik im Dritten Reich,Hajo Bernett
Winning and losing,Lowell A. Dickmeyer
Youth sport and the law,Thomas Appenzeller
Mawsūʻat qawānīn al-alʻāb,Buṭrus Rizq Allāh
Lifetime-Sport,Konrad Paschen
Sharing the victory,"Dunn, Joseph"
Athletics and the heart,Richard Rost
"Pigsticking, a joy for life",William Rushton
Le sport populaire,René Moustard
Sports and fitness,Raymond John Prytherch
Funsports for everyone,Gail Andersen Myers
Građa za bibliografiju fizičke kulture i sporta u Bosni i Hercegovini od 1918-1941. godine,Hajrudin Ćurić
Codice delle attività sportive,Italy
Kirgizskie nat͡s︡ionalʹnye vidy sporta i narodnye igry,Dolen Omurzakov
Cruising in Seraffyn,
Fishing Hawaii Style Vol.2,Jim Rizzuto
The World of Pro Hockey,"Howard Berger, Bruce Bennett"
New Moon,"Inc. New Moon Publishing, Seth Godin Productions, LLC Lark Productions"
Golf My Way,"Jack Nicklaus, Ken Bowden"
Sport in Australia,
A Comic Book of Sports,
Jack Nicklaus' Lesson Tee,"Jack Nicklaus, Ken Bowden, Jim McQueen"
Self-Defense for Women,"Donald Monkerud, Mary Heiny"
"Gentleman's Game, A",Tom Coyne
50 Walks in Staffordshire (50 Walks),"Paul Grogan, Hugh Taylor, Moira McCrossan"
50 Walks in Oxfordshire (50 Walks),"Nick Channer, Ann Stonehouse"
Red Voices,"S. Kelly, Alison Kelly"
Sunday Express Gen Know Xword 2,"Sunday Express Staff, Express"
Harvey Penick's Little Red Book,"Harvey Penick, Bud Shrake"
50 Walks in Norfolk (50 Walks),"Beau Riffenburgh, E. Cruwys"
The Golfer's Mind,"Robert J. Rotella, Bob Cullen"
In and Around the Vale of York (Jarrold Short Walks Guides),"Dennis R. Kelsall, Jan Kelsall"
Aberdeen and Royal Deeside (Pathfinder Guide),"Brian Conduit, John Brooks"
"Northumberland, the Borders and Hadrian's Wall (Pathfinder Guide)","John Brooks, Brian Conduit, Hugh Taylor"
"Durham, North Pennines and Tyne and Wear (Pathfinder Guide)","Brian Conduit, John Brooks"
Rothmans Football Yearbook 2002-2003,
Amazing but True Sports Stories,"Phyllis Hollander, Zander Hollander"
Fair Play,"Scott B. Lancaster, Bill Walsh"
AA Pocket Historical Walks Kit (Pocket Walks),Automobile Association (Great Britain)
Louisville Slugger Presents Batting Around,"Doug Myers, Brian Dodd"
Bruce Lee,
The Game That Was,"Richard Cahan, Mark Jacob"
Above the Clouds,"Anatoli Boukreev, Galen Rowell"
Celtic Football Club 1887-1967 (Archive Photographs: Images of Scotland),"Tom Campbell, Pat Woods"
AA Pocket British Walks Kit (Pocket Walks),Automobile Association (Great Britain)
How to Jump and Spin on In-Line Skates,"Jo Ann Schneider Farris, Bruce Curtis"
Tying the Classic Salmon Fly,
Cruising Endless Summer,"Roger Mummah, Susie Mummah"
All-Star Games,
Sport Sociology,"Andrew Yiannakis, Thomas D. McIntyre, Merrill J. Melnick, Dale P. Hart"
Sports and Exercise in Midlife,
The Sporting News Baseball's Knotty Problems,
"Complete Baseball Record Book, 2004 Edition","Sporting News, The Sporting News"
Official NBA Register ,
Official WNBA Guide & Register,"Sporting News, NBA"
1987 Box Score Book/National League (National League Box Scores and Official Averages),
Curse Reversed,"Sporting News, Sporting News Editors"
Tom Seaver's Scouting Notebook 1989 (Tom Seavers Scouting Notebook),"Tom Seaver, Rick Hummel, Bob Nightengale"
NASCAR Record and Fact Book 2004 Edition,"Sporting News, NASCAR, The Sporting News"
Complete Hockey Book 1994-95,"Craig Carter, George Puro, Kyle Veltrop"
Baseball Register,
Clymer Suzuki Quad Racer Lt250r 1985-1992,"Clymer Publications, Primedia Business Directories & Books"
"Official Usfl Guide and Register, 1986",
Rotisserie and Fantasy Baseball League Guide 1990 (Sporting News),"Steve Mann, Ken Mallin"
"Official Major League Baseball Rules Book, 2004 Edition","Sporting News, Major League Baseball, The Sporting News"
Baseball Guide 1999 (Baseball Guide),
Fishing on the Edge,"Brian Kamenetzky, Andrew Kamenetzky"
Fishing on the Edge,"Brian Kamenetzky, Andrew Kamenetzky"
Great American Race Tracks,"David Oliver, Frank B. Mormillo"
Motor Racing,"Giuseppe Guzzardi, Enzo Rizzo"
The Rules of the Game,"Richard E. Lapchick, John Brooks Slaughter"
The Art & Science of Racquetball,"Michael G. Marshall, D. Ray Collins, Patrick Hodges, Patrick B. Hodges, Michael Marshall"
Heroic Climbs,"Royal Geographical Society (Great Britain), Alpine Club (London, England)"
The Lakeland Fells,
Climb! The History of Rock Climbing in Colorado,"Jeff Achey, Dudley Chelton, Bob Godfrey"
Yosemite National Park And Viciinity (Recreation Map),Jeffrey P. Schaffer
Swanage,"Gordon Jenkin, Climbers Club"
On Peak Rock (1500 of the Best Gritstone & Limestone Climbs),"Geoff Milburn, Carl Dawson, BMC Guidebook Committee"
The Overlook Martial Arts Dictionary,"Emil Farkas, John Corcoran"
King Ludwig Way,"Fleur Speakman, Colin Speakman"
Pocket Guide to Fly Fishing for Steelhead (Pocket Guides (Greycliff)),"Jay Rowland, Ehor Boyanowsky, Ron Cordes, Gary Lafontaine"
St. Andrews,"Desmond Muirhead, Tip Anderson"
Pro Football Guide,"Sporting News, STATS INC"
"Cruising guide to the Hudson River, Lake Champlain & the St. Lawrence River","Alan McKibben, Susan McKibben"
Goooal! a Celebration of Soccer,"Andres Cantor, Daniel Arcucci"
More Than a Game,John Major
Hockey Talk,"Lewis J. Poteet, Aaron C. Poteet"
Frankie,
Backwoods Ethics,"Laura Waterman, Guy Waterman"
Greatest Sports Stories Never Told,Bruce Nash
The Double Eagle Guide to Camping Along the Lewis and Clark Trail,"Thomas Preston, Elizabeth Preston"
The Mick,
Julie & Lawrie McEnally's Complete Book of Fishing Baits & Rigs (Ultimate Fishing Knots & Rigs Series),"Julie McEnally, Lawrie McEnally"
"Sports Medicine, Sports Science","Robert C. Cantu, William J. Gillespie"
Fishing Ontario,"Jason Marleau, Russell Mussio"
Hockey Register and Guide 2005-06,"Sporting News, STATS INC"
Rally Navigation,Martin Holmes
How to Win the Walleye Game,"Jeff Murray, Mike McClelland"
Study Guide for the Therapeutic Recreation Specialist Certification Examination,"Norma J. Stumbo, Jean E. Folkerth"
Baseball Guide,"Sporting News, STATS INC"
Martial Arts Legends,"John Little, Curtis Wong"
"Mackintosh/Wright Ultimate Golf Lover's Two-Book Bundle (Golf's Greatest Eighteen, The Best Golf Tips Ever)","David Mackintosh, Nick Wright"
Aikido,
Tai Chi,"Duane A. Crider, John J. Kerecz"
"The Sailor's Classics Three-Book Bundle (Strange Last Voyage of Donald Crowhurst, Gipsy Moth Circles the World, Saga of Cimba)","Nicholas Tomalin, Ron Hall, Sir Francis Chichester, Richard Maury"
Mountain Weather ,"J. Papineau, John Papineau"
Tidal Current Tables 2008,McGraw-Hill
Weight Training for Everyone,David Williams
"Lochhaas Life and Death Adventures on the High Seas Two-Book Bundle (Treacherous Seas, Intrepid Voyager)",Tom Lochhaas
"MacArthur/Longyard Greatest Ocean Voyages Two Book-Bundle (Taking on the World, A Speck in the Sea)","Ellen MacArthur, William H. Longyard"
Sport Ethics,"Angela Lumpkin, Sharon Kay Stoll, Jennifer Marie Beller"
Athletic Training Management: Concepts and Applications with PowerWeb,"James M. Rankin, Christopher D Ingersoll"
Figure Skating School,"Peter Morrissey, James Young"
Signs and Symptoms Of Athletic Injury with PowerWeb,"James Gallaspy, Doug May"
Hockey Pool Fever,"Scott Abbott, John Epstein"
Administration of Physical Education and Sport Programs,"Lawrence E. Horine, Lawrence Horrine"
Signs & Symptoms of Athletic Injury,"James B. Gallaspy, James Gallaspy, Doug May"
History of Sport and Physical Education in the Unites States,"Richard A. Swanson, Richard Swanson, Betty Spears"
History & Philosophy of Sport & Physical Education,"Robert A. Mechikoff, Robert Mechikoff, Steven Estes"
Sports Ethics,"Angela Lumpkin, Sharon Stoll, Jennifer Marie Beller"
Athletic Training Management,"James M. Rankin, James Rankin, Christopher Ingersoll"
Sports and Recreational Activities,"Dale P. Mood, Dale Mood, Frank Musker, Judith Rink"
The Perfect Season,"Tim Mccarver, Danny Peary"
Scottish Sport in the Making of the Nation,
THE THREE Ws of West Indian Cricket,"Keith A. P. Sandiford, Arjun Tan"
Yoga Cards,"Tim Clark, Loretta McArthur"
Onward to the Olympics,
Golly Gee - It's Me!,"Howie Meeker, Charlie Hodge"
The Great Football War 1984-1995,"W. Dennis Hand, Eric W. Allen"
The Sporting News Baseball Guide 1996 (Baseball Guide),
Baseball Guide 1997,
"Hockey Register, 1999-2000 (Hockey Register)",
Sport Medicine: Physiology (Sport Medicine Ser : Vol 4),
Adriatic Pilot,"Trevor Thompson, Dinah Thompson"
"Grand Prix/2, 1986","Nigel Roebuck, Barry Naismith"
Fishing Hawaii Style III,Jim Rizzuto
"The Interface Between Sport Psychiatry and Sports Medicine, An Issue of Clinics in Sports Medicine (The Clinics: Orthopedics)","Ian R. Tofler, Eric Morse"
Fishing Hawaii Style #2,Jim Rizzuto
Raising a Healthy Athlete/the Complete Manual for Every Parent Who Has a Child Who Participates in Athletics/Also Includes,"Douglas G. Avella, Theresa Foy Digeronimo"
Swimming,
It's in the Bag,
Grand Prix Riders,"Mick Woollett, Peter Clifford"
Gates and Stiles (Gold Cockerel),Michael Roberts
The Trailrider Guide - Spain (Trailrider Guide),"Nathan James, Linsey Stroud"
Jiu Jitsu,"K. Koyama, A. Minami"
Air Pistols,Dennis E. Hiller
Firearms and Their Use,"W. T. Castles, V. F. Kimball"
Sailing Directions for the North and East Coasts of Ireland,
Mountain Bike Guide,"Timothy King, Derek Purdy"
Golf Bawls,Richard Willard Armour
"Sailing Around the World the Wrong Way, Vol. 1","Harold Knoll Jr., Harold Byler Jr."
The Snowboard Guide Europe,"Alex Reiser, Jason Horton"
Many Rivers To Run,"David Manby, Manby Dave"
Mick O'Dwyer - The Authorized Biography,
Attacking Judo (Special Interest),"Katsuhiko Kashiwazaki, Hidetoshi Nakanishi"
Ski Mountaineering in Scotland (Scottish Mountaineering Club Guide),
Surf Girl's Guide to Surfing,
Scottish Sea Kayaking,"Doug Cooper, George Reid"
The Art of Freestyle,"Eric Brymer, Loel Collins, Tom Hughes"
Pirelli World Rallying 28,Martin Holmes
The High Alps (Alpiniste),"Iain White, Martin Moran"
Roadmap to the Zone,"Robert S. Neff, Michael, K. Garza"
The Welsh Three Thousand Foot Challenges,"Roy Edward Clayton, Ronald Turnbull, Ronald Turnball"
Rugby League in Focus,
"""Trout and Salmon's"" 220 Favourite Flies (Trout & Salmon/Trout Fisherman)","""Trout and Salmon"", ""Trout Fisherman"""
Rugby World Cup 2007 Official Travel Guide (Purple Guide),"Mike Gerrard, Donna Dailey, Hope Caton"
Teach Cricket,"Richard O'Sullivan, Robert Thomas"
The Black Cloud,"June Parker, Tim Pickles"
Spalding's Official Baseball Guide 1913,John Buckingham Foster
Within the Arm's Reach,"Clifford W. Stewart, Karen Dean"
Hunting Western Deer,"Jim Brown, Wes Brown"
Johnny Podres,"Bob Bennett, John Bennett, Robert, S. Bennett"
Feeling Good,"John, B. Payne , J., Jody Kelly"
"Don't Give Me the Scores, Just the Stories",Mike Edwards
Jeet Kune Do,"Ron Balicki, Steven Gold"
It Isn't A Bus,"Martha French Patterson, Sally Patterson Tubach"
Snow-finder France,"Martin Bell, Adam Coxen"
"Sailing Around the World the Wrong Way, Vol. 4","Harold Knoll Jr. , Harold Byler Jr."
Pictorial History of Baseball,John S. Bowman
Catfishing,Keith Sutton
The World Atlas of Golf,"Pat Ward Thomas, Herbert Warren Wind, Charles Price, Peter Thompson"
Bassing Bible 2005: The Ultimate Bass Fishing Reference Guide (Bassing Bible: The Ultimate Bass Fishing Reference Guide),Keith Sutton
Archer's Bible 2005: The Ultimate Archery Reference Guide (Archer's Bible: The Ultimate Archery Reference Guide),Keith Sutton
Chinese Kara-Ho Kempo,"Sam Kuoha, Ka'Imi Kuoha"
Walk of a Lifetime,"Alex Meacham, Sam Dunn, Mark Brown, Curtis Cowles, Simon Anderson"
The Naui Textbook,Dennis Graver
Karate in Action: Kata & Self-Defense II ,Masatoshi Nakayama
"Always Stand in Against the Curve, and Other Sports Stories",Willie Morris
Aikido and Chinese Martial Arts,"Tetsutaka Sugawara, Xing Lujian"
Championship Tennis by the Experts,
Winning With Frank Chapot,"Frank Chapot, Arlene Newman"
Building The Six-Hour Canoe,"Richard Butz, William Bartoo"
I Don't Do Portholes,"Gladys Walker, Iris Corimer"
Modern Karate,"Milorad V. Stricevic, Dusan Dacic, Toyotaro Mivazaki, Anderson, George"
Croquet,"Jack R. Osborn, John C. Osborn"
Foothills to Mount Evans,"Linda McComb-Rathburn, Linda Wells Ringrose"
A Tribute to Golf,"Thomas P. Stewart, Arnold Palmer"
Karate of Okinawa Building Warrior Spirit With Gan Soku Tanden Riki,"Robert Scaglione, William Cummins"
Men of Steel Discipline,"William Hinton, Rahming D'Arcy"
Best Book Of Baseball Facts,"Carlton Books, Don Jozwiak"
The Complete Golfer's Handbook (Handbooks),"Gary Player, Duncan Cruickshank"
Quantum Strength Fitness II (Gaining the Winning Edge),"Pat O'Shea, Patrick O'Shea"
A Complete Guide to Ski Touring and Ski Mountaineering,"Henry, Branigan, Keith, Jenns"
Marathon Runner's Handbook,"Bruce Fordyce, Marielle Renssen"
Lure of the Links: Great Golf Stories ,
Tai Chi:Chinese Art Of Healing And Self Defense,"Carlton Books, Erle Montaigue"
Hikes Around Invermere & the Columbia River Valley,"Aaron Cameron, Matt Gunn"
The Louisiana Icegators Phenomenon,"Trent Angers, Nissa Darbonne, Tim Berryman"
Falcons and Foxes in the U.K,"A. Lee Chichester, Lee Chichester"
"Have Glove, Will Travel","Bill Lee, Richard Lally"
"Coaching 9, 10, and 11 Year Olds","Bobby Howe, Tony Waiters"
Smith's Sea Fishes,
The Book of the Fly Rod,
Complete Book Of Taekwon Do Forms,Keith Yates
Who Runs Professional Sports,
4Wd Trails,"Peter Massey, Jeanne Wilson"
"Dawn, Dusk and Deer",Nelson
Hit Your Second Shot First,"Marshall Smith, Tom Ferrell"
4Wd Trails,"Peter Massey, Jeanne Wilson"
England's Number One,"Paul Dodd, Iain McNee"
Columbia River Gorge (Discovering Old Oregon Series Volume 1),"Marty Sherman, Joyce Herbst, Kathy Johnson"
Sport Fish of the Atlantic,"Vic Dunaway, Kevin R. Brandt"
Love That Golf - It CAN Be Better Than You Think,Don Herold
Letters to Young Sportsmen on Hunting and Angling,"J. Mackillop, Horace, G. Hutchinson"
Sports Americana II,"Charles S. Hellman, Robert A. Tiritilli"
"Rugger - The History, Theory  And Practice Of Rugby Football","W.W. Wakefield, H.P. Marshall"
Bill Dance on Largemouth Bass,"Bill Dance, Tim Tucker"
Horse Racing,"Charles S. Hellman, Robert A. Tiritilli"
The Art of Shooting and Fishing for Beginners,"Dr., F.W.E. Wagner, E., Maude Cox"
Tennis,
The Angler's Weekend Book,"Eric Taverner, John Moore"
Soccer,"Charles S. Hellman, Robert A. Tiritilli"
Adventures with Big Fish - Big Game Fishing and Whaling,Walter Wood
Basketball,"Charles S. Hellman, Robert A. Tiritilli"
Golf II,"Charles S. Hellman, Robert A. Tiritilli"
BOXING INTERVIEWS OF A LIFETIME,"Bad"" Brad Berkwitt, Brad Berkwitt"
Pocket Guide to Fly Casting,"Ron Cordes, Cordes Lafontaine"
Fishing Bc,"Russell Mussio, Wesley Mussio"
Pocket Guide to Salt Water Fly Fishing,"Ron Cordes, Gary Lafontaine, Cordes Lafontaine"
Selected Shorts,"W. P. Kinsella, T. Coraghessan Boyle, Roger Angell"
"Gene LeBell, The Grappling Club Master","Gene Lebell, Gene LeBell Lynn Salvatori"
He Loved the Dog,Mike Gould
The Dog's Guide to Surfing,
The Sculler At Ease,"Frank Cunningham, Leslie S. Strom"
Western Grit (Rock Fax),"Chris Craggs, Alan James"
Sixty-Five Sunsets,"Rick Davies, Jaquie Bunse"
"Boone and Crockett Club's 25th Big Game Awards, 2001-2003 (Boone and Crockett Club's Big Game Awards)","Eldon ""Buck"" Buckner, Jack Reneau"
New England Golf Guide 2007,"John Dicocco, Mark T. Williams"
Great Hockey Tough Guys of Today (Amazing Stories),Chris Robinson
Planning and Design of Outdoor Sports Facilities,"United States Department of the Army, Navy and Air Force"
Coaching Fundamentals,Bob Parker
Hot Legs,Robert Kennedy
For Golfers and Other Athletes,"Wanita Holmes, James Caufield"
Physical Fitness Training,U.S. Army
Massive At Last,Robert Kennedy
The Advanced Pistol Marksmanship Manual,U.S. Army
Muscle Up! Develop a Perfect Body Naturally,Robert Kennedy
A Game of Golf (The Sportstown Series),"Francis Ouimet, Richard A. Johnson, Robert Donovan, Ben Crenshaw"
Marathon Training Tips,"Mike Stapenhurst, Debbie Prosser"
Five-star Basketball Coaches' Playbook (Five-Star),
Pocket Guide to Basic Canoeing,"Ron Cordes, Newell Cordes"
New Energy For You!,Robert Kennedy
Colorado Trails South Central Region,"Peter Massey, Jeanne Wilson"
Pocket Guide to Fly Fishing for Steelhead,"Ron Cordes, Cordes Lafontaine"
DAN Pocket Guide to First Aid for Scuba Diving,"Dan Orr, Bill Clendenen, Divers Alert Network"
California Trails South Coast Region,"Peter Massey, Jeanne Wilson, Angela Titus"
Pocket Guide to Walleye Fishing in Lakes,"Lesger G., II Cordes, Harley Reno, Reno Cordes"
HEALING THE FISHER KING,
Beckett Baseball Card Price Guide,
Arizona Trails South Region (Trails),"Peter Massey, Jeanne Wilson, Angela Titus"
Pocket Guide to Lure Fishing for Trout in a Stream,"Ron Cordes, Harley W. Reno, G. Lafontaine, Reno Cordes"
Arizona Trails Central Region,"Peter Massey, Jeanne Wilson, Angela Titus"
Arizona Trails West Region,"Peter Massey, Jeanne Wilson, Angela Titus"
Billiards,"Medium Pool Tom Keller, Jason Akst"
Akiba Rubinstein,"John Donaldson, Nikolay Minev"
Circuit Hikes in Northern New Jersey,"Ny, nj Trai"
Thinking Out Loud through the American West,"Pete Sinclair, Pete"" Leon Sinclair"
Canoeing Michigan Rivers,"Jerry Dennis, Craig Date"
Roughing It In Gold Country,"William S. Pierson, Gilberto d'Urso"
Talk of the Tide,
The World of Professional Golf 2007 (World of Professional Golf),
Sailing's a Breeze!,"Gary Solomon, Mark Solomon"
Winning in One-Designs,"Dave Perry, Peter McGowan, Brad Dellenbaugh"
"Official Rules of Golf, 1993","United States Golf Association., Royal and Ancient Golf Club St. Andrews"
"Billiards: The Official Rules & Records Book, 2005 Edition (Billiards: the Official Rules and Records Book)",
Sports Illustrated Greatest Pictures,Sports Illustrated.
Lake Tahoe Bouldering,"Kevin Swift, Chris McNamara"
Hawk Planners Coaching Soccer,"Matthew C. Hawk, Frank Strauss"
Hawk Planners Coaching Hockey,"Matthew C. Hawk, Frank Strauss"
Capitol City Bike Map,"Phil Heywood, Doug Shidell"
"GRAND SLAM Coach Your Mind to Win in Sports, Business, and Life","Anne Smith, Scott Edwards, Bev Gay-Raws"
Movin' On Up,"Robert Gordon, Tom Burgoyne"
Bill Snyder,"Mark Janssen, Bill Snyder"
Taekwondo,"C. Alexander Simpkins, Annellen M., Ph.D. Simpkins"
Hawk Planners for Better Coaching,"Matthew C. Hawk, Frank Strauss"
Shortcut to Golf Rules,"Fredrik Ostberg, Tintin Timen"
Maple Street Press 2007 Red Sox Annual (Maple Street Press Red Sox Annual),
The Golfer's Bible,
"Hunting from Home, 4-cd set",Christopher Camuto
Coaching Football's Tilted-Nose Technique (The Art & Science of Coaching Series),"Denny Marcin, James Peterson"
Shuffle Offenses for Mens and Womens Basketball (Art & Science of Coaching),"Harry L. Harkins, Jerry Krause"
Good Skiing and Snowboarding Guide 2001 (Good Skiing and Snowboarding Guide),"Peter Hardy, Felice Eyston"
101 Defensive Basketball Drills,"George Matthew Karl, Terry Stotts, Price Johnson"
101 Basketball Rebounding Drills (101 Drills),"George Matthew Karl, Terry Stotts, Price Johnson"
101 Offensive Basketball Drills,"George Karl, Terry Stotts, Price Johnson"
101 Women's Basketball Drills,"Theresa Grentz, Gary Miller"
Smallmouth Bass Fly Fishing,"Terry Wilson, Roxanne Wilson"
101 Defensive Football Drills,"Bill Arnsparger, James Peterson"
Coaching Linebackers (Art & Science of Coaching),"Jerry Sandusky, Cedric X. Bryant"
Search for the Perfect Putter,"Tom Grundner, Tom Wishon"
"Great Practices, Great Games","John Mayer, Steve Hayward"
The Complete Book of Man-To-Man Offense,"John Kresse, Richard Jablonski"
Zone Offenses for Men's and Women's Basketball,"Mike Harkins, Jerry Krause"
Dare to Hit 400 (Art & Science of Coaching Series),"Jake Boss, Kevin Ziesman"
Killers in Africa,"Alexander Lake, Mike Resnick"
"Stats Player Profiles 2000 (Stats Player Profiles, 2000)",
Ice Hockey Made Simple,"P. J. Harari, Dave Ominsky"
Three-Point Field Goal Offense for Mens and Womens Basketball (The Art and Science of Coaching Series),"Harry L. Harkins, Jerry Krause"
The Best Of Field & Stream,
Tap's Tips,H.G. Tapply
The Delaware Wing-T,"Harold R. Raymond, Ted Kempski"
Stats Minor League Handbook 1998 (Annual),Bill James
"Stats Baseball Scoreboard 2000 (Stats Baseball Scoreboard, 2000)",
The Delaware Wing-T,"Harold R. Raymond, Ted Kempski"
Field Guide,"Randy Acker, Jim Fergus"
Training with the Master,"John Stevens, Walther V. Krenner"
Footballs Quick Passing Game,"Andrew Coverdale, Dan Robinson"
The Scouting Notebook 1999 (Sporting News STATS Major League Scouting Notebook),
101 Defensive Football Drills,"Bill Arnsparger, James Peterson"
Stats 2000 Diamond Chronicles (STATS Diamond Chronicles),
Bill James Presents Stats Minor League Handbook 1999 (Annual),Bill James
Ice Hockey Made Simple,"P. J. Harari, Dave Ominsky"
Stats 1996 Pro Football Handbook (STATS Pro Football Handbook),"STATS Inc, Stats Publishing"
Stats 1995 Baseball Scoreboard (STATS Baseball Scoreboard),"John Dewan, Don Zminda"
Gulf Islands and Vancouver Island,"Anne Yeadon-Jones, Laurence Yeadon-Jones"
Idols of the Game,"Robert Lipsyte, Peter Levine"
Stats Baseball Scoreboard 2001 (Stats Baseball Scoreboard),
The Scouting Notebook,John Dewan
Stats 1997 Baseball Scoreboard (8th ed),"John Dewan, Don Zminda"
Bill James Presents... Stats Minor League Handbook 1997 (Annual),Bill James
Stats 1998 Diamond Chronicles (STATS Diamond Chronicles),Bill James
Stats Pro Basketball Handbook 2001-02 (Stats Pro Basketball Handbook),
Stats Pro Football Scoreboard 1999 (STATS Pro Football Scoreboard),
The Scouting Notebook,
Killers in Africa,"Alexander Lake, Mike Resnick"
Chapman Knots,"Brion Toss, Gae Pilon"
Voyaging,Lea E. Williams
The Ultimate Cubs Companion,
Banned in the Bronx,"Gene Hutmaker, Michael, A. Hutmaker"
SPADA II,
Titletown: The Green Bay Packers Journey to Super Bowl Xxxi,
The Official Ohio State Football Encyclopedia,Jack Park
"Bob Forsch's Tales from the Cardinals Dugout,, Limited Edition","Bob Forsch, Tom Wheatley"
Beware of the Phog,"Doug Vance, Jeff Bollig"
The Encyclopaedia of Sports and Games,"Yograj Thani, Lokesh Thani"
1989 Baseball Encyclopedia Update,
The Mutt,"Rodney Mullen, Sean Mortimer"
1986 Pro Football Scouting Report,"Dick Vermeil, Sam Rutigliano, Gil Brandt, Chip Falivene"
Ten Rings,"Yogi Berra, Dave Kaplan"
David Leadbetter 100% Golf,"David Leadbetter, Richard Simmons"
The International Marine Boat Manager,"Bob Payne, Nick Ellison"
The Scouting Report,
World Whitewater,"Jim Cassidy, Dan Dunlap"
Total Baseball,"John Thorn, Pete Palmer"
The Shaolin Way,"Steve DeMasco, Alli Joseph"
Stats 1994 Baseball Scoreboard (Stats Baseball Scoreboard),"John Dewan, Don Zminda"
The Formula One Pack,"Ron van der, Adam Cooper"
The Reduced History of Golf,"Aubrey Ganguly, Justyn Barnes"
Boat Handling Under Power (Captain's Quick Guides),Robert J. Sweet
The Complete Guide to Coaching Girls' Basketball,"Sylvia Hatchell, Jeff Thomas"
Won for All ,"Pepper Johnson, Bill Gutman"
Coaching Girls' Lacrosse,"Janine Tucker, Maryalice Yakutchik"
The Strange Last Voyage of Donald Crowhurst,"Nicholas Tomalin, Ron Hall"
High-Intensity Training the Mike Mentzer Way,"Mike Mentzer, John R. Little"
Fit for Golf ,"Boris Kuzmic, Jim Gorant"
"Creative Management In Recreation, Parks and Leisure Services with PowerWeb","Richard Kraus, Joseph E. Curtis"
Intracoastal  Waterway Chartbook ,"John J. Kettlewell, Leslie Kettlewell"
Applications In Recreation and Leisure,"Kathleen A. Cordes, Hilmi Ibrahim, Kathleen Cordes"
The Making of the Super Bowl,"Don Weiss, Chuck Day"
Tropical Cruising Handbook,"Mark Smaalders, Kim des Rochers"
Won for All ,"Pepper Johnson, Bill Gutman"
Sport Ethics,"Angela Lumpkin, Sharon Kay Stoll, Jennifer Marie Beller, Jennifer Beller"
How to Break 90,"T.J. Tomasi, Mike Adams, Mike Corcoran"
On-Board Weather Forecasting (Captain's Quick Guides),Robert J. Sweet
More Than a Game,"Cynthia Lee A. Pemberton, Donna de Varona"
Touchdown Tommie,"Tommie Frazier, Bob Schaller"
The Essential Guide to Sumo,"Dorothea M. Buckingham, Dee Buckingham"
Pocket Guide to Fly Fishing Knots (Pocket Guides (Greycliff)),"Stan Bradshaw, Ron Cordes, Gary Lafontaine"
The Hungry Boaters Restaurant Guide,"Louis Tserhardt, Tserhardt Louis, Patricia Tserhardt"
Youth Baseball,"Wendell Kim, Sally Tippett-Rains"
Secrets of the Samurai,"Oscar Ratti, Adele Westbrook"
Official NBA Register 2005-06,"Sporting News, NBA"
Dalglish,Alison Kelly
Working The Trail,"Bill Topp, Keith Zirbel"
101 Ways to Be a Terrific Sports Parent,"Joel Fish, Susan Magee"
Official NBA Rules Book 2005-06 (Official NBA Rules),"Sporting News, NBA"
The Sporting News Official Nba Guide 1994-95,
1990-1991 Hockey Scouting Report,Michael A. Berger
The Cup of Death,"Jan P. Oller, Jan P. Oller"
Official NBA Register ,"Sporting News, NBA, David Walton"
Coaching the Mental Game,H. A. Dorfman
Basketball Coach's Survival Guide,"William E. Warren, Larry F. Chapman"
Fitness Education,"Bradford N. Strand, Ed Scantling, Martin Johnson"
Pierre Turgeon,J. Gordon
Run with the Best,"Tony Benson, Irv Ray"
Backpacking Tips,
The Negro Leagues Book,
The Ultimate Tigers Companion,
Official Rules of Soccer 1999,
CycleLog,"Jan Bass, Tim Houts"
HIGH STAKES,"TIMOTHY JON CURRY, KENT SCHWIRIAN, RACHEL A. WOLDOFF"
Kites Method kiteboarding book (Kites Method Da Book),
The Master of Putting,"George Low, Al Barkow"
Murderers' Row,
Field Hockey,"Dewayne J. Johnson, Barbara A. Parks"
Motorcycles (Rollin'),Jackson
World Class,"Jane Boyar, Burt Boyar"
Jumbo Book the Sun Cross Book 8 (Penguin Crosswords),
Seventh Penguin Jumbo the Sun Cro (Penguin Crosswords),
Man-Trackers & Dog Handlers in Search & Rescue ,"Ed Johnson, Robert J. Koester"
Flagstaff Historic Walk ,"Richard K. Mangum, Sherry G. Mangum"
Eighth Penguin Jumbo Book of the Sun Crosswords (Penguin Crosswords),
The Volleyball Mom's Manual,"Laurel Phillips, Barbara Stahl"
In Pursuit of the Yellow Jersey,"Samuel Abt, James Startt"
The Complete Guide to Ar-15 Accuracy,"Derrick Martin, Barrett Tillman"
Bass Flies,"Dick Stewart, Larry Largay"
Sports Illustrated 1998 Sports Almanac,Sports Illustrated.
Coolest Guys on Ice,"Jeff Z. Klein, Karl-Eric Reif"
Final Confessions of NFL Assassin Jack Tatum,"Jack Tatum, Bill Kushner"
Sky Sports Football Yearbook 2007-2008,"Jack Rollin, Glenda Rollin"
Violencia Contra Ninos (Ariel Estudios De Violencia),
Kent Hrbek's Tales from the Minnesota Twins Dugout (Tales),"Kent Hrbek, Dennis Brackin"
Deschutes River,"James W. Quinn, James G. King"
Passing the Guard: Brazilian Jiu-Jitsu Details and Techniques,Beneville Ed
All About Road Racing,"Tom Heinonen, Janet Heinonen"
Soccer Kicks,"Elisabeth Jacobs, Benjamin Eli Smith"
Sanders Price Guide to Sports Autographs,"George Sanders, Helen Sanders, Ralph Roberts, Chuck McKeen"
Diary of a Bass Pro,"Joe Thomas, Tim Tucker"
The Truth about Winning!,"Tom Veneziano, Mary A. Sicard"
New Hampshire Fishing Maps,"Charlton J. Swasey, Donald A. Wilson"
A Woman's Own Golf Book,"Barbara Puett, Jim Apfelbaum"
The Golf Courses of the Monterey Peninsula,"Cal Brown, Udo Machat"
It's Only a Game,"Terry Bradshaw, David Fisher"
Running Into The Sky,"Chris Wolf, Michael Maikowski"
A Chance to Win,"Mike Gentry, Tony Caterisano"
Athletic Protective Equipment,"Scott Street, Debra Runkle"
"Chinese Kara-ho Kempo, Volume 2 ","Sam Kuoha, Ka'Imi Kuoha"
New Biographical History Of Baseball,"Donald Dewey, Nicholas Acocella"
Leadership and Administration of Outdoor Pursuits,"Jim Blanchard, Michael Strong"
125 Years of Professional Baseball,Major League Baseball
Shooting Hoops and Skating Loops,"Alannah Hegedus, Kaitlin Rainey"
Tennessee Titans,
Akiba Rubinstein Uncrowned King,"John Donaldson, Nikolay Minev"
Uechi-ryu Karate Do,George E. Mattson
The Cordes/Lafonaine Pocket Guide to Fly Fishing for Largemouth Bass (Pocket Guides (Greycliff)),"Gary Lafontaine, Ron Cordes"
We Played the Game,
Naxos and Small Cyclades (Walking the Greek Islands),"Christian Ucke, Dieter Graf"
Sedona Hikes ,"Richard K. Mangum, Sherry G. Mangum"
Firearms and Their Use,"W. T. Castles, V. F. Kimball"
Athletic Injury Assessment with Power Web,"James M. Booher, Gary A. Thibodeau"
Goal!,"Gloria Averbuch, Ashley Michael Hammond"
Horse Racing,
"Official WNBA Guide and Register, 2002 Edition",
Fishing the Local Waters,
Running to the Top of the Mountain,"Joe Newton, John Durkin"
Bowling,"Parker, III Bohn, Dan Herbst"
WalkLog,"Tim Houts, Tim Holtz"
Fishing Tales,"Lorian Hemingway, Gerry Wood"
Modern Sports Officiating,"Richard Clegg, William A. Thompson"
Intracoastal Waterway Chartbook,
Cyclist's Training Diary,"Diary, Press Vitesse"
Terror at the Atlanta Olympics,"Kenneth Alonso, Kenneth, M.D. Alonso"
The Corey Ford Sporting Treasury,"Chuck Petrie, Corey Ford"
DAN Pocket Guide to First Aid for Scuba Diving,"Dan Orr, Clendenen. Bill, DAN Medical Staff"
Offshore Cruising Encyclopedia on CD-ROM,"Steve Dashew, Linda Dashew"
Fotheringham's Sporting Trivia,"Will Fotheringham, Sanctuary Publishing"
Passing Rhythms,
Dutch Coaching Notebook,"Henny Kormelink, Tjeu Seeverens"
Inside Racing Technology,"Paul Haney, Jeff Braun"
Sport and Postcolonialism (Global Sport Cultures),
Salmonia,"An Angler, Sir Humphry Davy"
"Coach of the Century, an Autobiography","John Carver, Gordon Wood"
Manual of Pack Transportation,"H. W. Daly, H. L. Scott"
Hail to the Victors,
Training for Mortals,"John Bingham, Jenny Hadfield"
Les yeux du stade,
Goalkeeping Drills,"Gerd Thissen, Klaus Rollgen"
Surf Life 32 To 02,
Beyond Basketball,"Mike Krzyzewski, Jamie K. Spatola"
"Total Baseball, Seventh Edition",John Thorn
Smoke,"Mark Rucker, Peter C. Bjarkman"
Karl Malone (101 Little Known Fact about),"Sports Publishing Inc, Dale Ratermann"
Beginner's Guide to Flytying,"Chris Mann, Terry Griffiths"
Official 2006 Ncaa Men's Basketball Records Book (Ncaa Mens Basketball Records),
"That Reminds Me of the One... True Hunting & Fishing Tales, Misadventures, and Stupids Stunts","Willow Creek Press, Jim Zumbo, John Barsness"
Curtis Turner,"Alan Hill, Dennis Treece"
Mark May's Tales from the Washington Redskins,"Mark May, Dan O'Brien"
Bob Forsch's Tales from the Cardinals,"Bob Forsch, Tom Wheatley"
Baseball's Most Wanted Boxed Set,"Floyd Conner, John Snyder"
Pro Football Forecast 2004,"Sean Lahman, Todd Greanier"
The Ultimate Encyclopedia of Soccer,Keir Radnedge
The Wit of Cricket,
Full Moon (Mainstream Sport),"Rupert Moon, David Roach"
Blackie,"Steve Black, Arthur McKenzie"
Bottle,"Steve Grit, Ivor Baddiel"
Alan Shearer's Got My Shirt,"Billy Whitehurst, Rob Finch"
The Wit of Cricket,
Making Sense of Diversity in Organizing Sport (The Business of Sports),
The Diver's Universe,"Danja Kohler, Annemarie Kohler"
The Gun - Afield & Afloat (History of Shooting Series - Game & Wildfowling) (History of Shooting Series),Henry Sharp
Stopping Power,"Jean Little, Edwin J. Sanow, EVAN P. MARSHALL"
"Hawkeye Legends,  Lists & Lore, Limited Edition","Mike Finn, Chad Leistikow"
George Toma,"George Toma, Alan Goforth"
Flat Out and Half Turned Over,"Buddy Baker, David Poole"
Tales from the Marquette Hardwood,"Tom Pipines, Mike Neufeldt"
Bill Wennington's Tales from the Bulls Hardwood,"Bill Wennington, Kent MCDILL"
Sport In Ireland - With Notes And Prose Idyls On Shooting And Trout Fishing,W. Barry
Beware of the Phog,"Doug Vance, Jeff Bollig"
Charlie Sander's Tales from the Detroit Lions Sidelines,"Charlie Sanders, Larry Paladino"
As They Head for the Checkers,"Kathy Persinger, Mark Garrow"
Miracle Over Miami,"Dan Schlossberg, Kevin Baxter, Jeff Conine"
Crowning the Kansas City Royals,"Jeff Spivak, Jeffrey Spivak"
The Yankee Encyclopedia,"Mark Gallagher, Walter LeConte"
The Giants Encyclopedia (Limited Edition),"Tom Schott, Nick Peters"
Dominik Hasek,"Randy Schultz, Rand Shultz"
The Official Major League Baseball,"Major League Baseball, Baseball Encyclopedia"
The Prime Of Their Lives,
30-Second Golf Swing,"T.j. Tomasi, Kathryn Maloney"
Sunday Morning Quarterback,"Phil Simms, Vic Carucci"
Extreme Sea Kayaking,"Michael Powers, Eric Soares"
Grip It and Rip It,"John Daly, John Andrisani"
Golf Your Way,"Phil Ritson, John Andrisani, Leonard Kamsler"
Passing Shots,"Pam Shriver, Frank Deford, Susan B. Adams"
Total Baseball,"John Thorn, Pete Palmer"
Twice Around the Bases,"Kevin Kennedy, Bill Gutman"
Fundamentals of Exercise Physiology,"Robert Robergs, Steven Keteyian"
An Introduction to Olympic-Style Weightlifting,"John M. Cissik, John, M. Cissik"
Clearing the Bases,"Mike Schmidt, Glen Waggoner"
The Mutt,"Rodney Mullen, Sean Mortimer"
Baseball's 50 Greatest Games,
Scuba Diving in Majorca,"Juan Poyatos, Anibal Alonso"
The World's 72 Toughest Golf Holes,
Wrestlecrap,"R.D. Reynolds, Randy Baer"
Jim Telfer,"Jim Telfer, David Ferguson"
Chelsea's Century,Harry Harris
Hearts,"Rob Kiddie, Rob Robertson, Paul Kiddie"
Hooked on Scotland,Paul Young
Fields of Glory Paths of Gold,"Kevin Connolly, Rab MacWilliam"
The Fashion of Football,"Paolo Hewitt, Mark Baxter"
Unlicensed - Random Notes from Boxing's Underbelly,Jon Hotten
Brecon Beacons East (Superwalker),
Sporting Profiles,Michael Parkinson
Late Innings,
1987 Official Yankees Yearbook,
How to Build a Classic Golf Swing,"Ernie Els, Steve Newell"
1994 Competition Rules,
David Leadbetter,"David Leadbetter, Richard Simmons"
Villeneuve,"Jacques Villeneuve, Gerald Donaldson"
Botham,"Ian Botham, Peter Hayter"
Hell Razor,"Neil Ruddock, Dave Smith"
Nigel Mansell My Autobiography,"Nigel Mansell, James Allen"
Total Fitness in 30 Minutes a Week,
Botham's Century,"Ian Botham, Peter Hayter"
Faults and Fixes,"David Leadbetter, John Huggan"
Boating Magazine's Insider's Guide to Buying a Powerboat,"Robert J.P. Lamy, Robert J. P. Lamy"
Sea Kayaker Magazine's Handbook of Safety and Rescue,"Doug Alderson, Michael Pardy"
Tropical Cruising Handbook,"Mark Smaalders, Kim des Rochers"
Coastal Cruising Under Power,"Gene Hamilton, Katie Hamilton"
The Plane Truth for Golfers,"Jim Hardy, John Andrisani"
A Boatowner's Guide to Using PCs on Board,"Tim Thornton, Rob Buttress"
Athletic Protection Equipment with Powerweb,"Scott A Street, Debra R. Runkle"
The Certified Diver's Handbook,Clay Coleman
Coaching Team Basketball,"Tom Crean, Ralph L. Pim"
The Fiberglass Boat Repair Manual,"Allan H. Viatses, Allan H. Vaitses"
Principles of Yacht Design,"Lars Larsson, Rolf Eliasson"
The Basics of Strength Training,"John M. Cissik, John Cissik"
Tenzing Norgay and the Sherpas of Everest,"Tashi Tenzing, Judy Tenzing"
Golf's Greatest Eighteen,David Mackintosh
An Ocean to Cross,"Liz Fordred, Susie Blackmun"
Fast Track to Cruising,"Stephen Colgate, Doris Colgate"
"40,000 Miles in a Canoe",John C. Voss
The Intracoastal Waterway Chartbook,"John J. Kettlewell, Leslie Kettlewell"
A Speck on the Sea ,William Longyard
Coaching 6-and-Under Soccer (Baffled Parent's Guide),"David Williams, Scott Graham"
A Speck on the Sea,William Longyard
Playing the Offensive Line,"Karl Nelson, Bob O'Connor"
Jocks and Socks ,"Jim Ksicinski, Tom Flaherty"
Great Soccer Drills ,"Thomas Fleck, Ronald W. Quinn"
Nautical Knots Illustrated,"Paul H H Snyder, Arthur FF Snyder"
Elite Wrestling,"Thomas Ryan, Julie Sampson"
World of Tennis 2001,
Payne Stewart,"Tracey Stewart, Ken Abraham"
Jason Leonard,"Jason Leonard, Alison Kervin"
Jason Leonard,"Jason Leonard, Alison Kervin"
Hizzy,"Steve Hislop, Stuart Barker"
"It's True, It's True","Kurt Angle, John Harper"
Payne Stewart,"Tracey Stewart, Ken Abraham"
Bill Beaumont,"Bill Beaumont, Geoff Green"
Hawk,"Tony Hawk, Sean Mortimer"
Inside the Cage,"Carl Merritt, Wensley Clarkson"
100 Per Cent Golf,"David Leadbetter, Richard Simmons"
Inside the Cage,"Carl Merritt, Wensley Clarkson"
Golf (Collins Need to Know?),
The Penn State Football Encyclopedia,"Lou Prato, Ron Falk"
Basketball Skills and Drills,"Jerry Krause, Don Meyer, Jerry Meyer"
Fishing Bc,"Russell Mussio, Wesley Mussio"
Coming Of Age,"Tom Donelson, Beth Donelson"
PGA Play Better Golf for Women,"Mike Adams, Kathryn Maloney, T.J. Tomasi"
Richard Petty,"Tim Bongard, Bill Coulter"
Canoeing and Kayaking for Persons With Physical Disabilities,"Anne Wortham Webre, Janet Zeller"
Boss,"Mike Bossy, Barry Meisel"
"Foundations of Physical Education, Exercise Science, and Sport with PowerWeb","Deborah A. Wuest, Charles A Bucher"
Motor Learning and Control for Practitioners with PowerWeb Bind-in Passcard,"Cheryl A Coker, Cheryl Coker"
Motor Learning and Control,"Richard A. Magill, Richard Magill"
Understanding Motor Development,"David L. Gallahue, John C. Ozmun"
Athletic Training Management,"James M. Rankin, Christopher D Ingersoll"
Leadership in Recreation with PowerWeb Bind-in Card,"Ruth V. Russell, Ruth Russell"
Clinical Sports Nutrition,"Louise Burke, Vicki Deakin"
Catch,"Ernie Whitt, Greg Cable"
Leisure Programming,"Christopher R. Edginton, Susan D. Hudson, Rodney B. Dieser, Susan R Edginton, Christopher Edginton, Susan Hudson, Rodney Dieser, Susan Edginton"
Pro Football Register,"Sporting News, STATS INC"
Golfing Days,"Phil Sheldon, Liz Kahn"
Motion Game Offense for Mens and Womens Basketball,"Mike Harkins, Jerry Krause"
The Book,"Brian Prax, Mark Schultheis"
Randy Johnson (Baseball Legends),Mike Bonner
Detectives on Everest,"Eric Simonson, Jochen Hemmleb, Dave Hahn"
Touching My Father's Soul,"Jamling Tenzing Norgay, Broughton Coburn"
The Royal Marines Circuit Training,"Robin Eggar, Loraine Dieter, Dieter Loraine"
Working the Wheel,"Martin Brundle, Maurice Hamilton"
Karate Kata Applications,"Aidan Trimble, P.M.V. Morris"
Nuggets on the Diamond,"Dick Dobbins, Jon Twichell"
Diamonds Are Forever,
The October Twelve,"Phil Rizzuto, Tom Horton"
Play Golf Forever,"Michael Jaffe, Brian Tarcy, Ron Brizzie"
Pocket Guide to Basic Fly Tying Techniques (Pocket Guides (Greycliff)),"Ron Cordes, Gary Lafontaine"
Ready-To-Use Pre-Sport Skills Activities Program (Ready-To-Use),"Lowell F. Turner, Susan Lilliman Turner"
Sport for a better world,
New book of sports,
Super Bowl Victories,
1997 Ncaa Ice Hockey Rules (Serial),
Yachting,
Spalding's Official Baseball Guide 1884-1886,
"Skiers Directory, 1989",
1990 Ncaa Men's and Women's Cross Country and Track and Field Rules,
2000 Ncaa Men's and Women's Basketball Rules and Interpretations (Ncaa Men' and Women's Basketball Rules and Interpretations 2000),
The Elderly in Motion,"Bjarne Andersen, Michael Andersen, Jette Forchhammer, Jorgen Povlsen, Hanne Topsoe-Jensen"
Creative Image Bank,
Superbike World Championship,"Claudio Porrozzi, Fabrizio Porrozzi"
Outdoor Training (Practical Trainer Series),"Bill Krouwel, Steve Goodwill"
Investigation Of The Olympic Scandal,John McCain
Business Practices in the Professional Boxing Industry,John McCain
Reform Of The Professional Boxing Industry,John McCain
Cooperative Research,
Philadelphia's Boxing Heritage: 1876-1976,"Tracy Callis, Chuck Hasson, Mike DeLisa"
Smoke,"Mark Rucker, Peter C. Bjarkman"
Your Brain Is A Muscle Too,"Vince Fudzie, Andre N. Hayes"
Mickey Mantle,"Mickey Mantle, Lewis Early"
"Baseball In Washington, D.c.","Frank Ceresi, Mark Rucker"
Condition The Nba Way,
Sports for Life,"Schimel, Greenberg"
Toothpick,"A. J. Joannides, John Holladay"
The Official Rules the Usga Hoped You Wouldn't Find Out About,"Mark Alan, Donnie V"
"Woodall's Mid- Atlantic Campground Guide, 2002",
"Woodall's Far West Campground Guide, 2002",
This Day in Baseball 2002 Calendar,
Girls Got Game 2002 Calendar,
Ultimate Guide To Kung-Fu,"John R. Little, Curtis F. Wong"
Ultimate Guide to Aikido ,"John R. Little, Curtis F. Wong"
Teach Yourself Instant Reference Sport & Games,
The Book of 1993 Baseball Cards,
"Sports Illustrated, the Covers",Sports Illustrated.
Maritime & Fishing Technical Dictionary,
Funny Cide,"Funny Cide Team, Sally Jenkins"
Pro Wrestling Finishing Holds,
Bethune on Bass,John Bethune
Karate,
Olympic Factbook,
Karate in Action III,Masatoshi Nakayama
Talking Sports,Pat O'Brien
Contracted Versus District-Operated Pupil Transportation Programs,"Tom Gostas, Greg Arnim, Dan Medenblik"
Out of Time,"Alex Fynn, Lynton Guest"
Training a Tiger,"Earl Woods, Pete McDaniel"
"Historical and Literature Review of Horizontal Curve Design, 1940-1990","Kay Fitzpatrick, Karen Hall"
Goju Ryu Karate Do,
Jimmy D'Angelo and Myrtle Beach Golf,
Sportsmassage,
Interoperability Cost Analysis of the U.S. Automotive Supply Chain,"Smita Brunnermeier, Sheila A. Martin"
Amtrak Reform and Privatization Act of 1997,Bud Shuster
Heroes and History,"Stan Fischler, Shirley Fischler"
Century of the National Hockey League,
Rules of Golf Illustrated & Explained,"Tom Watson, Frank Hannigan"
Karate,Bruce A. Haines
Boat Economics,"Don Woodwell, John Schneider"
How to Play Winning Tennis in the Prime of Life,"Al Bunis, Roger Williams - undifferentiated"
"Blue Book. Sailboat Trade in Guide, 1991",
Child Care Programs (Ymca Program Discovery Series),
"Blue Book. Sailboat Trade in Guide, 1991",
"Getting Strong, Looking Strong","Boyer Coe, Bob Summer"
champs d'ébats,Georges Hébert
Balls!,"Rob Bagchi, Simon Burnton, Barney Ronay"
The Complete Idiot's Guide(R) to Hockey,"Malcolm Kelly, Mark Askin, Malcolm G. Kelly"
David Leadbetter 100% Golf,"David Leadbetter, Richard Simmons"
Ski-runs in the High Alps,"F. F. Roget, Francois Frederic Roget"
Murderers' Row,
Sedona Hikes,"Richard K. Mangum, Sherry G. Mangum"
Tennis and the Meaning of Life,
Shotokan Karate,"Keinosuke Enoeda, C. J. Mack"
The Southern Uplands (Scottish Mountaineering Club District Guides),"Ken Andrew, A.A. Thrippleton"
Chicken Soup for the Sports Fan's Soul,"Jack Canfield, Mark Victor Hansen"
Thinking Rugby,"Ken Hodge, A. McKenzie"
Legends 5,"Alan Gold, Sally Harrison, Ty Wyant, Frank Holmes"
Zamboni Rodeo,"Jason Cohen, Jason Cohen"
The Strike Zone,"Carol J. Blassingame, Thomas S. Cross"
World Class,"Jane Boyar, Burt Boyar"
Pocket Guide to Saltwater Fly Fishing,"Ron Cordes, Gary Lafontaine"
Pocket Guide to Walleye Fishing in Lakes,"Lester G., Ii Cordes, Harley Reno"
Winter Walks and Hikes,"Harvey Manning, Ira Spring"
Emmitt,"Reagan White, Rudy Klanchik"
Fur Trapping,"Bill Musgrove, Gerry Blair"
Caddie Sense,"Michael Carrick, Steve Duno"
Our Island in the Sun,"Garry Domnisse, Carol Domnisse"
The Baseball Encyclopedia ,Macmillan
Columbia River Gorge (Discovering Old Oregon Series Vol 1),"Marty Sherman, Joyce Herbst, Kathy Johnson"
Unlicensed,Jon Hotten
Brett,"Kevin Allen, Brett Hull"
Golfer's Log & Diary,"Tommy Hedgepeth, Ted Bonham"
Ted Williams: A Splendid Life,"Bill Nowlin, Jim Prime, Roland Lazenby"
"Chinese Kara-ho Kempo, Volume 1","Sam Kuoha, Kaiimi Kuoha"
The Braves,"Bob Klapisch, Pete Van Wieren"
Sport Specific Speed,"Vern Gambetta, Gary Winckler"
Splash Hit! Pac Bell Park,"Joan Walsh, C. W. Nevins"
Baseball Register 1999 (Baseball Register),
Winning the Arms Race,
Joe Montana's Art and Magic of Quarterbacking,"Joe Montana, Richard Weiner"
Camp Counsellors Handbook (F92-433),"Brian Blackstock, John Latimer"
Tempo: Golf's Master Key ,"Al Geiberger, Larry Dennis"
My Autobiography,"Ian Botham, Peter Hayter"
Parents' Complete Guide to Youth Sports,"Ronald E. Smith, Frank L. Smoll, Nathan J. Smith"
Official NBA Rules Book,"Sporting News, NBA, The Sporting News"
A Fun Book of Olympic Trivia,
"Coaching 6, 7, and 8 Year Olds","Tony Waiters, Bobby Howe"
Pocket Guide to Nymph Fishing (Pocket Guides (Greycliff)),"Ron Cordes, Gary Lafontaine"
You Can Be a Woman Basketball Player,"Tamecka Dixon, Judith Love Cohen"
Introduction to Fencing,"Thomas Cross, Ernie Kirkham"
Collins Gem Golf Tips,HarperCollins UK
The Sun Word Games 4,HarperCollins UK
Better Football Officiating,"Tom Hammill, Jerry Grunska, George Demetriou"
The In-Your-Face Basketball Book,"Chuck Wielgus, Alexander Wolff"
A Man Called Lion,Peter Capstick
Yankees Baseball: The Golden Age,Richard Bak
Baseball Encyclopedia Update 1991,
Chen Pan-ling's Original Tai Chi Chuan Textbook (Tai Chi Chuan Chiao Tsai),"Chen Pen-Ling, Ann Carruthers"
Final Season,"Bill Parcells, Will McDonough"
The Good Skiing and Snowboarding Guide 2000 (Good Skiing & Snowboarding Guide),"Peter Hardy, Felice Eyston"
Character for Champions,"Rhee, Charles Sutherland"
Natural Golf,"Seve Ballesteros, John Andrisani"
Harry and Sarah Sneider's Olympic Trainer,"Harry Sneider, Sarah Sneider"
Right Down Your Alley,"Vesma Grinfelds, Bonnie Hultstrand"
Beisbol,"Michael M. Oleksak, Mary Adams Oleksak"
Ohio State '68: All the Way to the Top ,"Steve Greenberg, Larry Zelina"
Easy Steps to Self-Defense,"Francis J. Pultro, Constance Ditzel"
Pat Summerall's Sports in America,"Pat Summerall, Jim Moskovitz"
International Convention Against Doping in Sport,
Aim/Far 1994,"Tab, Aero"
The Complete Book of Man-To-Man Offense (The Art & Science of Coaching Series),"John Kresse, Richard Jablonski"
Think Like a Champion,"Mike Shanahan, Adam Schefter"
Why We Win,"Billy Packer, Roland Lazenby"
"Aim/Far, 1994","Tab, Aero"
"Woodall's Great Lakes Campground Guide, 2002",
Official Nba Guide 1996-1997,
Baseball Guide,
"Official WNBA Guide and Register, 2001 Edition",
"Official Major League Baseball Rules Book, 2005 Edition","Major League Baseball, Sporting News"
Hunting in the Olden Days,William Scarth Dixon
The Compleat Angler (Parts I and II),"Izaak Walton, Charles Cotton"
Bill James Presents Stats 1993 Major League Handbook,Bill James
Stats 1991 Major League Handbook,"STATS Inc, Staff Stats Inc, Bill James"
Juggling & Feats of Dexterity (The Pocket Entertainers),
Cinderella Story,"Bill Murray, George Peper"
Reds in Black & White,"Greg Rhodes, Mark Stang"
"1,000 to 1!","Malcolm Barr Sr., Tom Ardies"
Passing Rhythms,
Greatest Stars of the NBA Volume 9,"Nba, Tokyopop"
The Dictionary of Sport (Sport Reference),
Heinz Field Touchdowns to Tailgating,"Charles Reichblum, Rania Harris"
Greatest Stars of the NBA Volume 10,"Nba, Tokyopop"
Best Dives' Snorkeling Adventures (3rd Edition) (Best Dives Snorkeling Adventures),"Joyce Huber, Jon Huber, Claudia Sammartino"
Sport Bibliography,
Down Time,
Light From A Thousand Campfires,"Fred G. Baker, Hannah Pavlik"
The Tandem Book,"Angel Rodriguez, Carla Black"
The Unofficial Guide to Hockey's Most Unusual Records,"Don Weekes, Kerry Banks"
4Wd Trails,"Peter Massey, Jeanne Wilson"
4WD Adventures,"Peter Massey, Jeanne Wilson"
4Wd Trails,"Peter Massey, Jeanne Wilson"
Bareboat Cruising,"Us Sailing Association, U S Sailing Association"
"Complete Tang Soo Do Manual, from White Belt to Black Belt, Vol. 1",Ho Sik Pak
Return to Glory,
Fly Patterns of Alaska,
Complete Tang Soo Do Manual,Grandmaster Ho Sik Pak
"Complete Tang Soo Do Manual, from White Belt to Black Belt, Vol. 1",Grandmaster Ho Sik Pak
The Mystery of Golf,"Arnold Haultain, Herbert Warren Wind"
Static Line Parachuting Techniques And Training,U.S. Army
Northwest Sea Disasters,"Leif Terdal , John Keiter Keiter"
Emergency Navigation Card,David Burch
M16A1 and M16A2 Rifle Marksmanship,U.S. Army
The Smell Of Astroturf In The Afternoon,"Bill Horner, Brian Feldman"
Cruising Guide to the Hawaiian Islands,"Bob Mehaffy, Carolyn Mehaffy"
California Trails High Sierra Region,"Peter Massey, Jeanne Wilson, Angela Titus"
"The Compleat Angler, or the Contemplative Man's Recreation","Izaak Walton, Charles Cotton"
California Trails Desert Region,"Peter Massey, Jeanne Wilson, Angela Titus"
Colorado Trails North Central Region,"Peter Massey, Jeanne Wilson"
California Trails Northern Sierra Region,"Peter Massey, Jeanne Wilson, Angela Titus"
Great Hockey Teams West (Amazing Stories) [BOX SET] (Amazing Stories),"Monte Stewart, Justin Beddall, Rich Mole"
California Trails Central Mountains Region,"Peter Massey, Jeanne Wilson, Angela Titus"
Kansas Speedway,"Curt Cavin, Sammie Lukaskiewicz"
Pure Dynamite,"Tom Billington, Alison Coleman"
Great Hockey Goalies of Today (Amazing Stories),Chris Robinson
Pocket Guide to Fly Fishing for Largemouth Bass,"Ron Cordes, Gary Lafontaine, Cordes Lafontaine"
Utah Trails Southwest Region,"Peter Massey, Jeanne Wilson"
Hail Mary,Drew Pearson
Muscle Building 101,Robert Kennedy
Arm-A-Gettin',Robert Kennedy
101 Linebacker Drills,"Jerry Sandusky, Cedric X. Bryant"
All Purpose Offenses for Mens and Womens Basketball (The Art & Science of Coaching Series),"Mike Harkins, Jerry Krause"
Play Golf Forever,"Michael Jaffe, Brian Tarcy, Ron Brizzie"
"Football's Quick Passing Game, Vol. I - Fundamentals and Techniques","Andrew Coverdale, Dan Robinson"
The Delaware Wing-T,"Harold R. Raymond, Ted Kempski"
Parachuting,"Dan Poynter, Mike Turoff"
Bill James Present Stats 1998 Batter Vs. Pitcher Match-Ups! (STATS Batter Versus Pitcher Match-Ups),Bill James
Heads-up Baseball,"Ken Ravizza, Tom Hanson"
Elephants and Ivory,"John Alfred Jordan, John Prebble, Mike Resnick"
Bill James Presents...Stats 1995 Minor League Handbook (STATS Minor League Handbook),Bill James
"Bill James Presents Stats Major League Handbook 2000 (Bill James Presents Stats Major League Handbook, 2000)",Bill James
Ballpark Sourcebook,"Oscar A. Palacios, Oscar Palacios, Inc. STATS, Don Zminda"
Bill James Presents Stats 2000,Bill James
Walking in Sicily (Cicerone International Cycling),Gillian Price
Who Is the Master Omraam Mikhael Aivanhov (Testimonials Ser),
"The ""Star"" Family Walks (Cicerone Guide)","John Spencer, Ann Beedham"
Walking in the Black Forest,"Fleur Speakman, Colin Speakman"
2006 Sports Market Place Directory,
The Zone,"Floriano Marziali, Vincenzo Mora"
Highland Broadsword,
Appalachian Trail Thru-Hikers' Companion (2005),"Appalachian Long Distance Hikers Association, Appalachian Long Distance Hikers Associa"
Coaching the 5-3-2 with a Sweeper,"Eugenio Fascetti, Romedio Scaia"
The Coaching Philosophies of Louis van Gaal and the Ajax Coaches,"Henny Kormelink, Tjeu Seeverens"
Kung Fu Elements,"Liang, Shou-Yu, Wen-Ching Wu"
How to Improve the 7 Speeds of Soccer,"Neil Sedwick, Mikael Thyron"
Pocket Guide to Outdoor Survival,"Ron Cordes, Gary Lafontaine, Stan Bradshaw"
Keeping Score,"Carter Ramzel, Lee Tunnell"
Chipper Jones ,Hank Aaron
Gold in Trib 1,Douglas Anderson
Nba Basketball: An Official Fan's Guide (NBA Basketball: An Official Fan's Guide),"Mark Vancil, Don Jozwiak"
Kurtis-Kraft Midget,"Bill Montgomery, Bill Montgomery "
Sports (Brick),"Jonathan Hayden, Peter Feierabend"
Us Soccer Official Rules of Soccer,"US Soccer, FIFA"
Tube Flies Two,"Mark Mandell, Bob Kenly"
Official Athletic College Workbook,
Play Golf in the Zone ,"Garry Martin, Derek Ingram"
Fishing Bc,"Russell Mussio, Wesley Mussio"
Waterfront Trail & Greenway Mapbook,"Dun-Map Inc., Waterfront Regeneration Trust"
Western Mayfly Hatches,"Rick Hafele, Dave Hughes"
The 1998-99 Hockey Annual,"Murray Townsend, Townsend"
Brett,"Brett Hull, Kevin Allen"
Yosemite,"Alexander Huber, Zak Heinz"
Official 2005 NCAA Men's Basketball Records (Ncaa Mens Basketball Records),
Greed & Glory,"William Houston, David Shoalts"
Baseball Forever,"Ralph Kiner, Danny Peary"
Fishing Bc,"Russell Mussio, Wesley Mussio, Jason Marleau"
"Official Rules of Major League Baseball 2000 (Official Rules of Major League Baseball, 2000)",Major League Baseball
"Great Practices,Great Games",John Mayer
Hermann Buhl,"Reinhold Messner, Hofler Horst"
Windward Crossings,
Northern California River Maps & Fishing Guide,
2007 Official Rules of Major League Baseball,
Oregon River Map & Fishing Guide,
The Book of Boxing,"W. C. Heinz, Nathan Ward"
Win the Bermuda Bowl With Me,"Jeff Meckstroth, Marc Smith"
Recreation Programming,"J. Robert Rossman, Barbara Elwood Schaltter"
Walk! Lanzarote (Walk),"David Brawn, Ros Brawn"
San Francisco Giants,"Matt Johanson, Wylie Wong"
Play REAL Golf,"K., Tracy Roberts, Stephen Plummer"
The 100 Greatest Minor League Baseball Teams of the 20th Century,"Bill Weiss , Marshall Wright"
Donnie Allison,"Donnie Allison, Jimmy Creed"
Let's Talk.....Auburn!,"Kevin, Lynn, Robbie, Bateman"
Rhodes Dodecanese Samos (Walking the Greek Islands),"Dieter Graf, Christian Ucke"
Pro Football Prospectus,"Sean Lahman, Todd Greanier"
Baseball Prospectus,"Joseph Sheehan, Chris Kahrl, Clay Davenport"
Epic (Adrenaline),
Dave Mackay Story,"Dave Mackay, Martin Knight"
Badfellas,"John Sugden, Tomlinson, Alan."
Masters of the Baize,"Luke Williams, Paul Gadsby"
"Out of the Rough: Booze, Birdies and a Driving Ambition","Barclay Howard, Jonathan Russell, Russell Howard"
Formula One Encyclopedia,"Carlton Books, Bruce Jones"
Fighting Fans,
A Dream Come True,"Andrew Quirke, Doug Laughton"
From the Himalaya to Skye,Norman Collie
The Spirit of Cheltenham,
The Insider's Guide to Manchester United ,"John Doherty, Ivan Ponting"
No Pain No Gain,"Kevin Ward, Dave Sampson"
Cathy,"Cathy Freeman, Scott Gullan"
Thames Valley Cycle Route (Sustrans National Cycle Network),
Fighting Fans,
50 Phabulous Phillies,"Skip Clayton, Jeff Moeller"
"John Laskowski's Tales from the Hoosier Locker Room, Limited Edition","John Laskowski, Stan Sutton"
Smash-Mouth,"Elvin Bethea, Mark Adams"
Red Squirrel Guide to Women's Soccer 1999 World Cup,"Upublish. Com, Randal Charlton"
"Tales from the Drag Strip with ""Big Daddy"" Don Garlits","Don Garlits, Bill Stephens"
On Wisconsin!,"Don Kopriva, Jim Mott"
The Professional Wrestlers' Instructional and Workout Guide,"Harley Race, Ricky Steamboat, Les Thatcher, Alex Marvez"
Ron Kittle's Tales from the White Sox Dugout,"Ron Kittle, Bob Logan"
Denny Matthews's Tales from the Royals Dugout,"Denny Matthews, Matt Fulks"
More Tales from the Red Sox Dugout,"Jim Prime, Bill Nowlin"
Tales from the Tribe Dugout,"Russell Schneider, Rich Schneider"
Fish Sticks,"Peter Botte, Alan Hahn"
Legends of N.C. State Basketball,Tim Peeler
Richard Petty,"Tim Bongard, Robert Coulter"
Sailing Designs Volume Four,Robert H. Perry
Gilles Villemure's Tales from the Ranger Locker Room,"Gilles Villemure, Michael Shalin"
Football Officials Guidebook: Crews of Four and Five ,"Jeffrey Stern, George Demetriou, Jerry Grunska"
Kenny Bernstein,"Kenny Bernstein, Bill Stephens"
Shirley Muldowney's Tales from the Track,"Shirley Muldowney, Bill Stephens"
The San Diego Padres Encyclopedia,"Joe Naiman, David Porter"
Brian Urlacher,
The Yankee Encyclopedia,"Gerry Wood, Lorian Hemingway"
Clemson,"Sam Blackman, Bob Bradley, Chuck Kriese"
The Fighting Irish Football Encyclopedia Limited Edition,"Michael R. Steele, Mike Steele"
Road to Canton,"Marcus Allen, Matt Fulks"
Fish Sticks,"Alan Hahn, Peter Botte"
Steve McMichael's Tales from the Chicago Bears Sideline,"Steve McMichael, Phil Ariva"
Perspektiven des Sportsponsoring,Jens-Uwe Babin
Make Me the Best Lacrosse Player (Make Me the Best Athlete),Jess Myers
Physiologie et méthodologie de l'entraînement,Véronique Billat
Platano Power,J. C. Malone
Bonn in Bewegung,"Dittmar Dahlmann, Norbert Schlossmacher, Joachim Scholtyseck"
The Complete Diving Guide,"Colleen Ryan, Brian Savage"
Typography Now,"Various, Edward Booth-Clibborn"
Sports Agility,"Frank Costello, E. J. Kreis"
The Ultimate Runner's Journal,"Dennis Craythorn, Rich Hanna"
Softball,"Susan B Craig, Kenneth D. Johnson, Susan Craig"
Run With The Best,"Tony Benson, Irv Ray"
Quest for the Cup,
The Four Magic Moves to Winning Golf,"Joe Dante, Len Elliot"
Chicken Soup for the Sports Fan's Soul,"Jack Canfield, Mark Victor Hansen"
Ultimate Cincinnati Bengals Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Master's Legacy,Rick Grayson
123 Cheer with Me!,"Scott Borgmier, Lauren Borgmier, Noor Moiz"
Ultimate Crystal Palace FC Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Ultimate Brighton & Hove Albion FC Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Cycling,"Creig S. Hoyt, Julie Hoyt"
On the Other Hand,"Steve Anderson, Paul Devere"
The Country Sportsman's Record Book and Journal,"John Humphreys, John Paley"
"Le Champion, sa vie, sa mort",Claire Carrier
Watakushi no shozoga,Tsuneyoshi Takeda
Nyu supotsu jiten =,Isato Kitagawa
Sport-- et désir de guerre,Claude Roggero
L' entraînement en pleine nature,Véronique Billat
Pocket Golf Etiquette,
Weight Training (Elements of Learning),"David Newbery, Kurt Kaufmann, John A. W. Baker"
Guide to Effective Coaching Principles and Practice,"Billie J. Jone, L. Janet Wells, Rachael E. Peters, Dewayne J. Johnson"
Outdoorsman's Emergency Manual,
Golf Skills Analysis,
Official Softball Scorebook,
Nagws Volleyball Rule Book 2001-2002,
"Completed Research in Health, Physical Education, Recreation, and Dance, 1986 (Completed Research in Health, Physical Education, Recreation, and Dance)",
Paul Elvstrom Explains the Yacht Racing Rules,
Powerboat Guide,"Mark Parker, Ed McKnew"
Yoga Dictionary,"Wood, Ernest"
Youth League Hitting,"Tony Oliva, Jack Clary"
The Good Skiing Guide 1996,
"The Good Skiing Guide, 1997",
1987 Box Score Book,"Craig Carter, Larry Wigge, Tom Barnidge, Ron Smith, Richard Waters"
Final Four ,"Sporting News, The Sporting News"
Sporting News 1990-91 College Basketball Yearbook,
The Sporting News,
1994 National League Box Scores and Official Averages,"Craig Carter, Dave Sloan"
Best of New Zealand's Toughest Golf Holes,"Tom Hepburn, Selwyn Jacobson"
Handicap! Finding the Key Horse,"David L. Christopher, Albert Beerower, Albert C. Beerbower"
Golf,
The World of Sports/City Sports/Mountain Sports/Summer Sports/Winter Sports,"Isidro Sanchez, Carme Peris"
Mountaineering,
The Art and Science of Coaching Linebackers (Sagamore Sports Series),"Jerry Sandusky, Cedric X. Bryant"
Art and Science of Racquetball,"D. Ray Collins, Patrick Hodges, Michael G. Marshall"
Mr. Byte Presents Computers in Sports,Christopher Brown
Double Eagle Guide to Camping Along the Lewis and Clark Trail,"Thomas Preston, Elizabeth Preston"
National Speedway Directory 2004 (National Speedway Directory),
National Speedway Directory 1999 (National Speedway Directory),
Who Runs Professional Sports,"Marie T. Finn, Nancy L. Jellison"
"National Speedway Directory 2002 (National Speedway Directory, 2002)",
National Speedway Directory 2003 (National Speedway Directory),
Official 1993-94 Synchronized Swimming Handbook,
Official 1993-94 Synchronized Swimming Handbook,
Three Books on Fishing,
Fundamentals of Fitness,
Fresh Fiction for Fresh Water Fishing,"Harry Groome, Sid Gustafson, Fred DeFauw et al"
Football Powers Of The South,
Football Powers Of The South,
Football Powers Of The South,
Football Powers Of The South,
Football Powers Of The South,
Football Powers Of The South,
Sheep and Sheep Hunting,
Football Powers Of The South,
Football Powers Of The South,
Football Powers Of The South,
An Unexpected Miracle,Demos Shakarian
Conditioning for Tennis,"Bill Wright, Bill Manning"
Trout Chaser's Journal,
Conditioning for Wrestling,"Dan Gable, PhD James A. Peterson"
Eddycat Brings Soccer to Mannersville (Social Skill Builders for Children),"Ada Barnett, Nicole Wurfer, Mark Hoffmann"
Hemmings' Vintage Auto Almanac (Hemmings' Collector Car Almanac),"Terry Ehrich, Dave Brownell"
The Coaches Collection of Women's Volleyball Drills,"Bob Bertucci, Mario Trebitch"
Physics Olympics Handbook,
Stakes Winners Annual of 1990 (Blood-Horse),
Auctions of 1990 (Annual Supplement to the Blood-Horse Magazine Series),
Adapted Aquatics,Canadian Red Cross Society.
The Wonder of Yoho,
Hiking the Historic Crowsnest Pass,"Jane Ross, William Tracy"
"Recovery and Regeneration/Recuperation Et Regeneration (Sportbiblio, 19)",
Mindpower: How to Develop the Mental Skills Necessary to Maximize Performance ,
Coaching Theory Manual - Level 2,
"Canadian Volleyball Association Rule Book, 1987-88",
Night Diving,"Ken Loyst, Robert Von Maier, Marty Snyderman"
800 The College-Prep Game,
Coaching Theory Manual - Level 3,
The Ultimate Track and Field Drill Book,"Robert Lasorsa, Remi Korchemny"
The Ultimate Baseball Drill Book,"Gordon Gillespie, James Peterson"
Greco Roman Sports and Games,
Fishing Hot Spots Presque Isle Area (North Central Wisconsin Series),"Bob Knops, Russ Warye"
Pat Riley L. A. Lakers,
James Worthy,"Jerry Carpenter, Steve Dimeglio"
"Fishing the Mississippi Pools 5A, 6,7,8.","Steve Brich, Bob Knops"
Ohio Golfers Map and Guide 2001,
The Philadelphia Sports Wiz Trivia Quiz,"Harry Patterson, Jack Kreismer"
2000 Ohio Golfers Map and Guide,
Spalding Rebounding Drill Book (Spalding Sports Library),"Sven Nater, James Peterson"
The Black and Blue Rivalry,
The Stock Car Racing Chassis,Steve Smith
Stock Car Driving Techniques,"Benny Parsons, Steve Smith"
Guns for Women,"George Flynn, Alan Gottlieb"
World Record Game Fishes 1994,
Fishing Planner,
Sports Americana III,"Charles S. Hellman, Robert A. Tiritilli"
Practical Football Coaching Techniques,Bernard Taylor
Michigan's Snow Trails,
Horse Racing-Pick Six and Pick Nine,"Robert Serotic, Love"
The Official Book of the 1994 World Series,
"Boone and Crockett Club's 19th Big Game Awards, 1983-85 (Boone and Crockett Club's Big Game Awards)",
Chicago Cubs Yearbook 1988,
1988 Giants Yearbook,
Down the Fairway (Classics of Golf),"Robert T. Jones, O. B. Keeler"
Hislops Running Ledger,
Usta College Tennis Guide 1992-93,
Milwaukee Brewers Facts and Trivia (Sports Facts and Trivia),
Packer Legends in Facts,
St. Louis Rams,"Linda Everson, Lin Everson"
Rules of Tennis and Cases and Decisions,
Chicago White Sox Facts and Trivia (Sports Facts and Trivia),
Wisconsin Badgers Facts & Trivia,"Jeff Everson, Linda Everson"
Stage by Stage,"Russell Brookes, Neil Perkins"
South Tyrol (Sunflower Countryside Guides),"F. Hauleitner, W. Klier"
Target Teaching,"William F. Luehe, Richard H. Ehrgott"
"One Encounter - One Chance, the Essence of Take Nami Do Karate",
One-On-One Handbook,"Michael Taraban, Robin Tolleson"
Flyfishing Southwestern Colorado,"Mark D.Recreation Williams, Fishing"
Powerzone Sports Camp,
Winter Recreation in California and Western Nevada,
Century of Sports,
Venture Survival,
Bowling Basics,
Coaching Hockey,
Psychology and Sociology of Sport,"Lee Vander Veldenn, James H. Humphrey"
Nba Two Pack,
Aim High,"Dave Johnson, Verne Becker"
Golf Instructor's Guide,
Trivia Mania,
The 1988-1989 National Directory of College Athletics (National Directory of College Athletics (Men's Edition)),
The International Professional Rodeo Association Inc.,
Rowing Fundamentals,
Motorsports,"Susan L. Coman, Sharon Mason"
Hockey All Stars,
MacRoss,
"Official Playing Rules of USA Hockey, Inc. for 1993-94 and 1994-95 Seasons",
Bleeding Orange,"John Maher, Kirk Bohls"
Bears...Boys & Katie King,"Jim White, Andy White"
Personal Health,"Patricia A. Floyd, Sandra E. Mimms, Caroline Yelding"
Sports Psyching,
Yachting,Meyer
"The Complete Angler V1: Or, The Contemplative Man's Recreation","Izaak Walton, Charles Cotton"
Teens Crime and Community,
Karate Training Methods,
Journal of the Philosophy of Sport,
Journal of the Philosophy of Sport 2005 (Journal of the Philosophy of Sport),
Valais Alps East,"Les Swindin, Peter Fleming"
Spalding Baseball Guide 1899,
Reach Baseball Guide 1889,
Advertising and Promoting Your Golf Facility (Ngf Infopacs),
Developing New Players,
TotalGolf®Instructional CD-ROM,"Tim Rosaforte, Todd Anderson"
Pocket Sports Guide 1995,
Slow Play,
The 1998 Official ACC Basketball Handbook,"Bell South, Atlantic Coast Conference, BellSouth Advertising, Publishing, The Atlantic Coast Conference"
Coaching Youth Baseball,"Bob Kirchmer, Bryan Kirchmer"
George Best,"Bernie Smith, Maureen Hunt"
Futuristic Fifteen Man Rugby,"Bert Holcroft, Margo Holcroft"
Game for a Laugh,"Ally McCoist, Ian Durrant"
Dreams and Songs to Sing,"Tom Campbell, Pat Woods"
Captain's Log,"Gary McAllister, Graham Clark"
Kings of the Ice,
Winter Climbs in the Lake District (Cicerone Winter and Ski Mountaineering),"R. Bennett, Bill Birkett, Brian Davidson"
"Tibetan Terrier Champions, 1988-1994","E. E. Camino, Jan Linzy"
Getting into Golf Shape,"Neil, Ph.D. Wolkodoff, Scott Robert Hays"
Caribbean Reef Fish (Pisces Photo Pak),"Lisa Walker, Steve Blount"
Holistic Golf,"Michael Szapko, Frank Coffey, Colby Allerton"
Shrimp and Spey Flies for Salmon,"Chris Mann, Robert Gillespie"
Great Britain & Ireland's Toughest Golf Holes,"Tom Hepburn, Selwyn Jacobson"
Modern Drills for Track & Field,"Joe Walker, Jay Silvester, Rick Attig"
Paul Wardlaw's Competitive Drills for Tennis,
1991-92 National Collegiate Championships,
Official 1993 Ncaa Basketball (Ncaa Mens Basketball Records),
Decisions on the Rules of Golf,
Golfing in Washington,
Coaching Tips for the 90's,"Doug Beal, Mary Jo Peppler, Laura Kessel"
Fundamentals of Fitness,"Judson L. Biasotto, Edward H. Ritter"
Fishing Journal,"Mark Koenig, Paul Peterson"
Age Group Swimming Around the World,"Mary T. Meagher, Eric A. Wagner"
Tri Swimming,
Swimming,"Bill Wadley, Robert J. H. Kiphuth"
Ultra,
"Drugs, Sex, Sports, and American Pastimes","Judd Biasotti, Arne Ferrando"
Triple Header,"Judd Biasiottom, Arny Ferrando"
Usvba Officiating Guidebook,"Dick Smith, John Kessel"
The Pool Book,"Nan L. Gifford, Tbl"
21 Great New Zealand Trout Waters,
Oakland A's Greatest Hits 1968-79 (Vest Pocket ed),"Curtis L. Deberg, Rodney W. Johnson"
Jack Berry's 1993 Guide to Michigan Golf,Jack Berry
Philadelphia Phillies' Greatest Hits,"Curtis L. Deberg, Rodney W. Johnson"
Desaru Presents Mark H. McCormack's the World of Professional Golf 1991 (World of Professional Golf),"Mark H. McCormack, Lawrence Levy"
Chicago Cubs Greatest Hits the 70s (Vest Pocket ed),"Curtis L. Deberg, Rodney W. Johnson"
San Francisco Giants Greatest Hits the 80s (Vest Poctet ed),"Curtis L. Deberg, Rodney W. Johnson"
"Eldridge Tide and Pilot Book, 1997 (Annual)",
Paddle to Perfection Toolbox (Getting Off the Ground Series),"Gary Solomon, Mark Solomon"
"Eldridge Tide and Pilot Book, 1996",
Paddle To Perfection,
A Basic Guide to In-Line Hockey,
A Basic Guide to Roller Sports,
A Basic Guide to Ice-Hockey,
A Basic Guide to Walking,
Basic Guide to Baseball,
National Road Race Encyclopedia (Weddington's Running Series),
Assessment Tools for Recreational Therapy,"Joan Burlingame, Thomas M. Blaschko"
Following the Fairways,Nick Edmund
Stats Pro Football Sourcebook 2001 (Stats Pro Football Sourcebook),
2003 Baseball Blue Book (Baseball Blue Book (Looseleaf)),John Montague
Pro Football Revealed,"STATS Inc, Stats Publishing"
"Stats 1996 Baseball Scoreboard (7th ed, 1996)","John Dewan, Don Zminda"
Pro Football Revealed,
2000 Baseball Blue Book (Baseball Blue Book (Looseleaf)),John Montague
1998 Baseball Blue Book (Annual),John Montague
1999 Baseball Blue Book (Baseball Blue Book (Looseleaf)),John Montague
Stats 1996,Bill James
Stats Inc. Pro Football Scoreboard 2000 (STATS Pro Football Scoreboard),
Stats 1995 Player Profiles (Stats Player Profiles),"Tim Kurkjian, Stats Publication"
2001 Baseball Blue Book (Baseball Blue Book (Looseleaf)),John Montague
Great American Automobiles of the 60s,"Richard M. Langworth, James R. Flammang, Consumer Guide"
Golf (Galison Halfnotes),
The New Big Book of Jewish Baseball,"Peter S. Horvitz, Joachim Horvitz"
Northern Limestone (Rockfax Climbing Guide),"Chris Craggs, Allan James, Mark Glaster"
So You Think You're a Hockey Fan,Bob Parker
"Surfing, Rollerblading & Skateboarding for Fun & Profit",
Oakland A's Trivia,"Paul Cunniffe, Daniel Klein"
So You Think You're a Philadelphian,"Monica Anderson, Mike Anderson"
Cool Careers for Girls in Sports (Cool Careers for Girls Series),"Ceel Pasternak, Linda Thornburg"
Throw It and Pray,"Michael McKenzie, Steve Cameron"
Youth Volleyball,"Terry Liskevych, Don Patterson"
Fast Break,"Gary Hoenig, Turner Pub"
And the Crowd Goes Wild/And the Fans Roared (Two Books with four Audio CDs Boxed Gift Set),"Joe Garner, Bob Costas"
Inside the Yankees,"Bill ""Killer"" Kane, Maury Allen"
1996 Senior Pga Tour,"Triumph Books, Pga Senior Tour"
Greatest Moments in Texas Football History,
Wta Tour,
The Amistad Pictorial History of the African American Athlete: Volume 1 ,"Francis C. Harris, Charles F. Harris"
Atp Tour 1995,"Triumph Books, Atp Tour"
The Sport of Learning,"Vince Fudzie, Andre Hayes"
Ncaa Basketball,
The Official 1997 Women's College Basketball Records Book,
Official Big Ten Football Fan's Guide 1997-1998,"Triumph Books, Big Ten Conference"
Greatest Moments in Texas A&m Football History,
Renovating Your Golf Course (Ngf Infopacs),
Golf Consumer Spending in the U.S,
Planning & Conducting Competitive Golf Events,
"Developing Golf Courses on Landfills, Strip-Mines and Other Unusual Location (Ngf Infopacs)",
Improving Golf Car Fleet Operations (Ngf Infopacs),
The Golf Industry On-Line,
Developing Golf Communities (Ngf Infopacs),
Golf Balls,
Spikeless Shoes,
Custom Club Fitting,
Investment Opportunities in Golf (Ngf Infopacs),
Golf Participation in the U.S,
"How to Plan, Build and Operate a Successful Golf Range",
1997 Directory of Golf,
Trends in the Golf Industry 1986-1995,
Golf Ranges,
Golf Course Design (Ngf Infopacs),
Employee Safety for the Golf Facility (Ngf Infopacs),
Executive and Par 3 Golf Courses,
Indoor Ranges and Golf Entertainment Centers (Ngf Infopacs),
Golf Manager's Handbook,
The Best .. the Most .. the Greatest,
Successful Management Practices,
Golf Course Financing/Refinancing (Ngf Infopacs),
Junior Golf,
Economic Impact and Benefits of Golf Course Development (Ngf Infopacs),
Technology Trends in the Golf Industry (Ngf Infopacs),
Directory of Publishers,
Titanium,
Golf Management Companies,
Insurance and Risk Management for the Golf Course (Ngf Infopacs),
Golf Manager's Handbook,
Knockoffs and Counterfeits,
Managing Caddie Programs (Ngf Infopacs),
Golf Facilities in the U.S,
"Lightning, Storms, Natural Disasters and Your Golf Facility (Ngf Infopacs)",
Miniature and Putting Courses,
The Global Dimensions of the Golf Industry (Ngf Infopacs),
Developing Your Career in the Golf Industry (Ngf Infopacs),
Golf Online,
Managing and Training Personnel in the Golf Facility (Ngf Infopacs),
Senior Golfers,
Inside Sports Soccer,
Our Goal Is Gold,"Everett Sports and Marketing, U S A Hockey, Nhl"
San Antonio Spurs Official Team Yearbook,
New Jersey Nets Official Team Yearbook,
The Soccer Coach's Pocket Handbook,"S. Jorge Mena, Stephen York"
Rock Climbs of Southwestern Utah & the Arizona Strip,Goss
Golf - The Game for Life,
Chicago Bulls Official Team Yearbook,
Malta and Gozo Walking Guides (Discovery Walking Guide),"D.A. Brawn, Ros Brawn"
New York Rangers 1998-99 Official Team Yearbook,
Tales from Colorado Football,"Jay Leeuwenburg, David Plati, Dave Plati"
The Official's Guide,"George Demetriou, Steven Ellinger, Bill Topp"
Chicago Historical Block,
Runnin' Utes Basketball,
Football Officials Guidebook ¿ Mechanics For Crews of Four & Five Officials,"Jeffrey Stern, George Demetriou, Jerry Grunska"
Football Rule Differences 2003,"Paul Whiteside, George Demetriou, Jeffrey Stern"
Tigers Big Block,
Football Rule Differences 2000,
Football Rule Differences 2004,"Jeffrey Stern, George Demetriou, Paul Whiteside"
Jets,"Larry Bowa, Barry Bloom"
Boston Sports Encyclopedias,
Baseball in Dutchess County,"Joseph V. Poillucci, Joseph Poillucci"
World Series Champion,
Football Rule Differences 1999,"Paul Whiteside, Jeffrey Stern, George Demetriou"
Red Sox Heroes Block: Nomar : Fenway's Favorite/Ted Williams ,"Jim Prime, Bill Nowlin"
Greatest Moments in Tennessee Vols Football History,
Out by a Step,"Mike Shalin, Neil Shalin"
Rules for Refs,
Fishing Ontario,"Jason Marleau, Russell Mussio"
Junior High School Intramurals,
Creativity In Sport,"John Eisenberg, Malcolm Levin, Michael Eben, Herbert Eisenberg, Michael Katz, Stan Adamson, David Cheifetz, Mark Hanna, Bobby Moffat"
Fishing Bc,"Russell Mussio, Wesley Mussio"
Fishing Ontario,"Jason Marleau, Russell Mussio"
Fishing Ontario,"Russell Mussio, Wesley Mussio, Jason Marleau"
Hockey Coaching ABCs: A Program for Developing the Complete Player ,"Juhani Wahlsten, Tom Molloy"
Jeff Gordon (Champion Sports Biography),"Ken Sparling, Joseph Romain"
The Racing Tribe,Kate Fox
1997 Physical Activity Benchmark,"C. L. Craig, S. J. Russell, C. Cameron, A. Beaulieu"
Your Guide To Public Golf Courses,"Jim Molis, Charles Kelley"
Negro Baseball...before Integration,"Effa Manley, Leon Herbert Hardwick"
Full-color Greylock State Reservation/Statewide Locator Map,"Appalachian Mountain Club Books, AMC"
Handbook to the Illinios River Canyon,"James W. Quinn, James G. King"
SW Massachusetts/Mt. Tom & Holyoke/Wachusett Dogtown Map,"Appalachian Mountain Club Books, AMC"
SW Massachusetts/Mt. Tom & Holyoke/Wachusett Dogtown Map (T),"Appalachian Mountain Club Books, AMC"
A Glossary of Training,
Sport A. S. I. S. T.,"NCAA, James P. Britt, Naia"
Rhode Island NW-SW/Blue Hills Trail Map (T),"Appalachian Mountain Club Books, AMC"
Atlanta Braves Greatest Hits,"Curtis L. Deberg, Rodney W. Johnson"
Los Angeles Dodgers Greatest Hits the 60s (Vest Pocket ed),"Curtis L. Deberg, Rodney W. Johnson"
Greatest Athletes of the 20th Century (The Century Collection),
Basic Guide to Running (Official Us Olympic Sports Series),
Following the Fairways (Sporting Annuals),Nick Edmund
Tidal Streams Between Portland Bill and St.Alban's Head,"Peter Bruce, Gillie Watson"
"Detroit Pistons Yearbook, 1991-1992",
Sports for Fun & Profit,
Hunting for Fun & Profit (For Fun & Profit Series),
Michigan Team Defense,"Lloyd Carr, Greg Mattison"
Football,"Steve Young, Tom Newell"
Cavalletti,"Reiner Klimke, Ingrid Klimke"
"Great Practices, Great Games","John Mayer, Gene Pingatore"
Playball,
"Grand River, Michigan (River Journal)","Jim Bedford, Tony Pagliei"
The Official Rules of Soccer,
Nba Basketball,"Mark Vancil, Don Jozwiak"
The Sport of Learning,"Vince Fudzie, Andre Hayes"
Ncaa Football,"National Collegiate Athletic Association, NCAA"
Ncaa Basketball,
Retraining the Harness Racehorse,"Mary A. Donovan-Wright, Robyn Cuffey"
Official Sec Football Guide 1997-1998,"Southeastern Conference Staff, Southeastern Conference"
"Hey Kids, Start Golf Right!","John Degarmo, Sam Wiley"
Official Big 12 Football Guide 1997 (Official Big 12 Football Guide),"Big 12 Conference Staff, Big 12 Conference"
Finding Information in Ngf's Electronic Library,
Employment Policies and Personnel Issues for Golf Facilities (Ngf Infopacs),
High Interest Women Golfers - Target Marketing for Success,
Environmentally Friendly Golf Courses (Ngf Infopacs),
Golfer's Survival Kit,
Portraits of Excellence,"Lyle Niedens, Steve Buckner"
3- Step Approach to Better Jumping,"Vern Gambetta, Tom Justice, Ken Kontor, Dan McDounough"
Raccoon Hunting Basics,"Thomas C. Rakow, Bob Rakow"
Inside Track to the Triple Crown,"Anita Scialli, Maryann Hagerty, Joseph Avenick"
Still Wide Open,"Brad Doty, Dave Argabright"
White-Tipped Orange Masts,"Peter K. Prybot, Peter, K. Prybot"
Washington Wizards Official Team Yearbook,
Skiing with Style,"Steve E. Humphries, Robert Frohlich"
35 Madeira Walks,"David Brawn, Ros Brawn"
Philadelphia Flyers 1998-99 Pictorial Yearbook,
Washington Capitals 1998-99 Official Team Yearbook,"Matt Williams, Doug Hicks, Jesse Price, Amy Keller"
Los Angeles Clippers Official Team Yearbook,
Charlotte Hornets Official Team Yearbook,
The 1998-99 Carolina Hurricanes Yearbook,
The Art and Science of Racehorse Training,Michael Marshall
The National Hockey League Official Guide & Record Book 1998-99 (Serial),"National Hockey League., Nhl"
Lanzarote Tour and Trail Super-durable Map (Discovery Walking Guides),"David Brawn, Ros Brawn"
Philadelphia 76ers Official Team Yearbook,
"20th Century Yankees - ""The Best That Ever Played""","Jim Gross, Charlie Olgiati"
Cleveland Cavaliers Official Team Yearbook,
Seattle Supersonics Official Team Yearbook,
From Behind the Red Line,"Tod Hartje, Lawrence Martin"
Post-Secondary Student Leadership Development Guide,
Athletics for Advanced Level Physical Education/sport Studies,"Jan Roscoe, Jannette Veronica Roscoe"
Derby to York Cycle Route (Sustrans National Cycle Network),
The Detroit Red Wings,"John Morrison, Doug McLatchy"
Touched by Frost,"Jimmy Frost, Lucy Johnson"
Horses to Follow,
"""Racing Post"" Flat Horses of 2004",
Safe Boating Plus/Sécurité Nautique Plus,"IDON EAST Corporation, Marine Institute of Memorial University of Newfoundland., Fisheries"
Skiing Legends and The Laurentian Lodge Club,"Catharine McKenty, Neil McKenty"
Winter Trails in the White Moutains of New Hampshire,"Collective, Larry Garland"
Greatest Moments in Auburn Tigers Football History,
Stories Of Survival,
"Beckett Racing Price Guide and Alphabetical Checklist (Beckett Racing Collectibles and Die-Cast Price Guide, 7)",
Gillette Rugby League Yearbook 2004-2005,
The Cornish Way Cycle Route (National Cycle Network Route Maps),
Sea to Sea Cycle Route (National Cycle Network Route Maps),
West Midlands Cycle Route (National Cycle Network Route Maps),
Canoeing (Wilderness Education Series),
Enemy Chocolatier (Games),
David Feherty's Irish Pilgrimage,"David Feherty, Brendan Koerner"
Pocket Guide to Target/Field Archery,"Ron Cordes, Gary Lafontaine, Harley W. Reno, Reno Cordes"
Dead Money (Games),
Into the Lion's Den,
101 Offensive Baseball Drills,"Pat McMahon, James Peterson"
Golf-A Mind Game,"Richard Butler, Peter Galvin"
THE BLACK ACES,"Jim ""Mudcat"" Grant, Tom Sabellico, Pat O'Brien"
Tabletop Bowling,Jon Richards
THE BLACK ACES,"Jim ""Mudcat"" Grant, Tom Sabellico, Pat O'Brien"
Karting Yearbook,
Just Champion!,David Bond
Rallycourse,David Williams
Final Whistle - the Coca-Cola Championship (Soccer),
The Rugby League Grounds Guide,"Peter Lush, Dave Farrar"
Kick Off Rugby Premiership (Rugby),
The Open Championship,"Robert Sommers, Michael McDonnell, Robert Green, Andy Farrell, Ron Sirak, John Hopkins"
Stan the Man,"Stan Ternent, Tony Livesey"
The Winning Edge,"Jack Potter, Ashley Mote"
In the Eye of the Typhoon,Frank Tyson
Kick Off (Rugby),
Bibliotheca Piscatoria,"Westwood, Thomas Satchell"
Fishing First Aid (The Freshwater Angler),"Bill Forgey, Dr. Bill Forgey"
Fly-Fishing Knots (The Freshwater Angler),"Creative Publishig International, The Editors of Creative Publishing international"
Smokey,"Earl Hudson, Thomas Mattingly"
A Basic Guide to Alpine Skiing (An Official U.S. Olympic Sports Series),
Super Register 2007,
Super Register 2004,
Gray Ghosts & Lefty's Deceiver,
Sock It To 'Em Tigers,
The 30-06,Bob Shell
The Illustrated History of Running - cancelled ISBN,"Dagny Scott Barrios, The Editors of Runner's World Magazine"
When March Went Mad,Tim Peeler
N.A.P.B.L. Umpire Manual,
I Can Do Rhythmic Gymnastics,"USA Gymnastics, Federacion Espanola De Gimnasia"
The Shooting Star...and You Can Be One Too (The Backyard Coach Series),"Dale Ellis, Tom Newell"
Dirt Road To A Silver Crown,"Bob Gates, John Mahoney, Pat Sullivan, Ed Watson"
Snowmobiling Quick Load,"Barbara Holesinsky, Barbara J. Holesinsky"
Redleg Journal,"Greg Rhodes, John Snyder"
Huddersfield F.C. Story (Memories),
Celtic Trail (Lon Geltaido) (Sustrans National Cycle Network),
Mogollon Rim Illustrated Camping/Hiking Guide,
Intramurals in the Elementary School (Intramural Series),
Munson (Icons of Major League Baseball),Major League Baseball
Golf The Hard Way,"William Kroll, Joseph Kroll"
2007 NTCA Throws Handbook,
From Veer to Eternity,"George Thole, Jerry Foley"
Coaching Special Teams (Art & Science of Coaching),"Al Roberts, Dan Robinson"
Super Register 2006,
OVERHEARD AT THE GAME,"Michael Malice, S. Morgan Friedman"
What Does A limo Driver Know About NASCAR,
Meet the Mets 2008,
Longshot,
Total Stanley Cup,
Rico Petrocelli's Tales from the Impossible Dream (Tales),"Rico Petrocelli, Charles Scoggins"
Slam Dunked,"Ron Gomez, Beryl Shipley"
Official 2008 NCAA Men's Basketball Records Book (Ncaa Mens Basketball Records) (Ncaa Mens Basketball Records),
The Self-defence Manual (Summersdale Martial Arts),"Martin Dougherty, David Birdsall"
Taking It from Behind: From Boycott to Blewett,"Richard Blakey, Andrew Collomosse"
Outdoor Ideas,"Lizzie Matthews, Tbc"
The Blues,"Richard Lerman, David Brown"
Wisden,
The Toffees,Graham Betts
Sailing on French Rivers and Waterways (IGN Grey) (IGN Grey),
Wrestling Reality,"Chris Kanyon, Ryan Clark"
Golfs De France (IGN Grey) (IGN Grey),
Best of the Bruins,"Paul Sterman, Jill Painter"
Official Liverpool Fc Annual 2002 (Annual),
Automobile Year,
Savvy Girls of Summer,"Diedre Silva, Jackie Koney"
Wisden,
"Oh, Hampden in the Sun . . . (Mainstream Sport)","Peter Burns, Pat Woods"
Reliving the Dream,"Derick Allsop, George Best"
The Red and the Black,"Michael Aylwin, Matt Singer"
A Season in Stripes,Michael Tanner
A Bhoy's Own Story,"Paul Lambert, Graham Clark"
The Official England World Cup Book 2002 (World Cup 2002),
Liverpool,
Quick Rules,
Sejours Peche (Fivedit),
Peugeot Golf Guide 2004/2005,
Sla Tillbaka!,
Youth Sport,"William Duquest, Paul De Knop"
"Tronics, Inc.","Claudia Bienias Gilbertson, Leahmy"
The Swing Factory,"Steve Gould, David A. Wilkinson, William Sieghart"
Air Bags Safety,John McCain
Aviation Competition,"JayEtta Z. Hecker, Steven C. Martin"
Oversight of the Professional Boxing Industry,John McCain
Home Run!,
Playful Games and Activities,"Ernest G. Olson, Kathy Martinez"
Tibet¬s Secret Mountain,"Chris Bonington, Charles Clarke"
Official Rules Of Major League Baseball,
A Coache's Guide to Social Issues,Jay J. Coakley
The Concise Encyclopedia of Fishing,"Gareth Purnell, Yates, Alan., Chris Dawn"
Introduction to Yoga,"John Burdick, Elizabeth I. Graham"
Gallina Paulina-paulina The Hen (Superlibros Santillana),Fernando Alonso
Record Mundial De Anita/anita's World Record,
Taming the Wild Outdoors - Building Cooperative Learning Through Outdoor Education,
"Woodall's Western Campground Directory, 2002",
"Woodall's New York, New England & Eastern Canada Campground Guide, 2002",
"Woodall's Frontier West/Great Plains & Mountain Region Campground Guide, 2002",
Sports Illustrated Sports Almanac 2000,Sports Illustrated.
Women's Basketball Drills,
Laurent Giles and His Yacht Designs,"Adrian Lee, Ruby Philpott"
"1989 Official Code/Amateur Athletic Union of the Usa, Inc. (Amateur Athletic Union of the United States Official Code and Directory)",
First Pitching Book (Ibi-103),"Bert Haysom, Bill Haysom, Barbara Haysom"
The First Hitting Book No. 2,"Bert Haysom, Charlie Shuckhart, Barbara Haysom"
Coaches Guide to Women's Basketball (Sagamore Sports Series),"Nancy Lieberman-Cline, Robin Roberts"
1994 Pacific Boating Almanac,
"Hank Stram's Pro Football Scouting Report, 1991 Edition","Hank Stram, J. David Miller"
Play Better Slo Pitch,"Blair Tullis, Dan Osborne"
"How to Buy, Own and Sell a Boat (Without Going Broke)","John Schneider, Don Woodwell"
Pacific Boating Almanac,
Motorsport America,"Autosport International, Inc Staff Autosport International"
"National Speedway Directory 2000 (National Speedway Directory, 2000)",
National Speedway Directory 2005 (National Speedway Directory),
National Speedway Directory 2006 (National Speedway Directory),
"National Speedway Directory 2001 (National Speedway Directory, 2001)",
More Stories of the Old Duck Hunters,
Mystic Seaport Water Craft,"Maynard Bray, Benjamin A. G. Fuller, Peter T. Vermilya"
"The Book of Baseball Records 2000 (Book of Baseball Records, 2000)",Seymour Siwoff
Football Powers Of The South,
The Elias Book of Baseball Records 2005 Edition,Seymour Siwoff
"Register of American Yachts, 1990-91 (Register of American Yachts)",
The Book of Baseball Records 2006 (Elias Book of Baseball Records),Seymour Siwoff
Growing into Baseball,"Mark Gelinas, Albert Marier"
Mixed Gas Diving,"Tom Mount, Bret Gilliam"
"Fishing the Mississippi Pools 3, 4, 5.","Steve Brich, Bob Knops"
Fishing Hot Spots,"Bob Knops, Russ Warye"
Sports Market Place July 1996/With No Supplement,
Lightweight Expeditions,
Ken Cook's Bass Logic,"Ken Cook, Tim Tucker"
Rver's Guide to Solar Battery Charging,"Noel Kirkby, Barbara Kirkby"
Tennis,"Eleanor Owens, Jackie Johnson, Anna McLemore"
"Team Baseball Card Checklist, No 4 (Sport Americana)","Jeff Fritsch, Dennis Eckes"
"The Sport Americana Team Football and Basketball Card Checklist, No 2 (Sport Americana Series)","Jeff Fritsch, Jane Fritsch-Gavin"
"Aim/Far, 1993","Tab, Aero"
Aim/Far 1993,"Tab, Aero Staff"
The Big Book of Boat Canvas/a Complete Guide to Fabric Work on Boats,
Leicestershire Round,
Moe Berg,"Louis Kaufman, Barbara Fitzgerald, Tom Sewell"
Spalding Baseball Guide 1900,
Football's Finest Hour,
Reach Baseball Guide 1891,
Famous Sluggers 1931,
Spalding Baseball Guide 1897,
Spalding Baseball Guide 1901,
Reach Baseball Guide 1883,
Reach Baseball Guide 1887,
Team Handball,"Baha M. Hamil, James D. Lapoint"
Spalding Baseball Guide 1896,
Reach Baseball Guide 1886,
Bud Wilkinson,
Famous Sluggers 1933,
Imray Chart G1 (Imray Chart G001),
Reach Baseball Guide 1900,
Reach Baseball Guide 1892,
Reach Baseball Guide 1899,
Spalding Baseball Guide 1898,
Reach Baseball Guide 1904,
Reach Baseball Guide 1897,
Reach Baseball Guide 1893,
The Complete Diving Guide,"Colleen Ryan, Brian Savage"
Explosion on the Sidelines,
Always a Winner,
Race Search,"Ed Walter, Jack Saltiel"
"Cutting, One Run At A Time","Barbara Schulte, Julie Wells"
Color Coded Camping,"Bonney Jo Rousseau, Brandi Griffith"
Dynamic Kicking Method,"Masafumi Shiomitsu, Shiomits"
Professional Golf 2001,"Walter O'Neill, Susan Seed"
You Might Be a Basketball Fan If...,"Dorothy D. France, Jason Frankle, David Frankle"
Lenny Wilkens Legacy Basketball Clinic Series - The Basics,"Dick Helm, Lenny Wilkens"
Jujitsu/ Nippon Ketsugo Ryu,"Larry D. Hilton, Donna Murphy"
Climbing Mount Rainer,"Fred Beckey, Alex Van Steen"
The Ultimate Golf Guide - Florida's West Coast,
The Pro Approach,
Cleaning Out My Closet,"J. Jermayne, Jacquelyne J. Scott"
The Great British Golf Course Guide (Golf),
Seeing Red,
Successful Sea Trout Angling,"Graeme Harris, Moc Morgan"
Saltwater Flyfishing,
"Pirelli World Rallying, No. 27",Martin Holmes
Sports Fanatics Almanac 2008 Daily Boxed Calendar,"Steve Ney, Tom Ney"
Sports Illustrated for Kids Year in Sports 2006,
Baseball's Best Shots,Major League Baseball
Cue Tips,
Ping American College Golf Guide ,Dean W. Frischknecht
Big Bad Baseball Annual 2000,"Don Malcolm, Sean Forman, Brock J. Hanke, Jim Furtado, Tom Ruane"
Southern California's Best Surf,"Tom Wegener, Bill Burke"
Cycle Log,"Jan Bass, Tim Houts"
The Original Sport of Kings Trivia Handbook,"Bobby Kimbrell, Shannon Kimbrell"
The Decoying and Trapping of  Birds and Animals - With Notes on Lark Mirrors,"M. Browne, J.E. Harting"
Lift Log,"Nate Foster, Tim Houts"
Bluewater Checklist (Cruising Series),"Rory Burke, Sandra Burke"
New Fishing Guide to Lake Lanier,Lee
The Dan Emergency Handbook,"John Lippman, Stan Bugg"
Benched,"Paul Thompson, Antony Hopker"
Century of Troy,
Carolina Court,
Five Easy Turns,"Michael Jeneid, Tom Martens"
World Snowboard Guide 2005,"Steve Dowle, Pete Coombs"
"Bay Area Golf Guide, 1991","Harry Grout, Susan Grout"
The Alabama Gang,Clyde Bolton
Foreplay,"Patti Devincenzi, Suzanne, Ph.D. Curtis"
Powers 1997 Greater Delaware Valley Golf Guide,
"L A Area Golf Guide, 1991",
"Bay Area Golf Guide, 1991",
Promoting Your Way to Success,
Second Wind,
Teacher's Guide (Elementary,
ABC's of Football,"Jacqueline D. Hamilton, Alfred T. Hamilton"
Whitewater in B.C.'s Southwest,"Steve Crowe, Jim Hnatiak"
Baseball Cards and You,"John R. Peterson, Harvey L. Lee"
Good to Great Golf,"Rob Gilbert, John Sikes Jr."
Fish and Hunt Colorado's Best,"G. Brown, D. Frey"
Sportsource,
The Fundamentals of Hitting,"Charles Chandler, John Chandler"
Marketing Golf to Women,
What You Always Wanted To Know About Football But Were Afraid To Ask - 2000 Pro Schedule,"Carole Leigh, Nancy Prentice"
El Ponche de 4 Strikes,"Antonio Romero, Carlos Tamargo"
The Big Game Scouting Report,"Guy Collier, Spencer Kluesner"
Tournaments and Events,
Increasing Your Pro Shop's Bottom Line (Ngf Infopacs),
The 2003 Sports Market Place,
The 2003 Sports Market Place Directory,
"Gotta Go To Work, Again","Jeff Gordon, Jeff Gordon"
The Prodigy,"Joseph, Jr. Palermo, Robert Bruce Woodcox"
Aikido,"Fumiaki Shishida, Tetsuro Nariyama"
Gross Misconduct,
On Foot in Joshua Tree National Park,
Physical Justice,"Dwaine R. Klein, Douglas J. Geving"
American Motocross Illustrated,"Davey Coombs, Eric Johnson undifferentiated"
The Complete Guide to Clubs & Flags,
First Round Lottery Pick,Franklin White
Classic Rocky Mountain National Park Climbs,"Fred Knapp, Mike Stevens"
"Peter ""Sugarfoot"" Cunningham's Civilized Warring","Peter Cunningham, Robert Mickey"
Golfer's Log & Diary Tour Book,"Tommy Hedgepeth, Ted Bonham"
"SPORTS SCAN, The Baseball Fan's Superhighway Survival Guide","Mel West, Glen Greene"
Pro Baseball 1996-1997,
Pro Hockey 1996-1997,
The Science of Snow Goose Hunting,"Dennis Hunt, Bob Guist"
The Tai Chi Flipbook,"Craig Balcom, Kirk E. Bales"
Fishing Log & Diary,"Tommy Hedgepeth, Ted Bonham"
US Army Survival Manual,"Department of Defense, U.S. Army, Us Army"
Taiji Quan. 48 formas,"Asociacion China De Wushu, Chinese Association"
"2000 Ncaa Water Polo Rules (Ncaa Water Polo Rules, 2000)",
"2001 Ncaa Baseball Rules (Ncaa Baseball Rules, 2001)",
"Baseball Market Place, 1991",
"2001 Ncaa Men's and Women's Track and Field and Cross Country Rules (Ncaa Men's and Women's Track and Field and Cross Country Rules, 2001)",
Sixteenth Penguin Book of the Sunday Crossword (Penguin Crosswords),
A Hard Road to Glory,
Eddie Bauer Guide to Bicycle Touring,"Archie Satterfield, Eddie, Sr. Bauer"
Run to Starlight,"Martin H. Greensberg, Joseph H. Olander"
BTEC First Sport (Btec First),"Bob Harris, Ramela Mills, Shanon Parker-Bennett"
The Coach and Us,"Norman Kozak, Nathan Yellan"
Skateboard Extreme,
Outdoor Life,"The Editors of Outdoor Life magazine, CPi"
The Dan Emergency Handbook,
Fish Farming,"Edsall, Mary E., Ann Townsend Young"
Studies of the French Dog Sports 'Championship of France',
Aikido,
"Competitive Youth Sports Programs (Ymca Program Discovery Ser. Vol. 1, No.3)",
Football Skills Analysis,
Softball Skills Analysis,
Karate,"K. Enoeda, J. Chisholm"
Energy Metabolism in Exercise and Sport,
Major League Baseball Poster Books,
Major League Baseball Poster Books,
The Athlete's Body,
Be a Sport,
"Completed Research in Health, Physical Education, Recreation and Dance, 1987 (Completed Research in Health, Physical Education, Recreation, and Dance)",
Softball Skills Test Manual,
Archer's Bible (Archer's Bible: The Ultimate Archery Reference Guide),Keith Sutton
"Nagus Volleyball Rulebook, 1998",
Volleyball Rules,
Motivation of Chinese-Americans Participating in Organized Sport Within the Chinese Community (Shades of Diversity),"Gong Chen, Xiaolu, Ph.D. Hu, Zhan-Jie Liu"
"Ferrari (Great Marques Poster Book, Order No. 111218B)",
All Stars,
Sports,
The Nba Official Encyclopedia of Basketball,
Fishes of the Gulf of Aqaba,"Maroof Kahlaf, Maroof A. Khalaf, Ahmad M. Disi"
Mid Wales and the Marches (Pathfinder Guide),"Laurance Main, Neil Coates"
The Log Book,
The Atlantic Crossing Guide,
Hurling (Know the Game),
Secret of Perfect Putting,Horton Smith
The Boston Celtics 1990-91 Greenbook,
Ray Reardon,"Ray Reardon, Peter Buxton"
Super Bowl Book 1989,
Pro Football Guide,
2004 Official WNBA Guide and Register (Official Wnba Guide and Register),"Sporting News, NBA"
The Sporting News Pro Football Register 1994,
1995 National League Box Scores and Official Averages,
"Pro Football Yearbook, 1991",
61* ,"Sporting News, The Sporting News"
1988 Box Score Book,"Craig Carter, Larry Wigge, Tom Barnidge"
The Sporting News Pro Football Register 1996,
"Sporting News, 1989-90 Pro Basketball Yearbook",
Hockey Register 1996-97 (Hockey Register),
Sporting News' Guide to Sports Viewing,Leonard Koppett
"Pro Football Yearbook, 1991 (Pro Football Yearbook)",
Gridirons,
1988 Box Score Book,"Craig Carter, Larry Wigge, Richard Waters, Tom Barnidge, Ron Smith"
"College Football Yearbook, 1991",
1995 American League Box Scores and Official Averages (Official American League Averages and Box Scores),
The Coaches Collection of Men's Volleyball Drills,"Bob Bertucci, Mario Trebitch"
Better Baseball Through Weight Training,"Steve Hinman, John Stearns"
Young Athlete's Guide to Nutrition,"Barbara Campaign, Annette Totten"
Total Conditioning for Football,"Paul Stark, Alex J. Kramer, Kip Smith"
Fit It Run,"Kathrine Switzer, James Peterson"
Day by Day in Giants History,"Fred Stein, Nick Peters"
The Encyclopedia of Strength Training,William Bradford
Athlete's Guide to Better Performance and Fitness,"Unitas., Dintiman"
Gymnastic Skills for Women,"David P. Johns, Lorback Johns"
Windsurfing for Beginners,"Michael Garaudee, Dominique Serafini"
NFL Today,
"National Hockey League Official Guide and Record Book, 1989-90",
1991 Baseball's One Hundred Hottest Rookies Cards/Book,
Baseball Card Dealer Directory 1990,
Tennis,"Joel R. Barton, William A. Grice"
Badminton,
Underwater Diving,"Peter Dick, David Sisman"
Archery,"Titlow, Dewayne J. Johnson"
Major League Baseball Player Directory and Record Book,
Underwater Diving,"Peter Dick, David Sisman"
Racketball Basics,"Jim Dinucci, David Shows"
Applied Research in Coaching and Athletics Annual 1993 (Applied Research in Coaching and Athletics Annual),
Major League Baseball Season Guide,
Tennis,"Joan D. Johnson, Kevin L. Burke"
Reed's Guest Log for Yachts,
"My Unforgettable Season, 1970","Red Holzman, Leonard Lewin"
From Worst to First!,"Bill Gutman, Dave Weiner, Tony Seidl"
Vaulting,
Larry Holmes' Boxing Tactics and Techniques,"Larry Holmes, Roy G. Nelson"
Yesterday in Sport ( A Sports Illustrated Book),
Art and Science of Motorcycle Road Racing,
Carolina Whitewater,"Bob Benner, David Benner"
Sports Success Book,
Camping With Your Kids (Nuts 'n Bolts Guide Series),"Victoria Logue, Frank Logue"
Karate Defense and Attack,"K. Enoeda, John Chisolm"
The Sports Pool Draft Book,
Indianapolis 500 Yearbook/1987,
Ski Europe (Serial),"Charles A. Leocha, William Walker, James Kitfield, Steve Giordano, Diane Slezak Scholfield, Christopher Elliot, Glen Putman, Andrew Bill"
"Indianapolis 500 Yearbook, 1989 (Indianapolis 500 Yearbook)",
Boreham a History of the Racing Circuit,"Bryan Jones, John Frankland"
Reach Baseball Guide 1896,
Reach Baseball Guide 1894,
Reach Baseball Guide 1903,
"The Sporting News Record Book, 1921",
Reach Baseball Guide 1898,
"Sporting News Baseball Register, 1940",
"Ohio's Top Twenty Wrestlers, Teams, Coaches and Officials, the Final Edition 1991/1992 Season",
Reach Baseball Guide 1888,
Reach Baseball Guide 1884,
Lou Holtz,
Reach Baseball Guide 1895,
National Football League Official Record Manual 1943,
Explorer Chartbook Exumas - including the Ragged Island,"Monty Lewis, MARY-KAY LINDQUIST, SARA LEWIS"
Beekay Guide to Carp Rigs (Beekay Guides),"Kevin Maddocks, Julian Cundiff"
Basketball and the Rio Grande College Legend,"Dr. Danny Fulks, Newt Oliver"
Holiday Gift Pack (Being the Ball,"B. Balata, Billy Muster"
New England Golfguide 1996,
Tri Log,"Jan Bass, Tim Houts"
Baseball Hall Of Fame 2008 Daily Boxed Calendar,Major League Baseball
"The Compleat Baseball Advocate, 1994","David Srinivasan, Douglas Byron, Evan Rentschler, Todd Willoughby"
A Prenatal Guide for the Active Woman,"Mary Campbell, Ruth Hanton"
The Autosource Guide 1991,
Sailor's Multihill Guide,"Kevin Jeffrey, Charles E. Kanter"
Kempo Karate-Do Chitose Tsuyoshi,
The Golf Ball Book,"Larry Dennis, Udo Machat"
The 25 Greatest Moments in Lambeau Field History,"Cliff Christl, Dale Hofmann"
2001 Pars Plus,"D. Schwartz, Cynthia Publishing Company"
Lyndon's Complete Pace Chart for Runners,
Are You Fun to Play Golf With?,"Allen E. Zimmer, Allen E.Zimmer"
Mud Hen Memories,"John O'Brien, Jerry Debruin, John Husman"
Circle of Success,"Bill Leach, Ted Newland"
About Party Boat Fishing,"T. L. Bloomer, P. G. Bohart"
Montana-Idaho-Wyoming Top 45 Fishing Waters,
Developing Positive Relationships With Member and Customer (Ngf Infopacs),
Modern Taekwondo at the Olympics,"Soon Man Lee, Gaetane Ricke"
Womansport,"Kathleen Stauffer, Greg Cylkowxski"
Rick Barry's Pro Basketball Bible: 1996-97 ,"Rick Barry, Jordan Cohn"
HOW FOOTBALL WORKS,"LYLE STAFFORD, MARY ANN STAFFORD"
Roads and Trails of the Golden Gate,
Pro Basketball 1996-1997,
Shot and a Goal,"Bill Brophy, Julie Klug"
The Journey,"Joe Hyams, Tom Bleecker"
A Passion to Lead,"Jim Calhoun, Jr., Richard Ernsberger"
On the Ice for Thee,Kevin Gibson
Great Lakes Salmon and Trout Fishing,"Dan Keating, Chip Porter"
Sandlot Stories (Japanese Edition),"Marcella Parsons, Steven Hayes Young"
New England Golfguide 2005,"Garfinkle Curhan, Leona Curhan, Irwin Garfinkle"
We Care About Golf,Thomas E. Warner
The Snake Hunting Guidebook,"Will Bird, Phil Peak"
Hawk Planner for Better Coaching,"Matt Hawk, Steve Reinschmidt"
FUNBE T-Ball,"John Tuozzo, Michael Funaro"
Porsche,"Autostyle, Julian McNamara, Jeremy Snook"
The Magic Soccer Ball,"Susan, Adam Rita, Coach Pedro Rita"
Shooting,"Lord Walsingham, Payne-Gallwey, Ralph Sir"
"The Complete Angler V1: Or, The Contemplative Man's Recreation","Izaak Walton, Charles Cotton, Harris Nicolas"
Police Jiu-Jitsu,"Kato Futsiaka, Professor Butch"
The Foundations Of Golf,"J. S. K. Smith, B. S. Weastell"
Where There's A Will There's A Way,"Charles Hudson, Edward Shirley Kennedy"
Snowdonia South (Superwalker),
PGA Play Better Golf for Juniors,"Mike Adams, T.J. Tomasi, K. Maloney"
What a Difference a Day Makes,"Brian Irvine, Stuart Weir"
Environnements sauvages 2006,
Walking in the Salzkammergut,"Fleur Speakman, Colin Speakman"
Images of Kent Cricket,"John Evans, Derek Carlaw, Howard Milton"
1989 Professional Rodeo Official Handbook,
Leeds United,"Martin Jarred, Malcolm MacDonald"
Speycasting a New Technique,
WE,"Jim Yerkovich, S. J. Patrick Kelly"
"Bulldog Champions, 1988-1995","E. E. Camino, Book Co. Staff, Camino EE"
2004-05 Ncaa Directory ,
2005 Men's and Women's Rifle Rules (Ncaa Men's and Women's Rifle Rules),
2001-02 Ncaa Directory,
1991-92 National Collegiate Championships,
1993 Competition Rules,
Fighting Back,
1991 Football Case Book,
1991 Football Simple and Illustrated Rules,
The Men of Autumn,
"Official 2002 Ncaa Winter Championships Records Book (Official Ncaa Championships Records Book, Winter 2002)",
Fatso,
Baseball Card Price Guide,
Current Review of Sports Medicine 1995,
1995 Ncaa Men's Water Polo Rules,
1996-97 Ncaa Directory (Serial),
"Twelve Comprehensive, Professional Golf Lessons With over 100 Illustrations",
1996 Ncaa Men's Water Polo Rules (Serial),
1997 Ncaa Men's and Women's Rifle Rules (Serial),
Nagws Volleyball Rule Book 1997-98,
"1988 Directory/Amateur Athletic Union of the Usa, Inc.",
American Racing Manual 1997 (Disk Only),
"Boating Almanac, 1987",
"Boating Almanac, 1987",
"National Sprint Car Annual, 1988",
Sporting Goods Market 1997 (Serial),
"Boating Almanac, 1988",
The National Directory of College Athletics,
1998 Ncaa Read-Easy Football Rules,
1998 Ncaa Convention Proceedings,
1998 Ncaa Water Polo Rules (Serial),
Bass Flies,
Man in Sport,
Guidelines for Planning and Developing a Public Golf Course,
"2000 Ncaa Illustrated Men's and Women's Basketball Rules (Ncaa Illustrated Men's and Women's Basketball Rules, 2000)",
The 1989-1990 National Directory of College Athletics (Men's Edition),
Pro-Mo's Secrets for Finding Walleyes,"Gary Roach, Randy Amenrud, Bob Jensen"
National Baseball Congress World Series 1999 (NBC World Series 1999),
"1999-00 Ncaa Division I Manual (Ncaa Manual Division I, 1999-2000)",
"1999 Ncaa Men's and Women's Soccer Rules (N C a a Men's and Women's Soccer Rules, 1999)",
Philadelphia Recreation Volunteerism Project,"Larry Allen, Richard Kraus, Delores Williams-Andy"
Nagws Volleyball Rule Book 1999-00,
British sports and sportsmen,
Conditions Of Work In The Fishing Sector,
"Boating Almanac, 1990",
"Ski Magazine Survey, 1990",
On Pocket Billiards/B-113,
Usta Tennis Yearbook,
1991 Ncaa Baseball Rules,
Racquetball,
"Boating Almanac, 1990",
"Boating Almanac, 1990",
"Boating Almanac, 1990",
Journal of the Philosophy of Sport,
Japanese Professional Baseball Handbook 1993,
"National Baseball Congress World Series 2000 (N B C World Series, 2000)",
Encyclopedia Porsche (No. 1112842A),
"Boating Almanac, 1991",
1992 Official Guide and Rule Book,
"2002 Ncaa Illustrated Men's and Women's Basketball Rules (N C a a Illustrated Men's and Women's Basketball Rules, 2002)",
Racing Engine Preparation (S106),
"Boating Almanac, 1991",
1990-1991 Saskatchewan Manitoba Coaching Directory,
Report of the Select Committee on Athletic Problems and Concerns in Higher Education,
"Baseball Posters, Hitters (No. 401278)",
Journal of the Philosophy of Sport,
Football Fields Are for Band Practice,
"American Racing Manual, 1991",
"Boating Almanac, 1991",
Golf Course Directory of Chicago Land 1991,
Ncaa Basketball Records,
"Ncaa Championships Records 1999-2000 (Ncaa Championships, 1999-2000)",
2004 Ncaa Baseball Rules (Ncaa Baseball Rules),
"2002 Women's Ncaa Basketball Records (Ncaa Basketball Records (Women's), 2002)",
"Official 2001 Ncaa Winter Championships Records Book (Official Ncaa Championships Records Book, Winter 2001)",
"2002 Ncaa Baseball Rules (Ncaa Baseball Rules, 2002)",
2002 Men's Ncaa Basketball,
"Baseball, the Right Way","Jim Egelston, Chris Egelston"
"2001 Ncaa Men's and Women's Soccer Rules (Ncaa Men's and Women's Soccer Rules, 2001)",
"Book of Baseball Records, 1991",Seymour Siwoff
Teaching Sports Skills to Young Athletes/Pa11107,
Golf Course Directory of Chicago Land 1991,
1994 Ncaa Men's Lacrosse Rules,
Official 2005 Ncaa Baseball Records (Ncaa Baseball Records),
"2000-01 Ncaa Directory (Ncaa Directory, 2000-2001)",
Second Serve,
Automotive Services,
Lunar and Planetary Science XIV,
Heart of the Order,
Season Ticket,
National Sporting Good Association Buying Guide 1991,
Ncaa Basketball Records,
National Baseball Congress World Series 2004 (National Baseball Congress World Series),
Official 2005 Women's Ncaa Basketball Records (Ncaa Basketball Records),
Automotive Services,
Official 2005 Ncaa Men's Basketball (Ncaa Basketball),
1993 Ncaa Men's Ice Hockey Rules,
Official 1991 Ncaa Football,
"2002 Ncaa Football Rules and Interpretations (Ncaa Football Rules and Interpretations, 2002)",
"The Sporting News Nba Guide, 1992-93",
1991-92 National Collegiate Championships,
Tennis Courts 1992-1993,
"Baseball Market Place, 1991",
"Football Manual, 1988 (Coach of the Year Clinics)",
Target Teaching,
Sporting News Pro Basketball Yearbook 1991-1992,
"Ski Magazine Survey, 1991",
"Football Manual, 1989 (Coach of the Year Clinics)",
Ski En Los Andes Sur/sky In The Southern Andes,"Monica Aguerrondo, Alvaro Fernandez"
"Football Manual, 1985 (Coach of the Year Clinics)",
"American Racing Manual, 1991",
The Sporting News Baseball 1994 Yearbook,
"Register of American Yachts, 1990-91",
1992 Ncaa Convention Proceedings,
"After 50,000 Miles",
Blue Book of College Athletics 2001-2002,
Sporting Good Directory 1990,
"Official Uswf Rulebook, 1992/Includes Uswf and Iwf Rules",
United States Flag & Touch League Official Rulebook & Guide,
High School Basketball Rules 1991-1992,
Read Easy Men's and Women's Basketball Rules 1993,
The Rules of Golf,
"National Baseball Congress World Series 2003 (National Baseball Conference World Series, 2003)",
The 1991 Baseball Card Directory,
1993-94 Ncaa Sports Medicine Handbook,
Golf Digest's,
"Ski Magazine Survey, 1993",
"Ncaa Sports Medicine Handbook 2001-2002 (Ncaa Sports Medicine Handbook, 14th ed)",
1994 Ncaa Men's and Women's Skiing Rules,
Official Baseball Guide 1993-94,
Naia Championships History and Records Book 1993 1994,
New Basic Seamanship and Safe Boat Handling,
Brm,
2003-04 Ncaa Water Polo Rules (Ncaa Water Polo Rules),
USA Race Walking Handbook 1994,
The Sporting News Baseball 1994 Yearbook,
2004 Ncaa Wrestling Rules and Interpretations (Ncaa Wrestling Rules and Interpretations),
Official 2003 Ncaa Winter Championships Records Book (Official Ncaa Championships Records Book),
Baseball Quotations,
1995 Shooting & Hunting Buyer's Guide,
1995 Ncaa Mens and Womens Soccer Rules,
How to Perfect Your Golf Swing,
Campers Bible (F92-432),
2003-04 Ncaa Directory ,
"Annual Official Volleyball Reference Guide of the United States Volleyball Association, 1995",
Ncaa Men's and Women's Rifle Rules 2004 (Ncaa Men's and Women's Rifle Rules),
1993 Baseball Blue Book,John Montague
Blue Book of College Athletics 2001-2002,
2002 Competition Rules,
National Baseball Congress World Series ,
"2002 Ncaa Water Polo Rules (Ncaa Water Polo Rules, 2002)",
Character and Excellence the Challenge of Olympic Swimming,"T. Andrews, M. Barrowman, M. Biondi, T. Caulkins, R. Gaines, T. Jager"
An Introduction to Fly Tying,
Professional Golf Shop,
1994 Ncaa Men's and Women's Swimming and Diving Rules,
USA Track & Field,
2002-03 Ncaa Directory ,
1994 Ncaa Men's and Women's Basketball Rules and Interpretations,
An Introduction to Sea Fishing,
The Sporting News Pro Football 1993 Yearbook,
"2002 Ncaa Men's and Women's Soccer Rules (Ncaa Men's and Women's Soccer Rules, 2002)",
1992 Ncaa Football Rules and Interpretations,
College Football 1993 Yearbook,
2003 Ncaa Men's and Women's Rifle Rules (Ncaa Men's and Women's Rifle Rules),
"2002-03 Ncaa Division III Manual (Ncaa Division III Manual, 2002-2003)",
Blue Book of College Athletics 2002-2003,
2003 Ncaa Illustrated Men's and Women's Basketball Rules (Ncaa Illustrated Men's and Women's Basketball Rules),
"2002-03 Ncaa Division I Manual (Ncaa Division I Manual, 2002-2003)",
Golf Courses of the Pga European Tour,
The Official National Hockey League Stanley Cup Centennial Book,
"The Book of Baseball Records, 1992",Seymour Siwoff
"2003 Ncaa Men's Lacrosse Rules (Ncaa Men's Lacrosse Rules, 2003)",
Runner's Handbook,
"College Football Yearbook, 1992",
Catcher in the Wry,
"2002-03 Ncaa Division II Manual (Ncaa Division II Manual, 2002-2003)",
2003 Ncaa Women's Volleyball Rules and Interpretations (Ncaa Women's Volleyball Rules and Interpretations),
Firearms Assembly 4 Rifles/No 10122,
Metallic Sights/No 10340,
Sighting In/No 10400,
2003-04 Ncaa Division I Manual ,
2003-04 Ncaa Division II Manual (Ncaa Division 2 Manual),
High School Girls Gymnastics Rules and Manual 1994-95,
Japanese Professional Baseball Handbook 1993,
Telescopic Sights/No 10410,
2003 Ncaa Men's and Women's Soccer Rules (Ncaa Men's and Women's Soccer Rules),
2003 Ncaa Football Rules and Interpretations (Ncaa Football Rules and Interpretations),
"Official 2001 Ncaa Spring Championships Records (Official Ncaa Championships Records Book, Spring 2001)",
Webley Revolvers; Revised from William Chipchase Dowell's The Webley Story,"Bruce, Gordon, Christian Reinhart"
Three Peat 1993/Souvenir Issue,
1991 Football Rules Book,
"Official 2000 Ncaa Fall Championships Records (Official Ncaa Championships Records Book, Fall 2000)",
Ncaa Mens and Womens Skiing Rules 94,
Naia Championships History and Records Book 1993 1994,
1995 Shooting & Hunting Buyer's Guide,
1992 Decisions on the Rules of Golf,
Journal of the Philosophy of Sport,
Platoro Area Wildflowers,
Lady Foot-Locker Presents Women Collegiate Sports Scholarship Guide,
USA Track & Field ,
"Annual Official Volleyball Reference Guide of the United States Volleyball Association, 1995",
Journal of the Philosophy of Sport,
Boating the Right Way,
"Official Ncaa Football Statisticians' Manaual 2004 (Official Ncaa Football Statisticians' Manual, 2004)",
"Official 2003 National Collegiate Spring Championships Records (Official Ncaa Championships Records Book, Spring 2003)",
Naia Championships History and Records Book 1991-92,
1995 Ncaa Men's and Women's Track and Field and Cross Country Rules,
"NBC World Series, 1993",
 1994 Ncaa Men's Water Polo Rules,
Cycle Uk! the Essential Guide to Leisure Cycling,
The Book of Baseball Records 1994,Seymour Siwoff
The Ultimate Baseball Quiz Book,
Play Better Golf the Swing from A-Z,
U.S. Civil Aircraft Series,
The 2004 Sports Market Place ,
World Record Game Fishes 1994,
"Official Playing Rules of USA Hockey, Inc. for 1993-94 and 1994-95 Seasons",
The Sporting News Pro Football 1993 Yearbook,
"Great Baseball Feats, Facts and Firsts",
"Hawaii, Washington, Alaska, Oregon Coaching Directory, 1993-94 (Clell Wade Coaches Directory)",
U.S. Civil Aircraft Series,
1995 Ncaa Men's and Women's Basketball Rules and Interpretations,
1994 Ncaa Football Rules and Interpretations,
Golf Begins at Forty,
The International Professional Rodeo Association Inc.,
Classic Hints and Tips for Motorcyclists,
Sports Rules Encyclopedia,
Golf Consumer Spending and Facility Fee/99Mr007,
Street Rodder's Handbook,
"Official Rules of Diving and Code of Regulations, 1995-96",
One Size Doesn't Fit All,
The Kayaking Book,
Trends in the Golf Industry 1988-92,
High School Girls Gymnastics Rules and Manual 1994-95,
Playing the Great Game of Golf,
"Economic Impact of Golf Courses on Local, Regional and National Economics/99Gcp27",
Sporting Goods Market 1994,
Golf Product and Club Component Manufacturers,
1995 Ncaa Baseball Rules,
Golf Facilities in the United States,
The World of Professional Golf 1995,
Wrestling Ringside No 78,
"Read Easy Basketball Rules, 1996 (Serial)",
Ncaa Championships,
Football Rules in Pictures,
"ABC 1994-95 Constitutions, Specifications, Rules and Suggested League Rules",
USA Track & Field,
Golf Operations Handbook and Golf Facility Development Guide,
Ncaa Illustrated Men's and Women's Basketball Rules 1996 (Annual),
Introduction to Shaolin Kung Fu,
The Book of Baseball Records 1998 (Annual),Seymour Siwoff
Journal of the Philosophy of Sport,
1997 Ncaa Illustrated Men's and Women's Basketball Rules (Serial),
1997 Read Easy Basketball Rules (Serial),
"2001 Ncaa Men's and Women's Rifle Rules (Ncaa Men's and Women's Rifle Rules, 2001)",
Computer Boxing Update 1990,
Usptr Manual for Coaches (Item No. 4162),"Jim Verdieck, Dennis Van Der Meer"
2005 Ncaa Wrestling Rules and Interpretations (Ncaa Wrestling Rules and Interpretations),
2000 Ncaa Convention Proceedings,
Sporting Goods Market 1999 (Serial),
"2000 Ncaa Football Rules and Interpretations (Ncaa Football Rules and Interpretations, 2000)",
"Championship History and Records Book, 1990-91",
Official 2004 Men's Ncaa Basketball Records (Ncaa Basketball),
Official 1992 Ncaa Basketball,
"2000 Ncaa Men's and Women's Soccer Rules (Ncaa Men's and Women's Soccer Rules, 2000)",
The Sports Hall of Shame,
The Official Ncaa Men's Basketball Schedules and Results: All Teams in All Divisions ,
Coaching Tips for the 90's,
"Championship History and Records Book, 1990-91",
Official 1991 United States Golf Course Directory and Guide,
Jockey's Life,
"1999-00 Ncaa Directory (Ncaa Directory, 1999-2000)",
2005 Ncaa Baseball Rules (Ncaa Baseball Rules),
"Ski Magazine Survey, 1992",
Strongest Shall Survive,
"Football Manual, 1987 (Coach of the Year Clinics)",
Fishing the Upper Fox-Lower Wolf,
"National Baseball Congress World Series 2001 (National Baseball Congress World Series, 2001)",
Gold's Gym Weight Training Book,
"Football Manual, 1984 (Coach of the Year Clinics)",
2002 Sports Market Place Directory (Sports Market Place Directory (CD-Rom_),
Show Time,
Abca Baseball Directory,
International Amateur Athletic Federation Official Handbook 1992/93,
Deportes De Ciudad/City Sports,
1989-90 Championships Summary,
Ncaa Basketball,
1999 NCAA Wrestling Rules and Interpretations,
Baseball,
Rotisserie League Football,
"The Book of Baseball Records, 1993",Seymour Siwoff
The Hilldale Club,
Baseballistics,
1993 Ncaa Men's and Women's Rifle Rules,
1998 Read-Easy Basketball Rules,
Official 2003 Women's Ncaa Basketball Records (Ncaa Basketball Records),
"1993 Pro Football Yearbook (Tsn, No 3)",
Official 2003 Men's Ncaa Basketball Records (Ncaa Basketball),
The Complete Hockey Guide 1993-1994,
Chum Kil,
Official 1991 United States Golf Course Directory and Guide,
1990-91 High School Officials Manual,
1993 High School Softball Rules,
"The Sporting News Pro Football Register, 1991",
Play Better Golf Short Cuts to Lower Scores,
Practical Sail Care and Repair,
The Seaggoing Hitchhiker's Handbook,
The Mental Athlete,
Official 1991 Ncaa Football,
1995 Official Read-Easy Football Rules,
Training for Cycling,
"1994 Rules for Stock Outboard, Pro Outboard, Modified Outboard, and Outboard Performance Craft",
Official 1992 Ncaa Football,
Usta College Tennis Guide 1992-93,
"NBC World Series, 1994",
Advanced Racing Tactics,
Sports Illustrated 1995 Sports Almanac,
Strategy of Pitching Slow Pitch Softball,
Flexibility,
1995 Ncaa Men's Ice Hockey Rules,
Family Health and Medical Guide,
The Baseball Research Joural #24,
"Marine Directory, 1985-86",
American Racing Manual 1995,
1985-86 Competition Rules for Athletics,"Heliodoro R. Rico, Bob Hersh"
Sports Talk/Cards,
1997 Ncaa Men's and Women's Basketball Rules and Interpretations,
1995-96 Ncaa Division 1 Operating Manual,
Journal of the Philosophy of Sport,
"Boating Almanac, 1985",
"Ethics (American Academy of Physical Education Papres, No 26)",
The Book of Baseball Records 1996 (Serial),Seymour Siwoff
Drug File Update,
"1996 Ncaa Men's Ice Hockey Rules (Ncaa Men's Ice Hockey Rules, 1996)",
Evening the Odds,
High School Intramurals (Intramural Series),
Super Bowl Book 1996,
Ncaa Basketball,
National Directory of High School Coaches 1995-96 (Serial),
"Ncaa Football Records Book, 1995",
"Annual Official Volleyball Reference Guide of the United States Volleyball Association, 1997 (Annual)",
1996 Ncaa Men's and Women's Soccer Rules (Serial),
Sportsearch,
1996 Ncaa Men's and Women's Rifle Rules (Annual),
National Directory of High School Coaches 1994-95,
The American Whitewater Affiliation's River Safety Flashcards,
Towards Gender Equity for Women in Sport,
"Nagws Volleyball Rule Book, 1996-1997 Official Rules, Interpretations&Officiating",
Making an Informed Decision About Girls' Participation on Boys' Teams,
1995-96 Ncaa Directory,
Autocourse 1986-87 Calendar/110335Ae,
"Annual Official Volleyball Reference Guide of the United States Volleyball Association, 1996 (Annual)",
American Racing Manual 1996 (Serial),
Official Pin Guide of the 1996 Olympic Games,
Basic Monkey Boxing,
1997 Ncaa Baseball Rules (Serial),
1997 Ncaa Read-Easy Basketball Rules,
1994-95 Ncaa Annual Reports (Serial),
1992-93 Ncaa Sports Medicine Handbook,
1997 Ncaa Men's and Women's Swimming and Diving Rules (Serial),
The Book of Baseball Records 1997 (Serial),Seymour Siwoff
1997 Ncaa Men's and Women's Soccer Rules (Annual),
Ncaa Basketball,
"NBC World Series, 1996 (Serial)",
1997 Ncaa Water Polo Rules (Serial),
Road Race and Finish Line Management,
Journal of the Philosophy of Sport,
1997 Ncaa Convention Proceedings (Serial),
"Boating Almanac, 1987",
1997 Read-Easy Football Rules,
"Boating Almanac, 1987",
Sporting Goods Market 1998 (Serial),
"Boating Almanac, 1988",
Ncaa Championships,
"Boating Almanac, 1988",
Work Activities Performed by Leisure Service Personnel,"Joseph Bannon, Jim Busser"
"Boating Almanac, 1988",
1999 Ncaa Men's Ice Hockey Rules and Interpretations,
Canadian Alpine Journal/Journal Alpin Canadien/1987,
"Official Uswf Rulebook, 1997 (94 Edition Updated)",
Baseball America's Almanac,
"2000 Ncaa Baseball Rules (Ncaa Baseball Rules, 2000)",
1998 Read Easy Basketball Rules (Serial),
American Racing Manual 1998,
American Racing Manual 1999,
Skiers Southeastern Companion,
1997-98 Ncaa Directory (Serial(2 Vol Set)),
Nagws Volleyball Rule Book 1998-99,
Skiers Southeastern Companion,
"1998-99 Ncaa Sports Medicine Handbook (Ncaa Sports Medicine Handbook, 11th ed)",
1999 Ncaa Baseball Rules (Ncaa Baseball Rules 1999),
Pari-Mutuel Racing,
1998 Ncaa Illustrated Men's and Women's Basketball Rules (Serial),
Another Ascent of the World's Highest Peak,
Getting to Know Adventure,
National Baseball Congress World Series 1998 (64th ed),
Ncaa Basketball,
Journal of the Philosophy of Sport,
The Ahaus Coach,"Lou Vairo, Dave Ogrean"
The 1989-1990 National Directory of College Athletics (Women's Edition),
"Colorado Fishing, Hunting and Outdoor Guide",
"1999 Ncaa Illustrated Men's and Women's Basketball Rules (Ncaa Illustrated Men's and Women's Basketball Rules, 1999)",
National Directory of Football and Soccer Camps,
Ncaa Basketball,
Journal of the Philosophy of Sport,
1999 Ncaa Water Polo Rules (Serial),
Stanley Cup,
Ncaa Championships,
"National Directory of Cheerleading, Pom Pon, Drill Team, and Dance Camps",
Complete Sportsman Hunting and Fishing,
"Ncaa Men's and Women's Rifle Rules 2000 (Ncaa Men's and Women's Rifle Rules, 2000)",
Racquetball,
Tales of a Bogey Golfer,"D. C. Winburn, D.C. ""Hank"" Winburn"
Don't Keep Your Head Down,Bill Grossman
A Romance of the Turf,"Duke of Devonshire, The Duke of Devonshire"
Successful Dinghy Sailing (Sackville Sports Clinic Series),"Steve Ancsell, David Pitman"
Journal of the Philosophy of Sport,
The Recovery-Stress Questionnaire for Athletes,"Michael Kellmann, K. Wolfgang Kallus"
Coaching Power,
Journal of the Philosophy of Sport,
Resistance Training,
Zamboni is not a Dessert,"Jan Andreen, Merv Magus, Barbara Sommons"
Bob Costas,Bob Costas
Baseball Promotion,
Coaching Little League,"Gerard O'Shea, Kurt Aschermann"
A Champion's Mind,"Pete Sampras, Peter Bodo"
The Official Illustrated History of the FA Cup,"Bryon Butler, Byron Butler"
Sunday Express Gen Know Xword 5,"Sunday Express Staff, Express"
Daily Express Sm Crossword Vol 12,"The Daily Express, 747250146"
Playfair Football Annual 2000-2001,"Jack Rollin, Glenda Rollin"
World of Sport,
The Official England World Cup Guide 2002 (World Cup 2002),"Gerry Cox, Mark Knowles"
Illustrated Encyclopedia of Cricket,"Arnold Thomas, Wynne Thomas"
Xii. Bercht Uber Die Ausgrabungen in Olympia,"Von Helmut Kyrieleis, Klaus Merrmann, Christa Schauer, Jorg Rambach"
Report on The International Year of Sport and Physical Education 2005,
Sports Medicine in Childhood (Special Issue: Annales Nestlt 2006),
All About Sport,"Sandro Del Pulp, Mario Fabretto, Max Galtarossa, Patrik Lang"
Motor Racing,
Apports nutritionnels conseillés pour les enfants et adolescents sportifs de haut niveau de performance,
Nikephoros. 16. Jahrgang (2003),
Tony Romo,MAC Engel
Shiki to besuboru,Junji Kanda
Sensatsii i skandaly sportivnogo veka,B.A. Bazunov
Sports Illustrated Kids: Sports Picture Puzzle (Sports Illustrated: Kids),Editors of Sports Illustrated Kids
Sociologie,Patrick Laure
Mémento de médecine du sport,Patrick Laure
Undo kodo no shinrigaku (Shintai kyoikugaku sosho),Nobuyoshi Fumoto
Hot Topics in Sports and Athletics,Samuel R. Bakere
Les Théories sociologiques de la pratique sportive,Jean Corneloup
Sports de la cité,Chantelat/Fodimbi/Ca
"ISHPES - Studies, vol. 13: New aspects of sport history, 2 vols.",
Bŭlgarii͡a︡--strana na sporta,Chavdar Kalev
The Achievement Zone,Shane M. Murphy
Talk sporty to me,Jen Mueller
City sports,Isidro Sánchez Sánchez
Careers in sports,Jack T. Clary
Becoming A Team Leader,Cory L. Dobbs
Introduction to the Italian Rapiert,Devon Boorman
Un parfum de bonheur,Didier Daeninckx
Game day glory,John White
Sports,Nigel Smith
D. C. United,Marty Gitlin
Introduction to the Italian Rapier,Devon Boorman
Day Trips from Atlanta,Janice McDonald
Seattle Sounders FC,Marty Gitlin
"Hot Hands, Draft Hype, and Dimaggio's Streak",Sheldon Hirsch
Genius of Ichiro,Ryuho Okawa
Let the Games Continue,Kevin Mcleod
"Bowhunting in Arizona, Including Records of Game Animals","Bowhunting in Arizona Record Book Committee, Mark F. Vancas"
"Numeric History of Seattle High School Football, 1914 - 1984",Brian Barnett
Adlard Cole's Heavy Weather Saliing,Peter Bruce
Weightlifting Training and Biomechanics,Andrew Charniga
Aikido,John Stevens
Chicago Cubs World Series Book,Luxury Custom Publishing
Lessons of the Game,Kevin Mcleod
American Alpine Journal 2016,American Alpine Club Staff
Base Jumping,S. L. Hamilton
Bouldering Lake Tahoe -East Shore 2nd Edition,Dave Hatchett
Ron Hill Here!,Ron Hill
Weightlifting Training and Technique,"Ilya Zhekov, Andrew Charniga"
Your first book of athletics,"Guy Drut, Jacques Piasenta"
History of the Sydney Swans,Matthew Geddes
Patterns in Sports,Bela Davis
Magic Shirt-The China Story,Eddie Mitchell
Flow Tennis for Kids,Will Greenwald
Best Doubles Match,julio yacub
Advanced Open Water Scuba Diver,"Stephen J. Craig-Murray, ITDA Advisory Board"
Nitrox Diver (Specialist),"Stephen J. Craig-Murray, ITDA Advisory Board"
If Only You Were White,Al Beard
Kids Guide to the Olympics & Paralympics,Robert Bedeaux
Sailing Life,"Tania Aebi, Richard Marker"
Mind of an Olympian,Laron D. Bennett Jr
Safety at Sea,"Sally Honey, Ralph Naranjo, Sheila McCurdy, Peter Isler, Chuck Hawley"
Small Boat Sailor Certification Record Book,United States Sailing Association
How to Talk to a Carolina Fan,Tor Ramsey
Hapkido Student's Handbook,Charles F. Corliss
How Good Is Your Golf Handicap?,Phil Taylor
Final Odyssey of the Sweet Ride : Bill Spaceman Lee's Epic Journey Through America,Scott Russell
Immaculate reflections,Jim O'Brien
The fundamentals of sports media and sponsorship sales,David J. Halberstam
It's All about Golf,Nancy Carroll Phillips
Sports and spectators,David Booth
Close Contact,Summer Ann Sparks
Little Girl Big Dream,"Leslie Harter, Hayley Moore"
MakingTurns in Colorado's Front Range Volume 2 North of Interstate 70 2nd Edition,Fritz Sperry
Research on Rural Sports Public Service,Daxin Li
Carving Miniature Duck Decoys,Anthony Hillman
Kids' Guide to Sports Media,Shane Frederick
NIL Book,Jerome Jackson
ABCs of Trail Riding and Horse Camping,Robert Eversole
Time Flies,John Oreovicz
Facility and Event Management,"Jeffrey Petersen, Lawrence Judge, John J Miller"
Casing Sport Communication,"Diana Tucker, Jason S. Wrench"
Sport,"Schaap, Dick"
Fantasy Sports Math,"Allan Morey, Shane Frederick"
Sports Shockers!,"Michael Bradley, Eric Braun"
Sports Illustrated Kids All-Star Jokes!,Blake A. Hoena
Observations on Eastern Falconry,D. C. Phillott
Por Amor a la Pelota,Stein Campisi
Fighting Stereotypes in Sports,"Duchess Harris, Carla Mooney"
Der Weg des Sports in die industrielle Zivilisation,Henning Eichberg
Body cultures,Henning Eichberg
Building a Bow Hunter,Eric Whitaker
Junior Golf,David Smith
Golf Swing Essentials,John Hebert
Baseball's Future,Bill Davidson
Sports in Ancient Qi State,Dong Fu
Joe and Marilyn,Roger Kahn
Chronicles of a Dallas Cowboys Fan,John Eisenberg
Golf School,Jim McLean
Golfer's Diet,Scott Kramer
Dream Shot,Robert C. S. Downs
Jordan Rules,Sam Smith
Included,Nick Marshall
Wrestling Fun,Cari Meister
Softball Fun,Cari Meister
Martial Arts Fun,Cari Meister
Dance Fun,Cari Meister
Erschaffe Den Ultimativen Basketballer,Joseph Correa
Saint Francis Desales Boys Soccer 2020 Season,Aaron Hatcher
Training of the Weightlifter,Andrew Charniga
Voices from Meadowbrook Park,Mike Chibbaro
Border Stories Vol 1,"Harlin, John, 3rd"
Learn to Play Basketball,"Jed Eichhorn, Melissa Mikkola"
MMA Unchained for the Champions Mind,Erik Purcell
Learn to Play Soccer,"Jed Eichhorn, Melissa Mikkola"
Leap of faith 2,Steve Rose
Beginning snowboarding,Julie Jensen
Understanding sport behavior,David Pargman
Normal Sport,"Kyle Porter, Jason Page"
Certificate in Diving Manual,"Stephen J. Craig-Murray, Georgina A. Craig"
Tennis Psychology Made Easy,A. J. Dowsett
Grommet Goes Skateboarding,Bennett Evans
Summary of Matt Sullivan's Can't Knock the Hustle,I. R. B. Media
Insights into Advanced Motorcycling,Andrew Slater
Profiles of Christian athletes who became ... the overcomers,Carlton Stowers
Real winning,Carlton Stowers
History of the North Melbourne Kangaroos,Matthew Geddes
Talkin' sports,"O'Brien, Pat"
Kids Guide to the Tokyo Olympics,Robert Bedeaux
¡Joe Anota un Gol!,Joe Akmakjiian
Beaverton Cricket Badshahs,Justin Curtis Ermer Lacche
High Tide - Low Tide by Chuck Linnen,"Bruce Gabrielson, Lee Graham"
Twice a Week Heroes,Danny Miles
Softball Pitching Stats Journal,Adrienne Briones
History of the Gold Coast Titans,Matthew Geddes
Summary of Ross Edgley's Blueprint,I. R. B. Media
Summary of Peter H. Diamandis and Steven Kotler's the Future Is Faster Than You Think,I. R. B. Media
Golf for Beginning Players,"Jennette A. Stein, Emma F. Waterman"
Golf Tournament Journal,Shella Sylla
We Are Marshall Soccer,"Scott Jackson, Beckham Marshall Hood, Ian Hughes, Samuel Broh"
"Sport, media and regional identity",Simon Gwyn Roberts
Scotland '74,Richard Gordon
Deaf Athletes at the Olympic Games,Rafael Pinchas
Run - a Book for Real Runners,Alistair Jones
Shapes in Sports,Oona Gaarder-Juntti
Rothschild's Guide to Football Handicapping,John Rothschild
Prevention and Rehabilitation Exercises for the Baseball Player,"Jason H. Robey, Josh Porter"
Beast Mode Soccer,David Copeland-Smith
Understanding Football and Why Boys Love It,L. O. Grant
Weightlifting,Andrew Charniga
Psychologie du sport,"Cox, Richard H."
Bad Sports,Emmett L. Gill
Life in the Toy Department and Other Splendiferous Places,"Jim Dawson, Heather Turning"
Anthology of Australian Tennis Players,Matthew Geddes
Snowboarding in Three Simple Steps,"Ray McNeal, Betsy Feinberg"
History of the Richmond Tigers,Matthew Geddes
Basic and Applied Sciences for Sports Medicine,Ron J. Maughan
Biochemistry of exercise and training,Ron J. Maughan
Kick it!,Monica Hughes
Injury Susceptibility in Sport,Andrew Charniga
Rockne of Ages,"Jeffrey G. Harrell, John Davenport"
Family History of the Berkeley Frisbee Group Keepsake 2020,Victor Malafronte
Mariners Magical Season,"Stan Emert, Mike Siegel"
College Athletes for Hire : the Evolution and Legacy of the NCAA's Amateur Myth,"Allen L. Sack, Ellen J. Staurowsky"
Professional Divers Log Book,A. J. Powell
The roar of the crowd,Julian Walker
Top Dawgs,KCI Sports Publishing
Interstate ’85,Marshall Garvey
Turn by Turn,"Brad Klaas, Randall Shirley"
Bouldering Lake Tahoe-South Shore 2nd Edition,"Dave Hatchett, Frank Lucido"
End Games,"Ric Hamlin, Gary Yamasaki"
"Lean, Mean and Lime Green - Racing with Kawasaki","Randy Hall, Bruce Cox"
Speed by the Dozen,Ryan Quick
Stumped!,Nicholas Hobbes
Vantage Rock Quick Reference,Jason Curtis
KILL to GRILL - the Ultimate Guide to Hog Hunting,"Luke Clayton, G. P. S. PrintNGraphics"
Blessed Stories in the Life of a Golf Professional,"James F. ""Jeff"" Burey"
New Zealand Cricket Almanack 2021,"Francis Payne, Ian Smith"
Jaque Mate en San Juan,Alonso Zapata
Vermont Rock,Travis Peckham
Sport's Company Finance,Carol Niemeyer
"Sun, Fun, and Pervasive Politics",John Dandola
History of the Deaflympic Summer and Winter Games 1924-2018 ( in Russian),Rafael Pinkhasov (Pinchas)
Mastering Chess Sight 2,Vladimir Romanenko
Baseball Drill Book (the Drill Book Series),American Baseball Coaches Association
Cricket World Cup,Matthew Geddes
Mastering Chess Sight 3,Vladimir Romanenko
Mastering Chess Sight 4,Vladimir Romanenko
Diseños en Los Deportes (Patterns in Sports),Bela Davis
"Wembley Lacrosse Club, Celebrating Eighty Years, 1938 - 2018",Jen Banyard
Daniels' Running Formula-3rd Edition,Jack Daniels
Bielarski Family Racing,"Charles ""Buddy"" Bielarski, Gerald Hodges"
2021 NFL Draft Bible,Ric Serritella
Playing Zen-Sational Pickleball,David Ranney
Sports Business Academy,Tijani R. Cole JD
Meaning of the Minute,"Dima Raynova, Radostina Petrova"
Dance Anatomy (Sports Anatomy),Jacqui Greene
Accidents in North American Mountaineering 2015,Dougald MacDonald
Kurash,"Olimjon Khaitov, Akramjon Abdulakhatov"
Female in Weightlifting,Andrew Charniga
W5 of Flyfishing,John (JACK) Serre
The 100 greatest sports blunders of all time,Eldon L. Ham
Painting a Purple Picture,Mike Brown
Vlad the Impaler,Keith Gave
Legend,Vinita S. Johnson
Wilted Wings,"Mike McTee, Daniel J. Rice"
Border Stories Vol 2,"Harlin, John, 3rd"
Yosemite Bigwalls Select,Erik Sloan
Ultra Marathoner's Journey,Jack Andrish
Rough Weather Seamanship for Sail and Power,Roger Marshall
One Stride Ahead in 1958 and Just That Close In 1960,Stuart Kantor
"Mad, Mad, Mad World of Deaflympics Hierarchy and Politics",Rafael Pinchas
Team Leadership,Cory Dobbs
Colors of Sports,Laura Purdie Salas
Houston Dynamo,Bonnie Hinman
Delayed Harvest Fly Tying Book and Kit,Steve Hudson
"History of volkssporting in the U.S.A., 1976-1989",Charlene E. Agne-Traub
Finish,Bob Lundeberg
Business of Sport,Adrian J. Tan
"Dude Perfect 101 Tricks, Tips, and Cool Stuff",Dude Dude Perfect
FC Dallas,Bonnie Hinman
New England Revolution,Joanne Mattern
Sports Series,Terry Barber
Why I Never Left Williams College,"Dick Farley, Dick Quinn"
??????????????????,Gang Lan
???????????,"WuChao Tao, HuiQin Ruan"
????????????,YuBo Cao
Back Checker Strategy,"Michihito Kageyama, Roland Herrera"
Science of Putting,"Steven Davis, Michael Davis"
?????????,WenQing Kong
Fifty Days of Pleasure,"Michelle Rayford, Anita Roseboro"
Across the Prairies,Robert Franks
Bronc Riders of South Dakota,Dan DeWitt
The elusive fan,Irving J. Rein
I Heart Backpacking : With 10 Easy to Moderate Trips in Oregon and Washington,Lisa Holmes
Blue Bistro,Elin Hilderbrand
Best and Worst of Sports,"Drew Lyon, Sean McCollum"
Major Sports Championships,Tyler Omoth
Six Degrees of Sports,"Tyler Omoth, Hans Hetrick, Shane Frederick"
Journey to Be a Pro,Jayy Free
Reset Your Goals,Jos Andrews
Long Sword Gloss of GNM Manuscript 3227a,Michael Chidester
Back-To-Back la Dodgers World Series Champions,KCI Sports Publishing
Baseball's Greatest What If,Dan Joseph
Roger Federer,Peter Bodo
Dance Fun,Cari Meister
Softball Fun,Cari Meister
Martial Arts Fun,Cari Meister
University of Louisiana's National Championship Weightlifting Teams,Warren Perrin
Wide Open,"Andre Rison, Camela Chavers Douglass, Angela Williams"
Boomer on the Jets,Jim Bradford
Pitcher's Prayer,M. M. Le Blanc
Golf Journal and Practice Log,FleetsBay Goods
Captain,Jamy Bechler
Sports and inequality,Michael J. Cozzillio
Sled Dog Wisdom,Tricia Brown
KAW Match 3 - Slippery Seal vs. Royal Rhino,Scott Groach
KAW Collection - Books 1 - 20,Scott Groach
Ultimate Southampton FC Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Match Fixing,Samuel Thomas
Ultimate Kansas City Chiefs Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Eye on the Ball,Yousuf Rahman
Northwestern Wildcats Softball Coloring Book,Anthony Powell
Northwestern Wildcats Women's Basketball Coloring Book,Anthony Powell
Ultimate New York Jets Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Northwestern Wildcats Baseball Coloring Book,Anthony Powell
Ultimate Oakland Athletics Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Ultimate Cleveland Browns Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Northwestern Wildcats Men's Basketball Coloring Book,Anthony Powell
Fox's physiological basis for exercise and sport,Merle L. Foss
Baseball,Jim Gigliotti
Football,K. C. Kelley
Sports Goats the Greatest of All Time Set,N/A
Leadership Quest Expanded Edition,Cory Dobbs Ed.D.
Mariner's Book of Days 2010,Peter H. Spectre
Art and Practice of 16th C German Swordsmanship,Robert Rutherfoord
Boca Juniors,Stephen Brandt
"Three Strikes, You're Out! : Baseball at San Quentin","Kent Philpott, Katie Philpott"
Lacrosse,Ellen Labrecque
2022 Nicklaus Golf Calendar,Legendary Publishing & Media Group
KAW Match 2 - Ancient Alligator vs. Totally Tiger,Scott Groach
KAW Match 4 - Devil Dolphin vs. Gravedigger Gorilla,Scott Groach
KAW Match 5 - Shipwreck Shark vs. Grizzly the Grouch,Scott Groach
Masters of the Games,Joseph Epstein
Chasing Twilight,"Adam Kimble, Connor Crouch, Jim O'Brien"
Violence in Sports,Arthur W. Toga
Equality in Sports,Howard Friedman
Yearling (North Oak #2),Ann Hunter
Pro Sports Team Guides,"Drew Lyon, Tyler Omoth"
Coaching YOUR 4-3-3,Gary Curneen
Short Summer,John Wickline
Wooden : The Official UCLA Retrospecitve,Ucla
45-Love,Ray Krueger
Hacker's Journey,Larry Galley
Football Favorites Word Search Large Print Puzzles,"Susan Meadows, Regal Puzzles"
Hoop History,Michael Griffin
Tackle Life Head On,Jeff Ogden
Voices of the Counted Out,L.E.A.D. Inc
Bryce Harper Story,Washington Post Staff
DeMarr Invitational Golf Tournament,"Catherine Roberts, John Roberts"
Sports Illustrated Book of the Apocalypse,"Jack McCallum, L. Jon Wertheim"
Pull Hard!,David Arnold
Voices of the Counted Out,L.e.a.d.
Dance Fun,Cari Meister
Martial Arts Fun,Cari Meister
Wrestling Fun,Cari Meister
Softball Fun,Cari Meister
Softball Fun,Cari Meister
Dance Fun,Cari Meister
Martial Arts Fun,Cari Meister
Wrestling Fun,Cari Meister
Wrestling Fun,Cari Meister
Doggerel & Lyrics,"Jonathan Lethem, Will Amato"
They Said They Wanted More,"Kenneth Bosse, Ken MacGray, Jaime Bernard, Shandi Elliott, James Kneeland"
Science Behind Track and Field,Lisa J. Amstutz
Truth Be Told,"Lowe, Phillip, Jr."
What's Your Dream?,"Derek Tellier, Margaret Gurevich, Jeremy Johnson"
Come Out Smokin',Phil Pepe
Wrestling at the Chase,Ed Wheatley
"Fishing : Tips, Tricks, and Tactics","Billy Lee, Deborah Lee, Matilda Jacques"
Team Sports,"Robert D. Shrader, Sue Everden"
Unsung Heroes!,Marc Lande
Detail,Gary Curneen
Morning Glory (North Oak #3),Ann Hunter
Deep into Cave Diving,Global Underwater Explorers
Women Riders Who Could and Did,"Sharon McKusker, Kay Duscheck"
Sports to the Extreme,Erin K. Butler
Sprints and distances,Lillian Morrison
"The sidewalk racer, and other poems of sports and motion",Lillian Morrison
Concussions,Martin Gitlin
The electronic olympics,Hal Higdon
Martial Art School Business Growth Strategies,Mike Massie
Racket Racketeering,Samuel Thomas
Leistungsräume,Henning Eichberg
43rd Ryder Cup Book,David Shedloski
Ultimate Guide to Fighting and Winning,Bob Pierce
Small Dojo Big Profits,Mike Massie
Thoroughbred Investor's Bible,"John Perrotta, Jay Hovdey"
Archery Performance Journal,Clare Maness
Still Barking,John-Paul Flaim
Life Aloft,"Thomas Gompf, Elaine Howley"
"Summary of Shannon Lee's Be Water, My Friend",I. R. B. Media
History of Cajun Quarter Horse Racing,Lynn Richard
Precision Shooting Handbook : Rifle and Handgun,Aram Hovasapyan
Varsity Captain,Ginger Scott
Bumped His Head and Went to Bed,"Shannan Stanke, Scott Monaco, Concussion Legacy Foundation"
Ultimate Guide to Arm Size and Strength,Charles R. Poliquin
Tulloch,"Ken Linnett, Geoff Slattery"
Play the Game,Heidi van 't Riet
Power of Possibility,Alexandra Andre
History of Baitcasting in America,"Emmett Babler, Stan Fagerstrom, Kathy Carter"
Phoenix Rising,Aaron A. Mitchell
Arrowhead,Michael McKenzie
Mississippi State BulldogsMen's Basketball Coloring Book,Anthony Powell
Wooden Dummy,"Alexander Richter, Sean Madigan"
Bandon Dunes,Luxury Custom Publishing
New York Red Bulls,Joanne Mattern
"Backcountry Skiing Mount Baker, WA 2nd Edition",Matt Schonwald
King of Cameron,Beau Dure
New Hampshire Ice,Dodge Garfield
Head Land to the Promised Land,Martin Brown
"Delayed Harvest Fly Tying Book and Kit, Second Edition",Steve Hudson
Evolution of Skating Vol IV,Sk8rz Konnect
Ultimate Milwaukee Brewers Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Northwestern Wildcats Football Coloring Book,Anthony Poell
Ultimate Colorado Rockies Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Ultimate Wolverhampton Wanderers FC Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Ultimate Los Angeles Chargers Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Holcomb : Sky Forest Gold,"Chris Owen, Miller, Chris"
Zane nutrition,Frank Zane
Bug Out Survival Vest,Creek Stewart
Girl with a Fly Rod,"KleinKauf, Cecilia Kleinkauf"
Inside ARC,Susan Marie Conrad
Jerome Kersey,Kerry Eggers
Everything You Need to Know About Sports Injuries,Lawrence Clayton
Get 2 Free Plays,Joel Orlando
Deer Hair Beetle Fly Tying Book and Kit,Steve Hudson
Speedy Racers,Maureen Ash
Myron Pesky and the Basketball Nightmare,Kelly Schwarze
Understanding American sports,Gerald R. Gems
A sports bestiary,George Plimpton
"The Bowler's Holding, the Batsman's Willey",Geoff Tibballs
Great Sporting Scandals:,Geoff Tibballs
Top Sports Tips,"Rebecca Rissman, Heather Schwartz"
Ultimate Student Athlete - Basketball,Joshua Woodley
Ice Skating Practice Book,Kristina Bak
High-Pressure Youth Sports,Ailton Dias dos Santos
TIME Blinked,George W. Young
How to Build a Sport or Life Dynasty,Norbert A. Baschnagel
One Bad Break,"Minnett, Barry, Jr."
2022 the A.T. Guide,"David ""Awol"" Miller, AntiGravityGear"
Pro Athlete Pay Equity,Martha London
Footprints of the Kilties,"Nola Mae Ross, Susan McFillen"
Saint George Bouldering,Dallas Lasley
2021 NASCAR Cup Series Yearbook,Cory DeMarco
Beast Mode Soccer Individual Development Plan,David Copeland Smith
Profit-Boosting Principles for Martial Art School Owners,Mike Massie
Greater Fool : Brad Gobright,Lucas Roman
Convictions of an Old Coach,"Joe North, Jacque Hillman, Katie Gould"
So Santa Brought You a Cornhole Set,"Michael Lanni, Kate Lanni Hershey"
Martial Arts Character Education Lesson Plans for Children,Mike Massie
Martial Arts School Staff and Leadership Team Training,Mike Massie
Spearfish Canyon,Mikel Cronin
Train 503,Samuel Thomas
My Road,Julie B. Hughes
Standard Guide to Big Cottonwood Canyon Rock Climbing,Tony Calderone
Baseball Is a Numbers Game,Kenneth Ardizzone
Total Knife Manual - Battlbox,To Come
Big Cottonwood Rock Climbing,Tony Calderone
Moo Duk Kwan,"Kee Hwang, H. C. Hwang"
Diamondbacks Collection,"Tom Zappala, Ellen Zappala, John Molori, Joe Orlando"
Unstoppable Kids : Famous Athletes,"Anthony Curcio, Madison Smith"
Standard Guide to Wasatch Bouldering,Tony Calderone
"Steve Canton's Tributes, Memories and Observations of the Sweet Science",Steven Canton
Vinces Secret Locker Volume 2,Karl Coyne
My Journey to Ironman,"Sibilla, Warren W., Jr."
Football,K. C. Kelley
Los 7 Imperios,"Louceiro, Pedro, 3rd"
"Name, Image & Likeness","Stukent, Maribeth Kuzmeski"
"Rolex Presents the World of Professional Golf 2022, Founded by Mark H. Mccormack",Andy Farrell
Deadlift Dynamite,"Andy Bolton, Pavel Tsatsouline"
My First Hunting Book,Cynthia van Ockenburg
I Am Strong,Hopscotch Girls
ARA's Untold Story : Skateboard Racing in the Rockies,Peter Camann
Fútbol Memorable,Luciano Wernicke
Respect Earned,Matthew H. Dick
Next Play,John Norton
East Lake - Where Bobby Learned to Play 2nd Edition,"Linton Hopkins, Thomas Cousins, Rees Jones, Charles Yates, Thomas Barnes"
Training Mission Three - Spiral Bound,"Hock Hochheim, Margaret Eden"
Ang Tak,Helen Yeomans
Shot Put and Discus Throw Coaches Manual,Scott Cappos
NFL to Prison Cell,Wendell Brown
Football Game Planner,Surinder Kaur Ghotra
Weights and Dumbbells,"Jennifer Degenhardt, Sofía Salazar, Mishell Turuy, Layla Morris"
Reel Job,Ryan Johnston
Learn to Ski with Me!!,"Cristina Berna, Eric Thomsen"
Western Sloper,"Pegg, Achey, Sbarra"
"Book of Ted : Olympian, Coach, Mentor","Sean Colgan, Kate Hensler Fogarty"
British Golf Links,Horace Hutchinson
Happenstance Farms Catch That Pony,"Susie McMichael, Justo Borrero"
Summary of Christie Aschwanden's Good to Go,Irb Media
Love Goals,stacy travis
Love Goals,"travis, Stacy, 1st"
Fishing Chronicles Starter Pack,Lane Walker
Celtics Legends Alphabet,"Alphabet Legends Pty Ltd, Beck Feiner"
What the Fuzz? Survival Stories of a Minor League Mascot,Daniel Ruefman
Territories,"Chad Dundas, Jonathan Snowden, Dan Brooks"
Figure 8 Voyage,Randall Reeves
"Forts, Forests, and Flintlocks","Moore, John L."
Olympischen Spiele 1912 in Stockholm,Ansgar Molzberger
Basketball,Cecilia Minden
Tennessee Titans,Tennessean Staff
Glory Years,"John Poretnas, Jim Davidson, Jack Park"
Homer,David Gronsky
Appalachian Grouse Dog,"Dennis LaBare, Bill Horn, Helen Stacy LaBare, Smith, Steve, Gordon Allen"
Pit River Fishing Access - 1st Edition,Peter Ibershof
Smith/Chetco Rivers - 3rd Edition (2021),Peter Ibershof
Star of the Team,Beverly Stowe McClure
"""Go, Devils! beat Chapel Hill!""",Robert Kulik
Wild World of Sports,"Adele Samuel, Steck-Vaughn Staff"
Sporting heroes,Ruth Redford
The sports triad,Robert Kleinwaks
High-Pressure Youth Sports,Maryann Hudson
Violence in Sports,Paul Bowker
Vsl 1 Original,Coyne
Cooperative Sports and Game Book,Terry Orlick
The second cooperative sports & games book,Terry Orlick
Therapeutic medications in sports medicine,Malissa Martin
The Second Cooperative Sports and Game Book,Terry Orlick
Cooperative games and sports,Terry Orlick
Betsy Cowles Partridge,Janet Robertson
Bernas Estocadas : Volume 1,"William Bernas, Paolo Pagaling"
Noble Echoes,Gregory Shefler
Misfits of Melrose Avenue,Christopher Grasso
"Lance, Spear, Sword and Messer","Christian Henry Tobler, Robert Charrette"
Weird but True Sports,National Geographic Kids
This sporting life,Ron Brown
National Geographic Kids Funny Fill-In,National Geographic Kids
Skiing and the Poetry of Snow,John Frohnmayer
Correctable Error : Rule 2,Kevin Sparrock
Just Like Me Volume 2,Kelly Park
Aggression und Sport,Werner Schmidt
Paso Deportistas,Damon J. Reinagle
Warriors,Scott Gummer
Regulations on athletics,Harvard University. Committee on the Regulation of Athletic Sports.
Summary of Ben Mcgrath's Riverman,Irb Media
Summary of Matt Fitzgerald's 80/20 Running,Irb Media
Telluride Bouldering,Christian Prellwitz
Yes I Have Volleyball Fever,"Natilee Stouya, Misti Stephen"
Meet Me at the Summer Games,Julie L. Spencer
A Sowing of Love,"Divaldo Franco, Joanna de Ângelis"
Amazing Sports from Around the World (Hmong-English),"Douglas McLaughlin, Michelle Griffis, Davie Boualeevang"
Two for Tee,Tony Rosa
Flip-Flop and Don't Stop,"Darleen Anderson, Brittney Anderson Ferguson"
Últimas Noticias de Futbotitlán,Xalbador García
Trail Meals - Vista Edition,Chef Corso
Were You There?,Stephen Mulligan
Mom's Big Catch,Marla McKenna
Pumping granite,Michael D'Orso
Concrete and Smog,Bill Batchelor
Trail Meals - Origin Edition,Chef Corso
Summary of Seth Wickersham's It's Better to Be Feared,Irb Media
SURE FOOT Equine Stability Program® Workbook 1,Wendy Murdoch
Holman-Moody,"Tom Cotter, Al Pearce"
Children's lore in Finnegans wake,Grace Eckley
The super sports puzzle book,
The green line,"Green, Alan"
Knife Combatives - Spiral Bound,"W. Hock Hochheim, Jane Eden"
Introduction to Sport Administration,Michelle Brimecombe
Martindale's Drugs Restricted in Sport 2009,Sean C. Sweetman
Amazing Sports from Around the World (Ukrainian-English),"Douglas McLaughlin, Michelle Griffis, Oleksandra Matviichuk"
I Manifest,Cate Shepherd
Trail Meals - Wander Edition,Chef Corso
Summary of Mike Carey's Bad News,Irb Media
Parts Unknown : Long Jenn Silva Series,Scott Quinn
Les mots des sportifs,
Outdoor Adventure!,"Adam G. Klein, Cynthia Kennedy Henzel"
Running to Thousand Letters,Wendy C. Drake
Mat Time,Ginny Tyler
Product Liability,Jeffrey D. Wittenberg
2024 Skateboarding Wall Calendar,Bright Day Calendars
2024 Snowboarding Wall Calendar,Bright Day Calendars
Let Her Play,Aaron Velky
Summary of Bob Rotella's Golf Is Not a Game of Perfect,Irb Media
Psychology and sociology of sport,James H. Humphrey
Greatest Fight Ever,David Magee
Cuestión de pelotas,Pablo Alabarces
Rise of the Rainbow Warriors,"Dick Tomey, Lance Tominaga"
The winning mind,Steve Backley
Bedford High School Scrapbook BHS Golf Team 1974-1978,Ronald Huffman
Standard Guide to Wasatch Wilderness Rock Climbing,Tony Calderone
24th and Glory,"Dirk Chatelain, Kristine Gerber, Christine Zueck-Watkins"
Men up Front - Michigan,Andrew Vodopia
Umpiring Is for U,Paul Hagen
Almost Everything about Baseball,Dom Forker
Beyond the Pitch,Michael Shamberger
¡No te limites! Los equipos (Outside the Box: Teams) : (Spanish Version) (Level K),Kristy Stark
Coach for a nation,Jim Lefebvre
Take the lead,Kathy Hogan
Baltimore sports,Daniel A. Nathan
A sport and recreation strategy for Saskatchewan for the 90's,"Saskatchewan. Saskatchewan Parks, Recreation and Culture."
Backside of Normal,Roger Olson
Answer,Antonio Stevenson
When the Alphabet Comes,Jerome Allen
La reciprocità uomo/donna,Marie Gannon
Carl Hubbell,Ronald A. Mayer
Roaring Tigers,Merrill Shaffer
I Am Not a Baseball Bozo,Chris Williams
Building Muscle for Seniors,Scott Hamrick
Totally Tennis for Me!,"Becky Gunn Holmes, Doug Orleski"
Alley Gator Bowling Book with 30 Score Sheets and Scoring Instructions,Joe Lacey
Captain John's SAILING SECRETS,John Jamieson
Hunting Horn,Grosvenor Merle-Smith
Playing for Change,"Kelly Brown, Johnson Simon"
My Wheels Gave Me Wings,Willow Rockwell
Sport,Barbara Karolczak-Biernacka
A program for everyone,Canada. Fitness and Amateur Sport Directorate
Remember the Alamo Bowl,Jim Reeves
Peak Experiences,Manson Boze
Winning Smash,Akshay Gupta
Summary of Steven Low's Overcoming Gravity,Irb Media
Sir Alex Talks Soccer,Alexander H. ter Weele
2024 Surfing Wall Calendar,Bright Day Calendars
2024 Skiing Wall Calendar,Bright Day Calendars
Extra Innings,C. M. Kane
Altitude Adjustment,"Greg Smith, Rothman, David J., David Downing"
Summary of Lisa Jhung's Running That Doesn't Suck,Irb Media
F1 Legends Alphabet,"Alphabet Legends Pty Ltd, Beck Feiner"
From Sailing Club to Yacht Club,"Carla Underwood, Dawn Underwood"
Summary of Annabel Streets's 52 Ways to Walk,Irb Media
Yankees Legends Alphabet,"Alphabet Legends Pty Ltd, Beck Feiner"
"Scotland's Gift, Golf",C. B. Macdonald
On Richmond's Wheel,"Tom Houff, Aynsley Miller Fisher"
Golden Age of Buffalo Sports,"Daniel P. Starr, Mary Lu Littlefield"
La Patria deportista,Ariel Scher
Tuition Rebate,Patrick McCaskey
Happenstance Farms Catch That Pony,"McMichael, Borrero"
Close to the Dirt!,Bill Meade
Hiking in & Around St. George,"Bo Beck, Jeremy Gorzalski"
Inside the Golfer's Mind's Eye,Karen Jewell
Fly Fishing the Hex Hatch,Leighton Wass
How did sports begin?,R. Brasch
Golf's Red Zone Challenge,"Rob Akins, Charlie King, David Toms"
"Women, sport and physical activity",Canada. Health and Welfare Canada.
Expedition Handbook,Dave Wynne-Jones
Sports and Career Development,"Tekemia Dorsey, Halee Simons"
Dugouts and Diamonds,Jim Reeves
New Complete Horse Racing Logbook,John Edgette
Wacky Sports Trivia,"Matt Chandler, Shane Frederick, Megan Cooley Peterson"
So You Think You Know Indiana University Basketball?,Terry Hutchens
Dreadball,Robert Waters
Becoming a True Student-Athete,"Turner, Marchel, 2nd, Evan Deuvall"
Search and Rescue in Colorado's Sangre de Cristos,Kevin Wright
Sports Debate,"Michelle Schaub, Anthony Wacholtz, McConnell, Robert L."
Mike Mccarthy : Nobody's Underdog,Rob Reischel
"Armenian-American/Canadian who's who of outstanding athletes, coaches, and sports personalities, 1906-1989",Richard N. Demirjian
Forty Six,"Randy Leffingwell, Doug Nye, Sean Cridland, Will Edgar, Gary Horstkorta"
EPC Climbing,Frank Madden
Bay Area Bouldering,Jim Thornburg
Love of Toddlerball,Sherrell Wilson
Cincinnati Bengals,"Jeff Suess, Rick Pender"
Shut up and Say Something,Heather Klieve
It's Race Day in Indianapolis,"Paul Page, J. R. Elrod"
Man Behind the Makeup,Jeff Bearden
Owning Our Game,Heike Martin
Is Your Coach Bona Fide or a Bonehead?,Tommy Coleman
Warrior Athletes,"Robert Bigart, Joseph McDonald"
Arco the 50 Coolest Jobs in Sports,David Fischer
Theorie und Analyse sportbezogener Ängstlichkeit,Dieter Hackfort
Die Stimmungs- und Befindensskalen (SBS),Dieter Hackfort
Astonishing but true sports stories,Steve Riach
Mitología e historia del deporte en la América precolombina,Edmundo Quintanilla M.
View from the High Board,"Williams, Richard"
Lo sport in Italia,Sandro Provvisionato
Victoria!,Erica M. Stokes
Savoir négocier,Donald L. Dell
Prévention et premiers soins en sports de combat,Greg R. McLatchie
Habit,Ginger Scott
Politics and Protest in Sports,"Duchess Harris, Cynthia Kennedy Henzel"
Leaves on the Wind Volume V,Christopher Dow
Summary of Roger Angell's the Roger Angell Baseball Collection,Irb Media
Mental Skills Training for Sport,Moira Stuart
Storm Blitz,Lane Walker
Who Can Run?,Susie Pline
Diseños en Los Deportes,Bela Davis
Horses Pulled Me Back to Them,"Jay Addison, Frank Bernis, Martin Brown, Fabio Santa, Evan Downing"
Desire - Lesson 8,The SPH Nithyananda Paramashivam
Cradle of Champions,John Horgan
Sport in Australian history,Daryl Adair
Athlētikos kōdikas,D. P. Panagiōtopoulos
Dikaio diethnōn athlētikōn scheseōn kai thesmōn,D. P. Panagiōtopoulos
12 Reasons to Love Football,Brian Howell
Rce to War,Greg van den Dries
Bernedoodles,Christina Earley
Labradoodles,Christina Earley
Maltidoodles,Christina Earley
Aussiedoodles,Christina Earley
Alaska Factor,Joe Stock
John Gutenko : Kid Williams,Thomas Hollowak
Scholastic Year in Sports 2016,James Buckley Jr.
High Sierra Climbing Volume 1,"Roger Putnam, Vitaliy Musiyenko"
Race and College Sports,"Duchess Harris, Tom Streissguth"
Wrestling in the Canadian West,Vern May
Tai Chi Chuan Eagle Claw Fist Comparison,Donald Walth
First Down,Jenna Fields
Elite Performance Moment in a Soccer Match,Michael Mitchell
Breaking 80 At 80,Wes St Clair
Breaking 80 At 80,Wes St. Clair
They Said It,David Fischer
Yankee Stadium Scrapbook,David Fischer
Fighting Stereotypes in Sports,"Duchess Harris, Carla Mooney"
INFAMOUS Altamont SPEEDWAY,Dennis Mattish
Magic Tickets : 1992-2022,"NEW Media Inc & Shawano Leader, Gregory Mellis"
You Can Follow Rules,"Connie Colwell Miller, Victoria Assanelli"
Sierra Trail Runs,"Dan Patitucci, Janine Patitucci, Kim Strom, Hjordis Rickert"
Sunset Dreams,Gary Zwiezinski
The political economy of global sporting organisations,"Forster, John"
EA sports official power play guide,Chris Rice
Concealed Carry & Self Defense Color,FMG Publications
Chosen Ones,Dan Phillips
Recruiting Process-,"Walter Beede, Butch Baccala"
Deeper Inside Zhan Zhuang,"Cohen, Mark"
Injuries in sport and exercise,J. P. Nicholl
Flor de Básquet,"José A. Campos Fusté, Editorial EDP University"
G.O.A.T.,"Eli Blyden, Ashlee Predmore, Amy Crosby"
"Backcountry Ski Map, Rocky Mountain National Park, CO",Mike Soucy
Coach Erk Russell's Split-Sixty Defense,Pat McShea
"Backcountry Skiing East Side, Washington",Matt Schonwald
Sports Coloring Book,Fiero Publishing Company
Mississippi State Bulldogs Men's Basketball Coloring Book,Anthony Powell
Jack Benedict My Major League Life in Broadcasting,Jack Benedict
L' autonomie culturelle et l'aide communautaire aux fédérations sportives,J. Brassinne
Dziesięć sportów dla młodzieźy,Kazimierz Laskowski
Los secretos de la báscula,Ignacio Romo
Na olimpijskim szlaku,"Leszek Bednarski, Artur Cendrowski"
Tigers vs. Jayhawks,Mark Godich
How to Get Your Kid from Little League to Pro,Taylor
Kindness Formula,Jim Olayos
Sportunterricht und Sportlehrfilm,Bernhard Haimerl
Liikuntatieteellinen suomalais-englantilainen tiedonhakusanasto,Outi Meriläinen
Sport and nature,Outi Meriläinen
Leistungsmotivation und Mannschaftsdynamik,Hans Lenk
Pragmatische Vernunft,Hans Lenk
Leistungssport: Ideologie oder Mythos?,Hans Lenk
Das Prinzip Fairness,Hans Lenk
Social philosophy of athletics,Hans Lenk
L' agressivité et la combativité en psychologie du sport,Claude Lessard
Nimrod abroad,Nimrod
Filosofía sociología y política deportiva,Williams Sánchez Díaz
Physical and sport education for Victorian schools,Victoria. Committee for the Review of Physical and Sport Education in Victorian Schools.
Juggler's Trilogy of Timeless Techniques,"Reginald W. Bacon, Thomas Horton, Will Goldston"
Curveballs,"Rolfe, John."
Curveballs strikes again,"Rolfe, John."
Ten Powerful Strategies to Get an Athletic Scholarship,Michael Taylor
The do-it-better book,Shari Lewis
Englanti-suomi-englanti yleisurheilusanasto,Kari Wauhkonen
"A History of Indian Sport Through 100 Artefacts [Paperback] [May 05, 2017] Boria Majumdar",Boria Majumdar
Caught Stealing,C. M. Kane
Reef Smart Guides Beneath Blue Planet,"Peter McDougall, Ian Popple, Otto Wagner"
"Games, Puzzles, and Toys",Megan Stine
"Fundraising projects for sport, recreation and fitness programs",William F. Stier
Naming rites,Glenn Arthur Pierce
Death in the Locker Room,"Bob Goldman, Patricia Bush, Ronald Klatz"
The Production and Consumption of Sport Cultures,Ian McDonald
The Tennis Bomber,Rony Kessler
"Siła, radość, piękno",Arkady Brzezicki
ESPN,
People of prowess,Nancy L. Struna
The best of Hook & bullet,Wayne McLoughlin
How to hang a spoon,"Martin, Joe"
Ethics in sport management,Joy Theresa DeSensi
El deporte en Tamaulipas,"Foro de Comunicación (2nd 1993 Ciudad Victoria, Mexico)"
"Dauṛa, jhāopa o nikshepa",Kājī Ābadula Ālīma
How to get an athletic scholarship : a student-athlete's guide to collegiate athletics,Whitney Minnis
They fought like wildcats,Abraham S. Chanin
For whom the ball tolls,Thomas J. Kruckemeyer
Info release,Vidya S. Sharma
"Sport, socialization and the school",Walter E. Schafer
Vinny's wide world of sports,Rich Manning
Strain of Discourse,Danny Bennett
How to Get Your Kid from Little League to Pro,Michael Taylor
Le sportif et la Communauté européenne,Laurent Chabaud
Science of Splits and Bridges,"Kathryn Glaspey, Tom Lawton"
Deporte rural vasco,"Aguirre, Rafael"
Narodnye sredstva adygov v sovremennoĭ sisteme fizicheskogo vospitanii͡a︡ deteĭ i uchashchikhsi͡a︡,K. I. Ashkhamakhov
Körperutopien. Eine philosophische Anthropologie des Sports,Volker Caysa
Sablen og den bløde hat,Ib Nordby
All-Stars Soccer,na
Silver Dollar Deer Hunting Club,Dale Pitsch
Desportistas almadenses,Henrique Mota
Zur biomechanischen Validierung von Komponenten der Fahrtechnik im Strassenradsport,"Henke, Thomas."
Sociología del deporte,Cursos de Verano en San Sebastián (5th 1986)
Great days at Lancaster Park,Gordon Slatter
15. yüzyıldan günümüze sporda ünlüler ansiklopedisi,Ergun Hiçyılmaz
Les groupements sportifs professionnels,Christophe Gerschel
Hands-On Guide to Equine Sportsmassage,Jo-Ann Wilson
Gloom to glory,Dan Nolan
Ultimate Football Activity Book,Kurt Taylor
Trilogy Now,"Quinn Matthews, Lyanne Tonk"
Alan Kulwicki : NASCAR Champion,Dale Grubba
Soccer,Thomas Kingsley Troupe
Little Shredder's Guide to Jackson Hole,"Brad Flynt, Ryan Stolp"
Voices of Michigan Stadium,Jim Brandstatter
Black Cat Change-Up,"David A. Kelly, Mark Meyers"
Inspirational Sports Stories for Young Readers,Kurt Taylor
"Blood, sweat and cheers",Colin D. Howell
Summary of Adharanand Finns' Running with the Kenyans,I. R. B. Media
Football Puzzle Book,T. R. Grady
Even coarser sport,Michael Frederick Green
The Michael Green book of coarse sport,Michael Frederick Green
Inside big-time sports,"Norman Marcus, David A. Klatell"
Wonderful Journey in the Game of Golf,Stuart Miller
Black College Nines,Jay Sokol
Match Book,Katherine Judge
Early Days of the British Tackle Trade,"Hugh T. Sheringham, Todd E. A. Larson"
Con Bowl,"A. J. ""Paki"" Perkins"
Pickleball Poetry Book,Doug Snelson
Coach Landon's Playbook,Landon Rogers
Psihologija sporta,Smiljka Horga
Safe practice in physical education and sport,"Whitlam, Peter,"
Gridiron Gypsies,Tom Benjey
Zoey's Great Adventures-Learns to Talk Coloring Book,"A. J. Kikumoto, Aaliyah Kikumoto, Akyra Kikumoto, Amaya Kikumoto, Akayla Kikumoto"
Clinical Sports Nutrition,"Louise Burke, Vicki Deakin"
Amazing Sports from Around the World (Pashto-English),"Douglas McLaughlin, Michelle Griffis, Mohammad Ibrahim Hamza"
Goode and Faithful Servant,"Kerry Goode, Tom Ward"
Dog Life Well Lived,Rob Phillips
Secrets of Itto-Ryu,"Junzo Sasamori, Mark Hague"
Win the College Soccer Recruiting Game,Steven Gans
Train Like a Champ,Catherine Coker
Golf Course Architecture for Normal People,Geoff Shackelford
YOGA for PREGNANCY Author's Technique in Recovering New Mother's Body,Anelya Satybaldy
Sport in Britain,"Mason, Tony."
Teigan Tees It up... Again,Bob Lausten
Best World Cup Trivia Book Ever,House of Ballers
FORE! the Love of Golf,"Lauri Kriva, David Carrewyn"
18 Golf Poems and a Recollection at the 19th Hole,Ronald Colby
Suffer Candy Volume 2,Jason Nelson
Kick the Ball!,Christine Hjorth
Best Arsenal Trivia Book Ever,House of Ballers
"Case 360, Instructor Copy - Sports Diplomacy in Africa",Lindsay Sarah Krasnoff
Good Time Charlie,Donnie Prince
Down the Pike,Ryan Cypress
I Am D1,"Meadows, Chris, Sr., Inspira Literary Solutions, Jeffrey Shears"
Habit,Ginger Scott
Baseball America 2023 Prospect Handbook Digital Edition,The Editors The Editors at Baseball America
Transcending Football,"Tevin Mitchel, Ross Williams"
40 Minutes from Leadville,Justin Talbot
Brazilian Jiu-Jitsu,Clint Sharp
High Sierra Climbing Volume 3,Roger Putnam
Catch the Ball!,Christine Hjorth
Oregon Ski Atlas,Dexter Burke
Stevens Pass Ski Atlas,Garry Rambis
Buceando Solo,José Pablo Mir
Softball Facts,Christine Hjorth
Football!,Christine Hjorth
Japanese Pro Wrestling Trading Card Almanac,Richard Velligan
High Sierra Climbing Volume 2,Roger Putnam
Over the Bar,Steve Anderson
Football,Thomas Kingsley Troupe
Brave Champion,Tiffany Stevens
Summary of John Eisenberg's the League,I. R. B. Media
Tahoe Ski Atlas,Stanley Cramer
Tennis,Thomas Kingsley Troupe
Brutal Play,Alison Rhymes
Summary of Jennifer Pharr Davis's Becoming Odyssa,Irb Media
"Hometown Sports Heroes, Vol. 2",Mike Hauser
Only a game?,"Mason, Tony."
Canasta Rules,Jerry S. Bugg
Sports for All!,Christine Hjorth
On the Grass,Christine Hjorth
Basketball!,Christine Hjorth
Last of the Rockland Boys,Ed Prence
Redwood Burl,Evan Wisheropp
Hit the Ball!,Christine Hjorth
Tag the Bag!,Christine Hjorth
Dunk the Ball!,Christine Hjorth
Best Liverpool Trivia Book Ever,House of Ballers
Atlante degli impianti sportivi,Mario Arnaboldi
Cover Story,Mark Osmun
Swing of the Game,Jentry Youd
Old West History Guns & Gear 2023 Edition,FMG Publications
Dive and Travel Turks and Caicos,"Steve Rosenberg, Greg Bassett"
"Cazador de Los Llanos, Hunter of the Plains",Ernest Eichwald
Sports Career Game Plan,"Brian Clapp, WorkInSports"
Baseball!,Christine Hjorth
Legend Mastros,Sultan Zeshan
"I Can Canoe, Can You?",Jennifer Singer
All of Marcus' Pals,"Kelli Bagley, Livida Buggs, Bagley, Marcus, Jr."
Tutus on the Mountain,Carrie Proudfit
2023 Nicklaus Golf Calendar,Legendary Publishing & Media Group LLC
Summary of Bill Pierce & Scott Murr's Runner's World Run Less Run Faster,Irb Media
Captain John's NAVIGATION SECRETS,John Jamieson
Winning in the Dojo and Your Life,"Kris Wilder, Lawrence Kane"
Concerning Bamboo Fly Rods and Dry Fly Fishing,"Ralph L. Montagu, Todd E. A. Larson"
Hockey,Thomas Kingsley Troupe
Football Facts,Christine Hjorth
Stand for Something,Emmanuel Gatling
Volleyball Facts,Christine Hjorth
"Believe, Live, Think","Heather Macy, John Pennisi"
Old West History Guns & Gear 2022 Edition,FMG Publications
Baseball All Time Defensive Player Matchups,Kenneth Ardizzone
Win the College Recruiting Game,Steven Gans
Desporto e autarquias locais,Alfredo Melo de Carvalho
The South African dictionary of sport,J. Alswang
Wrestling,Thomas Kingsley Troupe
Right Thing to Do,"Tom Shanahan, Mel Tucker"
Summary of Samuel Gladding & Debbie Newsome's Clinical Mental Health Counseling in Community and Agency Settings,Irb Media
Douglas Knocks Out Tyson,Robert Eugene Rubino
Me encanta el béisbol,Ryan Nagelhout
El cuento de Ned y su nariz,Dorothy Potash
Health Benefits Fact File,English Tourism Council
Behind Closed Doors,Woolf
Parent's Guide to Gaming and Esports,"Ben Halpert, Jennifer Geller"
Summary of Kareem Rosser's Crossing the Line,Irb Media
Sports scandals,Hank Nuwer
"Winners Lose, Too",Thomas Oberdorfer
Bookworm Visits Lambeau Field,Darick Spears
Glamorgan Cricketers,Andrew Hignell
Cycle Journeys - Cycling Logbook & Journal,HomeTrees Press
Ball,Daniel Paisner
Duels in the Pool,Matthew De George
From red ink to roses,Rick Telander
Athletes,Pat Rediger
Soccer in Oneonta,Mark Simonson
"Sport, Arts Materials and Management Science",Du Wenjiang
Living the Eucharist through sports,James Penrice
Glow Pucks and 10-Cent Beer,Greg Wyshynski
Obsession Quest,Bob Foulkrod
Sports marketing,Phil Schaaf
Sport w Polsce,Krajowa Agencja Informacyjna (Poland)
4 Hour Triathlete,Matthew Froehlich
Baseball America 2023 Prospect Handbook,The Editors The Editors at Baseball America
Joy of Martial Arts,Tom Sotis
Master Your Mind Game,Jess Hogan
"Hamtramck & Detroit Poletown's greatest basketball teams, players & records 1930-1980",Michael A. Sitkowski
Victory on Ice,Paul R. Greenland
Plakat sportowy w świecie,Muzeum Kultury Fizycznej i Turystki Warzaw
Moab Climbs,Karl Kelley
Maine's Appalachian Trail,Harvey A. Dennenberg a.k.a. GrandPa Walking
Amazing Sports from Around the World (Brazilian Portuguese-English),"Douglas McLaughlin, Michelle Griffis, Claudia Dornelles"
World Sporting Records,Stan Greenberg
Chet Coppock,Chet Coppock
32 Letters,"Julie Atlas, Atlas, Anthony ""Tony"", Sr., Ruyi ""Jo"" Deng"
My Backpacking Book,HomeTrees Press
Dark Side and Marathon Plan,Richard Diaz
Summary of Rainer Martens's Successful Coaching,Irb Media
Beneath the Blue Planet,"Otto Wagner, Peter McDougall, Ian Popple, Alex Brylske"
"C'mon, Cymru!",Jenny Sullivan
"Scarecrow Swimming Series, Volume 2 : Duels in the Pool",Matthew De George
Before Big Blue,Gregory Kent Stanley
Awa Book of New Zealand Sports Writing,Harry Ricketts
Kevin Keegan,Brian Woolnough
Sideline help,Marshall K. Steele
Swimming and diving,John Verrier
Sachin Tendulkar,"Cricinfo Staff, ESPN Staff"
Jaffe Sweats,Jaffe
"Sport - Spiele - K ampfe, vol. 5: Sport in der Gesellschaft des Spektakels",Gunter Gebauer
A dictionary of sports injuries and disorders,O. Potparic
Go Chiefs Go!,"Chris Meggs, Rob Peters"
Liikunnan ja urheilun asiasanasto,Outi Meriläinen
L' association sportive face au droit,Margareta Baddeley
Puck Stops Here,Bruce Landon
Science at the ball game,Thomas G. Aylesworth
Ghost of Johnny Tapia,"Paul Zanon, Sammy Hagar"
"Magyar sportélet Csehszlovákiában, 1918-1938","Turczel, Lajos."
Psikholog v komande,R. M. Zagaĭnov
Argots & néologismes du sport,Albert Doillon
Argots & neologismes du sport,Albert Doillon
Le dico du sport,Albert Doillon
Idrott åt alla?,Ann Dahlberg
Arthur Makes the Team,Marc Brown
"The development of intercollegiate athletics at Miami University, Oxford, Ohio",Albert Allan Moore
The sports quizbook,Chris Coley
Five lessons - The Modern Fundamentals of Golf,Ben Hogan
Tents for North American Gymnastic Union,United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on Military Affairs
Bewegung und Sport,"European Congress of Sport Psychology (8th 1991 Cologne, Germany)"
New paths of sport learning and excellence,"World Sport Psychology Congress (5th 1981 Ottawa, Ont.)"
Relationship of anxiety level and performance in NAIA intercollegiate basketball games,K. James Boutin
Little known Olympic sports,Kurt Wilcken
Yunnan Sheng shao shu min zu chuan tong ti yu yang sheng bao jian yan jiu,Yuhong Chen
Prestuplenii︠a︡ v sporte,Denis Pilipenko
Nuumyŏn chukko kŏrŭmyŏn sanda,Yŏng-gil Kim
Super fast,Audrey Dancer
Mediating sports disputes,Ian Stewart Blackshaw
A photographic description of social problems in sport,Lorraine A. Bennett
Shaun White,Karen Schweitzer
Steve Nash,Ian Kimmich
"XV symposium on biomechanics in sports, June 21-25, 1997","International Symposium of Biomechanics in Sports (15th 1997 Denton, Tex.)"
Local development benefits from staging global events,Greg Clark
Development of physical education and sports in India,Daisy Sheokand
Competitive state-anxiety and experience related to performance of women intercollegiate track and field,Sandra Marjorie Schleiffers
This sporting life,David Storey
Guantanameros olímpicos,Enmanuel Adrián Figueredo de la Rosa
Soziale Ungleichheiten im Sport,Michael Nagel
Sport e società,Pippo Russo
Ti yu yun dong xin li xue shi yan zhi yin,Wanfu Wu
Taiiku to supōtsu no shakaigaku,Rei Sugawara
Physical education and sport as an instrument of nation building in the Republic of Korea,Sung Jae Park
An introduction to sports law in Malaysia,Zaidi Hassim.
"Kāyikaraṅgaṃ, varttamānavuṃ bhāviyuṃ",Ji Bipin
"Edinburgh Leisure's sports and physical activity strategy, 1999/2000",Edinburgh Leisure.
Edinburgh Leisure's sports and physical activity strategy,Edinburgh Leisure.
Antebellum American sporting magazines and the development of a sportsmen's ethic,Donald W. Klinko
Gnarly skateboarders,Michael Sandler
"Bobsleigh, luge, and skeleton",Robin Johnson
Rodeo,Robin Johnson
Ice hockey and curling,Robin Johnson
Overtraining athletes,Sean O. Richardson
"Max Schmeling: Berufsboxer, Propagandafigur, Unternehmer; die Geschichte eines deutschen Idols",David Pfeifer
Freemasonry and sport,John Webb
Leisure activities in the industrial society,"International Congress ""Leisure Activities in the Industrial Society"" (1974 Brussels, Belgium)"
Ustawa o sporcie kwalifikowanym,Wiktor Cajsel
"Proceedings from the third Canadian Symposium on History of Sport and Physical Education, August 18-21, 1974, Dalhousie University, Halifax, Nova Scotia","Canadian Symposium on the History of Sport and Physical Education, Education (3rd 1974 Dalhousie University)."
al- Niẓām al-qānūnī lil-jamʻīyāt al-riyāḍīyah wa-al-kashfīyah fī Lubnān,Anṭuwān Nāshif
Planning for development of sports in India,"National Conference on Physical Education and Sport Sciences (7th 1993 Dept. of Sports Sciences, Punjab University, Patiala)"
Chiyŏk munhwa yesul chinhŭng ŭl wihan pŏpche chŏngbi pangan,Myŏng-yong Kim
Wortschatz der Sportsprache Spaniens,Otto Pfändler
Ju guo ti zhi,Xiaolong Liang
"Nutrition, dietetics and sport","International Conference on Nutrition, Dietetics and Sport (1976 Bordighera)"
Let's talk baseball,Janice Behrens
Let's talk tae kwon do,Laine Falk
The magic of sport,Nat Gould
Ocherki po fiziologii fizicheskikh uprazhneniĭ,A. N. Krestovnikov
Origins of some modern sports,Marvin Howard Eyler
A cross-cultural analysis of achievement motivation in sport and the classroom,Joan Lynne Duda
"Proceedings, Law and Sports Conference February 16-18, 1986 Winston-Salem, North Carolina","Law and Sports Conference (1986 Winston-Salem, N.C.)"
The effect of success on team cohesiveness,Jane Elizabeth Schelly
Gymnastics,Anne Wendorff
Onna wa naze dohyō ni agarenai no ka,Makiko Uchidate
Silly sports,Jill L. Donahue
I voli dell'Ape,Francesco Bruni
Tārīkh-i varzish-i Yazd,ʻAlī Mudīrī
An introduction to the terminology of sport pedagogy,Maurice Piéron
"Proceedings, First IOC World Congress on Sport Sciences","IOC World Congress on Sport Sciences (1st 1989 Colorado Springs, Colo.)"
Pluralità degli ordinamenti e tutela giurisdizionale,Giuseppe S. Manfredi
Success/failure attributions and performance satisfaction as a function of internal-external locus of control,Theresa Tarin
A decade of American sporting books & prints,Derrydale Press.
A repository of primary and secondary sources for Canadian history of sports and physical education,Lorne W. Sawula
Swimming,Anne Wendorff
"Sport, malédiction des noirs",Mathieu Méranville
Authentic letters from Upper Canada,Thomas William Magrath
Hē proklēsē,Nikos Exarchos
"Football, language and linguistics",Torsten Müller
Supōtsusuru shintai to jendā,Masako Taniguchi
La giustizia sportiva tra funzione amministrativa ed arbitrato,Francesco Goisis
Science in athletics,International Congress of Sports Sciences (1979 University of Alberta)
"The effect of selected sport surfaces on vertical force in walking, running and jumping",Thamer Saeed Al-Hasso
The world of sport today,Catholic Church. Pontificium Consilium pro Laicis.
Hanguk sanggo cheyuksa,Tong-yong Ko
Anreizstrukturen Im Outdoorsport,Klaus Beier
Was ist Sport? Sportarten in der Literatur,Jürgen Court
Konflikte in Sportspielmannschaften des Spitzensports. Entstehung und Mangement,Ansgar Thiel
Sportveranstaltungen zwischen Liga- und Medieninteressen,Horst-Manfred Schellhaaß
Pukhan cheyuk supochu yongung,Tong-gil Chong
You yi shi jie (Zhongguo ren di shi jie),Yanfen Hou
"The World of Sport Today (a field of christian mission, volume 10)",laity today
Derecho del deporte,Jose Domingo Valls Lloret
Doloon khushuu naadam,Magsarjab
Usul al-laib wa-al-tarwih wa-al-riyadah fi al-mujtama al-Islami,Adnan ibn Darwish Jallun
Applicazioni Statistiche Con Excel,Giuliano Bonollo
Testez et ameliorez votre condition physique,Stephane Cascua
La gestion mentale du stress pour la performance sportive,Dr É. Perreault-Pierre
Atletas do Brasil,Claudia Jaguaribe
Sport & tourism,Peter Keller
Pédagogie sportive : modules de formation et méthode d'enseignement des standards,Jacques Cathelineau
Identification and conceptualization of expert high performance gymnastic coaches' knowledge,Jean Côté
Engineer Sport,Haake
Advances In Sports Cardiology,A Pelliccia
Des vies en fauteuil,Anne Marcellini
Yang sheng jian shen,Xiaoyan Zhang
English in modern sports and its repercussions in German,Alexander Onysko
Derecho del Entretenimiento,Federico Pablo Vibes
Contrato de Trabajo Deportivo,Ricardo Frega Navia
Performances sportives et psychomotricité,Jean-Paul Pes
Zhongguo jing ji ti yu jie mi,Qihong Li
Shi jing bai tai (Han Tang liu feng),Xueshu Zhang
Zhongguo ti yu ren kou de li lun tan suo yu shi zheng yan jiu,Jun Qiu
I Startgroparna,Bertil Elbe
"Jing ji, Zhongguo",Yunting Lu
Shi jie guan jun yu yun dong xin li,Jingxi Chen
Cong wu shi ji tan dao Ao yun sheng huo,Shaolu Yan
Xi bei ti yu wen hua,Keqin Qiao
Zhongguo gu dai ti yu shi,Boyuan Lin
Zhongguo ti yu,Lian Wang
"Protocol on Culture, Information and Sport",Southern African Development Community.
Hanguk kodae supochu yongu,Chin-su Yi
Han Ying ti yu yong yu 20000 tiao =,Luxian Wang
Yun dong zhe xue dao lun (Shi yuan jiao yu cong shu),Zhengzhi Fan
Wu huan qi xia di zui hui,Dan Li
Wu huan ren shi xiang (Beijing shi ji zhe she hui ji shi cong shu),Chongli Wang
Ti yu di li liang,Wenshan Jen
Zhongguo ti tan re dian xie zhen (Zhong sheng cong shu),Chongli Wang
Zhongguo gu dai ti yu,Hai Ren
Zhongguo chuan tong ti yü feng su,Qi Sheng
The effects of glasnost and perestroika on the Soviet sport system,Chŏng-il Kim
"Development, implementation, and evaluation of an educational program in sport psychology for athletic trainers",Suzanne Fritts Pero
Teaching sport management,Dina Gentile
Indoor soccer,Daniel J. Egeler
Undong haengdong ui simnihak,Hung-hwan Ko
A history of the concept of professionalism in Canadian sport,Frank Cosentino
The similarities and differences of expression through movement in dance and sports,Ruth Ann Meyer
Aesthetics of sport,Nancy Gayle Wulk
"Superstitions among male and female inter-collegiate athletes and non-athletes of the University of Western Ontario, 1971-1972",Catherine Jane Gregory
Physical activities of the Etruscan civilization,Lorne W. Sawula
"An historical study of the development of the intramural sports program at the University of Western Ontario, 1878-1972",L. Donald Morrow
Masculinidades,Eduardo Archetti
"Sownik Sportu Angielsko-Polski, Polsko-Angielski",Zbigniew Marek Jankowski
al-Tarikh al-riyadi fi ahd al-Malik Abd al-Aziz,Muhammad ibn Ali Qaddadi
"A thesis entitled, The concept of fair play in Homer's Greece",Jan Proost
Implementation of Title IX-- prohibition of sex discrimination-- in intercollegiate athletics by the California State University and Colleges and the University of California campuses,Irving Swain
An assessment of sports information departments' policies and procedures concerning in-season football player media interviews in Division 1-A institutions,Jeffrey R. Tarman
"The equality of men and women in sport as portrayed through the history, development and the analysis of performance in age class competition of selected Canadian sports",Nestor N. Korchinsky
The effects of coping skills on physiological and cognitive adaptation to a high risk activity,Deborah Anne Lewis
Attitudes toward playing a game and the sport involvement of school age adolescents,T. Lawrence Maloney
"Sport and physical education in Thailand, 1932-1966",Nat Indrapana
Personality and physical variables between and among tennis players and other athletes and non-athletes,J. Albert Tatem
The Amateur Athletic Union of Canada and changing concepts of amateurism,Keith L. Lansley
The concept of fair play in Homer's Greece,Jan Proost
"Bill Jeffrey, soccer, and the Penn State athletic program, 1926-1952",John M. Infield
A documentary study of physical education and athletics in the United States Virgin Islands from 1921 to 1974,Wendell Hamilton
The socialization process of the black athlete,Sandra G. Hopson
"A history of the role played by the military in the development of competitive sport in Nova Scotia, 1930-1969",John M. McFarland
The relationship between socioeconomic status and sport involvement among adolescents,Michael Francis Black
Relationship between the congruence of preferred and actual leader behaviors and subordinate satisfaction with leadership,Earl Steven Schliesman
Cómo se forma un atleta,Osvaldo Arsenio
Actividad Fisica y Salud Integral,Eduardo Medina Jimenez
Beyond the boundaries of physical education,Anthony Laker
Diccionario Espasa De Terminos Deportivos / Espasa Dictionary of Sports Terms (Diccionario Espasa),Recaredo Agullo
La cronica taurina actual,Maria Celia Forneas
A British borderland,Henry Allen Wilson
Analisis de la ley general del deporte de Galicia,Eduardo Blanco Pereira
Alle Fonti Del Doping,Maurizio Zerbini
Mantova Sport,Renzo Dall'ara
Fragmentos Para una Antropologia de la Actividad Fisica,Jose Luis Pastor Pradillo
"al-Riyadah al-badaniyah inda al-Arab: Tarikhuha, anwauha. adabuha",Abd al-Hamid Salamah
Sport role socialization and attitudes toward physical activity of wheelchair athletes,Michael James Kennedy
A description of stimulus seeking in sport according to flow theory,Janice Lee Progen
Attitudes of Korean national athletes and coaches toward athletics participation,Kwang Min Cho
Nutricion para el Alto Rendimiento,Norberto Palavecino
Fragmentos para una antropología de la actividad física,José Luis Pastor Pradillo
You xi feng qing (Zhonghua min su feng qing cong shu),Qingwei Zhao
Siento Ruido de Pelota,Diego Lucero
Zhongguo jin dai ti yu shi hua (Wen shi zhi shi wen ku),Le-Chuan Tsui
Ti yu shi hua (Zhonghua wen ming shi hua),Lequan Cui
Physiothérapie sportive et rééducation,Thomas Einsingbach
Rong Gaotang ti yu wen lun xuan,Gaotang Rong
Ti yu wen hua =,Jiandong Yi
Min zu ti yu ji jin,Xiaoming Hu
Ti yu chao liu =,Ke Ke
Puntapie Inicial,Nestor Vicente
Hashivah ve-kabalat hahlatot be-sport (Sifriyat universitah meshuderet),Ronnie Lidor
Physical activities of the Etruscan civilization,Lorne William Sawula
Annual rifle competitions,United States. Congress. House. Committee on Military Affairs.
Sports and the law,William T. Ford
"A history of the role played by the military in the development of competitive sport in Nova Scotia, 1930-1969",John M McFarland
Sport and poetry,Ardis C Resen
The dynamics of sports,David F Griffing
The joy of sports,Michael Novak
Changes in the affective state of guilt as a function of exhibiting instrumental or reactive aggression,John Marshall Silva
Greek athletics,Frederick Adam Wright
Assaultive behavior of young hockey players as a function of socioeconomic status and significant others' influence,Michael Dewar Smith
Socialization into the role of sport consumer,Barry David McPherson
Songs and ballads of sport and pastime,William Weaver Tomlinson
"""Master"" and men","Booth, J. B."
A proposal to strengthen the Commonwealth Games,Canada. External Affairs and International Trade Canada.
Fitness and amateur sport annual report,Canada. Fitness and Amateur Sport.
National study on the supply of sports and recreation facilities,Canada. Fitness and Amateur Sport.
Your sports are showing,Lucille Caroline Follmer
Biomechanics in sport--a 1987 update,American Society of Mechanical Engineers. Winter Meeting
The boy's book of sports and games,George John Fisher
A catalogue of 16 mm. films on sports available from the Canadian Film Institute,Canadian Film Institute
Sports loisirs Québec,Parti québécois.
Forgive me my press passes,Jim Taylor
Use of polo field in Potomac Park,United States. Congress. House. Committee on Military Affairs.
Corporate power and the market,Alan Listiak
Encyclopedia of rural sports,"Walsh, J. H."
Sportsmanship in a sporting America,Robin L Chambers
Gender differences in situational inhibitors to participation in sport,Patrick J Duffy
The effect of Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 on the administration of girls' competitive athletic programs in selected public high schools of Texas,Bobby Edward Riley
Six hundred years of sport,Grolier Club
"Standard sports areas for industrial, school, private and public recreation personnel",National Industrial Recreation Association
"The role of sport, games, and play in the development of society",Shella A. Cuddeback Mann
More than fun and games,Steven David Cohen
"Alternative patterns and values of play, games, and sport in America",Dorothy L Brightman
A photographic description of social problems in sport,Lorraine Ann Bennett
Towards a Canadian sport policy : a discussion paper =,"National Summit on Sport (2001 Ottawa, Ont.)"
Proposed action plan for the Government of Canada : for discussion =,"National Summit on Sport (2001 Ottawa, Ont.)"
The dynamics of sports,David F Griffing
A description of stimulus seeking in sport according to flow theory,Janice L Progen
Biomechanics in sports,International Symposium of Biomechanics in Sports.
"Perceptions of students, faculty and staff about recreational sports at Miami",Michael Jay Keller
Amateur sport: future challenges,"Canada. Parliament. House of Commons. Standing Committee on Health and Welfare, Social Affairs, Seniors and the Status of Women."
The sports of the world,Frederick G. Aflalo
Sports law,Robert D Hay
Sports marketing,Robert D Hay
The effects of minor hockey league competition on aggression in young boys,Daniel Christian Smith
National trophy and prizes for rifle competition,United States. Congress. House
Complete moments in sport,Katherine A Welter
Sport fans and others,M. Jeanine Bennett
Sport and rural Wales =,Sports Council for Wales. Policy Planning Section.
Sports and games in Alberta before 1900,John E Reid
Sport: tyranny of the mind,Ronald Jean Allard
"An assessment of sports history theses in the United States, 1931-1967",Melvin Leonard Adelman
Arbitration process of the National Football League Players Association,United States. Congress. House. Committee on the Judiciary. Subcommittee on Commercial and Administrative Law
An encyclopædia of rural sports,Delabere Pritchett Blaine
"Participation by Athenian women in symbolic forms of movement during the sixth, fifth and fourth centuries B.C. as depicted in selected examples of Greek literature and art",Barbara Danielson
Sporting chance,Bill Tidy
BBC brain of sport 2,Chris Rhys
Intramural participation of fraternity men at Oregon State College since 1929,Harry Reed Barnes
Hanʾguk chʻeyuksa yŏnʾgu,Hyŏn-sŏng Na
The thrill of victory!,Stephanie Howlett-West
Sport funding and finance,Bob Stewart
The influence of ingroup/outgroup norms on sport fans' aggressive responses to social identity threat,Christian M End
"Sport, Ideologie, kritische Theorie",Alfred Rütten
More people more places more medals,English Sports Council.
A diplomat off duty,Lindley Sir Francis
Examination of adolescents' sources of subjective task value in sport,Moira E. Stuart
Nationaler Volkssport,K Kauer
Obair is luadhainn,Colm Ó Gaora
"Youth sport participation as influenced by goal orientation, perceived motivational climate, and enjoyment",Christopher C. Kohl
Japanese martial arts and American sports,United States-Japan Conference (2nd 1996 University of Wisconsin--Madison)
Attention in sport,Wendi Ellen Roberts
Mental training for coaches & athletes,"World Sport Psychology Congress (5th 1981 Ottawa, Ont.)"
The effects of organized athletic participation on rural female adolescent sexual behavior,Rebecca Ann Sero
"""Getting on the same page""",Shannon Christine Burtrand
Playing the game,Sarah McLean Mullen
Proceedings,Canadian Symposium on the History of Sport and Physical Education (6th 1988 University of Western Ontario)
The sports business,Neil Wilson
Rebels at the double,Eamonn Young
ISBS '98,"International Symposium of Biomechanics in Sports (16th 1998 University of Konstanz, Germany)"
Los hábitos deportivos de los aragoneses,María Jesús Perich
La fabbrica dei campioni,Andrea Di Lenna
Olímpicas razones,Marcos Alfonso
Humanistyczna encyklopedia sportu,Wojciech Lipoński
Dzieje sportu polskiego,Wojciech Lipoński
Zhongguo ti yu chan ye fa zhan bao gao,Mingxiao Bao
Deporte y modernización,Antonio Rivero Herraiz
Pravovoe regulirovanie obshchestvennymi obʺedinenii︠a︡mi v rossiĭskom i mezhdunarodnom sportivnom dvizhenii,S. A. Ishchenko
Madrid,Antonio Rivero Herraiz
Koch life,Hesbon Otieno Achola
Les athlètes africains-américains et les mouvements pour l'égalité raciale,Alexandre Roos
The new Europe and future sports co-operation,"European Sports Conference (10th 1991 Oslo, Norway)"
"An examination of the relationship among TARGET structures, team motivational climate, and achievement goal orientation",Susan L. Becker
Norsk idrettslitteratur 1971 - 1975,Halldis Aubert
Sport governance,Russell Hoye
Lösung inverser Problemstellungen in der Biomechanik,Karen Roemer
Estrategias de comunicación publicitaria,Agnès Riera Ferran
La passione astratta,Giovanni Amedeo
Sport-confidence as related to performance in male and female tennis players,Ryan J. Caserta
Kindai Chugoku taiiku supotsu shi,Tsunesuke Sasajima
Sport crazy,Desmond Lynam
Crunch time,Michael Ferraro
Wales Unemployed Games [programme],Wales TUC.
Working in sport,Thelma Barber
Die Aktualität der Sportphilosophie,Philosophic Society for the Study of Sport. Meeting
Forty years of a sportsman's life,"De Crespigny, Claude Champion Sir"
Functional anatomy in sports / Jurgen Weineck ; translated by Thomas J. DeKornfeld,Jurgen Weineck
İslamda idman,Qulu (Cännät) Seyfullayev
A hunting diary,Newton Wynne Apperley
The sports lover's guide to recovery,Andrew L. Dieden
Hitlers Rennschlachten: die Silberpfeile unterm Hakenkreuz,Eberhard Reuss
EUROPEAN RITUAL: FOOTBALL IN THE NEW EUROPE,ANTHONY KING
EUA y los deportes,Alfredo Michel
World of soccer,Michael Hurley
Sheng ming huo li de beng fang,Yuan Rao
Sport in 't stad,Marijke den Hollander
Our original games,Bruce Miller
"Sport, physical activity and T.V. role models", Dennis W. Hrycaiko
Five centuries of sport,Alfred Barmore Maclay
Home-grown heroes,Frank Pagnucco
A Challenge to the nation,Canada. Health and Welfare Canada. Fitness and Amateur Sport.
"The King's Maiesties declaration to his subjects, concerning lawful sports to be used",King James VI and I
Récupération du sportif blessé,*Eric Viel
Le crépuscule des dieux,"Université sportive d'été (20e 2003 Nantes, France)"
Management et marketing du sport,Société francophone de management du sport. Colloque
Satiation tendencies and sensation seeking among high and low risk sport groups,Michael R. Brown
Shōgai supōtsu no riron,Ryōzō Kanezaki
Velikie sportsmeny XX veka,A. G. Ushakov
Ogonek nad stadionom,Anatoliĭ Bochinin
"ETHICS, MONEY AND SPORT: THIS SPORTING MAMMON",ADRIAN WALSH
Sportuniversum,Hermann Hess
Figure skating,Joseph Alan Gustaitis
Randy Orton,Jason Nemeth
Snowboard,Joseph Alan Gustaitis
Speed skating,Joseph Alan Gustaitis
Social and economic value of sport in Ireland,Liam Delaney
'Race' and sport,Kevin Hylton
Psicología del deporte,Luis Humberto Serrato Hernández
Ėnt︠s︡iklopedii︠a︡ zabluzhdeniĭ,Khmelʹnit︠s︡kiĭ B. N.
"Bericht, Weltkongress für Freizeit und Erholung, Hamburg, vom 23. bis 30. Juli 1936, Berlin",World Congress for Leisure Time and Recreation (1936 Hamburg)
ʻIlm al-nafs al-riyāḍī,Muḥammad Ḥasan ʻAllawi
Statistique vraiment appliquée au sport,Stéphane Champely
Der Betze unterm Hakenkreuz: der 1. FC Kaiserslautern in der Zeit des Nationalsozialismus,Markwart Herzog
Kaḷikkaḷaṅṅaḷkkumappur̲aṃ,Madhujanārdhanan.
SPORTS GEOGRAPHY,JOHN BALE
Anthropometric examination of growth in the competitive gymnast,Joseph Robert Roosa
How we playthe game,Richard Lipsky
Zhongguo shao shu min zu chuan tong ti yu shi =,Yuliang Xu
"Proceedings, World forum on physical activity and sport","World forum on physical activity and sport (1st 1995 Québec, Québec)"
"Proceedings of the fourth Canadian Psycho-Motor Learning and Sport Psychology symposium, University of Waterloo, October 23-25, 1972",Canadian Psycho-Motor Learning and Sport Psychology Symposium (4th 1972 University of Waterloo)
"Proceedings of the first Canadian Symposium on the History of Sport and Physical Education, University of Alberta, Edmonton, Alberta, May 13-16, 1970",Canadian Symposium on the History of Sport and Physical Education (1st 1970 University of Alberta)
The development on sport industry,"International Conference on Sport Industry (2007 Surakarta, Indonesia)"
Le sport en prison,Laurent Gras
Introduction aux analyses sociologiques du temps hors travail,Jean-Marie Lafortune
"NEW PERSPECTIVES ON SPORT AND 'DEVIANCE': CONSUMPTION, PERFORMATIVITY AND SOCIAL CONTROL",TONY BLACKSHAW
"Proceedings of the 37th conference of Nigerian Association of Physical, Health Education Recreation Sport and Dance (NAPHER. SD)","Nigeria Association for Physical, Health Education, Recreation, Sport, and Dance. Conference"
Mei you sheng yin de yun dong hui,Ailing Lü
Sports in the Carolinas,Ed Southern
Country life and sport,John Fairfaz-Blakeborough
250 maʻagalim nisgarim,Uri Ofeḳ
Nosfu 250 maʻagalim,Uri Ofeḳ
RETHINKING AGGRESSION AND VIOLENCE IN SPORT,JOHN KERR
Yusanso undong kigu ŭi musŏn intʻŏpeisŭ cheŏ changchʻi kaebal,Chong-hak Hwang
"INTERNATIONAL SPORT: A BIBLIOGRAPHY, 1995-1999","Cox, Richard William"
"WOMEN, SPORT AND SOCIETY IN MODERN CHINA: HOLDING UP MORE THAN HALF THE SKY",DONG JINXIA
"Proceedings of the 5rd annual Meeting of the Canadian Society for Exercise Physiology, Société Canadienne de Physiologie de l'Exercice",Canadian Society for Exercise Physiology. Meeting
Menggu min zu you le wen hua,Hongkui Zheng
More than swings and roundabouts,Issy Cole-Hamilton
al- Alʻāb al-riyāḍīyah,ʻAlī Ḥusayn Amīn Yūnus
Life is a ball!,Bob C. Douglas
al- ʻAlāqāt al-ʻāmmah fī al-majāl al-riyāḍī,Jalāl ʻAbd al-Wahhāb
Sport-santé et nutrition,Jean-Paul Ostiguy
Sports injuries,Roger Evans
Scripture and sport psychology,Derek De la Pena
Proceedings of the second World Symposium on the History of Sport and Physical Education,"World Symposium on the History of Sport and Physical Education (2nd 1971 Banff, Alta.)"
"Sports, éducation physique et mouvements affinitaires au XXe siècle","Carrefour de l'histoire du sport (10e 2002 Cergy-Pontoise, France)"
Le sport,François-Xavier Amherdt
Midnight in the garden of Evel Knievel,Giles Smith
Therapeutic modalities for athletic trainers,Chad Starkey
Sot︠s︡ialʹnoe regulirovanie znachimosti massovogo sporta,K. S. Khusnutdinov
All round sport,T. Dykes
SOCIAL PSYCHOLOGY OF EXERCISE AND SPORT,MARTIN HAGGER
Literatura de tema deportivo,Antonio Gallego Morell
"SPORT, RULES AND VALUES: PHILOSOPHICAL INVESTIGATIONS INTO THE NATURE OF SPORT",GRAHAM MCFEE
Sport v istorii evreev i evrei v istorii sporta,"Miller, Uri Dr."
Leis antidoping,Alberto Puga
"Sweden, a land of sport",Sveriges Riksidrottsförbund.
Chʻejo kyŏnggi ŭi chŭkkakchŏk pʻidŭbaek ŭl wihan kisul punsŏk pʻŭrogŭraem kaebal,Chin-ho Paek
Sŭpʻochʻŭ kwallyŏn chigŏp ŭi tʻŭksŏng kwa sŭpʻochʻŭ sanŏp ŭi koyong hyokwa punsŏk,Yŏng-ok Pak
Sŭpʻochʻŭ kʻŭllŏp chedohwa rŭl wihan pŏp kaejŏngan yŏnʼgu,Mun-jŏng Sŏng
Wang lu jiu shi yun dong hao shou,Yiling Qiu
ARISTOCRACY AND ATHLETICS IN ARCHAIC AND CLASSICAL GREECE,NIGEL JAMES NICHOLSON
Ben Raʻananah li-Veʼer-Shevaʻ,Aryeh Rapaport
HMĔM Nubar Heliopolis,"HMĔM Nubar (Cairo, Egypt)"
"FASTEST, HIGHEST, STRONGEST: A CRITIQUE OF HIGH-PERFORMANCE SPORT",ROB BEAMISH
Northeastern Ontario sports symposium '75,"Northeastern Ontario sports symposium (1st 1975 Sudbury, Ont.)"
Las fiestas nacionales,Angel Antonio Mingote
SPORT IN THE USSR: PHYSICAL CULTURE - VISUAL CULTURE,MIKE O'MAHONY
Biomechanics in sports XII,International Society of Biomechanics in Sports. Symposium
Tobacco and the BBC,Adhealth Limited.
Yo estuve ahí,Héctor Devia
"Teenager on first, geezer at bat, 4-F on deck",James Szalontai
Pervovoskhozhdenii︠a︡ na Ėlʹbrus,I. A. Gorislavskiĭ
Report of the Commission on the G.A.A,Commission on the G.A.A.
"Pañjāba dīāṃ kheḍām, mele ate tiuhāra",Paramajīta Pammī.
Chuvashskai︠a︡ sportivnai︠a︡ ėnt︠s︡iklopedii︠a︡,N. G. Skorodumov
Teferič na ničijoj zemlji,Zdravko Lipovac
Sporting days in wild Norway,Fridtjof Nansen
Standing tall,Sam Carchidi
"Sport, culture, society","Commonwealth and International Conference on Sport, Physical Education, Dance, Recreation and Health (8th 1986 Glasgow, Scotland)"
The color of life is red,Don E. Liebendorfer
El deporte en Cuba,José Llanusa Gobel
Sporting recollections,H. J. Chinnery
El deporte de hoy,Raudol Ruiz Aguilera
Maqām-i jahānī-i Īrān,Kāẓim Kāẓimaynī
Derecho del entretenimiento,Juan C. Alesina
Sport,Barbara Woods
"Okhorona zdorov'ia, fizkul'tura i sport",Mark Nikiforovich Mel'nik
Playing to win,David L. Mair
British sports,Walter Leigh
"al- Tarbiyah al-badanīyah wa-al-riyāḍah fī al-turāth al-ʻArabī al-Islāmī khilāla al-ʻAṣr al-ʻAbbāsī, 132-656 H/749-1258 M",ʻAbd al-Razzāq Ṭāʼī
Le Sport,Jean Giraudoux
Sportsmanship in youth athletics,Tom Robinson
"The best things anybody ever said about sports, management, & marketing",Louis E Boone
Sport et psychologie,"International Congress on Sport Psychology (7th 1990 Montpellier, France)"
Team sports marketing,Kirk L Wakefield
Imagery validation,Tadhg Mac Intyre
An analysis of some factors influencing adult leisure time participation in various sports in the State of Washington,Forrest Lowell Miller
Aussiedlerfamilien und Sport,Heike Jakob
Sport psychology,S. J. Bull
"R.C.A.F. Track and Field Clinic, 1957",Canada. Royal Canadian Air Force
"Jeux, sports et divertissements au moyen-âge et à l'âge classique","Congrès national des sociétés savantes (116th 1991 Chambéry-Annecy, France)"
Femininity and masculinity,Marcia Ruth Karwas
The effects of glasnost and perestroika on the Soviet sport system,Jong-Il Kim
Memories of summer,Roger Kahn
Les arènes totalitaires,Daphné Bolz
Success without college,Robert F Wilson
The erosion of the American sporting ethos,Joel Nathan Rosen
Olimpiĭskie igry i poėzii︠a︡ ėllinov,I︠U︡. V. Shanin
The sportsman's book for India,Frederick G. Aflalo
Modern English sports,Frederick Gale
Fama sin dólares,Rafael Pérez Valdés
The sports book,James Rivers
Eisenhower and golf,David Sowell
Atlas of American sport,John F Rooney
"A history of athletics at Pennsylvania, 1873-1896",George Washington Orton
Biomechanics and sports,"Winter Universiads (11th 2003 Udine, Italy)"
Power and ideology in American sport,George H. Sage
"Opportunity, perception and participation in sport",John Boothby
Fiziologicheskie osnovy fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta,N.V Zimkin
Reforming sports before the clock runs out,Bruce B. Svare
Playing with the boys,Eileen L McDonagh
Canada's sports heritage,G. G. Cumming
"Canada's sports heritage : a selection, 1807-1914 =",G. G. Cumming
Puntapié inicial,Néstor Vicente
Çifteker terimleri sözlüǧü,Hakki Bekensir
The GAA 100 yearsquiz book,Seamus Power
First off the tee,Don Van Natta
Diccionario temático de los deportes,Antonio Morales del Moral
"""Don't ask what I shot""",Catherine M Lewis
Szegedi sportolók az olimpiákon 1896-2004,Mihály Bali
Förderung des Breitensports in Österreich,Margit Schratzenstaller
The mental game plan,S. J. Bull
Lo sport e la seconda guerra mondiale,Giovanni Pastine
Chempionlik sirlari,Asror Moʻmin
Association ahtlétique d'amateurs nationale,Association athlétique d'amateurs nationale.
Constitution et règlements de l'Association athlétique d'amateurs nationale de Montréal,Association athlétique d'amateurs nationale.
Proceedings of the Maccabiah-Wingate International Congress,Maccabiah-Wingate International Congress on Sport Sciences & Coaching (1989 Wingate Institute for Physical Education and Sport).
Der Sport im alten Ägypten,A. Touny
When the game is on the line,Richard B Horrow
Sex discrimination in Washington State University's intercollegiate athletics program,Juli Anne Reynvaan
Athletic rules of the Canadian Amateur Athletic Union,Canadian Amateur Athletic Union.
Compendium of schemes of Ministry of Youth Affairs & Sports,India. Ministry of Youth Affairs & Sports.
What a coach can teach a teacher,Jeffrey Michael Reyes Duncan-Andrade
Intersport (Pelham Practical Sports),Ian Morrison
"Der Körper, sein ""Boom,"" die Theorie(n)",Swen Körner
Social aspects of sport participation of Swedish athletes with disabilities,Jan-Olov Johansson
Govori︠a︡t t︠s︡ifry i fakty,N. Makart︠s︡ev
Biomekhanika udarnykh dvizheniĭ,Fedor Konstantinovich Agashin
Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura i sport v uslovii︠a︡kh sovremennykh sot︠s︡ialʹno-ėkonomicheskikh preobrazovaniĭ v Rossii,"I︠U︡bileĭnai︠a︡ nauchno-prakticheskai︠a︡ konferent︠s︡ii︠a︡, posvi︠a︡shchennai︠a︡ 70-letii︠u︡ VNIIFK ""Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura i sport v uslovii︠a︡kh sovremennykh sot︠s︡ialʹno-ėkonomicheskikh preobrazovaniĭ v Rossii"" (2003 Moscow, Russia)"
The sportswoman's library,Frances E. Slaughter
767 Sports Questions Your Friends Can't Answer,Arco
Cornell University Hockey (Images of Sports: New York),Adam Wodon
Dwight Howard,Jeff Savage
The Syracuse Orange,"Stewart, Mark"
Bert Sugar's Baseball Hall of Fame,Bert Randolph Sugar
Forsaken,Jeff Gomez
Blowing the Whistle,Peter Walsh
Play-by-play track,Kristin Wolden Nitz
Sports science,John Perritano
Sports,Sean Price
Working in sports and recreation,Barbara Lee
Sports and money,Karen Judson
The athletic experience of ethnically diverse girls,Jeanne Drysdale Weiler
Staatliche Sportaufsicht und öffentliche Sportpflege,"Lex, Hans ritter von."
The Boston Bruins,"Stewart, Mark"
The composite guide to extreme sports,Ann Gaines
Santa's favorite sports jokes,Russ Edwards
The 1991 information please sports almanac,
Sports jokes to tickle your funny bone,Stew Thornley
Meet the Bears,Mike Kennedy
Meet the Vikings,Mike Kennedy
LeBron James,Sarah Tieck
Play ball,Mercer Mayer
Zhonghua Renmin Gongheguo ti yu fa. Quan min jian shen ji hua gang yao,China.
Ley del deporte y disposiciones complementarias,Spain.
Herbert Rosendorfer's aechtes Münchner Olympiabuch,Herbert Rosendorfer
Understanding American sports,Gerald R. Gems
Sports teasers,Zander Hollander
Sports and entertainment marketing,Ken Kaser
The Sports wiz trivia quiz,Steve Heldt
The Sports Illustrated 1998 sports almanac,
Sports,Emma Nathan
Atlanta Braves,K. C. Kelley
"Sports in America, 1990-1999",Bob Woods
Sports,Clive Gifford
Tumble bunnies,Kathryn Lasky
LeBron James,Stephen Feinstein
"Everything you always wanted to know about sports, and didn't know where to ask",Mickey Herskowitz
"Miracles, Shockers, and Long Shots",Ken Rappoport
"Lucent Library of Historical Eras - Arts, Leisure, and Sport in Ancient Egypt (Lucent Library of Historical Eras)",Don Nardo
Playoff sensations,Craig Ellenport
How many can play?,Susan Canizares
Tony Romo,Jeff Savage
The game player's book of Sports Trivia,Damien Christopher
Triumph of character,George Allen
Greek athletics,"Metropolitan Museum of Art (New York, N.Y.)"
"Really, really bad sports jokes",Katy Hall
Teens and Rural Sports,Roger Smith
Guinness Book of Sports Records 1992-1993,Facts on File Inc
Codigo del deporte (Codigos basicos),Spain.
Código del deporte,Spain.
The everything you want to know about sports encyclopedia,
Venus and Serena Williams,Hal Marcovitz
Sports broadcasting,Michael Teitelbaum
"Sports in America, 1980-1989",Michael Teitelbaum
Sportsmanship,Michael Teitelbaum
Cavs from Fitch to Fratello,Joe Menzer
The good sports joke book,"Miller, Paul M."
Mémoire de la jeunesse malienne,Sada Samake
Meet the Cowboys,Mike Kennedy
The Infinite arena,Terry Carr (editor)
"Sports in America, 2000-2009",Jim Gigliotti
Teamwork in soccer,Clive Gifford
Sports,Diane Lindsey Reeves
Pee-Wee T-ball,Nancy Parent
"The official Associated Press sports almanac,1977.",
The coaches' little playbook,
The encyclopedia of sports,Frank G. Menke
Student Notetaking Guide to Accompany Concepts of Athletic Training,Ronald P. Pfeiffer
The Kings Maiesties declaration to his subiects,King James VI and I
All-star Olympic Tips,David Scott
Boston Red Sox,K. C. Kelley
Any number can play,"Sullivan, George"
Better field events for girls,"Sullivan, George"
Sports superstitions,"Sullivan, George"
The Berenstain bears' report card trouble,Stan Berenstain
"The Berenstain bears ready, get set, go!","Stan Berenstain, Jan Berenstain"
Sports and sporting equipment,Nicolas Brasch
The technology behind,Nicolas Brasch
She's got game,Melissa Malamut
Spin it figure skating,Paul C. Challen
Sportstalent,Robert Burns Arnot
"Anetso, the Cherokee ball game",Michael J. Zogry
Playing piano in a brothel,Terry Frei
Sports,Tim Hammond
Snow monsters do drink hot chocolate,Marcia Thornton Jones
Here's why : science in sports,George Barr
Amazing athletes amazing moments,Steve Riach
nt:sport,Steve Conner
The funny side of sports,Michael J. Pellowski
Not-so-great moments in sports,Michael J. Pellowski
What's the score?,Charles Keller
Body politic,David Shields
"Proceedings of International Congress of Sport Sciences, 1964","International Congress of Sport Sciences (1964 Tokyo, Japan)"
Minnesota sports almanac,Joel A. Rippel
Biomechanics in sports,"International Symposium of Biomechanics in Sports (1982 San Diego, Calif.)"
In pursuit of excellence,Michael Hill
"""Master"" and men",John Bennion Booth
Quelques reprises,Christian Tétreault
The Olympig Games in antiquity,Tina Zissimou
Sportyvni vershyny devʹi︠a︡toï pʹi︠a︡tyrichky,Mikhail Makarovich Baka
Sports or athletics,Seminar on Canadian-American Relations .
Juegos y alegrías coloniales en Chile,Eugenio Pereira Salas
Prevention of sports injuries,COSPOIR. Research Committee.
Bie bi︠a︡ldryn khu̇mu̇u̇zhliĭn onol arga zu̇ĭn Oros-Mongol nėr tomʺëony khuraanguĭ tovch taĭlbar bichig,L. Baavlaĭ
"XI [i.e. Jedenáctý všesokolský slet, 1948",Slet všesokolský
Towards a quality future,"Sport and Leisure Scotland Conference (1991 Glasgow, Scotland)"
Sunzi bing fa yu jing ji ti yu mou lue,Rou Jing
Sports biomechanics,International Symposium of Biomechanics in Sports
"Vice-regal patronage of Canadian sport, 1867-1916",Mary Kathryn McLaughlin
Sportstättenbedarf und Sportstättenbau,Günter Breuer
"St. Fechín'sG.F.C., Tearmann Feichín",St. Fechín's Gaelic Football Club.
Spōtsu shikō to shakai,Kengo Fujiwara
Supōtsu to shakaika,Kengo Fujiwara
"""Herr Jud"" sollen Sie sagen!",Hans-Jürgen König
L' Esprit chrétien dans le sport,Michel Christian
Human performance and behaviour,Canadian Psycho-Motor Learning and Sport Psychology Committee.
L' esprit chretien dans le sport,Michel Christian
Greek athletics & festivals in the fifth century,Boston. Museum of Fine Arts. Division of Museum Extension.
"Aonach Tailteann, 1924",Aonach Tailteann
Games and athletics in bygone Wales,Hilaire M. Waddington
The Encyclopaedia of sport,"Suffolk and Berkshire, Henry Charles Howard 18th Earl of"
Sportpsychologie,Günther Bäumler
Relationship of selected personality attributes of women and their susceptibility to spectator influence during physical activity,Carolyn Marie Lewis
"Champions noirs, racisme blanc?",Timothee Jobert
Polskie współczesne słownictwo sportowe,Jan Ożdżyński
New aspects of sport history,ISHPES. Congress
L' équipe de France,Gilbert Prouteau
Shiki to bēsubōru,Junji Kanda
Sport als Kultursegment aus der Sicht der Semiotik,DVS-Tagung (1995 Schloss Rauischholzhausen)
Biomekhanika s osnovami sportivnoĭ tekhniki,D. D. Donskoĭ
Midiŏ wa sŭpʻochʻŭ yŏngung,Yŏ-gwang Yun
Yun dong yu neng liang dai xie,Guoqiang Xiao
"History of Sport and Physical Education, University of Alberta, Edmonton, Alberta, May 13-16, 1970",Canadian Symposium on the History of Sport and Physical Education .
Physiologie et activité sportive,Camille Charles Craplet
"Historia del deporte en el Uruguay, 1830-1900",José L. Buzzetti
Jeux de lutte,Daniel Eichelbrenner
Jeux de badminton,Patricia Lammertyn
Baseball,Frédéric Le Mercier
Der vergessene Sportverband der DDR,Ringo Wagner
An evaluation of youth sport Northern Ireland,Mary Allison
Konfessionen und Sport in der frühen Neuzeit /cArmin Ader,Armin Ader
Sport et formation de la jeunesse à la Martinique,Jacques Dumont
Konfessionen und Sport in der fr uhen Neuzeit,Armin Ader
Erlebter Sport,Armin Ader
Studies in the social history of sport in 18th century England,C. P. Darkwell
Sport u Crnoj gori do 1914. godine,Novak Jovanović
Massenmedien und Sportverein,Martina Richter
El juego del hombre,Fernando Huerta Rojas
The Phoenix dictionary of games,J. B Pick
Legal issues in sport,Rachel Corbett
Jeux et sports,Roger Caillois
"Sport, gender and the hidden curriculum in leisure",Aniko Theresa Varpalotai
al- Tārīkh al-riyāḍī fī ʻahd al-Malik ʻAbd al-ʻAzīz,Muḥammad ibn ʻAlī Qaddādī
Sport - a prison of measured time,Jean-Marie Brohm
al- Alʻāb al-riyāḍīyah,ʻAlī Ḥusayn Amīn Yūnus
"""Ethical issues in children's sport""",Council of Europe. Committee for the development of sport.
Grasmere Sports,Roy Lomas
La psicología del deporte en España al final del milenio,Congreso Nacional de Psicología de la Actividad Física y el Deporte (6th 1997 Las Palmas (Canary Islands)
Computerised unit for assessment of sprinters on the track,Bernard Donne
"A history of federal government involvement in the development of sport in Canada, 1943-1979",William D. Hallett
Tu shuo Zhongguo gu dai you yi,Lequan Cui
Moderní anglicko-český slovník sportovních výrazů,Jaroslav Heřmanský
Nationalsozialistische Expeditionspolitik: deutsche Asien-Expeditionen 1933 - 1945,Peter Mierau
E Is for Extreme,Brad Herzog
Sports Illustrated for Kids Millennium 2000,Brad Herzog
Política deportiva,Argentina. Secretaría de Estado de Promoción y Asistencia de la Comunidad.
L' homme et la bête,Arthur Mangin
NETSPORTS (Your Personal Net),Michael Wolff
Fishing with Hemingway and Glassell,S. Kip Farrington
The real book about sports,Mary Graham Bonner
Alphabet of sports,Barbie Schwaeber
Sports industry,Ewan McLeish
Sporting Blood,"Jack London, Howard Lachtman"
Soccer,Brad Herzog
Dare to Be Different,Brad Herzog
Heads Up! Puzzles for Sports Brains,Brad Herzog
A is for amazing moments,Brad Herzog
The Oldest Living Member Tells All,P. G. Wodehouse
Lernübertragungen in der Sportpädagogik,"Egger, Kurt."
Daten zur Sportgeschichte,Klemens Carl Wildt
The great book of Cleveland sports lists,Greg Brinda
Gedanken zur Sportgeschichte,Carl Diem
Hit the sign and win a free suit of clothes from Harry Finklestein,Bert Randolph Sugar
The sports,Leonard Everett Fisher
Ein Leben für den Sport,Carl Diem
Weltgeschichte des Sports und der Leibeserziehung,Carl Diem
Zik and sports,Okey Anyichie
Outdoor sports manual,Popular Mechanics
Lexique panafricain des sports,Elizabeth Fragua
Reiseberichte,Carl Diem
Zur Begründung von Sport und Sporterziehung,Carl Diem
Ausgewählte Schriften,Carl Diem
Weltgeschichte des Sports,Carl Diem
"Deutsche Arbeitersportler gegen Faschisten und Militaristen, 1929-1933",G. Wonneberger
Le sport et ses secrets,René Dunan
Wesen und Lehre des Sports,Carl Diem
"Burke's steerage; or, The amateur gentleman's introduction to noble sports and pastimes",T. H. White
Sports and Games of Medieval Cultures (Sports and Games Through History),Sally Wilkins
The baggy green,Michael Fahey
Rev!-alation!,Jeremy Diamond
Sport and criminal behavior,Jason W. Lee
Transforming play by teaching tactics and game sense,Dennis G. Slade
Transforming play,Dennis G. Slade
ESPN SportsCentury,David Halberstam
Manly Pursuits,Richard Beard
Kaplan Learning Adventures In Sports,Kaplan Publishing
Citizenship Through Sports and Law,McGraw-Hill
A Hearing for Jim Thorpe,Michael L. Sheaffer
Henry Aaron's dream,Matt Tavares
Beating the Odds,Rob Eastaway
"Going, going, gone!",Alan Katz
Sport and international understanding,"Proceedings of the Congress (7-10 July, 1982 Helsinki)"
La nouvelle loi concernant l'éducation physique et le sport,Luxembourg. Service Information et presse
Handbook for sport and physical education examinations,D. E. Webster
Proceedings,"National Symposium on Teaching Biomechanics in Sports (5th 2001 San Francisco, Calif.)"
Leistung und Gesundheit,Arbeitsgemeinschaft für Sportpsychologie in der Bundesrepublik Deutschland. Tagung
Coaching for long-term athletic development,Ian Stafford
The commonwealth journey,Gagan Narang
Title IX self-evaluation,Washington State University. Ad Hoc Title IX Review Committee.
Shakespeare's sports canon,Chris Coculuzzi
Sport physiology study guide,Stephen C Jefferies
Sport informatics,Andreas Nilsson
Manuale dell'imperfetto sportivo,Beppe Severgnini
Kultura fizyczna ludności ukraińskiej na ziemiach polskich (1868-1939),Stanisław Zaborniak
Cohesion in sports and organizational psychology,Robert L. Grice
Title IX,Joanne R. Washburn
Ren ti yun dong fen xi,Qingcheng Yuan
Uma escola para a inclusão social,"Conferência Nacional de Educação, Cultura e Desporto (2nd 2001 Brasília, Brazil)"
"A century of women's sports, 1905-2005",Mary Lou Norwood
How the body works in sport,Teresa Brookes
Atalanta,George Sommerville Sandilands
Kīlā phư̄nmư̄ang Thai,Chātchai Komarathat.
Sŭpʻochʻŭ Kʻoria,Wŏn-je Kim
ʻOśeh tseḥoḳ meha-ʻavodah,David Ratt
Spravedlivostʹ sily,I︠U︡. P. Vlasov
Fizičkata kultura kaj starite istočni civilizacii,Milorad Stefanoviḱ
Using sports for reading and writing activities,Lance M Gentile
Sŭpʻochʻŭ pŏpche ŭi kaesŏn panghyang e kwanhan yŏnʼgu,Chae-ok Chang
"Russia in the 'eighties,' sport and politics",John F. Baddeley
Saban tue--khalyknyn︠g︡ i︠a︡shăeshe,D. R. Sharafutdinov
Game day for the glory of God,Stephen Altrogge
Il mondo dello sport oggi,"Seminario internazionale ""Il mondo dello sport oggi: un campo d'impegno cristiano"" (2005 Rome, Italy)"
Interpretacija športa,Roman Vodeb
Sport und Recht,Peter C. Honegger
Brussels in focus,Bill Seary
Zhongguo jing ji ti yu chan ye shi chang yan jiu =,Jia Tang
From Colonials to Bearcats,Tim Schum
al- Waḍʻ al-qānūnī li-ʻuqūd intiqāl al-lāʻibīn wa-al-muḥtarifīn, Muḥammad Sulaymān Aḥmad
Direcciones del entrenamiento deportivo,Armando Forteza de la Rosa
La France et l'olympisme,Patrick Clastres
Prevent professional prize fighting and authorize amateur boxing in the District of Columbia,United States. Congress. House. Committee of Conference
Stelle in corsa,Alfio Branda
Effect of mental imagery of a motor task on the Hoffmann reflex,Brendon S. Hale
Clarification of the values held for intramural activities by intramural participants,Connie Edmonston
Política de esportes no Brasil,Eduardo Dias Manhães
Sportivnai︠a︡ trenirovka i organizm,V. A. Druzʹ
Die sozialerzieherische Funktion des Sports,Martin Bührle
Relationship between athletes' value systems and preferred motivational techniques,Laurie Louise Turner
Os direitos do torcedor,Ricardo de Moraes Cabezón
Les Sports athlétiques,Frantz Reichel
Sociologie de l'engagement corporel,Bastien Soulé
Uwarunkowania i sposoby wdrażania orientacji marketingowej w klubach sportowych,Zygmunt Waśkowski
Selected to represent,James McDowell
Sports for fitness,James F Kelly
Competitive anxiety in sport,Rainer Martens
Team perceptions of cohesion among deaf/nondeaf culture and starter/nonstarter varsity athletes at Gallaudet University,Rebecca Ann Clark
Analyzing the private contributions among collegiate letterwinners,Matthew Stephen Yablunosky
Athletics in ancient Cyprus and the Greek tradition,Clea C. Hadjistephanou
Stalʹnye muskuly Tagila,Boris Telkov
100 let tulʹskogo sporta,Sergeĭ Gusev
De sabor nacional,David Wood
A cinematographical study of the correlation between body lean and speed of seventh grade boys during a thirty-yard segment of a seventy-yard sprint,Wayne Keith Colman
Parent attitudes toward physical education at Fairhaven Middle School,Richard James Hiebert
Competitive anxiety level differences among male and female athletes and non-athletes,Dennis F. Lewis
Football and English society in the nineteenth century,Terence Gleeson
The role of physical education and sport in the nation-building process in Kenya,Sydney Owen Hall
"Marketing structures, activities and outcomes amongst selected national sport organizations",Sandra L. Gage
Traditional games in South America,Veerle Van Mele
Foundations of Sport and Exercise Psychology With Web Study Guide-5th Edition,"Robert Weinberg, Daniel Gould"
Case Studies in Sport Communication,"Burns, David"
Memories of Yesteryear,A. Katharine Francis
Dedicated Lives,Greg Downes
El hombre y los campeones en el deporte soviético,Coco López
Scallywags and the Wham Kabam Gran,Cameron Stelzer
Sports in Winter,Jenna Lee Gleisner
What makes sports gear safer?,Kevin Kurtz
"Pants off, this sporting life",Roy Slaven
Biggest chokes in sports,"Hawkins, Jeff (Sportswriter)"
Game Changer,Margaret Peterson Haddix
The dictionary of sports,"Carlton Books, Don Jozwiak"
Sport and PE,"Kevin Wesson, Nesta Wiggins, Sue Hartigan, Graham Thompson"
Triumph!,"Pat Williams, Ken Hussar"
The man in the glass,Murray Deaker
The oddest superstitions of all time,Will Graves
The Gaelic games quiz book,Andy Watters
Win that sprint,Angela Royston
Pop fleyes,"Ed Jaworowski, Bob Popovics"
Sport & leisure,Ray Barker
Encyclopédie junior des sports,"Martine Podesto, Francis Magnenot, Isabelle Allard"
SPARK Favorite Sports Spot-The-Differences,"Tallarico, Tony J., Jr."
Australian Cricket Digest Volume 7,Lawrie Colliver
Washington Sports Trivia,"Greg Oberst, J. Alexander Poulton"
How to Design the World's Best Sports Stadium,Paul Mason
Hverjir eru bestir?,Guðjón Ingi Eiríksson.
Sports and Physical Exercise in Early Modern Europe,"Rebekka v. Mallinckrodt, Angela Schattner"
Sports Sticker Activity Book,National Geographic Kids
Popular Politics and Popular Culture in the Age of the Masses,Jeff Hill
Gaffers,Trevor Keane
Race to Win,Alan Blair
Sports Science,Kazuyuki Kanosue
L' esport és notícia,Xavier Pujadas i Martí
"L' altra olimpíada, Barcelona '36",Xavier Pujadas i Martí
Bewegungslernen im Sport,Josef Wiemeyer
Born to Run,"Dean Karnazes, Albert Lewis"
Legends in Black,"Tom Johnson, Andy Martin, Geoff Watson"
Sport and PE,"Kevin Wesson, Nesta Wiggins, Graham Thompson, Sue Hartigan"
Big book of who,"Andrea Woo, Sam Barclay, Tim Gramling, Corinne Cummings"
Physics for sport,"Kerry Parker, Malcolm Parry"
Sports technology,Geoff Thompson
Ultimate Yankee Book,Harvey Frommer
Unleash the Dragon Within,Steven Macramalla
Women and Sports Coaching,Nicole Lavoi
Athletic Experience at Historically Black Colleges and Universities,"Billy Hawkins, Joseph Cooper, Akilah Carter-Francique, J. Kenyatta Cavil"
Sport Science,Simon Rea
Art of Travel Conversation,"Keith Lamb, Louise Howland"
Yosemite in the Sixties,"Yvon Chouinard, Steve Roper, Kevin Starr, Glenn Denny"
Physics of Sports,Michael Lisa
Wacky Sports,"Michael J. Rosen, Ben Kassoy, Doug Jones"
Advanced physical education & sport,"John Honeybourne, Michael Hill, Helen Moors"
On Wisconsin!,"Don Kopriva, Jim Mott, Pat Richter, Barry Alvarez, Elroy Hirsch"
Super Charge Your Learning,Richard J. Giordano
Gentlemen Only Ladies Forbidden,Percival Farquhar
Coaching Soccer Like Guardiola and Mourinho,Timo Jankowski
"Physical Education, Exercise and Sport Science in a Changing Society",William H. Freeman
Major Problems in American Sport History,"Steven Riess, Thomas Paterson"
"IB Sports, Exercise and Health Science Print and Online Course Book Pack",John Sproule
Touchstones,Steve Mascord
Fan or Fanatic,Mitch Melan
A team sport,Cala Heald
"Franky Snow, tome 6",Buche
Joe Bugner,"Joe Bugner, Stuart Mullins"
Hijo del Pescador,"Chris Malloy, Joshua Berry, Gerry Lopez, Ramon Navarro"
Lenny,"Lenny Hayes, Jason Phelan"
Història il·lustrada de l'esport a Catalunya,Xavier Pujadas i Martí
Great Grand Final Heist,Ian Heads
Ski Trails in the Canadian Rockies,"Chic Scott, Darren Farley"
Night the Music Died,Ian Heads
Philosophy and Sport,Anthony O'Hear
Rock Climbing,Gabi Flecken
Rhino,"Ryan Harris, Stephen Gray"
Billy Slater,John Ellicott
La Joconde et Platini,Jean Glavany
2019 Rugby Almanack,"Clive Akers, Geoff Miller, Adrian Hill"
Letters To 87,"Brad Mangin, Matt Maiocco, Michael Zagaris"
Miracle Match,Ian Brayshaw
Legal Aspects of Sports,"Miller, John J., Kristi L. Schoepfer"
When Children Play,Gina McMurchy-Barber
Ohio Sports Trivia,"Vince Guerrieri, J. Alexander Poulton"
TC - Tom Carroll,"Tom Carroll, Nick Carroll"
Mountains Don't Care,Dee Molenaar
Legal Concepts in Sport,Linda Jean Carpenter
Boxed,"Carlos Rolon, Franklin Sirmans"
Winter Hikes of Western Washington Deck,Craig Romano
Walk Tall,"Jim Stynes, Warwick Green"
"Our Bodies, Our Bikes","Elly Blue, April Streeter"
Visions of Sport,"Inc. Staff Getty Images, Vision Sports Publishing Staff"
Weird Records,Jim Theobald
The Best Game Ever,Mark Bowden
Uncommon Heroes,John Ellicott
Sports Marketing,Daniel J. Bruton
Sport,Mike Cronin
Zhongguo shao shu min zu chuan tong ti yu hui cui,Quan guo shao shu min zu chuan tong ti yu yun dong hui Zu wei hui. Xin wen xuan chuan bu
The code of the Court of Arbitration for Sport,Despina Mavromati
Texas off-Road Racing,Mike Kowis
Platón en Anfield,Serafín Sánchez
Najstarsze książki w zbiorach Biblioteki Muzeum Sportu i Turystyki w Warszawie,"Hanna Jeznak, Barbara Mikocka, Maria Rotkiewicz"
Stockholmsolympiaden 1912,"Hans Bolling, Leif Yttergren"
Österreichs Deutschland-Komplex,Gerhard Urbanek
101 Eesti spordilugu,Tiit Karuks
Olympian,Basil A. Ince
Overplayed,David King
Every boy's book,"Harvey, William, Harrison Weir"
Norges 100 største sportsøyeblikk,Svein Tore Bergestuen
La vida está en los rebotes,Juan Jacobo Velasco
Auch dem Papst half ich mal aus der Klemme,Klaus Huhn
Conditioning tolerance?,Hannu Itkonen
Idrottens bestraffningsregler,Krister Malmsten
"Sports, body and health","Jørn Hansen, Niels Kayser Nielsen"
Kayaker's Guide to Lake Champlain,"Catherine Frank, Margaret Holden, Arthur Cohn"
Zigong Shi ti yu zhi,
Sports guide USA,Frank Siering
Never a Bad Game,Mark McCarter
Athletics,Douglas Gordon Arthur Lowe
Petite philosophie du tennis,Christophe Lamoure
Revival by the river,Donna Eyring
Baseball and Bubble Gum,"Tom Zappala, Ellen Zappala, John Molori, Joe Orlando"
101 super sports jokes,Judith Bauer Stamper
"Golden Years, Golden Hours",Paul F. Vang
Sport und Ästhetik,"Bröskamp, Bernd & Alkemeyer, Thomas (Herausgeber)"
The love of baseball,Paul Adomites
100 things oklahoma fans should know & do before they die,"Richardson, Steve (Freelance writer)"
Esquire's First sports reader,
Searching for heroes,Ian Wooldridge
La géographie du football en France,Loïc Ravenel
Careers in sports and fitness,Debra Schmidt
Altijd de beste,H. W. Pleket
Sports club,Barbara Bourassa
Potent pastimes,A. M. Grundlingh
The Eagle book of records and champions,
"The science behind soccer, volleyball, and other popular sports",Stephanie Watson
Nan shi,Yaojia Chen
The Encyclopædia of sport,"Henry Charles Howard, Hedley Peek, Frederick G. Aflalo"
"Outdoor sports, the year 'round",Popular Mechanics Press
Power up! kids,Dave Branon
Beyond Coaching,"Greg Roeszler, Harrison Phillips, Donna Miesbach"
Shatel,Tom Shatel
"Onderzoeksmethoden voor Sportstudies, 3 druk","Jones, Ian"
Bizarre things we've done for sport,Tyler Omoth
Epic,"Peter Corney, Justin Field"
Amusements and sports in American life,"Weaver, Robert B."
Philosophy of American Sport,Arthur G. Ogden
Der geteilte deutsche Sport,Deutsche Vereinigung für Sportwissenschaft. Sektion Sportgeschichte. Tagung
Volleyball Coaches Planner,The Art of Coaching Volleyball
Demokrati og kropslighed,Henning Eichberg
Nachinalosʹ s legendy,Orekhov Anatoliĭ Ivanovich
Go Hard!,"Craig Null, Hand, Robert G. ""Gary"", Jr., Hand, Robert G. ""Gary"", Jr., William Horton ""Bill"" Kurtis"
"Hold Fast, Tweak Hard",Michael Goodwin
How to rappel!,Craig Luebben
Glory,Jack B. Tany
Learn to count,
Story of the San Francisco 49ers,Jim Gigliotti
Story of the Houston Texans,Jim Whiting
Story of the Miami Dolphins,Jim Gigliotti
Story of the New York Jets,Jim Gigliotti
Story of the Las Vegas Raiders,K. C. Kelley
Story of the Washington Redskins,Jim Gigliotti
Story of the Tampa Bay Buccaneers,Jim Whiting
Story of the New York Giants,Jim Gigliotti
Story of the Dallas Cowboys,Jim Gigliotti
Story of the Tennessee Titans,Jim Whiting
Story of the Carolina Panthers,Jim Whiting
Story of the Los Angeles Rams,K. C. Kelley
Story of the Denver Broncos,K. C. Kelley
Cent ans de P.U.C,Claude-Louis Gallien
El derecho venezolano del deporte,Carlos Felice Castillo
Da razve serdt︠s︡e pozabudet--,Gleb Raskolʹnikov
Lo sport a Firenze,"Eugenio Giani, Beppe Parenti"
Web sports marketing,Dan Migala
The Gift of Sports,Philip P. Arnold
Latvijas sports,Andris Stag̓is
Wacky team sports,Alix Wood
Cultura deportiva argentina,Osvaldo Jara
Athletic training case scenarios,Keith M. Gorse
Lo sport degli europei,"Anna Maria Pioletti, Nicola Porro, Nicola Porro"
Le regole e il sudore,Giovanni Boniolo
Tales from the Purdue Boilermakers locker room,Doug Griffiths
Final Four,"Allan Morey, Keith McCarthy"
World Series,"Allan Morey, Keith McCarthy"
World Cup,"Allan Morey, Mandy Kaplan"
NBA Finals,"Allan Morey, Keith McCarthy"
Stanley Cup Finals,"Allan Morey, Keith McCarthy"
Bill Stern's sports quiz book,William Stern
The sportsman's hornbook,
Super Bowl,"Allan Morey, Keith McCarthy"
Canyoning in the Colorado San Juan Mountains,"Ira Lewis, Lisa Lewis"
Sport und staat,"Baeumler, Alfred"
Dialectic of enlightenment as sport,Tom Donovan
The one-hundred-year history of women's sports at the University of Nebraska,Kristi Lowenthal
Me-ʻA'g'ar ʻad Elat,Meir Orenstein
"2012, el deporte en cifras",Ecuador. Ministerio del Deporte
Sport & fitness,Beryl Dixon
Der Markt für Spitzensport,Rudolf Kubat
Sportanthropologie,Wolfram Bernhard
Le Collège d'athlètes de Reims,"Tony Froissart, Jean Saint-Martin"
Les enjeux du sport en Afrique,Jean-Jacques Aziza Antoine Hongnyo
"¡En sus marcas, listos...!",Gregorio Bello Suazo C.
Le culte du corps et de l'esprit,"Christophe Henrion, Tony Froissart"
"Sport, gender and sexuality",Michael A. Messner
Fegyverük a sport,Ferenc Török
Story of the Los Angeles Chargers,K. C. Kelley
Winning the Transition Game,Adonal Foyle
Story of the Indianapolis Colts,Jim Whiting
Story of the Jacksonville Jaguars,Jim Whiting
Story of the New England Patriots,Jim Gigliotti
Story of the Atlanta Falcons,Jim Whiting
Story of the Philadelphia Eagles,Jim Gigliotti
Supōtsu roppō,Japan
Esquire's 2nd sports reader,Arnold Gingrich
My favorite sports stories,William Stern
Sport und Staat ...,"Baeumler, Alfred"
Braves Win! Braves Win! Braves Win!,"Tom Hufford, Bill Nowlin, Len Levin"
Hail to the Victors 2020,"Seth Fisher, Seth Fisher, Brian Cook, Ace Anbender"
Fred Wacker's Years in Racing,"Wacker, Fred, 3rd, Robert Birmingham"
Aikido Comes to America,"Antonio Aloia, Kirby, George"
Major sports techniques illustrated,"Allen, Ethan"
Sport and Exercise Psychology,Peter R. E. Crocker
Let's play!,"Debjani Chatterjee, Brian G. D'Arcy, Shirin Adl"
Football in a Forest--The Life and Times of Kenan Memorial Stadium / Vol. II,Lee Pace
Sportinformatik trifft Sporttechnologie,
Facetten sozialer Unterstützung,"Maike Tietjens, Strauss, Bernd"
Paradise and Beyond,Chris Sutton
Champion Crack-Ups.,MacMillan
Die Linke und der Sport,Gabriel Kuhn
Triumph and Tragedy,Peter Jackson
Molecular Exercise Physiology,Henning Wackerhage
Mythos Sport,"Hans Lenk, Dietmar Schulte"
Do curve balls really curve?,"Fischer, David"
Fisiología del deporte y el ejercicio - 5. edición,W. Larry Kenney
Careers in focus,Ferguson Publishing
Drivers of Athletic Success the Journal,Adonal Foyle
Over at the Rink,Stella Partheniou Grasso
Tom Brady,Jordan Lowe
When All the Cheerleaders Were,Robyn RYLE
Joe the Schmo Can Catch a Big Fish,"Michele White (Murray), Michele White (Murray)"
Authentic Iron Palm,Phillip Starr
Wandering along the Way of Okinawan Karate,Giles Hopkins
Last Out,Matthew Sullivan
Pandamonium!,Mark McCarter
Sports Data Mining,"Robert P. P. Schumaker, Osama K. Solieman, Hsinchun Chen"
Sports Book,
First Fork Sinnemahoning and Its Tributaries,"Scherder, Ralph, 3rd"
Figure Skate,"H. E. Vandervell, B. A. Thurber"
Lost in Boxing,"Carlos Acevedo, Oliver Goldstein, Jimmy Tobin"
Ti qian kan Ao yun,
"Pearson Canada Supplemental Cases in Marketing, 2007 Edition",Cindy Stewart
A league of their own,
Building self-confidence,"Chris Sellars, National Coaching Foundation"
"The science behind football, volleyball, cycling and other popular sports",Stephanie Watson
10 Days,Ananta Chetry
Social Psychology in Sport and Exercise,"Ann-Marie Knowles, Ross Lorimer, Vaithehy Shanmugam"
Isshin,"Victor Smith, James Keenan"
Plna bedna sampanskeho,Ota Pavel
Mr. Notre Dame,"Jason Kelly, George Connor, Jack Connor"
CCC Sailing Directions Orkney and Shetland Islands,Clyde Cruising Club
Street's Pilot/Guide to the Cape Verde Islands,"Street, Donald, Jr., Jeremy McGeary, Stephen J. Pavlidis"
2510 North Brittany Chart Pack,Imray
Cruising Almanac 2020,"Imray, Cruising Association"
3210 Gibraltar to Cabo de la Nao Chart Atlas,Imray
3210 Gibraltar to Cabo de la Nao Chart Atlas Wiro Bound,Imray
Eat Clean TRAIN DIRTY,Katie Tedder
Bulgarian sport for a peaceful world,Bogomil Nonev
Kevin Durant,Jordan Lowe
Russell Westbook,Jordan Lowe
Kyrie Irving,Jordan Lowe
"Proceedings of the 2nd International Colloquium on Sports Science, Exercise, Engineering and Technology 2015","Shariman Ismadi Ismail, Norasrudin Sulaiman, Rahmat Adnan"
Olympia als Bildungsidee,"Annette R. Hofmann, Michael Krüger"
Play with Your Brain,Travis Norsen
SUMMARY of the Mamba Mentality,John Wilder
Hockey Is for Me,"Jamal Mayers, Andrew Jesernig, Chicago Blackhawks"
Dirt Around Lake Tahoe,Kathryn Reed
Being a Sport Psychologist,Richard Keegan
Muzzleloading Guns for Self Defense,"Smith, Wm. Hovey, 3rd"
Buying Used Muzzleloading Guns,"Smith, Wm. Hovey, 3rd, Smith, Wm. Hovey, 3rd, Smith, Wm. Hovey, 3rd, Smith, Wm. Hovey, 3rd"
STEM in the Greatest Sports Events (Set Of 6),North Star North Star Editions
World's Greatest Soccer Players (Set Of 8),North Star North Star Editions
Sports medicine for specific ages and abilities,"Nicola Maffulli, K. M. Chan, Robert M. Malina, Tony Parker"
Sport UK,Moira Butterfield
Bildung im Sport,Michael Krüger
1960s in Sports,Miles Coverdale Jr.
Mutt's Dream,Howard Burman
Life Is Fun. Baseball Is Serious!,Ascend Books
Tailgater's Guide to SEC Football Volume V,"Chris Warner, Jamie Welch"
Building or Restoring Your Muzzleloader,Wm. Hovey Smith
Soziale Konstruktion von Geschlecht im Sport,Ilse Hartmann-Tews
AK-47 Survival Rifle Builder's Guide,"Dane Draven, Dane Draven, Dane Draven, Dane Draven, Dane Draven"
National Speedway Directory - 2020 Edition,"Timothy W. Frost, Allan E. Brown"
Athletic Trap!,Craig Boykin
Baseball Memories,Ronald Mayer
Imray 2120 North Sea - Nieuwpoort to Den Helder Chart Atlas 2020,Imray
Running in Silence,"Rachael Steil, Paula Quatromoni"
Ionian,"Imray, Rod & Lu Heikell"
Imray 2150 Waddenzee - Den Helder to Norderney Chart Atlas 2020,Imray
Ponies West,"Jeff Pappas, Murphy Hooker"
Stars of Sports,"Matt Chandler, Shane Frederick"
Lost in Boxing,"Carlos Acevedo, Jimmy Tobin"
Jock Whisper,Liz Matis
The Little Book of GAA Facts,"Ryan, Eddie (Sports writer)"
The Last Tackle,James G Wallgren
Ultimate Performance Analysis Tool,"Frutuoso G. M. Silva, Quoc Trong Nguyen, Acácio F.P.P. Correia, Filipe Manuel Clemente, Fernando Manuel Lourenço Martins"
Proceedings of the 11th International Symposium on Computer Science in Sport,"Martin Lames, Dietmar Saupe, Josef Wiemeyer"
The Grasshopper - Third Edition,"Bernard Suits, Frank Newfeld, Thomas Hurka"
Therapeutic modalities,"Marybeth Horodyski, Chad Starkey"
Sports are fun,"Vladislav Krasnov, Smith (undifferentiated)"
Isle Royale National Park,Jim DuFresne
Physical education and the study of sport,"Bob, Dr Davis, Ros Bull, Jan Roscoe, Dennis, Dr Roscoe"
Powered Paragliding Bible 6,"Jeff Goin, Tim Kaiser, Dennis Pagen"
On me 'eadline,"The Sun, John Perry"
"Faster, higher, smarter",Simon Shapiro
Unusual and awesome jobs in sports,Jeremy Johnson
Jin pai bei hou,Qilin Liu
Great moments of sportsmanship and extraordinary sports people,Paul R. Smith
BTEC sport level 2 assessment guide,Katherine Bowen
Coaching the whole child,David Haskins
The Scientific View of Sport,Helmut Baitsch Hans-Erhard Bock
Slovenska atletika 1945-1970,
Gaikoku ni okeru taiiku supōtsu no genjō,Japan. Monbushō
Sport in unserer Welt,"Ommo Grupe, Helmut Baitsch"
Sport medicine,"Kenneth Dwight Rose, Roy J. Shephard"
How sports began,
British best performances of all time,National Union of Track Statisticians.
"Jokoak, kirolak eta folklore-ikerketa",Emilio Xabier Dueñas
Breve historia del deporte argentino,Ezequiel Fernández Moores
ISSA 2009,Netherlands) World Congress of Sociology of Sport (2009 Utrecht
Handbuch Sportgeschichte,"Krüger, Michael, 1955-, Hans Langenfeld, Jürgen Court"
Magyar sport-magyar sors,József N. Pál
"Moving and knowing in sport, dance, physical education",Eleanor Metheny
Sportperiodika,Alfred H. Sokoll
The Lincoln library of todays sports champions,
Encyclopaedia of Sport and sportsmen,Charles Harvey
Encyclopedia of sport sciences and medicine,Leonard August Larson
Sport U.S.A.,
Psychologie in Training und Wettkampf,Karl Adam
The Heart and sports,
Who's who in physical culture,
Athletics,
Makten og æren,Bjørge Stensbøl
Regards sur le sport,"Benjamin Pichery, François L'Yvonnet, Michel Serres"
Terminologii︠a︡ sporta,A. N. Bleer
"7 sportivnykh triumfov Rossii i eshche 42 pobedy, kotorymi my gordimsi︠a︡",Vitaliĭ Borisovich Arkhireev
"Perspektivnye napravlenii︠a︡ v oblasti fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury, sporta i turizma",A. A. Kletneva
Organizational Behavior in Sport,"Eric W. MacIntosh, Laura J. Burton"
Deporte nacional,Ariel Scher
Derecho deportivo,Gerardo Luis Acosta Pérez
In the words of South African sporting heroes,G. N. Claassen
Los próceres tocan de primera,Escuela Superior de Ciencias Deportivas (Argentina)
National sport and olympic medals,
Report,Canada. Task Force on Sports for Canadians.
Physical education and sport,Council of Europe. Council for Cultural Co-operation.
Who's who in physical culture,
Idrett for alle,
Panorama of sports in America,Dick Friendlich
"At large, with Jerry Izenberg",Jerry Izenberg
You and me,Zhongguo xin wen zhou kan
Yun dong ji shu jiao xue fa,Shuyuan Xu
Leistungsaufbau aus sportpädagogischer und sportmedizinischer Sicht,
75 years alive and flourishing,"Cooke, Jim M. Litt"
Istoriko-kulʹturnoe i sportivno-prikladnoe razvitie nat︠s︡ionalʹnykh vidov sporta v Rossii,"Guli︠a︡ev, M. D. k.p.n."
Eesti spordi aastaraamat 1940--1949,"Rein Järva, Juhan Maidlo, Erlend Teemägi"
Wei Jin Nan Bei chao ti yu wen hua shi,Junqi Wang
Liao Xia Jin Yuan ti yu wen hua shi,Junqi Wang
The joyful athlete,George Beinhorn
Mexican American baseball in the Alamo region,Richard Santillan
Sport robotniczy w Łodzi 1918-1939,Sebastian Glica
Drugs in sports,"United States. Congress. House. Committee on Energy and Commerce. Subcommittee on Commerce, Trade, and Consumer Protection"
Les voix du sport,"Philippe Tétart, Sylvain Villaret"
Meeting the needs of injured veterans in the military Paralympic program,United States. Congress. House. Committee on Veterans' Affairs
Yovel li-sporṭ be-Universiṭat Tel-Aviv,"Yair Galily, Ilanah Berger"
The New Yorker album of sports and games,
Sports in China,
China's sports today,
Gold,Jörg Wetzel
"Ethik, Natur und Doping",Claudia Pawlenka
Politik im Sport,"Germany) Symposium ""Sportpolitik als Wissenschaftliche Entwicklungsregion"" (2009 Universität Göttingen"
Rip's roundball and redemption,Phil Ripton
L'empire des sports,"Pierre Singaravélou, Julien Sorez"
Norbert Elias and globalization,Akira Ōhira
Sport und Zivilgesellschaft,Deutsche Vereinigung für Sportwissenschaft. Sektion Sportphilosophie. Jahrestagung
Sportwaffen im Visier waffenrechtlicher Verbote,Germany) Institut für Deutsches und Internationales Sportrecht (Leipzig
Kommunikative Sportpädagogik,"Frei, Peter Professor Dr"
Nauchnye osnovy muzykalʹnoĭ stimuli︠a︡t︠s︡ii sportivnoĭ dei︠a︡telʹnosti,I︠U︡. G. Kodzhaspirov
Normativnoe pravovoe regulirovanie otechestvennoĭ sfery fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta,V. N. Zuev
Sportivnai︠a︡ bichura,V. A. Fomin
"Buku kenang²an PON VII, 26 Agustus-6 September 1969 di Surabaja",Pekan Olahraga Nasional
Munster G.A.A. story,Jim Cronin
Le Guide Marabout de tous les sports,
The Lincoln library of sports champions,
The Experiences of building a new society,János Veres
Sport a prawo karne,Andrzej J. Szwarc
Sports rules encyclopedia,
Hétnyelvű sportszótár,
"""Zeh raḳ sporṭ?""",Ronnie Lidor
Róma után Tokió előtt,
Informationen zum Sport in der Bundesrepublik Deutschland,
Sport in the Federal Republic of Germany,
Sport de France,
Shao shu min zu chuan tong ti yu,"Song Guo, Guoquan Zhu, Yun Liu"
Boks v Kazakhstane,K. S. Maulenov
Chosŏn ŭi sanai kŏdŭn p'utppol ŭl ch'ara,Chŏng-hwan Ch'ŏn
Saenghwal ch'eyuk chidoja paech'i saŏp ŭi sŏngbyŏl yŏnghyang p'yŏngka,Ŭn-ha Ko
Ent︠s︡iklopedii︠a︡ Kazakhstanskogo Boksa,K. S. Maulenov
"Osobnosti slovenského športu, 1896-2010",Anton Gajdos
"Sport, communication et socialisation",Alexandre Obœuf
Sport im Blickpunkt der Wissenschaften,Helmut Baitsch
Running for success,Richard Procello
"Fútbol, pan y circo",José Antonio Ruiz López
Empresas deportivas de nueva creación,Àngels Fañanàs
Ukhrujū minhā antum!,Muḥammad Būʻazzārah
Missbrauch der marktbeherrschenden Stellung durch Sportverbände,Daniel Grätz
Naličje takmičenja,Dragan Koković
Ying Han - Han Ying yun dong ren ti ke xue ci hui da dian,"Yingning Guan, Xiaoyang Xu, Xie,  Minhao"
"""Hou Ao yun shi dai"" Zhongguo ti yu chan ye fa zhan zhan lüe yan jiu",Yue Yang
A crash course in cool tricks,Ed Riley
Qaṭar al-shabāb wa-al-riyāḍah,Peters
Nambuk hakchadŭl i hamkke ssŭn minjok ŭi ch'eyuk palchŏn yŏn'gu,Minjok T'ongil Ch'eyuk Yŏn'guwŏn (Korea)
Indoor games and recreations,Gordon Stables
Varzish--qosidi sulḣu dūstī,Ėmomalī Raḣmonov
Dictionnaire culturel du sport,"Michaël Attali, Jean Saint-Martin"
Sport in de oorlog,"Ad van Liempt, Jan Luitzen, Erik Brouwer"
Een sportman doet niet aan politiek,André Swijtink
Outside the game,Jim Mandelaro
Car science,Jane P. Gardner
An illustrated price guide to non-paper sports collectibles,Theodore L. Hake
Sportswriting and sports photography,"Walters, John"
Integration gennem kroppen,Sine Agergaard
Ying Han Han Ying ti yu ci hui,Hanquan Liu
Shao shu min zu chuan tong ti yu xue ke ti xi jian she yan jiu,Jingdong Zhao
85 let slovenske atletike,Boris Dular
The ultimate handbook of motivational quotes for coaches and leaders,Pat Williams
Bóltspøl millum Klakk og Kjøl,Árni Dahl
Milliardenbusiness Sport,Daniel Germann
Tra vocazione e professione,Antonio Roversi
Cultures urbaines et sportives alternatives,Florian Lebreton
Justicia deportiva,David Hernández González
Spectators guide to sports,
Philosophie des Sports,"Hans Lenk, Moser, Simon"
Supōtsu Giren nijūgonenshi,Supōtsu Shinkō Kokkai Giin Kondankai
Perspectives for sport,
The Little known Olympic sports,Harvey M. Jessup
Toward a theory of sport,
World of sport,
Management Strategies in Athletic Training,"Richard Ray, Jeff G. Konin"
Psychology of sport,
The question of sports,
Sport for all,
Radiographie du sport français,"Guy Lagorce, Michel Thierry"
Sports dictionary in seven languages,
"Professional sports antitrust bill, 1965",United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on the Judiciary. Subcommittee on Antitrust and Monopoly.
Sport v sovetskoǐ strane,N. Tarasov
Games and sport in Old Mexico,Román Piña Chan
Jüdischer Sport und jüdische Gesellschaft,"Toni Niewerth, Tomasz Jurek, Wolf-Dieter Mattausch"
Jiangnan kan ti yu,"Liu, Jiangnan (Professor of physical education)"
Der Schulhof als bewegungsorientierter Sozialraum,Ahmet Derecik
Dáil stars,Conor McMorrow
New York State Senate public hearing on paperless ticket transferability,"New York (State). Legislature. Senate. Committee on Investigations, Taxation, and Government Operations"
"Questionnaires psychologiques pour l'activité physique, le sport, et l'exercice",Nathalie André
Golden girls,Margot Butcher
"Boys' own book of sports, birds, and animals",John Uncle
Saving sport,Kevin O'Gorman
"Sexe, drogue et mafias",Patrick Vassort
Exploding sports myths,George Shirling
Les dieux du stade,François Charton
Choice cartoons from Sports illustrated,"Preston, Charles"
"Stadia, arenas and grandstands","International Conference ""Stadia 2000"" (1st 1998 Cardiff, Wales)"
Las ligas profesionales,Ramón Terol Gómez
Wo guo jiao ke wen wei ti ling yu de fa lü zhi du,Xiaofeng Fan
Sports,Morgan Hughes
"Scooters (Hughes, Morgan, Wheels in Motion.)",Morgan Hughes
Khalkhyn domogt khu̇chtėn,Lkhamyn Khaĭdav
Cheerleading,Morgan Hughes
"Materialy parlamentskikh slushaniĭ, ""kruglogo stola"", rasshirennogo zasedanii︠a︡, provedennykh Komitetom Gosudarstvennoĭ Dumy po fizicheskoĭ kulʹture i sportu","A. T. Sikharulidze, A. V. Mikheev, I. V. Borodkina, M. Sh Orlov"
Istorii︠a︡ fizkulʹtury i sporta na Kubani,I︠U︡. G. Bich
Christmanship,Greg Linville
Mexican American baseball in the Pomona Valley,Richard Santillan
Teams of citizen-athletes,Lonzy F. Edwards
Formy razreshenii︠a︡ sportivnykh sporov,E. V. Pogosi︠a︡n
Gestión parlamentaria de la Comisión de Deportes 3,Santiago Rodríguez Bornert
Coronados de gloria,Víctor Andrés Pochat
"Líderes del deporte, líderes de la vida",Juan Pablo Sagarna
Sport-PR und PR im Sport,Michael Schaffrath
Olympia 1936,Alexander Emmerich
Rast︠s︡vet sporta v Rumynskoĭ Narodnoĭ Respublike,
Sportszótár,
Els esports i els jocs populars tradicionals de les Illes Balears,Francesc Amengual Rigo
Rechtsextremismus im Sport,Gunter Pilz
Sucre,Lázaro Hernández
Jüdischer Sport und Sport der Juden in Deutschland,Lorenz Peiffer
Handbuch Sportpolitik,Walter Tokarski
Pravo na sport,Slavoljub Radovanović
"Sport, économie & management",Pascal Chantelat
Enciclopedia degli sport antichi e moderni,
Development of human values through sports,Reuben B. Frost
Encyclopaedia of sport,"Harvey, Charles"
"Centennial sports review, Hamilton, Canada",Ivan Miller
Champions à vendre,
Die Rechtsproblematik der Sportwette,Tobias Volkwein
Sport voran,
Stolte øyeblikk 70-tallet,Rolf Arne Odiin
"Sports innovation, technology and research","Dominic Southgate, Peter R. N. Childs, Anthony M. J. Bull"
Sportdidaktik und Sportpädagogik,Harald Lange
Sporting lives,"Sporting Lives Symposium (2010 Crewe, Cheshire East, England)"
New Mexico's pueblo baseball league,"Baker, James D. (Mathematician)"
Sport and the law,"Samuel O. Regalado, Sarah K. Fields"
Pratiques sportives adolescentes,"Anne Bourgain, Eliane Allouch"
Mats Sundin (Hockey Heroes Biography Series) (Hockey Heroes),Kerry Banks
"Les cultures du corps et les pédagogies chrétiennes, XIXe-XXe","Guy Avanzini, François Hochepied"
Sport als Sprungbrett in die Gesellschaft?,Michael Mutz
T'aekwŏndo kyŏnggi rŭl wihan siksŭpkwan mit pojoje ŭi p'iryosŏng,Chi-hyŏn Kim
Ying Han Aolinpike ti yu ci dian,"""Ying Han Aolinpike ti yu ci dian"" bian xie zu"
Monografía del deporte apoleño,César Augusto Machicao Gámez
Gu dai Zhong xi fang ti yu wen hua,Huaimeng Cui
"New Zealand 50, Australia 0",Jack Sharp
Spitzensport,"Harald Lange, Lutz Nordmann"
Teikoku Nihon to supōtsu,Kō Takashima
Honour,Richard O'Connor
Las federaciones deportivas,Andreu Camps
Zhong guo li dai ti yu shi hua,Mo Hai
Sports science,Shar Levine
Biggest Upsets of All Time,Barry Wilner
"Concussion in Sports, An Issue of Clinics in Sports Medicine","William P. Meehan MD, Lyle J. Micheli MD"
101 volleyball drills,Peggy E. Martin
"Sport, Spiel und Leidenschaft","Carlotta von Maltzan, D. Simo"
Girls Got Game,Sue Macy
North Carolina's Mountains-To-Sea Trail Guide : The High Country - MST Segment 5,Friends of the Mountains-to-Sea Trail
Sports Idioms,"Vladimir Kovner, Lydia Razran Stone"
Sports memorabilia for dummies,Pete Williams
The magnificent seasons,"Art Shamsky, Barry Zeman"
The Science of Baseball,Norman D Graubart
The Science of Hockey,Ryan Nagelhout
Psych Up or Psych Out,"Michal J. Asken Ph.D., Breton Asken"
Need For Speed!,Trey King
Sport und Kultur in der DDR,Werner Rossade
Hiera kai agōnes stēn archaia Hellada,Panos Valavanēs
Games and sanctuaries in Ancient Greece,Panos Valavanēs
Gymnastics,Rita Storey
Hockey,Rita Storey
Judo,Rita Storey
Cycling.,Rita Storey
Sports Star,Geoff Barker
Racing the Gods,Paul Ritter
About Us,Elizabeth Seckman
Sportkultur und jugendliches Selbstkonzept,Wolf-Dietrich Brettschneider
A history of federal government involvement in the development of sport in Canada,William D. Hallett
Routledge Handbook of Qualitative Research in Sport and Exercise,Andrew C. Sparkes
Hormones and sport,Zvi Laron
Mental Skills Training for Sport,Moira E. Stuart
Physics of sport,Individualized Science Instructional System
It’s Great to Be a Fan in Colorado,Todd Kortemeier
"Osnovni statistički pokazateli za fizička kultura, lov i šah vo SRM, 1964-1974",Macedonia (Republic). Republički zavod za statistika.
Roller hockey blues,"Steven Barwin, Gabriel David Tick"
"The Best of Peter Finney, Legendary New Orleans Sportswriter",Peter Finney
Barbie,Jacqueline A. Ball
La integridad del deporte,Rafael J. Chavero Gazdik
More tales from the Cubs dugout,"Bob Logan, Robert Logan"
Impact Weapon Combatives,W. Hock Hochheim
"Dunedin, FL",A. M. De Quesada
Community and Inclusion in Leisure Research and Sport Development,"Aarti Ratna, Brett Lashua"
The Magic of Team Work,Pat Williams
The 1912 Stockholm Olympics,"Leif Yttergren, Hans Bolling"
Sports Gear,Mary Elizabeth Salzmann
Sports heroes,Jason Hook
Joe Mauer,Star Tribune
Principles of Athletic Strength & Conditioning,Jim Kielbaso
Ti yu sai shi guan li,"Shouheng Wang, Qinghui Ye"
Best sports stories of 1974,Irving T. Marsh
Visual Encyclopedia of Sports,Metro Books
Merle Harmon stories,Merle Harmon
"I Did It, Dear Dragon",Margaret Hillert
"Play, Play, Play, Dear Dragon",Margaret Hillert
Alice Henderson Makes the Grade,Sr Silcox
No Ordinary Game,Kirk Westphal
Amazing Human Feats of Distance,Matt Scheff
Doping im Spitzensport als Soziales Problem,Antje Dresen
Handbuch Sportpädagogik,"Herbert Haag, Albrecht Hummel"
Hosannah the home run!,Alice Mulcahey Fleming
"Footbinding, feminism, and freedom","Hong, Fan."
Grosse Lexikon Der Ddr-Sportler,Volker Kluge
Directory of psychological tests in the sport and exercise sciences,Andrew C. Ostrow
Camp Buccaneer,"James, Brian"
The Palgrave Handbook of Paralympic Studies,"Ian Brittain, Aaron Beacom"
Le professioni dello sport,Silvia Lolli
A Super Steelers Journey,Merrill Shaffer
Gettysburg Eddie,Lawrence Knorr
Dictionary of sports quotations,
Stadium,K.C. Kelley
SuS 161 Sport und soziale Integration,
Perspektiven des Raums im Sport,Werner Pitsch
Sport Psychology,Catherine Sanderson
Incentive motivation in sport,Nancy L. Wood
"The Raven King (All for the Game, #2)",Nora Sakavic
Drivers of Athletic Success,Adonal Foyle
Kansas Jayhawks ABCs And 123s,Rob Peters
Tales from Aggieland,"Bo Carter, Mike McKenzie"
L' inglese dello sport e delle scienze motorie,Rolando Bacchielli
al-Thawrah wa-al-riyāḍah,
Sports Development in the United States,"Peter Smolianov, Dwight Zakus, Joseph Gallo"
Nikolaos Ang. Nesiōtes,Nikos A. Nēsiōtēs
Jim Murray Reader,"Jim Murray, Vin Scully"
Ball Game Math,Katie Marsico
World  According to Les Murray,Les A. Murray
Look Inside Sports,Rob Jones
American Sports History,STEMPSON  SCOTT
Sasha Cohen,Anne Hill
Sportsoziologie,Detlef Grieswelle
Ashes to Ashes,Gideon Haigh
History of Soccer in Australia,"Roy Hay, Bill Murray"
Laura Robson - The Biography,Campanella Tina
World Cup,Paul Hansford
Trio d'enfer,Hélène Gagnon
Foundations of Sport and Exercise Psychology 6th Edition with Web Study Guide,"Robert Weinberg, Daniel Gould"
Routledge Companion to Psychology in Professional Sports and the Performing Arts,"Robert J. Schinke, Dieter Hackfort"
Sport and Religion in the Twenty-First Century,"Hardin Go Bain-Selbo, Bruce J. Evensen, Chris Geyerman, Alan Goldenbach, Landon T. Huffman"
Champagne Charlie,"Charlie Magri, Jim McDonnell"
Techniques d'hier ... et d'aujourd'hui,Georges Vigarello
Passion sport,Georges Vigarello
L' Esprit sportif aujourd'hui,Georges Vigarello
Du jeu ancien au show sportif,Georges Vigarello
Improving concentration,Ian Maynard
What every man wants,Andrew Mann
Sport,Sarah Ridley
Working in Sport,"Masters, James (Physical education teacher)"
More than gold,Scottish Bible Society
Famous first facts about sports,"Irene M. Franck, David M. Brownstone"
Sports and Entertainment Marketing,"Ken Kaser, Dotty B. Oelkers"
Sport na Górnym Śląsku,Antoni Steuer
The GAA Immortals,John Scally
Wacky moments in sports,Alix Wood
"Ping Pong, Vol. 1",Taiyō Matsumoto
Bibliographie der Spielbücher des 15. bis 18. Jahrhunderts,Manfred Zollinger
Za fizicheskata kultura i sporta,Todor Zhivkov
"Four Boys, Two Canoes and the Guadalupe River",Mae Durden-Nelon
Clinical Sport Psychology,"Frank L. Gardner, Zella Moore"
Physical Education and the Study of Sport,"Robert Davis, Jan Roscoe, Ros Phillips"
The faith of fifty million,"Christopher Hodge Evans, William R. Herzog"
Sport & fitness uncovered,
BTEC National Sport,m-adams
Sportfinanzierung - Spannungen zwischen Markt und Staat,"Martin-Peter Büch, Wolfgang Maennig"
Li Na,
Sport culture and sociology,Scott Witmer
Great Australian Sports Rorts,"John Rothfield, John Adams"
Physiology of Sport and Exercise 7th Edition With Web Study Guide,"W. Larry Kenney, Jack Wilmore, David Costill"
Grandes hazañas deportivas de Colombia,Alberto Galvis
Inside Pitch,Rick Allen
BTEC national sport,
You xi ren sheng,Yefu Zheng
Ice gold,Ted Wyman
Servant Leadership in Sport,Gregory S. Sullivan
Sport and PE,"Kevin Wesson, Nesta Wiggins, Graham Thomson, Sue Hartigan"
Me encanta el hockey,Ryan Nagelhout
The Bob Love story,"Bob Love, Mel Watkins"
Goalkeepers are crazy,"Large Imprint Books, Brian Glanville"
Art of Literary Conversation,"Keith Lamb, Louise Howland"
Avantage numérique,Hélène Gagnon
An unholy alliance,"Robert J. Higgs, Michael C. Braswell"
Total World Sport,Mark Ryan
BTEC National in sport & exercise science,"Jenny Brown, Simon Rea, John Chance, Jennifer Stafford-Brown"
The Bumper book of sporting wit,Richard Benson
Athletics,Andy Croft
Biggest blunders in sports,Paul Hoblin
Improving concentration,"Ian Maynard, National Coaching Foundation"
Bai nian Zhongguo ao yun,Xiaohua Wang
Sport-- Autonomie und Krise,Sven Güldenpfennig
Sensumotorisches Lernen und Sport als Reproduktion der Arbeitskraft,Sven Güldenpfennig
"Frieden, Herausforderungen an den Sport",Sven Güldenpfennig
Grenzen bürgerlicher Sportpädagogik,Sven Güldenpfennig
Sport,Sven Güldenpfennig
"Juego, historia, deporte y sociedad en América Latina",Eloy Altuve
Sport & active leisure,Angela Youngman
Top 101 athletes,Jeanne Nagle
Game changer,Kirk Cousins
"Der Diebstahl und andere Nachrichten aus der Soziologie des Sports, der Moral und der Sprache",Heinz Risse
Life and writings of Frank Forester (Henry William Herbert.),Henry William Herbert
Hanʼguk chʻeyuksa,Hang-nae Yi
Global games,"Maarten Van Bottenburg, Beverley Jackson"
Sport in contemporary society,D. Stanley Eitzen
"Chʻeyuk, sŭpʻochʻŭ chʻŏrhak",Chin-su Yi
Inside the minds,Aspatore Books Staff
Rodeo,Robin Johnson
Sports and athletics developments,James Harry Humphrey
Sporten,Rune Slagstad
Tosefet la-bibliografyah ha-sporṭivit,Lipa Leṿitan
A Basic Foil Companion,Paul Sise
Sports,Jim Kerr
Valkoisen Suomen urheilevat soturit,Erkki Vasara
Joe the Schmo Can Catch a Big Fish,Michele White
New Thinking Man's Guide to Professional Football,Paul Zimmerman
Velocity Calendar 2021,Pete Lyons
Teaching Cues for Sport Skills for Secondary School Students,Hilda A. Fronske
Snowshoeing Around Lake Tahoe,Kathryn Reed
Skating Stories,"E. F. Benson, B. A. Thurber"
BTEC first sport,"Simon Rea, Jennifer Stafford-brown"
Biochemical monitoring of sport training,"Atko Viru, Mehis, Ph.D. Viru"
The Perfection Point,"John Brenkus,Brenkus John"
BTEC Nationals Sport and Exercise Science Student Book + Activebook,Louise Sutton
You Can Follow the Rules,"Connie Colwell Miller, Victoria Assanelli"
Great Recession,Kate Riggs
Pally,"Gary Pallister, Ivan Ponting"
Literature Reviews in Sport Psychology,"Sheldon Hanton, Stephen D. Mellalieu"
Les mystères du sport en R.D.A,Roland Passevant
Encyclopedia of World Sports,Maddalen Esposito
Basic Rock Climbing,"Sam Fury, Diana Mangoba, Raul Guajardo"
"Sport, Politics and Society in the Middle East","Danyel Reiche Reiche, Tamir Sorek"
English National Identity and Football Fan Culture Who Are Ya?,Tom Gibbons
Bull City Summer,"Sam Stephenson, Howard L. Craft, Emma D. Miller, Adam Sobsey, Hiroshi Watanabe"
Concussed! : Sports-Related Head Injuries,"Keith Primeau, Kerry Goulet"
What's in Your Boathouse?,"Bob Matson, Dennis Evinrude"
Physical Basis for Exercise and Sport,"Merle L. Foss, Steven J. Keteyian"
Foundations of Physical Educaiton and Sport with Ready Notes and PowerWeb,"Deborah A. Wuest, Charles A. Bucher"
"Bibliographie québécoise sur l'activité physique, 1850-1973",Donald Guay
Take Me Out,"Bill Littlefield, Stephen Coren"
Moving Writing,"Jim Denison, Pirkko Markula"
Decolonizing Gender and Sexuality in Sport,Heather Sykes
How to Win When You Are Not Winning,Fiona Green
Womenrsquo;s Sport in Africa,"John Bale, Michelle Sikes"
Four Desert Challenge,"Rob Alcraft, Cliff Moon, Collins Big Cat Staff"
Great Walks of the World,D. Larraine Andrews
Seagull,Tina Satter
Simple Fly Fishing,"Yvon Chouinard, Craig Mathews, Mauro Mazzo"
Sports Nutrition for Health Professionals,"Natalie Digate Muth, Michelle Zive"
Rounders,"Alison Leslie, Liz Cummins"
Babine,"Pierce Clegg, Peter McMullan, Tony Amato, Mark Hume, Dave Hall"
"Physical Education, Sport and Schooling",John Evans
Alternative Sports and Pastimes,Graham Lanceley
All-Star Goofball Trivia,"Matt Chandler, Shane Frederick, Megan Cooley Peterson"
Quest for Gold,
Sport and Leisure,Speechmark
Dugout,"Adam Beechen, Manny Bello"
Wimbledon 2018,Paul Newman
African Americans in Sport,Gary Alan Sailes
Tempo libero e regime,Elisa Bizzarri
Complete Guide to Rugby World Cup,Tracy Rockwell
History of the Confraternity Shield 1980-2019,Tony Price
"Sport, Tourism and National Identities","Harris, John"
Essence of Sport,"Verner Moller, John Nauright"
Caught by Keating,Frank Keating
Canadian Sports Records,"J. Alexander Poulton, Gary"
Canadian Sports,Susan Hughes
Global Sport Business,"George Foster, Norman O'Reilly, Antonio Davila"
Antioxidants in Sports Nutrition,Manfred Lamprecht
New York Sports Trivia,"Edward Maloney, J. Alexander Poulton"
Draw of Sport,Murray Olderman
Sociology of Hypocrisy an Analysis of Sport and Religion,Stephen G. Wieting
Under pressure,Ray Lucas
Britain's sporting memories,
Sporting wit,Richard Benson
EFT for Sports Performance,Gary Craig
Doll Sports,Emily Osborn
"Developing People, Developing Schools","Peter Earley, Sara Bubb"
Playgrounds to the Pros,"Caroline Denyer Gallacci, Marc H. Blau, Doug McArthur"
Game Changers,Joao Medeiros
Language of Sport,Adrian Beard
Canadian Sports Quiz Book,J. Alexander Poulton
Refining Jin,Phillip Starr
Nate Encore et Toujours,"Lincoln Peirce, Isabelle Allard"
Weird Sports,"Sol Neelman, Brandy Rettig, Mike Davies"
Gender Diversity in European Sport Leadership,"Agnes Elling, Jorid Hovden, Annelies Knoppers"
Einsatz Von Schiedsgerichten Im Organisierten Sport,Matthias Holla
Native Americans and Sport in North America,Richard King
Sport and Social Exclusion,"Mike Collins, Tess Kay"
Jack Carroll,Paul Cupitt
Meet Me At Ray's,Patrick J. O'Connor
The participation of young boys in sports,Nancy D. Ragan
Fantastic Sports Facts,Michael Hurley
Score with Track and Field Math,Stuart Murray
The Philosophy of Aikido,John Stevens
The last legal spitball and other little-known facts about sports,Barbara Seuling
"Spalding's Football Guides for 1883, 1888, 1889, 1890, 1891 & 1893",Tom Benjey
Simple Machines in Sports,Gillian Gosman
Four Aces; One Expectation,Eli Kowalski
Wisdom,Ron Barassi
Religion and Sports,Rebecca Alpert
Sport 87,Manfred Seifert
Radio Five Live Sporting Yearbook,Desmond Lynam
eSports is Business,Tobias M. Scholz
Fathers & sons,Keith D. Guernsey
The mouth that roared,Dallas Green
The Olympics scandals,Moira Butterfield
80/20 Rule,Harvie Herrington
Water sports,David Jefferis
Duke of 18th and Vine,Harold Michael Harvey
"TGIT, Thank Goodness It's T-Ball Day","Kevin Christofora, Dale Tangeman"
Pigskin Rapture,"Mac Engel, Ron Jenkins, Troy Aikman"
Nick's Very First Day of Baseball,"Kevin Christofora, Dale Tangeman"
Sŭpʻochʻŭ pŏphak,Yŏng-chʻŏl Pak
Le sport en France,
Investigaciones breves en psicología del deporte,"Andrés López de la Llave, Ma. Carmen Pérez-Llantada, José María Buceta"
Sport Kinetics '97,Germany) Sport Kinetics '97 (5th 1997 Magdeburg
Baguazhang,Phillip Starr
Lao Shanghai feng qing lu,Shanghai tu shu guan
Sport in Wien,Birgit Baumann
Shanghai ti yu zhi,Yangwu Cai
Mastro fine sports auctions,Mastro Fine Sports Auctions (Firm)
The black athletes of the District of Columbia during the segregated years,Earl Telfair
The U.S. market for sports nutritionals,Packaged Facts (Firm)
Swell,Liz Clark
The Encyclopaedia of sport & games,Henry Charles Howard
Beyond the Barn,Reach Out to Horses
Media e co-marketing sportivo,Sergio Cherubini
"The Council of Europe and sport, 1966-1998",Council of Europe
Kōkō bukatsu no bunka shakai gakuteki kenkyū,Taketo Kai
The sportsman in Ireland,Robert Allan
"Kleine Schritte, grosse Sprünge",Stefan Wendt
Sporteeuw,Matty Verkamman
"Research report, sport and social exclusion",Michael F. Collins
Il fenomeno sportivo nell'ordinamento giuridico,Luca Di Nella
Xin Zhongguo ti yu wu shi nian,
Sport et pouvoirs au XXe siècle,Jean-Paul Clément
Betriebssport zwischen Arbeitgeberinteressen und Arbeitnehmerbedürfnissen,Andreas Luh
Macher und Matadore,Klaus Grundgeiger
Sport et identités,Serge Fauché
L'empreinte sportive indienne,Fabrice Delsahut
"Pop culture auction, May 20, 2000",
Sports and pastimes for in-doors and out,Oliver Optic
"Games, sports and amusements",Walter Edmund Roth
Idrettens lakeier,Frank Brandsås
Qin li shen ao,Jisong Wu
Enfin titulaire!,Chenez.
Sara Perovic,Sara Perovic
Becoming Coastal,Alex Zimmerman
My Journey from Boxing Ring to Boardroom,Hector Colon
Ursachenerklärung und Handlungszufriedenheit im Sport,Henning Allmer
Entwicklungspsychologische Grundlagen des Sports,Henning Allmer
Sport and Entertainment (Question & Answer Encyclopedia),Brian Williams
Sport & Entertainment,Brian Williams
Magic Bat Day,"Dale Tangeman, Kevin Christofora"
Athlete As National Symbol,"Villanueva, Nicholas, Jr."
Les sports en France,Jean Paul Ollivier
Triumph and tragedy,Peter Jackson
Outdoor sports the year 'round,
A focus on the extent of organised sporting activities amongst the 'coloured' people of the Cape Peninsula,Clare Digby
Illustrated Introduction to Japanese Baseball Cards,Robert K. Fitts
Varzishhā-yi maḥallī-i Afghānistān,ʻAzīz Āsūdah Tahmās
100 things Pirates fans should know & do before they die,Steve Ziants
The Winning Mindset,Damian Hughes
Sporting aviation handbook,
Moonlight Bait Company,Gregory Swartz
Overwinningen & nederlagen,"Mulder, Jan"
Any given number,Bill Syken
Pour bien faire du sport,
Idrætsboken,
Giovani e sport a Palermo,"Angela Di Pasquale, Angela Ruvolo"
Slava i pami︠a︡tʹ bylykh chempionov,Pavel Voronov
Competition issues related to sports,Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development
"Sport, business, and the law","R. Verow, Clive Lawrence, Peter McCormick"
Sovershenstvovanie ėkonomicheskogo mekhanizma v sfere fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta v uslovii︠a︡kh perekhoda k rynku,V. V. Aleshin
Anti-Samaranch'99,"Isaev, A. A."
Legacy Sport,"Neill Duffy, Fabien Paget, Jo Ramsay"
Fremdheit und Rassismus im Sport,"Bröskamp, Bernd & Alkemeyer, Thomas (Herausgeber)"
Goal! Let's play!,Joe Marriott
Léon Maigrichon,Dominique Demers
Sportethik und Sportökonomik,Egon Franck
Best Friends Become Strangers,"VSO Publishing LLC, H. M. Allen"
The best sports book in the whole wide world,Mauri Tapio Kunnas
It's My Time,"David L. Angeron, James L. Gamble"
Le sport et l'avenir,Georges Casella
Holiday cheer sports trivia,Santa Claus
Painting Pinehurst No. 2,"Jane Hixson, Jane Hixson"
Le sport et la loi,Serge Pautot
Ski freeride,Pierrick Garenne
Sports in Winter,Jenna Lee Gleisner
Home Truths,"Craig Bellamy, Matt Marshall, Phil Gould"
Mammoth Book of Weird Records,Jim Theobald
"Josef, the Indy Car Driver - Coloring Book",Chris Workman
Latinos and Latinas in American Sport,Jorge Iber
Rigby PM Collection,Rigby
Sporting profiles,Michael Parkinson
PADI Divemaster Manual,Padi
Rosiĭsʹko-ukraïnsʹkyĭ slovnyk z fizychnoï kulʹtury ta sportu,L. I. Chypylenko
On the Court,Matt Chandler
Three hundred things a bright boy can do,
Sport et télé,Eric Maitrot
Integrativnye podkhody v vozrastnoĭ i sportivnoĭ antropologii,B. A. Nikiti︠u︡k
Kommunikatives Handeln im Sportunterricht,Peter Frei
Great Bambino,Sam Chase
Visare te sportit shqiptar,Ismet Bellova
"Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura, sport, i turizm na Dalʹnem Vostoke",S. S. Dobrovolʹskiĭ
Fearless,Bill Rutherford
"Kleine Ideengeschichte der Sportwissenschaft, 1900-1914",Jürgen Court
Werder Bremen,Jörn Christiansen
Altaĭ Respublikada sporttyn͡g︡ nat͡s︡ionalʹnyĭ bu̇du̇mderi =,A. A. Selʹbikov
Springfield College studies in physical education,International Young Men's Christian Association College
Tʻi yü chih chʻun,Dechang Chen
Where the water kept rising,James W. Miller
Q&A supōtsu no hōritsu mondai,Supōtsu Mondai Kenkyūkai
Rules for coeducational activities and sports,
Dernière mission,Jean Ferrara
La actividad gimnástica y deportiva en Sevilla durante el siglo XIX,José P. Sanchís Ramírez
Zhongguo gu dai bei fang min zu ti yu shi kao,Cong Huang
"Citius, altius, fortius",Federico Corriente Basús
Sport in der DDR,Günther Fuchs
Physical culture and sport in Bulgaria through the centuries,Angel Solakov
"República, desporto e imprensa",Francisco Pinheiro
Portugal,
Wakayama-ken supōtsu 50-nenshi,
Nat︠s︡ionalen fizkulturen kompleks Rodina,
"Sentimiento, pensamiento y conducta de los atletas cubanos",
Pourquoi les blancs courent moins vite,Jean-Philippe Leclaire
Ti yu da guo de jue qi,Jian Chi
Staatsdoping,Klaus Latzel
Funkcija menadžmenta u animiranju sponzora,Zoran Kalinić
Sportainment,C. Bertling
Evaluation of the impact of sport-for-all policies and programs in Finland,Joel Juppi
La lucha contra el dopaje en el deporte,Fernando Olivero Barreto
"Situación actual de la educación física, el deporte y la recreación en Costa Rica",
Sport in contemporary society,D. Stanley Eitzen
Esporte e poder,João Saldanha
"Mongolyn Ulsyn bieiĭn tamir, sport",D. Narankhu̇u̇
Terni e lo sport nei 150 anni dell'unità d'Italia,Aldo Zerbini
"Sport et société, 1870-1914",
Emocje w sytuacjach startowych,Zbigniew Drozdowski
Igrovye tradit︠s︡ii narodov--kulʹturnai︠a︡ osnova rossiĭskogo sporta,A. V. Kylasov
Histoire du sport et géopolitique,Thierry Terret
Dine sporṭ ṿe-dine himurim ba-sporṭ be-Yiśraʼel,Zvi Jaffe
Quand le sport s'affiche,Jean-Yves Guillain
Mystère à Lake Placid,Roy MacGregor
Ti yu yun dong lun li xue,Shuyuan Xu
A philosophy of sport,Steven Connor
Fields of play,Daryl Leeworthy
Gesellschaft und Sport als Feld wissenschaftlichen Handelns,"Norbert Müller, Dieter Voigt, Kristina Bohnstedt"
Sport in the West,Donald J. Mrozek
Aktualʹnye problemy i perspektivy razvitii︠a︡ fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta,"Russia) Rossiĭskai︠a︡ nauchno-prakticheskai︠a︡ konferent︠s︡ii︠a︡ s mezhdunarodnym uchastiem ""Aktualʹnye problemy i perspektivy razvitii︠a︡ fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta"" (2012 Vladivostok"
Kulturgeschichte des Sports,Wolfgang Behringer
"14-18, le sport sort des tranchées",Michel Merckel
Sport im Spiegel der UN-Behindertenrechtskonvention,Florian Kiuppis
Le Développement du sport dans la région de Belfort de 1870 à 1914,Marie-Antoinette Vacelet
Images du sport,Patrice Blouin
XI Trofeo Silvano Buffa,
Olympische Spiele und Fernsehen,Michael Steinbrecher
Le sport européen à l'épreuve du nazisme,Patrick Clastres
Kleines olympisches Lexikon,
Recognizing Derrydale Press books,Don Frazier
Gelbe Karte!,"Dietmar Heeg, Oliver Lücke"
Leveraging legacies from sports mega-events,Jonathan Grix
El Paisaje del espectáculo en México,
Spor hukuk tezleri,Kısmet Erkiner
Geschichte der Sportwissenschaft,"G. Wonneberger, K. Liebold"
Dunhuang ti yu yan jiu,Kang Chen
Hua shuo Zhongguo ti yu,Qinyan Zheng
S gerba na republikata,
"""Guo jia ti yu duan lian biao zhun"" shou ce",
Introduction to sport psychology,Ema Geron
Sport in Apatin,"Josef Volkmar Senz, Peter Brandt"
Sportpolitik in Schleswig-Holstein,
Sport in the GDR,
"Kaderschmieden des ""Sportwunderlandes""",René Wiese
Soziologie der Praktiken,"Schmidt, Robert (Sociologist)"
Malá encyklopédia telesnej výchovy a športu,Jaromír Perútka
Hai xia liang an Ao wei hui yu guo ji Ao wei hui guan xi wen ti de yan jiu,Dongguang Pei
Deportes tradicionales de fuerza en España,Lucio Doncel Recas
Le prime pagine de La gazzetta dello sport,"Elio Trifari, Franco Arturi"
La narrazione sportiva,Paolo Dell'Aquila
Torino città dello sport,Maurizio Ternavasio
Grêmio Náutico União,"Leonid Streliaev, Gunter Axt"
"Jogo, celebração, memória e identidade","Vera Regina Toledo Camargo, Maria Beatriz Rocha Ferreira, Olga R. de Moraes von Simson"
Le Spectacle sportif,
Początki ruchu olimpijskiego w Polsce,Ryszard Wryk
"Encuesta sobre actividades deportivas, noviembre 1968",Instituto Nacional de Estadística (Spain)
Thoughts on sports,John R. Dunne
Gli agoni alla greca nelle regioni occidentali dell'Impero,Maria Letizia Caldelli
"Światowe igrzyska polonijne, 2010-2011",Zbigniew Szafkowski
La configuración de nuevos espacios en la cultura,Edith Cortés Romero
Remembered greatness,Andy Purvis
Un siècle d'affiches suisses de sports d'hiver,Jean-Charles Giroud
Psychologie sportu,
La face cachée du sport,Antoine Grynbaum
Pomiar w wychowaniu fizycznym i sporcie,Zbigniew Drozdowski
Der deutsche Sport auf dem Weg in die Moderne,Michael Krüger
Lexikon Sportler in der DDR,Volker Kluge
Physical education and sports in Japan,
"Affiches sportives en Belgique, 1890-1940",Fabienne Dumont
Sportifs high tech,Nunzio Lanotte
Figures de la rationalité dans les STAPS,Loïc Jarnet
Psychologie im Sportspiel,
"Bu xing, you yong, hua, qi",
Kinderhochleistungssport,"Udo Steiner, Michael Coester"
Yun dong yu jian kang,Tian'en Dong
Pathānukrom Kīlā phư̄nmư̄ang,Thailand. Krom Phalasưksā
Sporten rechnik,
"Himpunan peraturan pendidikan, kebudayaan dan olah raga Daerah Khusus Ibukota Jakarta",Jakarta Raya (Indonesia)
Szabadidő könyv,
Sportföldrajz,Miklós Bánhidi
Sporty a sportoviště,Zdeněk Míka
Mică enciclopedie a jocurilor,Miloš Zapletal
Nova legislação de direito desportivo,José Ricardo Rezende
Gênero e atividade física,"Sebastião Josué Votre, André da Silva Mello"
Direito do trabalho desportivo,"Alvaro Melo Filho, Alberto Puga"
Soziale Wirklichkeiten des Sports,"Horst Hübner, Torsten Kleine, Michael Pfitzner, Oliver Wulf"
Sport u starom Beogradu (XIX vek),Srbislav Č. Todorović
Mediensport,Felix Axster
"Von Klimmzügen, Aufschwüngen und Riesenwellen","Krüger, Michael"
Strasti po sportu,Aleksandr Solovʹev
Der Sport formt sein Gerät,Hans Wichmann
Sport et littérature,Serge Laget
Kīlā læ kānlalēn phư̄nmư̄ang Čhangwat Songkhlā,Thailand. Samnakngān Khana Kammakān Watthanatham hǣng Chāt
Sports law in New Zealand,Elizabeth Toomey
Bewegung der Form,Deutsche Vereinigung für Sportwissenschaft. Sektion Sportphilosophie. Jahrestagung
O esporte na cidade,"Marco Paulo Stigger, Fernando Jaime González, Raquel da Silveira, Ana Cecília de Carvalho Reckziegel"
Young people's encyclopedia of sports,
Mexican American baseball in the Inland Empire,Richard Santillan
Con El Deporte No Se Juega 3,Caloi.
Liên xô với Đại hội Ô-lim-pic lân thứ XXII,
Handbook of sport psychology,Ema Geron
"Pogledi na telesno vzgojo, šport in rekreacijo",Franc Pediček
Nella terra delle meraviglie,Paolo Brosio
Sport e società nell'Italia del '900,Saverio Battente
Sve o sportu,Serbia
Fremdheit im Sport,Klaus Seiberth
Atleti in camicia nera,
30 anni di sport,
Sŭp'och'ŭ wa pŏp,Un-hak Im
Ti yu yu qing chun,Zhenyi Cao
Sport business management in Australia and New Zealand,"Sarah I. Leberman, Chris Collins, Linda Trenberth"
Julius Hirsch - Nationalspieler - ermordet,Werner Skrentny
Ti yu wen gao,Shuiping Xiao
Ti yu ci dian,
Inklusion und Integration,Christa Kleindienst-Cachay
Erinnerungskultur im Sport,Michael Krüger
Éloge de la passe,Wally Rosell
Éducation et olympisme en Europe,"Éric Monnin, Jean-François Loudcher, Gilles Ferréol"
Esporte & publicidade,
Olimpiadi,Elisa Virgili
Macht und Ohnmacht der Sportidee,Sven Güldenpfennig
Un secolo di Guerino,Paolo Facchinetti
From Harvard to hagerman,Myron Finkbeiner
Liikunta yhdyskuntasuunnittelussa,
See to play,Michael A. Peters
Letopisʹ tomskogo sporta,Saveliĭ Ikonnikov
Marginalʹnostʹ v sporte,M. V. Averina
"Sports--win, place, or show",Robert M. Cooper
Senarai istilah sukan,Dewan Bahasa dan Pustaka
Quando Dozza giocava centravanti,Fondazione Duemila
Ti yu yun dong fa zhan xiao shi,Liqiang Ouyang
Japão e Brasília,Mario Ribeiro Cantarino Filho
Internationale Sportevents,"Germany) Internationales Hamburger Symposium ""Sport und Ökonomie"" (11th 2011 Hamburg"
L'organisation des spectacles dans le monde romain,Switzerland) Entretiens sur l'Antiquité classique (58th 2011 Vandœuvres
"Nowe idee w badaniach nad sportem, turystyką, rehabilitacją i wychowaniem fizycznym",Patrycja Rąglewska
One Goal,"Blackhawks Publishing Staff, Pat Foley, Bobby Hull"
Priručna literatura iz oblasti fizičke kulture,Perunika Popović-Ćićić
Sports Illustrated Almanac 2015,Sports Illustrated Editors
From Match Fixing to Murder,Ian Hewitt
Questions de sportologie,Michel Bouet
"Sport, Units 19 and 22","Sonia Lal, Layla Hall, Chris Manley"
Religion in Kirche und Gesellschaft,Karl-Fritz Daiber
Why Playing in Red Makes You a Winner,Gavin Newsham
Imray ChartC2,Imray Staff
De selectie,Youp van 't Hek
Snowboard,Lino Depalo
Out of Left Field,"Gamal Abdel-Shehid, Nathan Kalman-Lamb"
Oxygène sans bouteille,Richard Chartier
Sociologija fizičke kulture,Đorđe Štakić
Lockouts and Work Stoppages in Professional Sports,Conor A. Walsh
Goldkinder,Grit Hartmann
Bronx Bombers,Lew Freedman
Pumping Granite,Mike D'Orso
Man Versus Ball,Jon Hart
NFL Rush Zone - Guardians of the Core,"Kevin Freeman, Dave Dwonch, M. Goodwin, Jerry Gaylord, Flash Turner"
Neuromuscular Aspects of Sports Performance Vol. XVII,Paavo V. Komi
Advances in Contemporary Sport Psychology,Robert J. Schinke
"Gesellschaft, Sport und Diakonie",Stefan Schenk
Talking Balls!,Richard Foster
Bradman Museum's World of Cricket,"Mike Coward, Philip Brown, Sam Redman, John Benaud"
Cricket and Contemporary British Society,Russell Holden
History of Baylor Sports,Alan J. Lefever
"Con Pelé, Fidel y Rolando",Jorge Ribadeneira Araujo
World Atlas of Sport,Alan Tomlinson
Setting Sail in America,"Alan Silken, Cory Silken, Wm Dyer-Jones, Freddie Roy"
Qualitative Research on Sport and Physical Culture,"Kevin Young, Michael Atkinson"
Modern psychology,Robert Griffiths
Homecourt,Larry Needle
More Than a Game,"Eliot Shorr-Parks, Steve Parks"
Running One Thousand Miles,Robin Campbell
Pacing in Sport and Exercise,Andrew Edwards
Sporting Scots,John K. V. Eunson
Fyny gyda'r Swans,Owain Tudur Jones
Sporting ancestors,Keith Gregson
Sport Tourism Destinations,James E. S. Higham
Sports Data Analytics,"Ambikesh Jayal, Allistair McRobert, Giles Oatley, Peter O'Donoghue"
Be Physical : Phys Ed and Health for Junior Students,"Suzanne Plant, Robyn Woolcock"
Essentials,Garry Powell
Sports and Recreational Activities with PowerWeb,"Dale P Mood, Frank F. Musker, Judith E Rink"
Sport in Australia,"Wray Vamplew, Brian Stoddart"
Teaching Games for Understanding,Joy I. Butler
Global Sport Management,"Brenda Pitts, James Zhang"
Nick Crane's action sports,Nicholas Crane
North American Soccer Guide 2019,"Charles Cuttone, Linda Cuttone, Frank Dell'Apa, Jamie Goldberg, Brian Trusdell"
Advances in Sports and Athletics. Volume 1,James P. Waldorf
Politics and Identity in Chinese Martial Arts,Zhouxiang Lu
You Tell Me!,"Roger McGough, Michael Rosen"
"Game, Set, Cash",
Will to Fly,Lydia Lassila
Frog Olympics,Brian Moses
How to Be a Champion,James Nixon
Sports Analytics,Benjamin C. Alamar
Chambers sports factfinder,
Winners and Losers,Bob Latham
Hiking Maryland,Scott E. Brown
BTEC First in Sport Revision Guide,"Adam Gledhill, Sally Hillier, Business and Technician Education Council (Great Britain) Staff"
Sport Psychology,"McCarthy, Paul, Allen, Mark"
Contemporary Topics and Trends in the Psychology of Sports,Changiz Mohiyeddini
AS/A-level PE/sports studies,Carl Atherton
They Ruled The Pool The 100 Greatest Swimmers In History,John Lohn
Modern Football Is Rubbish An A To Z Of All That Is Wrong With The Beautiful Game,Nicholas Davidson
O esporte no Brasil,Manoel José Gomes Tubino
Summer Action Sports,Jim Brush
Sports market place directory,
Sports illustrated,
That's not the way it was,Allen Barra
Bhāratīya mallavidyā,"Sūryauãsī, Kr̥. Go."
International journal of sport psychology,International Society of Sports Psychology
Psycho-social aspects of physical education,Carole A. Oglesby
Careers in sports business,National Football League
Outdoorsman's fix-it book,Monte Burch
ChrisNames,Chris Berman
Individual differences,Peter Kent
Functional anatomy,Tom Trikojus
"South High School Wildcats winter sports program, Springfield (Ohio), Clark County",Ohio) South High School (Springfield
--'til the fat lady sings,"Burton, Alan"
Mainland Trails of Sleeping Bear Dunes National Lakeshore,Jim DuFresne
How to Follow Formula 1,Paul Schatzkin
Nike,Roger Bolton Productions
Games doctors play,Claude Albee Frazier
The symbolism of sport in France,Philip Dine
Current diagnosis & treatment in sports medicine,
Sport and leisure in social thought,Grant Jarvie
Electric Edwardians,"Sagar Mitchell, James Kenyon"
Fallibiliy[sic] of drug testing in professional sports,Melanie Cheng
Sports,Julie Rigby
The two Escobars,Jeff Zimbalist
Play safety guidelines for outdoor play provision,National Playing Fields Association (Great Britain)
"Smart Jocks, Long Talks and Pink Socks",Patricia Burgess
The swimsuit issue and sport,Laurel R. Davis
Sport ist Spitze,"Verein ""Ruhrolympiade."""
De l'évaluation des grands événements sportifs,Eric Barget
Momentos de gloria,Alberto Galvis Ramírez
Motorische Entwicklung,"Nadja Schott, Jörn Munzert"
Divácká reflexe sportu,Pavel Slepička
Ethnomotricité et développement,Pascal Alain Leyinda
A big ticket,Evaleen Hu
A level playing field,Evaleen Hu
Hapoel,National Committee for Labor Palestine. Youth Department
Xiangxi dang dai min zu wen hua chuan ren lu,Renli Tian
"Yuxi Shi lao nian ren ti yu zhi, 1984-2006",Yuxi Shi lao nian ren ti yu zhi bian zuan wei yuan hui
Lorraine,Bertrand Munier
Les Balkans et le sport,"Loïc Trégourès, Simon Rico"
Sporṭ,Julian Rowe
Formel 1-Sponsoring,Markus Maier
Anthologie de la littérature sportive,Association des écrivains sportifs
Wortschatz der Sportsprache Spaniens,Otto Pfändler
Life and writings of Frank Forester (Henry William Herbert),Henry William Herbert
Spor fizyolojisi ve sağlık bilgisi el kitabı,Necati Akgün
Pelota vasca,Olatz González Abrisketa
Sport w polskim kinie 1944-1989,Dominik Wierski
The best pitcher in baseball,Robert C. Cottrell
Kindai supōtsu bunka to wa nani ka,Tetsuo Nishiyama
Kawariyuku Nihon no supōtsu,"Yoshihiro Ōtani, Masatoshi Sanbonmatsu, Hideki Nishimura"
"Premier Colloque de l'UAC des sciences, cultures et technologies","Colloque de l'UAC des sciences, cultures et technologies (1st 2007 Abomey-Calavi, Benin)"
Plano nacional de desenvolvimento do esporte,Brazil. Ministério do Esporte e Turismo
Wirtschaftliche Bedeutung des Sports in der Schweiz,Adrian Berwert
Bijutsu ni miru Nihon no supōtsu,Tokugawa Bijutsukan
Kadur ha-taḥanot,Uriel Simri
Sportrecht,Deutsch-Brasilianische Juristenvereinigung. Jahrestagung
Österreichisches Bergsportrecht,Martin Binder
Économie internationale du sport,Wladimir Andreff
Estudios comparatistas sobre derecho deportivo del trabajo,"Iván Vizcaíno Ramos, Rosa María Rodríguez Martín-Retortillo, Alberto Arufe Varela"
"UEFA Euro 2008 und Nachhaltigkeit, Erkenntnisse zu Auswirkungen und Einschätzungen in der Schweiz","Hansruedi Müller, Heinz Rütter, Jürg Stettler, Francis Scherly"
Zhongshan Shi ti yu zhi,Zhongshan Shi (China). Ti yu ju
Jacques Borlée,Jacques Borlée
Au coeur de la compétition sportive,Marc Lévêque
Bioetica e sport,Mariaroberta Gregorini
Le-farsem beha-Poʻel zeh le-natseaḥ,Dan Shoshani
al-Aqbāṭ wa-al-riyāḍah-- Jūn fī malʻab al-taʻaṣub,Nūr Qaldas
ha-Maḥoziʼadah ha-23 ʻal shem Miryam Tsarfi ... 25-29.5.2010,Histadrut ha-ʻovdim ha-kelalit ha-ḥadashah. ʻAmutah li-sporṭ bi-meḳomot ha-ʻavodah be-merḥav Yerushalayim
Moja gra,Daniel Passent
Profite oder Pokale in der Fussball-Bundesliga?,Thomas Schroeter
Wedijver in een internationale arena,"Jeroen Scheerder, Bert Meulders"
Entwicklung und Stabilität der körperlich-sportlichen Aktivität im mittleren Erwachsenenalter,Darko Jekauc
Sauvon Urheilijoiden historia 1935-2000,Juha Kulmala
Rote Karte für die Damen,Brigitte Trip
Wo he ni,Zhongguo xin wen zhou kan
Der Körper als Mitte,Antje Stache
Sports,Kenneth Goldsmith
Actes,"Colloque de l'UAC des sciences, cultures et technologies (1st 2007 Abomey-Calavi, Benin)"
Fizkulʹtura i sport v istorii rossiĭskogo gosudarstva,Russia?) Vserossiĭskai͡a zaochnai͡a nauchnai͡a konferent͡sii͡a (2005? Saint Petersburg
Xi bei shao shu min zu chuan tong ti yu yan jiu,Pingsheng Lu
Cultures de clubs et politiques sportives territoriales,France) Université sportive d'été (27th 2009 Toulouse
G-A-Why don't you?,Donal Heath
Zeitgenössische deutsche und chinesische Sportpädagogik im Vergleich,Bo Liu
"ha-Hotsaʾah ha-leʾumit le-tarbut, le-vidur ṿeli-sporṭ, 1984/85-1997",Israel. Lishkah ha-merkazit li-sṭaṭisṭiḳah
Arbitraje deportivo,Francisco González de Cossío
Footsteps in the ocean,Denise V. Lang
Beijing di yu wen shi,Beijing shi di yu wen shi gong zuo wei yuan hui
Sport von Kopf bis Fuss(ball),Hans Lenk
Ökonomische Perspektiven von Sport und Gesundheit,"Robin S. Kähler, Silja Schröder, P. Becker"
Evaluation ausgewählter sportlicher Aktivitäten in Prävention und Rehabilitation,Bettina Schaar
Maccabi Milano 2008/2009,Maccabi (Italy)
Wuyang Xian jiao ti zhi,Wuyang Xian jiao yu ti yu wei yuan hui
Yun dong sheng li,Hanzhang Cheng
Sefer ha-ritsah,James F. Fixx
Idrottens rättskulturer,Bo Carlsson
Zhongguo gu dai ti yu,Yongchang Xu
Hitʻamlut ḳarḳaʻ,Eliʻezer Kamun
Kadur koaḥ,Aharon Bar-El
ha-Zeriḳah,Uriel Simri
ʻOd 250 maʻagalim,Uri Afek
Miśḥaḳ ha-ṭenis,Hillel Ruskin
ha-Ritsah,Uriel Simri
"De ludis privatis, ac domesticis veterum liber vnicus ...",Jules César Boulenger
Greek and Roman sport,David Matz
Achieving excellence,United States. Department of Defense
Changyang wen hua ti yu zhi,Changyang Tujiazu Zizhixian (China). Wen hua ti yu ju
"Sociologie des jeux, des sports et de l'éducation physique",Jean-Paul Callède
Spelregels voor buiten de lijnen,Pieter Verhoogt
Yingkou Shi ti yu zhi,Yingkou Shi ti yu yun dong wei yuan hui
Linxi lao nian ti xie zhi,Linxi lao nian ti xie zhi bian zuan wei yuan hui
Student's handbook,Abbott Athletic Association
"Sporti shqiptar, 1900-1946",Ilir Dojka
Yuepuhu Xian wen ti guang dian zhi,"Yuepuhu Xian wen ti guang dian zhi"" bian zuan wei yuan hui"
Gleichheit und Differenz in Bewegung,Deutsche Vereinigung für Sportwissenschaft. Kommission Geschlechterforschung. Jahrestagung
Ḥevrat Hekhale ha-sporṭ be-ʻe.m. Mitkabedet le-hazminkhem le-ṭeḳes ḥanukat Hekhal Nokia,Ḥevrat Hekhale ha-sporṭ be-ʻe.m.
Ungewissheit,Deutsche Vereinigung für Sportwissenschaft. Sektion Sportpädagogik. Tagung
"Psychophysiologie im Sport, zwischen Experiment und Handlungsoptimierung",Arbeitsgemeinschaft für Sportpsychologie in der Bundesrepublik Deutschland. Arbeitstagung
Herzfrequenzvariabilität im Fitness- und Gesundheitssport,Germany) Internationales Symposium zur Herzfrequenzvariabilität im Fitness- und Gesundheitssport (2nd 2003 Halle an der Saale
Jukolan rasteilla,"Heikki Roiko-Jokela, Esa Sironen"
"International, inklusiv, interdisziplinär","G. Doll-Tepper, Heike Tiemann, Sigrun Schulz, Erika Schmidt-Gotz"
Sportstadt Magdeburg,Volkmar Laube
"Every boy's book of handicraft, sports and amusements",Chelsea Curtis Fraser
Sŏul YMCA ch'eyuk undong 100-yŏnsa,Chae-u Kim
Granville,Jean-Marc Santier
Lo sport e l'Europa,Antonio Felici
Sunflower seeds & seoul food,Frederick C. Klein
"ha-Hotsaʾah ha-leʾumit le-tarbut, le-vidur ṿeli-sporṭ, 1984/85-1989/90",Israel. Lishkah ha-merkazit li-sṭaṭisṭiḳah
Informationsbeschaffung im Sponsoringmanagement,Robert Karl Wiegand
Festas cívicas e esportivas,Claudia Schemes
"""Vergessen die vielen Medaillen, vergessen die Kameradschaft""",Irene Pill
Gesundheit im Spitzensport,Ansgar Thiel
Die Arbeitersportbewegung in der Schweiz 1874-1947,Dominique Marcel Fankhauser
"Olympische Jugendspiele, Chance oder Gefahr?","Rico Kauerhof, Sven Nagel, Mirko Zebisch"
Ḥuqūq-i varzishī,Kayvān Shaʻbānī Muqaddam
Kamandan oxatma,Süleyman Huseynov
Paradise of sport,Richard Cashman
Sport psychology,Daniel L. Wann
Alʻābunā al-shaʻbīyah al-Kuwaytīyah,Ayyūb Ḥusayn Ayyūb
Hanʼguk chʻeyuksa yŏnʼgu,Hang-nae Yi
"Il linguaggio dello sport, la comunicazione e la scuola",Beatriz Hernán-Gómez Prieto
Hooliganismus,"Wolf-D Walker, Martin Schimke"
Kulturen des Jugendsports,"Roland Naul, Arnd Krüger, Werner Schmidt"
Breizh er penn a-raok,
"Enseignement, affaires culturelles, sports, de 1800 à 1940",Haute-Vienne (France). Archives départementales
Ningbo Shi ti yu zhi,Ningbo Shi ti yu zhi bian zuan wei yuan hui
Kindai supōtsu no misshon wa owatta ka,Masahiro Inagaki
"50 Jahre Hakoah, 1909-1959",Arthur Baar
Xin sheng huo yu yu le,Zhongling Shen
The man who brought the Olympics to China,Hailin Sun
SportivaMente,Fabio Lucidi
Coopération sportive française en Afrique,Marcel Piney
Banbrytare,Ingmar Björkman
Aḳṭiv,Liʼor Śaśon
Shaoxing Xian ti yu zhi,Shaoxing Xian ti yu zhi bian zuan wei yuan hui
Nujiang Lisuzu Zizhizhou ti yu zhi,Nujiang Lisuzu Zizhizhou (China). Ti yu ju
Gaoming Shi ti yu zhi,Foshan Shi Gaoming Qu shi zhi ban gong shi
ha-Poʻel,Emanuel Gil
Segundas no memorial,Juca Kfouri
El deporte en la jurisprudencia,"Ramón Terol Gómez, Alberto Palomar Olmeda, Ramón Barba Sánchez"
Chancen und Probleme der Nachwuchsförderung und Rekrutierung von Leistungssportlern mit Behinderung,Reinhild Kemper
HSK í 100 ÁR,Jón M. Ívarsson
Johann Christoph Friedrich GutsMuths (1759-1839) und die philanthropische Bewegung in Deutschland,Deutsche Vereinigung für Sportwissenschaft. Sektion Sportgeschichte. Jahrestagung
Profiles of fame,Ron Palenski
Sportpsychologische Betreuung des deutschen Olympia- & Paralympicteams 2008,"Germany) Workshop ""Sportpsychologische Betreuung des deutschen Olympia und Paralympic-Teams 2008 (2008 Cologne"
"Körperübungen, Turnen und Sport an der Universität Tübingen",Franz Begov
Sportsbogen,"Tom Kristensen, Vikie Jensen, Mia Obel, David Summers"
Le sport par les gestes,"François Bégaudeau, Xavier de La Porte"
Sport in Europa,Germany) Sportwissenschaftlicher Hochschultag (17th 2005 Leipzig
Selbststeuerung im Sport,Arbeitsgemeinschaft für Sportpsychologie in der Bundesrepublik Deutschland. Tagung
Intervention und Evaluation im Gesundheitssport und in der Sporttherapie,"Alexander Woll, Walter Brehm, Klaus Pfeifer"
A political gold medal for Xi Jinping,Yongnian Zheng
Der Trainer als Wissensexperte,Manfred Muckenhaupt
"Cien años de relación entre los navarros y el deporte, 1901-2001",Francisco Javier Caspistegui
Sport. Stadt. Ökonomik,Wolfgang Maennig
Darsnāmah-yi ḥuqūq-i jazā-yi ʻumūmī,Nūr Muḥammad Ṣabrī
50 years of American sports,"Buckley, James"
Sport climbing with Robyn Erbesfield,Robyn Erbesfield
Auf die Plätze,"Susanne Wernsing, Katarina Matiasek, Klaus Vogel"
"Bewegung und Leistung -- Sport, Gesundheit & Alter","Klaus Mattes, Bettina Wollesen"
The history of deaf sports in Alberta,Jo-Anne Robinson
The greater New York sports chronology,Jeffrey A. Kroessler
"A Review of the Governor's Council on Physical Fitness and Sports in the Executive Office of the Governor, pursuant to Section 11.611, Florida statutes, the Sundown Act",Florida. Legislature. Senate. Governmental Operations Committee.
Funky Donkey Tells His Story about His First Ski Lesson on Safety,Herbert K. Naito
My Serendipitous Life : Serendipity,Carl Herakovich
Athletes in the Village,"Bradley Branson, Fatoumata Konate, Terence Ryans"
Innovation University (Elite),"Garren Strong, Carlyle Garrick"
Responsibilities of Coaching,Scott Rosberg
Legends of Desert Point,William Heick
Rocktown Bouldering - 2nd Edition,Brayack
"Proceedings of the First AAHPERD Combined Conventions including the Northwest & Southwest Districts and hosted by the State of Nevada, February 4-6, 1993","AAHPERD Combined Conventions (1st 1993 Sparks, Nev.)"
Oakland Roots Class of 2022 Yearbook,"Max Ornstil, Azael Garcia"
Golf Ball Doesn't Lie,Larry Hood
"Basketball, Dad, and Me","Azlyn Clark, Garry Clark"
Putt Two Par,Ben Mutz
Código brasileiro de justiça e disciplina desportivas-C.B.J.D.D,Brazil. Ministério da Educação.
Ultimate Running Log - Track Your Training and Nutrition,Aimee Goudas
Principe Gestuurde Vaardigheidsontwikkeling,"Russ Smith, Patrick McCarthy, Marcus Davila, Fred Lohse, Marcel Proost"
Zeke's Theory,Eric V. Zimmerman
My First Name Is 'Coach',"Larry Holley, David Smale, Homer Drew"
Golf Architecture for Normal People,Geoff Shackelford
Modern Goalkeeper,"Marcelo Antonelli, Patricia Nardy, Jake Davis, Mauricio Negri"
"Germania, Pinheiros",Alceu de Mello Viana
Alice Henderson on Debut,"S. R. Silcox, Jaclyn Reyes"
Arquero Moderno,"Laura Viafara, Marcelo Antonelli, Patricia Nardy"
Just Add Water Two,Don Norton
Sports Technology,T. Reilly
More Than Winning,Marty Durden
Jumps,Nick Newman
Appalachian Trail Data Book 2023,Daniel Chazin
Beyond the Mat,Mark Cox
Finanzierung von Sport- und Freizeitanlagen,Günter Vornholz
65 Years a Blue-Collar Rifle Shooter,Robert Francis Brigode
I Like the Outdoors ? What Jobs Are There?,"Carron Brown, Roberto Blefari"
Protectors,"Israel Idonije, Ron Marz, Bart Sears"
Statistique appliquée aux activités physiques et sportives,Pierre Parlebas
Artistic Rollerskating Competition - la Competencía de Patinaje Artístico,Rachel Kimbrow
Hillman Sports Comics Scsc,Retro Comic Reprints
Jackie Robinson : Breaking the Color Barrier,"Michèle Dufresne, Pioneer Valley Educational Press"
Nada Es Imposible,"Theresa Marrama, Andrea Giganti Dima, Jennifer Degenhardt, Emmaleah Vickers"
Happy and Healthy Sports Games,DeQing Tian
Golf Logbook,Saguaro Press
Anti-Racism in Sport Organizations,"Joseph N. Cooper, Shaun M. Anderson, Black, Wayne L., Jr., Drew D. Brown"
Lacrosse,"Michèle Dufresne, Pioneer Valley Educational Press"
Sport and Film,Se Crosson
Les meutes sportives,Jean Marie Brohm
Corps et politique,Jean Marie Brohm
Critiques du sport,Jean Marie Brohm
"Sport, a prison of measured time",Jean Marie Brohm
Sammy!,"Sammy Swindell, Bones Bourcier, Bob Mays"
God and the Referee,Eoghan Corry
Forest Through the Trees,"William Sheehan, Rhys Tribolet, Mark Watsford, Job Fransen"
Alice Henderson Goes Big,S. R. Silcox
Simple Machines in Sports,Gillian Gosman
Winning,Joycelyn Carr
Central Oregon Hiking,Scott Schechtel
"Dive Truk Lagoon, 2nd Edition",Rod Macdonald
Performance in Sport,Nuala Mullan
Hillman Sports Comics Scfc,Retro Comic Reprints
Innovation University (Elite Alt),"Garren Strong, Carlyle Garrick"
South Africa and the Olympic games,Muriel Horrell
Innovation University (Standard),"Garren Strong, Carlyle Garrick"
Best of Smith & Wesson,FMG Publications
Nola Plays Baseball,"Candace Meredith, Miguel Ambalada"
Folklig idrott,Maximillian Stejskal
Die Sportverletzungen,"Saar, Günter Freiherr von"
De ludo Troiae commentatio philologica,Franz Rasch
Visions of Victory,Jane Livingston
"Kick the can, and over 800 other active games and sports for all ages",Darwin Alexander Hindman
"No pain, no gain?",Jim McKay
Hyŏndae sŭpʻochʻŭ chŏnsŏ,Hagwŏnsa
Jūgoya tsunahiki no kenkyū,Jūrō Ono
Sondagsport,Jan Hendrik Van Wyk
Think like a champion,Dick DeVenzio
Mao zhu xi qing nian shi qi duan lian shen ti de gu shi,Shizhao Zhou
Zhongguo gu dai ti yu tu shuo,
Glory bound,David Kenneth Wiggins
Sportärztliche Beratung,Friedrich H. Lorentz
Verhandlungsbericht,Germany) International Congress of Medicine and Sport (4th 1936 Berlin
A comprehensive manual of physical education activities for men,George B. Dintiman
Bing bai Hancheng,Yu Zhao
Days in the sun,John F. Steadman
Supōtsu no hon zenjōhō 92/97,Nichigai Asoshiētsu
Kōsasuru shintai to asobi,Keiji Matsuda
Ge xiang yun dong de zui gao ji lu,Xin ti yu she
"The development of sports in Alberta, 1900-1918",Cecil R. Blackburn
Furman Bisher,Furman Bisher
The Furman Bisher collection,Furman Bisher
Hanging it out on camera 3,Malcolm Kelly
Combat games of northern Nigeria,Edward L. Powe
Classic Wiley,Ralph Wiley
Über Sportunfälle und Sportschäden,W. Wachsmuth
Life through the earholes of our youth,Ken Burger
Hanʼgugŏ undong kyŏnggi tongsa nanmalbat,Ŭng-mo Kim
The African-American athlete resource directory,Dana D. Brooks
"The Ozarks, my arena",Marty Eddlemon
The influence of the Protestant ethic on sport and recreation,Steven J. Overman
Xin Zhongguo ti yu 60 nian,"Xiaozheng Xiong, Bingshu Zhong"
Bad Golf My Way,"Leslie Nielsen, Henry Beard"
Ōshima Kenkichi to iu supōtsu shisō,Yoshitaka Ban
Gendai supōtsu no seido to shakaiteki kōsei,Masahiro Matsuno
Sŭp'och'ŭ ro sesang ilki,Hak-chun Yi
Sŭp'och'ŭ sahoehak,Chʻang-sŏp Yi
Fields of play,District Six Museum
Xizang ti yu shi,Shenglin Shao
"Festivals, games, and amusements",Horace Smith
The sportsman's portfolio of American field sports,
Testnevelés I. A zentai sport és testnevelés krónikája [1875-1918,Géza Tolmácsy
"Image, power and space","Alan Tomlinson, Jonathan M. Woodham"
Aolinpike yan yi de jiao yu wen hua,Yi Guo
"Buku kenang²an delegasi olahraga Indonesia, GANEFO-I Djakarta 1963",Games of the New Emerging Forces
Lo sport a Siena,"Maurizio Boldrini, Nicola Natili"
Der antike sport,Martin Vogt
"The boy's treasury of sports, pastimes, and recreations",
Anwendungen der Sportpsychologie,"Jürgen Beckmann, Michael Kellmann"
Fidel y el deporte,Fidel Castro
Marzakan hanragitaran,M. S. Ispiryan
Circhi e ippodromi,"A. La Regina, Roberta Geremia Nucci"
"The Village green; or, Sports of youth",
Z dziejów turystyki i sportu w Polsce,"Tomasz Jurek, Kazimierz Obodyński, Stanisław Zaborniak"
"The USSR, sport and way of life",
Zhongguo gu dai ti yu,Hai Ren
Cultura deportiva and social club,Jesús Prieto Soto
Stadion,P. Novikov
Sportivnai︠a︡ istorii︠a︡ Kuzbassa,A. S. Trofimova
Welfare and recreation manual,United States. Bureau of Naval Personnel
L'ère des stades,Marc Perelman
80 años de acción y pasión,Carlos Uriarte González
La otra cara del deporte,Rafael J. Chavero Gazdik
"Deportes, atletas y triunfos",Carlos Nina Gómez
Undō tetsugaku,Rinjirō Deguchi
Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura i sport na Severnom Kavkaze,I. I. Mansurov
Deporte y dominicanidad,Andrés Barbour Luna
Kıbrıs Türk Futbolunda 60 yıllık efsane,Ahmet Ömerağa
Sportgeschichte erforschen und vermitteln,Deutsche Vereinigung für Sportwissenschaft. Sektion Sportgeschichte. Tagung
Gegenstand und Anwendungsfelder der Sportinformatik,Deutsche Vereinigung für Sportwissenschaft. Sektion Sportinformatik. Symposium
"Country contentments or, the husbandsmans recreations",Gervase Markham
Home and away,A. G. Weidenfeld
Nepālamā Khelakuda,Shyam Bahadur K. C.
"Oral history interview with Frances Hogan, May 23, 1991, and June 3, 1991",Frances B. Hogan
Der Sportstar in Deutschland,Julia Mährlein
Schulen in Bewegung -- Schulsport in Bewegung,Deutsche Vereinigung für Sportwissenschaft. Sektion Sportpädagogik. Tagung
Inner meaning of sport,Sri Chinmoy
Sporṭ le-lo hafsaḳah ba-ʻir Tel Aviv,Tel Aviv (Israel). Minhal ha-ḥinukh ṿeha-tarbut. Agaf li-ḳehilah noʻar u-sporṭ. Maḥlaḳah li-sporṭ
Din ṿe-ḥeshbon ha-Ṿaʻadah le-reformah be-mivneh maʻarekhet ha-sporṭ be-Yiśraʼel,Ṿaʻadah le-reformah be-mivneh maʻarekhet ha-sporṭ be-Yiśraʼel
XX vek,Aleksandr Nilin
Hanʼguk chʻeyuk paengnyŏnsa,Hang-nae Yi
Zhongmou jiao yu zhi,"""Zhongmou Xian jiao yu zhi"" bian zuan wei yuan hui"
Kraftmaschine Parlament,Peter Danckert
Local sport in Europe,European Association for Sociology of Sport. Conference
Einsatz neuer Analyse- und Modellmethoden in der Sportbiomechanik,"Kerstin Witte, Jürgen Edelmann-Nusser"
Sport studies,Matthias Marschik
Sportivnoe pravo Rossii,"Alekseev, S. V. doktor i︠u︡rid. nauk"
Current trends in performance analysis,Germany) World Congress of Performance Analysis of Sport (8th 2008 Magdeburg
Sport culture et société,Abassi Zohra
Bai nian Zhongguo ao yun zhi lu,"Pei Wang, Yanbing Liu, Yu Li"
Acto de recibimiento a la delagación cubana,Fidel Castro
Dr. Paul Wolff's Leica sport shots,Paul Wolff
You xi shi,Fengming Cai
Sports and games in Germany in the Middle Ages,Mildred E. Winter
Pour une histoire du sport et de la jeunesse,Jean-François Tournadre
Official rules of sports & games,
Sports Technology,Ron Fridell
Xtreme UFC,"ABDO Publishing Company Staff, John Hamilton"
"Sportedzés, versenyzés címszavakban","Nádori, László."
Missing the Signs,M. J. Compton
Legacy of Champions,"C. Robinson, Maria Robinson, Kevin Brooks"
50 Facts about the Chicago Cubs,"Sean McCandless, Mike McCandless"
Deserts (Russian-English),"Anita McCormick, Dmitry Fedorov, Vladislav Tolokontsev"
Back2back!,Kci Sports Publishing
Eastern Oregon Hiking,Scott Schechtel
Duncan Park,Edwin C. Epps
Diving with Charley At 0500,Charles Jehle
B Is for Ball,Tyrone Sanders
Ohio State National Champions,KCI Sports Publishing
Calvin,Jon Kerr
Pro Baseball Fan's Essential Scorekeeper,Palo Verde Press
Jerry Plays Sports,"Bailey Moore, Valentart"
Things He Could Have Been,W. Nikola-Lisa
Critical Speed,Robert Pettitt
Summary of Tim Kennedy and Nick Palmisciano's Scars and Stripes,I. R. B. Media
Just Let 'em Play,Dave Almany
Ol' Buddy Marty,Marty Devlin
Bookworm's Adventure to Miller Park,Darick Spears
"God, Make Me a Champion!",Veronica Karaman
Writing As Meditation,Jennifer Fisch-Ferguson
Ten Sleep Canyon Climbing,Louie Anderson
BUDWEISERS Kings of Bowling,"Ray Bluth, Van Lorenz"
My Pink Shoelacres,Tom Irby
Guinness Việt Nam,Huy Vĩnh.
Disc Golf,Nick Ribera
Deporte Cagueño : ,Luis Reinaldo Álvarez Vázquez
Game Plan,"Bell, Henry, Jr."
The sports immortals,"Williams, Peter"
Decide to Win,"Luke Javersack, Brian Johnson"
Athletes,"Renee Davenport, Elaine Webb, Tanja Blockx"
Still Movements,Jamie Trout
Gifford's Football 1969,Frank Gifford
A history of sports in North Carolina,James Sumner
Indian sports flashback,Jagadish Chandra Maitra
Chasing Greatness,"Karch Kiraly, Don Patterson"
Boston Celtics,Kci
In the Shadow of Tennis Legends,"Lenny Simpson, Bethany Bradsher"
Love Out of the Blue,Zwiezinski
Anchor-Centric Spey Casting,Zack Williams
Luberon Loop,Rory Moulton
Ping Pong Player and the Professor,Richard Sosis
Buffalo Bills,"Budd Bailey, Greg Tranter"
Baseball Greatest Offensive Seasons of All Time,Kenneth Ardizzone
Devlet Bakanı Mehmet Ali Yılmaz'ın T.B.M.M. genel kurulundaki 1992 yılı bütçe konuşması,Mehmet Ali Yılmaz
Stretching for Seniors,Scott Hamrick
Eye on the Ball!,Lerner Publishing Group
One Hurdle at a Time,Brad Herzog
"Sports Tips, Techniques, and Strategies",Rosen Publishing Staff
Love Met Baseball,Denise Taylor
Sports from Coast to Coast,Rosen Publishing Group
The anatomy of exercise & movement,Jo Ann Staugaard-Jones
Cheechakoes in Wonderland,Willard E. Andrews
YoYo Tricks for Kids,C. Gibbs
Dumb Waiter Drills,"Larkin, Eric, Sr."
NFL Team Trivia Football Crossword Puzzles with 2nd Chance Word Jumbles - NFC Edition,"Michael Erickson, David Sousa"
God's Rookie of the Year,John A. Mercurio
Last Green,Lane Walker
End Game,Allie Lasky
Just for Kicks,"Jim Murray, Bob Sands"
Little Book of Yoga,"Zack Bush, Laurie Friedman"
St. Louis Cardinals,Ed Wheatley
Stan Musial,Stephanie Bearce
New York Yankees 2023 Official Media Guide & Record Book,New York Yankees Media Relations Department
Obsesión Por el Tango,Jon Tariq
Tango Obsession,Jon Tariq
Becoming a Lifelong Golfer,J. P. Guidry
Pacific Coast League 1903-1988,Bill O'Neal
Sports' Most Memorable Characters,Marty Gitlin
His Country,Michael Hinson
Michigan National Champions,KCI Sports
Beginning Racquetball Textbook,"Fred Martin, Alan Martin"
Fly Fishing Guide to Rocky Mountain National Park,"Steven Schweitzer, Rick Takahashi, Mark Tracy"
Getting into Sports,"Ron Thomas, Joe Herran"
All Sorts of Sports,S. Hogenkamp
Paper Man,David James Roberts
Sports et loisirs,Laurent Turcot
Parent's Section : ,S Joye & Associates LLC
Xtreme Sports,ABDO Publishing Company
Evolution of Skating Vol VI,"Stewart, James, Staci Gallardo, Angel Vargas, Jerry Beck, Michelle Ritchie"
Trout Fishing in Southwest Wisconsin,John van Vliet
Greatest Teams That Didn't Win It All,Will Graves
Türk spor tarihine genel bakış,Yunus Tayga
Sports Illustrated Great Football Writing,Sports Illustrated Editors
King Richard,"Dan Eddy, Ron Clarke"
Bāṅalāra lokakrīṛā,Baruṇakumāra Cakrabartī
Jackie Joyner-Kersee Running for the Gold,"Jackie Joyner-Kersee, Laval Belle"
Home Games,John Lauricella
Staring down a Dream,Hughes
Oriental methods of mental and physical fitness,"Huard, Pierre."
American Tang Soo Do Hyungs,Courtney Griner
Lighthouses,Sean Finnigan
Tennis,Sean Finnigan
Girl Who Played Hockey,Christopher Middlebrook
Doa restu kepada para anggauta team nasional Indonesia untuk Asian games ke-IV,Soekarno
Breakthrough,Preston Ducati
Year of 500 Fish,"Nathan Woelfel, Steve Hill"
Baloncesto,M. K. Osborne
Los Deportes de Combate,M. K. Osborne
Tale of Tiger vs. Bear,"Golf Pops Classics, Christopher Edwards, Allan Blocker"
"Sports Illustrated Blood, Sweat and Chalk : The Ultimate Football Playbook",Tim Layden
Coping with Drugs and Sports,Elizabeth Ann Nelson
Golf's Greatest Rivalry,Sports Illustrated and Golf.com Staff
Carpe Diem @ 50,Lephart Michael
Standard Guide to Little Cottonwood Rock Climbing,Tony Calderone
Rock Climber's Guide to Lolo Pass,Mack Moore
Hatcher Pass Bouldering Guide,"David Funatake, Kelsey Gray, Sarah Glaser"
Complete List of Jericho,Chris Jericho
Windward Passage,"Randall Peffer, Steve Jost, Ronald Geisman"
above Par Day,Lindsay Farley
So You Think You Know Your Teams?!,"Michael Erickson, David Sousa"
Dick Connor remembered,Dick Connor
Baseball and lesser sports,Wilfrid Sheed
Dimana batas prestasi manusia,A. A. Katili
"Nikephoros Beihefte, Bd. 12: Ephebeia: a register of greek cities with citizen training systems in the hellenistic and roman periods",Nigel M. Kennell
A multicultural portrait of professional sports,David Paul Press
The athlete's game plan for college and career,Stephen K. Figler
Incidence and nature of sports injuries in Ireland,A. W. S. Watson
Improbing flexibility,A. W. S. Watson
Sports injuries related to body mechanics in players of body contact sports,A. W. S. Watson
"Sports injuries, relationship to deficiencies of flexibility and body mechanics",A. W. S. Watson
Yankee Stadium; fifty years of drama,Joseph Durso
"Heroes, fools & other dreamers",Dave Kindred
Dan Magill's bull-doggerel,Dan Magill
Theory of international physical education and sports studies for the achievement of peace,Noriaki Osada
Le recrutement des élites en France et en Allemagne,Sebastian Braun
A Catholic perspective,Robert Feeney
Home Stand,James McKean
Involuntary disengagement from a high school sport's environment,Sarah I. Gilroy
Martine à la montagne,"Gilbert Delahaye, Marcel Marlier"
9780 Paul Bryant Drive,"Steve R. Skipper, Ron Beers"
"Luisa und Emma, das Yoga-Einhorn",Sophia Fink
Sport i vozrast,R. E. Motylianskaia
Physical activity in disease prevention and treatment,"R. Masironi, H. Denolin"
Nihonjin to supōtsu,Masayuki Tamaki
"ha-Hotsaʾah ha-leʾumit le-tarbut, le-vidur ṿeli-sporṭ, 1984/85-1998",Israel. Lishkah ha-merkazit li-sṭaṭisṭiḳah
Tang dai ti yu,Xiaowei Pan
The heart has its reasons,"Mitchell, Robert L."
Nutritional erogogenics [sic] and sports performance,Melvin H. Williams
Yamagata-ken taiikushi,Yamagata-ken Kyōikuchō. Taiiku Hokenka
"1965 32nd AYF Olympic Games Armenian Youth Federation of America , Sunday, September 5, 1965, Willow Brook Park, New Britain, Connecticut",Armenian Youth Federation
The total sports experience--for kids,Aubrey H. Fine
2003 Providence Olympic Games,Armenian Youth Federation
An introduction to human movement,Charles H. Shea
Sport und Spannung im Prozess der Zivilisation,"Norbert Elias, Eric Dunning, Reinhard Blomert, Detlef Bremecke, Wilhelm Hopf, Reinhardt Peter Nippert"
Alcohol and sport,Robert D. Stainback
Joshi supōtsu o kataru,Kinue Hitomi
Da di fan zhuan huan xin tian,Ren min ti yu chu ban she
Shi jie ping tan yu Zhonghua er nü,
Supōtsu o kataru,Ichirō Hatoyama
Enciclopedia educației fizice și sportului din România,"Alexe Nicu, Mihai Cojocaru"
Ying Han Han Ying Ao yun ci dian,Yang Hong
Evidence of discrimination against Jews in sports in Germany,
Sportspielforschung und -ausbildung in Bochum,"Hans-Friedrich Voigt, Gernot Jendrusch"
Heatstroke,Michael G. Simonson
"Vergessen, verdrängt, abgelehnt - zur Geschichte der Ausgrenzung im Sport",Arnd Krüger
Friese sport,"Goffe Jensma, Pieter Breuker"
Sports in Israel,Simon Griver
"100 ídolos porteños, 1910-2010",Víctor F. Lupo
Lanxi jiao yu ti yu zhi,Lanxi jiao yu ti yu zhi bian zuan wei yuan hui
Origins of Chinese sports,"S. K. Lim, Chunjiang Fu, Victor Petersen"
Mongol játékok és versenyek,Ágnes Birtalan
Discriminations dans les sports contemporains,Stéphane Héas
"ha-Hotsaʾah ha-leʾumit le-tarbut, le-vidur ṿeli-sporṭ, 1991-1996",Israel. Lishkah ha-merkazit li-sṭaṭisṭiḳah
Esporte e lazer,Victor Andrade de Melo
Looking inside sports aerodynamics,Ron Schultz
"ha-Hotsaʾah ha-leʾumit le-tarbut, le-vidur ṿeli-sporṭ, 1984/85-1992",Israel. Lishkah ha-merkazit li-sṭaṭisṭiḳah
"Changning Xian wen hua ti yu zhi, 1933-2008",Shangyong Mu
Fengshun Xian ti yu zhi,Fengshun Xian (China). Ti yu ju
al-Riyāḍah fī Tūnis bayna al-taʼṣīl al-akhlāqī wa-al-tanẓīm al-qānūnī,Tunisia. Majlis al-Nūwāb. Markaz al-Buḥūth wa-al-Dirāsāt al-Barlamānīyah
al-Riyāḍah wa-al-khiṭāb al-iʻlāmī,Khālid Kāẓim Abū Dūḥ
"Maher yoter, gavoha yoter, ḥazaḳ yoter",Jason Page
"Justice, ethique et sport","Duygun Yarsuvat, Pierre-Henri Bolle"
Sporting days,J. Harry Savory
Ao yun Zhongguo,Yongheng Zhang
Rakt spår,Samuel Norrby
Gesellschaftlicher Wandel und Sportentwicklung,"Bernd Schulze, Ulrike Marker"
Handbuch Methoden im Sport,"Harald Lange, Silke Sinning"
Hanʼguk sŭpʻoochʻŭsa,Hyŏn-sŏng Na
Hanʼguk chʻeyuk sa,
Das sportarztwesen,Heinrich Epping
Management of bloodborne infections in sport,Terry A. Zeigler
Homo sportivus oeconomicus,Astrid Kämpfe
The Tao of sports,"Mitchell, Robert L."
Chʻeyuk osimnyŏn sa,Yong-hŭi Yi
Chʻeyuk taegwan,Taehan Ch'eyukhoe
Sŭpʻochʻŭ yongŏ sajŏn,Yŏng-hwan Kim
Sheria za michezo Yetu,J. M. Nkongo
Taehan Chʻeyukhoe osimnyŏn,Taehan Ch'eyukhoe
Sŭpʻochʻŭ sajon,Kwang-sik Cho
Supōtsu no hanashi,Yoshisaburō Kotaka
Larry Guest Lite,Larry Guest
Ping pang qun ying,Zhongguo qing nian chu ban she
Zhonghua Renmin Gongheguo di yi jie yun dong hui,China) Zhonghua Renmin Gongheguo yun dong hui (1st 1959 Beijing
Coach Odle's full court press,Jessica Rousselow-Winquist
Food for better performance,R. C. Hutchinson
Winning with teamwork,Katherine Karvelas
Diskoi,Paul Jacobsthal
Qing nian kang luo she shi diao cha bao gao,K. L. Gill
Ouzhou ti yu kao cha ri ji,Yongsheng Chen
60 years of winners,Bob Oates
攀岩技術教本,東 秀磯
Philosophy of sport,Drew A. Hyland
"Wellness, spirituality, and sports","Ryan, Thomas Father."
Fundamental golf,"Krause, Peter"
"A carnival of sports; spectacles, stunts, crazes, and unusual sports events",Bill Severn
Sports and psycho-physiology,Hugo H. Bronsen
Adaptation in sports training,A. A. Viru
Going fast,Jenny Feely
Citizenship through sports and law,Linda Riekes
Golf for Beginners,Barney Beard
Yuk'wae han sŭp'och'ŭ simnihak,Ch'ŏr-ho Im
The first twenty-five years,ABC Sports
Murphys's Secret,Becke Turner
Study Skills for Sport Studies,Tara Magdalinski
Black Sportsmen,E. Cashmore
Deportes en el Paraguay,Patricio José Zelada Silva
Sports Geography,John Bale
Cutting down the Nets,Lawrence Kelly
Baseball's Best (and Worst) 2023 Yearbook,G. Scott Thomas
Fight Stories the Pulp Magazine,Retro Comic Reprints
ORV Journal,Barbara Morina
Critical Perspectives on Minors Playing High-Contact Sports,John A. Torres
Het krankzinninge kwartiertje,Nico Scheepmaker
Sport in Society,Kirk Bizley
Saving Speedway,"Philip Dalling, John Somerville"
Hillman Sports Comics Scbw,Retro Comic Reprints
Pillar B's,"Santiago, Ray, 3rd"
Principle-Driven Skill Development,"Russ Smith, Patrick McCarthy, Marcus Davila, Fred Lohse"
Story of GameFace,"Bradley Padia, Erik Ellis"
Ballparks and Babes - Central Divisions,"Dicky Woodbury, Rock Morin"
Summary of James Kerr's Legacy,I. R. B. Media
Mimi and Moto's Magical Meteors,"Mark Augustyn, Nancy Gerloff"
"Simone Biles, Champion Gymnast","Michèle Dufresne, Pioneer Valley Educational Press"
Sport,"ICSS Seminar (1991 Tallinn, Estonia)"
Sports participation and health among adults in Ireland,Tony Fahey
Through thick and thin,Charles Little
Syn celerového krále,Ota Pavel
Footmania,Fabien Ollier
"Tabemono, nomimono",Masao Yamaguchi
"Michel Clare, passion sport",Michel Clare
"Flickflack, Foul und Tsukahara","Armin Burkhardt, Peter Schlobinski"
Ti yu shi hua,"""Zhonghua wen ming shi hua"" bian wei hui"
Carroll Shelby,Al Satterwhite
Pelé's Beautiful Game,"Nancy Dawson, Pioneer Valley Educational Press"
Hillman Sports Comics Hcfc,Retro Comic Reprints
Sport in Aotearoa/New Zealand society,"Chris Collins, Steven J. Jackson"
Bewertung von Sponsorships und Marketing-Events,Christoph Burmann
Güreşimiz,Erhun Tekakpınar
22 nian quan guo yun dong da hui zong bao gao,China) Quan guo yun dong da hui (1933 Nanking
"Tezisy dokladov XIX Vsesoi͡uznoĭ konferent͡sii ""Fiziologicheskie mekhanizmy adaptat͡sii k myshechnoĭ dei͡atelʹnosti""","Russia) Vsesoi͡uznai͡a konferent͡sii͡a ""Fiziologicheskie mekhanizmy adaptat͡sii k myshechnoĭ dei͡atelʹnosti"" (19th 1988 Volgograd"
Hinderlijk buitenspel,Eimer Wieldraaijer
En tō stadiō,Marianna Koromēla
Mädchen und Sport an der Hauptschule,Judith Frohn
La provincia dei campioni,Sergio Ceroni
Bob Fulton,"Fulton, Bob"
Seḳer yekholet gufanit,Hillel Ruskin
כושר גופני,Hillel Ruskin
Dornbirner Sportgeschichte,Laurin Peter
体育法学概论,Yang Zhang
Themenfelder der Sportwissenschaft,"Herbert Haag, Strauss, Bernd, Dorothee Alfermann"
Rituale im Sport,Frank Röller
Sport,Arthur van den Boogaard
Het sportieve leven van de Romeinen,Patrick Gouw
Bibliographien zur Sportwissenschaft,Manfred Komorowski
Novoe myshlenie i olimpiĭskoe dvizhenie,"Vsesoi͡uznyĭ nauchnyĭ simpozium ""Mezhdunarodnoe olimpiĭskoe dvizhenie--problemy i tendent͡sii razvitii͡a na sovremennom ėtape"" (1989 Rīga, Latvia)"
Le sport et la télévision,Wladimir Andreff
A payroll to meet,David Whitford
Nanaĭskie igry =,V. Belʹdy
Sport and society,Dennis Brailsford
Serious fun,Robert Edelman
Bibliografia,Jouko Käsmä
Lo sport a Roma,E. Bellizzi
Sport e giochi nell'antichità classica,Giovanni Manetti
Playing write field,Scott Pitoniak
The economic impact of professional sports on the Maryland economy,Pradeep Ganguly
Injuries in Combat Sports,Greg R. McLatchie
Arbeitersportbewegung,Anne Bärhausen
"For playground, field and forest",Daniel Carter Beard
Sportvorschrift für das Heer,Germany. Heer. Oberkommando.
Umgang mit Belastungssituationen,Petra Giess-Stüber
Théorie et méthodologie des jeux sportifs,Leon Teodorescu
Probleme de teorie și metodică în jocurile sportive,Leon Teodorescu
Slavii͡a,"Slavii͡a (Athletic club : Sofia, Bulgaria)"
Zur Theorie der Methodik des Sports,Beate Blanke-Malmberg
Pension fairness for NBA pioneers,United States
"Ho, ezo milḥamah meʻaneget",Amir Ben-Porat
Derecho público del deporte,Gabriel Real Ferrer
Untersuchungen zur Flimmerverschmelzungsfrequenz im Sport,Saarbrücker Expertengespräch zur Messung der Flimmerverschmelzungsfrequenz im Sport (2nd 1990)
Student Projects in Sport Psychology,Bryant J. Cratty
Psychology in contemporary sports,Bryant J. Cratty
Athlete in the Sports Team,Bryant J. Cratty
Mathematics and sports,Leonid Efimovich Sadovskiĭ
Drill team is for me,Valerie Childress
Greats of Gaelic games,Owen McCann
Sports lab,Robert Sheely
Marv Albert's sports quiz book,Marv Albert
Notre Dame odyssey,Herb T. Juliano
Sia lodato Bartali,Stefano Pivato
Meresapi makna dan tudjuan revolusi olahraga,Maladi.
Psychology in sport,John M. D. Kremer
Why sports morally matter,William John Morgan
Sport and the humanities,William John Morgan
Ethics in Sport,William John Morgan
Heroines of sport,Jennifer Hargreaves
Recreations of a sportsman,"Lennox, William Pitt Lord"
Merrie England,"Lennox, William Pitt Lord"
Zambia sporting score,Moses Sayela Walubita
Evolution de la pratique sportive des français de 1967 à 1984,Pascal Garrigues
Bear down,Janet Mitchell
Your best sport,Jonathan P. Niednagel
Pure Poore,Jim Poore
A woman's guide to spectator sports,Kathryn Lance
Sport for whom?,Great Britain. Audit Commission for Local Authorities in England and Wales.
"Physiology of exercise for physical education, athletics, and exercise science",Herbert A. DeVries
"The boy pioneers, sons of Daniel Boone",Daniel Carter Beard
More than a game,Sebastian Coe
New ideas for American boys,Daniel Carter Beard
Great Sporting Fiascos,Sebastian Coe
The fair weather and rainy day handy book,Daniel Carter Beard
The Jim Murray collection,Jim Murray
"Jim Murray, the last of the best",Jim Murray
"Jim Murray, the great ones",Jim Murray
Nel sacro recinto di Olimpia,Aldo Aledda
Performance massage,Robert K. King
Sportwissenschaft und Sportpädagogik,Robert Prohl
British Sport P,Dennis Brailsford
Sportfilosofie,J. W. I. Tamboer
Commentários à legislaçao desportiva brasileira,Valed Perry
Crônica de uma certa lei do desporto,Valed Perry
Seasons to remember,Curt Gowdy
Goethe als Eisläufer,August Gassner
Dear Dr. Jock ... the people's guide to sports and fitness,David C. Bachman
A history of the concept of professionalism in Canadian sport,Frank Cosentino
"Not bad, eh?",Frank Cosentino
Lo sport in Sardegna tra cronaca e leggenda 1850-1943,Angelo Carrus
Only a game,Bill Littlefield
Only a Game (Bison Original),Bill Littlefield
Keepers,Bill Littlefield
A Year in Sports,Neil Leifer
Les sports,Alain Grée
Sociology of sport,"Phillips, John C."
Developing sport and leisure,Caroline Pack
Typical layout--diagrams & construction details for recreation facilities,United States. Army. Corps of Engineers.
"Compendium of papers presented at the National Workshop in Physical Education and Sport, Chancellor College, Zomba, 17-19 August, 1987",National Workshop in Physical Education and Sport (1987 Chancellor College)
Vāzhgān-i jāmiʻ-i varzishī,ʻAlāʼ al-Dīn Pāzārgādī
Reading the sports page,Jeremy R. Feinberg
"Study Guide and Workbook to ""Nutrition""",Frank I. Katch
What makes a boomerang come back,Sharon L. Blanding
Calorie expenditure charts for physical activity,Frank I. Katch
El deporte correctamente hablado,Julio Bernárdez
Scotlands̓ sporting heroes,Robert Jeffrey
Sports Astrology,John Frawley
The Sports Zone,Gary Chmielewski
Pour en finir avec l'olympisme,Laurent Laplante
Playing out,Carol Sexty
75 Memorable Moments in Minnesota Sports,Joel A. Rippel
Beyond the Sports huddle,Dave Mona
"Jeux, sports et fêtes de l'antiquité à nos jours en Languedoc et Roussillon",Fédération historique du Languedoc méditerranéen et du Roussillon
Great Sporting Graphics,Rockport Publishing
Fair Game,Paul Daugherty
So Good! The Incredible Championship Season of the 2007 Red Sox,Boston Globe
The Bottom Line,David Kowalick
Sporta smaids,Vilis Čika
Personal Trainer Manual,Richard T. Cotton
Fitness for Sport (Skills of the Game),Rex Hazeldine
Strength Training for Sport (The Skills of the Game),Rex Hazeldine
The Funniest People in Sports and Neighborhoods,"David, Bruce"
Athletic Training in Occupational Settings (The Athletic Training Library),Susan Finkam
Ohio Sports Almanac,Orange Frazer Press
Excelling in sports,Cordner Nelson
101 Sports Nutrition Tips (101 Drills),Susan Kundrat
Real Winners,Shaun Gayle
Tête de moi,Jean-Noël Blanc
Golf,Rick Sessinghaus
"Carrera De Barril (Mcleese, Tex, Rodeo Discovery Library.)",Tex McLeese
Monta En Silla Y A Pelo,Tex McLeese
Lucha Con Novillos,Tex McLeese
"Monta De Toro Y Toreo (Mcleese, Tex, Rodeo Discovery Library.)",Tex McLeese
Careers in Entertainment and Sports,WetFeet
Sports of Mexico,Erica M. Stokes
Sports of Mexico (Mexico : Our Southern Neighbor),Erica M. Stokes
Sports A to Z,David Diehl
"Peak performance playbook, vol. 1",Jeff Janssen
"Heroes, Scamps, and Good Guys",Bob Dolgan
Sports Guys,Gene Fox
Trapped!,Michele Martin Bossley
Delaying the Game,Lorna Schultz Nicholson
Sports Trivia Quiz,Lagoon Books
Sporting Excellence,"Ted Garratt, Ted Garratt"
Sport Tourism Development (Aspects of Tourism),Thomas Hinch
"L' Histoire du sport, l'histoire des sportifs",Jean-Michel Delaplace
Sports champions,Linda Aksomitis
Take It To the Next Level,Doug Reese
Girl to Girl: Sports and You,Anne Driscoll
Sports Illustrated 1999 Sports Almanac (Sports Illustrated Sports Almanac),Editors of Sports Illustrated
Sports Illustrated 1995 Sports Almanac (Sports Illustrated Sports Almanac),Editors of Sports Illustrated
Sports Illustrated for Kids,Editors of Sports Illustrated
The Sports Illustrated 1992 Sports Almanac,Editors of Sports Illustrated
Sports Illustrated TBD #1,Editors of Sports Illustrated
Essential Sculling,Daniel  J. Boyne
ESPN ULTIMATE HIGHLIGHT REEL,ESPN Sportscenter
On the Edge Skateboarding/On the Edge Snowboarding,Patty Segovia
Illustrated History of Twentieh Century,Chris Nawrat
Amity in the Middle East,Geoffrey Whitfield
Careers in Pro Sports,Cordner Nelson
Colemanballs,Private Eye
Mortal Engines,"John, M Hoberman"
The Interval Training Manual,Tom Kelso
Instant Notes in Sport and Exercise Physiology (Instant Notes),Karen Birch
Keeping Score,Robert Hamblin
Timekeeping,Alan Tomkins
101 Positive Athletic Traditions,Bruce Eamon Brown
"Zelts, sudrabs, bronza",Vilis Čika
The Great Philadelphia Sports Debate,Angelo Cataldi Glen Macnow
Heart of a Champion,Roger Lipe
Ultimate Gt Weight Training for Golf Past 40 (Ultimate Guide to Weight Training for Golf Past 40) (Ultimate Guide to Weight Training for Golf Past 40) ... Guide to Weight Training for Golf Past 40),Rob Price
Sports Jokes & Trivia with Justplain Darren and Friends,Darren Scott
Color Atlas and Text of Sports Medicine in Childhood and Adolescence,Nicola Maffulli
Capelle's Practicing Pool,Phil Capelle
Crazy About Sports: Volume I,"James, Earl Hester Jr"
Shelf Road Rock,Fred Knapp
Perform to your potential,Jeff Janssen
Two on One,C. A. Forsyth
Sacred Records,Greg Echlin
The Fan's Book of Sporting Trivia,Nick Owen
I Can,Art Linsay
Innovations in sport psychology,"World Congress of Sport Psychology (9th 1997 Netanyah, Israel?)"
Official Video Game & Pinball Book Of World Records,Walter Day
PRIVATE EYE'S COLEMANBALLS,"LARRY, Barry Fantoni"
Trabajos científicos,International Society of Sports Psychology.
Sportsmath,Lee Arthur
Philippine sports greats,Jorge Afable
Ten moments that shook the sports world,Stan Isaacs
Careers and opportunities in sports,Stan Isaacs
Naqsh-i paḥlavānī va nahz̤at-i ʻayyārī dar tārīkh-i ijtimāʼī va ḥayāt i siyasī-i millat Īrān,Kāẓim Kāẓimaynī
Eye witness in sport,Frederick Willem Jacobus Labuschagne
A wealth of sport,Winifred Hindley
Girls' snowboarding,Heather E. Schwartz
Touchdown Jesus,Scott Eden
The Book of Woodcraft and Indian Lore,Edward Thomson Seton
NFL Blitz 2000,"Tim Cox, Michael Owen"
Tony Hawk's Pro Skater 2,Richie Plantain
50 Years of Hockey,Faber
Strafschopgebieden & reserves,"Mulder, Jan"
Antique sports uniforms & equipment,Daniel Hauser
The Complete Handbook of Baseball,Zander  Hollander
Nascar at the Track: Science of NASCAR,Mark Stewart
Nascar In The Pits./(Science Of Nascar),Mark Stewart
The New Jersey Nets,Mark Stewart
Sports Activity Book,Becky Radtke
Sports Illustrated For Kids Year In Sports 2005 (Sports Illustrated for Kids Year in Sports),Si For Kids
The Encyclopedia of World of Sports (Reference),John Wukovits
Everest:Struggle To Reach The Top,Andrews McMeel Publishing
Sports and Recreational Activities,Dale P. Mood
"Herbs for Sports Perfomance, Energy, and Recovery",Edmund R. Burke
Managing Sport Organizations,Ruben Acosta Hernandez
Performing in Extreme Environments,"Lawrence E. Armstrong, Lawrence E. Armstrong"
Genetics Primer for Exercise Science and Health (Primers in Exercise Science),Stephen M. Roth
Performance Appraisal for Sport and Recreation Managers,Joanne Maclean
Knowledge in a Nutshell on Sports (Knowledge in a Nutshell),Charles Reichblum
Disordered Eating Among Athletes,"Katherine A., Ph.D. Beals"
Enhancing Recovery,Michael Kellmann
An Insider's Guide to Managing Sports Events,Jerry Solomon
Frameworks for Sport Psychologists,Karen Lee Hill
Sport Promotion and Sales Management,Richard L. Irwin
Playing the Game,"Derek, Sir Birley"
Playing for Their Nation,Steven R. Bullock
"Careers in Sports, Fitness, and Recreation","Robert F. Wilson, Robert F Wilson"
Sports and entertainment marketing,Ken Kaser
Opkomst & Ondergang,Jan Mulder
Best Sport Book in the Whole Wide World,RH Value Publishing
History of Sport in Wales (University of Wales - Pocket Guide),Martin Johnes
The Athletic Institute,Tony Ladd
Chambers Sports Factfinder,Editors of Chambers
The Growing Child in Competitive Sport,G.R. Gleeson
"Jeux, divertissements, sports",Roger Caratini
"Marrow of the Nation: A History of Sport and Physical Culture in Republican China (Asia: Local Studies / Global Themes, 10)",Andrew D. Morris
Soccer in Oneonta   (NY)   (Images of Sports),Mark Simonson
The Norfolk Sports Club,Clay Shampoe
The Complete Hunter's Almanac,Knap
Complete OutdoorHhandbook,Knap
Fishing Secrets,Knap
Sociologies du sport,Henri Vaugrand
Applied exercise & sport physiology,Terry J. Housh
The Master's Touch,Ted Sprague
Neuerwerbungen des Sammelschwerpunktes Sport und Sportwissenschaften 1978-1981,Deutsche Sporthochschule Köln. Bibliothek.
Food for sport,Karen Inge
Official NBA Hangtime Player's Guide,BradyGames
Nobody Asked Me but the World,Cannon
Livewire Real Lives Sport 10 Title Pack,Various
How to Take a Penalty,Rob Eastaway
USA today sports atlas,Will Balliett
Pół wieku sportu na Pomorzu Szczecińskim,Zbigniew Szafkowski
Spis lektur do konwersatorium z historii kultury fizycznej dla studentów Instytutu Kultury Fizycznej,Henryk Laskiewicz
Ballooning (First Books--Sports & Recreation),Phyllis J. Perry
Mental Skills for the Artistic Sports,Murray Smith
Performance in Sport (Aspects of Physical Education),Heinemann
ESPN the Magazine Presents,Dan Patrick
Sports Medicine Eighty,Robert R. Rinaldi
ʻAl ḥitsim ṿe-bonbonim,Menahem Less
Sport Psychology,Gallucci
Lylat Wars,C. S. Kershaw
Che deportista,William Gálvez
AFC North,Brian C. Peterson
Encyclopaedia of Sports and Games,R.G. Goel
Psychology of Team Sports,H. Schellenberger
The complete book of lawn games,Tom C Harrington
More Than a Game,Brian Niiya
Sport,"Richard, Schaap"
Sports,Xavier Einstein
International Aspects of Sports,Robert Mertzman
The Practice Pro,Mike Cowan
Sports,Robert Mertzman
Play Smart,Science-by-Mail Staff
Recreation Sports and Fun,Norman Ludlow
answers on blueprint reading,Donald Dean MacChia
Class G: Geography; Maps; Anthropology; Recreation : Library of Congress Classification Schedules,Rita Runchock
"Philly Sports Challenge, Eagles Edition",Eli Kowalski
Physical fitness,Bernice Kegel
The Sportswoman Daybook,Ernestine G. Miller
Football Quiz Book 13b,Warren R. Etheredge
Looking Back...75yrs of Eagles History,Eli Kowalski
Exercise Physiology,J. Stegemann
Physical Activity and the Social Sciences,W. Neil Widmeyer
Experiments in the Mechanics of Human Movement,H. Joseph Scheuchenzuber
Epistémologie des activités physiques et sportives,Claude Bayer
Počeci sporta na tlu Vojvodine,Branko Mrkić
The 40 safest American sports records,Russ Marshall
Mechanics and Sport Performance,P. Walder
P.E. Essentials,D. Neate
Approches actuelles d'une épistémologie des activités physiques et sportives,Claude Bayer
The Best Los Angeles Sports Arguments (The Best Sports Arguments...),J.A. Adande
Using Video in Sport,Keith Lyons
Coaching athletes,Monika E Schloder
The Toronto Adventure and Recreation Guide,Tiffany Sher
Sponsor i sport,S. I. Gusʹkov
Sport i amerikanskai͡a︡ shkola,S. I. Gusʹkov
A letter for Daria,Екатерина Александровна Гордеева
Motivation Implications for Coaching and Teaching,A. Carron
V atake dollar,S. I. Gusʹkov
Sports challenge 2,Julian Farino
Sport in early Calgary,William M. McLennan
Smart marketing,Sue Burgess
Perpetuating the Memory of a Sportscaster,Liston B Monsanto Sr
Out And About at the Baseball Stadium (Field Trips) (Field Trips),Bitsy Kemper
Idrettens sponsoravtaler,Geir Woxholth
Sport unter dem Davidstern,Walter Hochreiter
Face to Face with Sports Legends,Joe Cullinane
Extending Science No. 13,R. B. Arnold
Building Champions,Augustine Gus Logie & Emmanuel Guadeloupe
Deeper Than the Game,Michael Basnight
"Outlines & Highlights for Legal Liability in Recreation and Sports by Hronek, ISBN",Cram101 Textbook Reviews
Famous American athletes of today,Jerry Nason
Pardon The Inspiration,Al Sturgeon
Physical education activities for the uncoordinated student,Susan J. Grosse
ABC's wide world of sports,Irving A. Leitner
Livewire Sports Magazine,Peter Leigh
Sociologie du sport,Pascal Duret
L' héroïsme sportif,Pascal Duret
Just Run!,Tonie Campbell
Sports Law and Litigation,Craig Moore
Complete Handicapper Manual,Pagurian
Latin American Sport,Joseph L. Arbena
Whitaker's Olympic Almanack (Whitakers),S. Greenberg
Circuito Interior (La Otra Escalera),Maria Luisa Santillan
"Internships, Jobs And Careers in the Sports Industry",Linda Wong
Sporting Pedagogies,Michael D. Giardina
The Brushback Report,Dave Saraiva
Entre les fleuves,Nadine Ltaif
Icebreaker,Steven Barwin
The Sports Address Bible & Almanac 2002,Edward T. Kobak
Virtual apprentice,Gayle Bryan
Working in Sport and Fitness,DFEE
Performance Technologies,Tar Magdalinski
Practical Skills Manual for Evaluation of Athletic Injuries,William Holcomb
The Last Hurrah,Sports Dream Challenges
Sports Injury Management,Terry R. Malone
Intergovernmental Committee for Physical Education and Sport,UNESCO
Sports Stories and the Bible,Stan Nix
Quotable Jim Murray,Linda McCoy-Murray
Sport Motivation,Ken Hodge
Warman's Sports Collectibles,Tom Mortenson
Standard Catalog of Sports Memorabilia 00 (Standard Catalog),Tom Mortenson
Taking Sport Seriously,Peter S. Donnelly
The story behind the glory,Bill Cairo
Ten Great Sports Quotations For All Time,Bill Cairo
Psychology Sport Methods Appli,Suinn
Business Planning for the Leisure Industry,Terry Collier
Physics for sport,Kerry Parker
American Game(s),Benjamin Eastma
Postsurgical Orthopedic Sports Rehabilitation,Robert C. Manske
One Hundred Years of Scottish Sport,Rodger Baillie
Clifford's Sports Day (Clifford the Big Red Dog),Norman Bridwell
Sports Illustrated Kids Year In Sports 2008 (Sports Illustrated for Kids Year in Sports),Sports Illustrated Kids
The Working Body (Aspects of PE),Kirk Bizley
The Best After-Dinner Sports Tales,Will Chignell
Organization Sport (Aspects of Physical Education),Kirk Bizley
Sport in Society (Aspects of Physical Education),Kirk Bizley
Sports Sponsorship and Marketing Communications,Wim Lagae
Extreme Sports,Sheri Holder
El deporte del poder,Jaume Boix Angelats
Shi jie ti yu yun dong xiao bai ke,Qiang Wang
Play Practice,Alan G. Launder
The View from the Upper Deck,DJ Gallo
The world of Muckledy-Dun (Little trolley book),Joan Wade Cole
"Brain Quest: After School, Sports",Brain Quest
"Sportliche Aktivität, fitness und Gesundheit im Lebenslauf",Alexander Woll
The sporting body,Mervyn Cross
Sport and Society,Brailsford
Developing decision makers,Lynn Kidman
Play the game,Nick Bowen
Tales from the Pits,Daniel Meyers
Plaisir des sports,Jean Prévost
Guttmann Textbook of Sport for the Disabled (Not Handled by New York),L GUTTMANN
"Legal Issues in Sport, PE and Recreation",Hazel Hartley
Sport and Spirituality,Parry/ et. al
Direito desportivo,João Correia Boaventura
The official encyclopedia of sports,John Lowell Pratt
Sports or athletics,University of Windsor Seminar on Canadian-American Relations (15th 1973)
A history of intercollegiate wrestling at Oregon State University (1909-1974),"Nelson, Richard C."
"The running, jumping, throwing, sliding, racing, climbing book",Antonio Lupatelli
Arrival Press,Suzy Goodall
Visiones del deporte,Publio López Mondéjar
Running for My Life,Ray Zahab
Body & soul,Loic Wacquant
Gendai Nihon ni okeru supotsu shakai no jinzai ikusei,Akio Yamagishi
"Alimentation du sportif et de l'homme moderne, diététique et gastronomie",Gérard Debuigne
BMX Freestyle,Ray Mcclellan
The Outdoor Book for Adventurous Boys,Adrian Besley
Nihon-teki supotsu kankyo hihan,Toshio Nakamura
The lifelong season,Keith Duggan
Legislación deportiva de la Comunidad de Madrid,Madrid (Spain : Region)
Reglamentos de los deportes autóctonos de Castilla y León,Manuel Jesus Veleda Vallelado
Optics for Birders,Al Akin
Sports Thematic Unit,SHERRI MCLEROY
The 1997 Nagano Symposium on Sports Sciences,Nagano Symposium on Sports Sciences (1997)
Otokotachi no tetsugaku (Sanichi shinsho),Hachiro Tahara
The Sports Lovers Guide to Recovery,Andrew Dieden
The Licensing letter's sports licensing report,Martin Brochstein
Sport,Fiona Aldridge
Funny Things Happen in the Press Room,C. Ledford
"Equinunk, Tell Your Story",Seth Davis
Ultimate,Pasquale Anthony Leonardo
Trends and Opportunities in the Travel and Tourism Industry,Dick Sisman
"La marche humaine, la course et le saut. Biomécanique",Viel
Undo seirigaku (Gendaijin no eiyogaku),Haruo Ikegami
Everyday Swahili,University of Massachusetts
Undo bunkaron,Setsuo Arai
Josei supotsu no shakaigaku,Shogo Esashi
Showa supotsu shiron,Katsumi Irie
Nihon supotsu bunka no genryu: Seiritsuki ni okeru waga kuni no supotsu seido ni kansuru kenkyu,Yuko Kusaka
"""Kindai puro supotsu"" no rekishi shakaigaku",Koichi Kiku
"Taiiku, supotsu tetsugaku ron, budoron",Shinobu Abe
"Kigyo, supotsu, shizen",Kenji Todoroki
Sengo Nihon no supotsu seisaku,Harunami Seki
Maboroshi no Orinpikku (Chikuma purima bukkusu),Yo Kawanari
J-rigu no keizaigaku,Yukio Ubukata
Mood And Human Performance,Andrew M. Lane
Sports gamer,Glenn Rubenstein
Undo seirigaku,Santa Ichikawa
The Smallest Things Make the Biggest Difference SMART WEIGHT LOSS,"Ray V., Ph.d. Haring"
Sport Lauderdale,Cynthia A. Thuma
Prokliatie Professii,R. M. Zagainov
The Big Z,Pedro E. Miranda Torres
Sports Illustrated: Full Throttle,TIHE BOOKAZINES
Dome sweet dome,Joe Glisson
Blue is the Colour,Ollie Byrnes
Das Volk der Athleten,Stefan Müller
Careers in Entertainment and Sports,J. Michael Ribas
Forecasting Methods in Sports and Recreation,Antoine Zalatan
Winners and Losers,Jill LeClair
Welsh Sporting Greats,Alun Wyn Bevan
Sport Ethics in Context,Debra Shogan
Footprints: Canadian Sports Stories,Dave Toms
Sport andleisure in Victorian Barrow,Bryn Trescatheric
"Schwingen, Schwingen, Schwingen",Hans Ruedi Schläpfer
Körperertüchtigung und Sport für die sozialistische Landesverteidigung,Joachim Tappert
Sport in Südtirol,Hans Friedrich Wonner
Die Gymnastik der Hellenen,Julius Bintz
Sports in Estonia,Erlend Teemägi
Influence des sports sur l'individu et la race,O. Lemarié
Girls and boys in elementary physical education,Sandra Gibbons
Higher Judo,M. Feldenkrais
The Working Body (Aspects of Physical Education),Nuala Mullan
Sports in Literature,Henry B. Chapin
White paper on the report of the Committee Appointed to Review the Organization of Sports in Ghana,Ghana.
Aspectos recreativos de los juegos y deportes tradicionales en España,Cristóbal Moreno Palos
Juegos y deportes tradicionales en España,Cristóbal Moreno Palos
"Tourisme, sports et loisirs neuchâtelois à la Belle Epoque",Eric-André Klauser
Psychology and Sport,Sally Gadston
Sports Development and Sports Policy in Society,Daniel Bloyce
Matters of Sport,D. Malcolm
The Politics of Sport in South Asia (Sport in the Global Society),Subhas Ranjan C
Sport and Crime Reduction,geoff nichols
Sport in a Changing World,Howard Nixon
Introduction to physical education and sport science,Robert C. France
The Marketing of Sport,Simon Chadwick
HRM in the Sport and Leisure Industry,Chris Wolsey
Kinanthropometry X,Mike Marfell-Jo
Sports Development,Hylton/Bramham
Sport and Foreign Policy in a Globalizing World (Sport in the Global Society),Steven J.  Jack
"Fatherhood, Sport and Leisure",Tess Kay
Instructor's manual [for] Physical education in a changing society,William H Freeman
Olympic Games 1988,Killanin Rodda Lord
The Sports Illustrated 1993 Sports Almanac,the editors of Sports Illustrated
Curveballs Strikes Again,John Lolfe
Sports Illustrated 1997 Sports Almanac (Serial),SI
The Sports Illustrated 1998 Sports Almanac (Serial),The Editors of Si
An investigation of promotion strategies for marketing the athletic program at selected Division I colleges and universities,Mary C. Kennedy
Modern Sports Helmets,"James A., Ph.D. Newman"
Colorado,James Whiteside
"Skills, Drills & Strategies for Racquetball",David R. Walker
S.A. Soldate en hul sport 1939-1945,Floris J. G Van der Merwe
Nifty Thrifty Sports Crafts (Nifty Thrifty Crafts for Kids),Michele C. Hollow
Be a Sport 89,Sandra J. Briggs
Sports Facts,Stephen Hanks/Jesus Diaz/editors of Better Way Books Allan Barra
Pencampwyr!,Howard Lloyd
Science Museum Book of Sport (Science Museum Book of Amazing Facts),C. Jarman
"Sporting Body, Sporting Mind","John D.; Connolly, Christopher Syer"
A question of sport 2,Mike Adley
A question of sport,Mike Adley
"Bibliography on Psychological Tests Used in Research and Practice in Sport and Exercise Psychology (Mellen Studies in Psychology, V. 7)",Arnold D. Leunes
An Interdisciplinary Study of Sport As a Symbolic Hunt,Douglas M. Carroll
Telling Tales in Sport and Physical Activity,Andrew C. Sparkes
Adolescents and sport,Andrew Taggart
Kneeling in the end zone,Josh Tinley
Psychologie sportive,Philippe Most
Coach Bo Will Show You (Reader's Clubhouse Level 3),Reader's Clubhouse
The effects of attention control training on the free throw shooting of competitive high school athletes,James E. Spencer
Camp ar gamp,William Morgan Rogers
Sports Genes,H. & M. Frommer
Megaevents & Modernity,MAURICE ROCHE
Le sportif et le sociologue,Marcel Bolle de Bal
Hunt Games and Sports World Around,HUNT *GAMES* AN
Human biology,Robeta Williams
You're not singing anymore!,Adrian Thrills
Championship Mathematics,Peter Connah
Health Related Fitness (Aspects of Physical Education),Nuala Mullan
Guide to Getting into Sport and Leisure (Getting Into...),Tony Charlton
Wheelchair Road Racing (Wheelchair Sports),James R. Little
Reminiscences of sport in Grimsby,Bob Lincoln
Sports And The Law,PAUL C. WEILER
Sports N'All (Sports Comedy),Dave Crowe
It's Our Game,John C. Schenkenfelder
The Book of Rules (Sports & Games),Duncan Petersen
"Nikephoros Beihefte, Bd. 11: Athletika: studies on the olympic games and greek athletics",Nigel B. Crowther
Peripheral Nerve Injuries in the Athlete,Joseph Feinberg
Great Days in Sports 1979,Hollreis
Improving health and performance in the athlete,John Unitas
Sport and Physical Recreation,Ian T. Elvin
Blue Chips,Woodley
All-star bathroom sampler,Max Brallier
How sports began,Sandie Oram
Sports and governance,Philip Ella Juico
Working in Sport and Recreation,Rob Saipe
Yachts in Color,A. Beken
Bibliographie des gesamten sports,"Internationale Hygiene-Ausstellung (1911 Dresden, Germany)"
A diplomat off duty,"Lindley, Francis Oswald Honourable Sir"
Fifty years of golf,Andra Kirkaldy
Sports in Japan,Genzaburo Noguchi
The Earley years,John Scally
Funny Sports Stories,John Scally
"Sport, business and the law",Richard Verow
Fidel sobre el deporte,Fidel Castro
Sports Nutrition (Nutrition in Exercise & Sports Ser.),Judy A. Driskell
The Bathroom Sports Quote Book,Jack Kreismer
Permission to Play,Jill Murphy Long
The Ultimate Dictionary of Sports Quotations,Carlo Devito
Essays on Heroism in Sport in Ireland and France,Sarah Alyn Stacey
Getting into Sport and Fitness (Getting into),Beryl Dixon
Spots,S. Clay Wilson
Australia's Sporting Success,John Bloomfield
The Kickball Game,Joseph P. Anderson
Momentos estelares del deporte,Eduardo Arias
The Endocrine System in Sports and Exercise,Alan D. Rogol
Accidents in North American Mountaineering 2006,Jed Williamson
Best Plays of 1933-34 and the Year Book of the Drama In America,Burns Mantle
Maximum Ability,Dr. Ray Mota
Game Day: Wisconsin Football,Athlon Sports
Physiology and Performance,National Coaching Foundation
"The best of Dan Cook, 1956-1990",Dan Cook
The Outdoor Knots Book (Mountaineers Outdoor Basics),Clyde Soles
Century of Champions,Detroit Free Press
Creating a legacy for local sports,Debbie Elicksen
The Joy of Sport,"Novak, Michael."
Xtreme Sports Training-Renegade Style,Coach Davies
The Holy Trinity of American Sports,Craig A. Forney
"Class, sports and social development",Richard Gruneau
Sport Tourism,Brent W. Ritchie
Mammoth Encyclopedia of Sports,Noam Friedlander
Philadelphia's Greatest Sports Moments,Philadelphia Daily News
KISS Guide to Fishing (Keep It Simple Series),Robert Roth
The big game,Wendy Jenkins
Great Sporting Fiascos,Tony Brett Yong
ESPN Did You Know?,"Shelly Youngblut, Howie Schwab"
Evil Eye Beagle,Harrison Powers
Is God a Cubs Fan?,Arnold B. Kanter
On the Corinthian Spirit,D.J. Taylor
Olimpiĭskai͡a︡ idei͡a︡ dli͡a︡ Rossii,V. S. Rodichenko
The Green Line,Alan Green
Sports quotes,Joe Klein
Musings of an old shikari,Alexander Inglis Robertson Glasfurd
Warum wir siegen wollen,Josef H. Reichholf
"School Rumble, Volume 8",Jin Kobayashi
A Sporttorveny Magyarazata,Evgenii Ivanovich Golovakha
Mandighed og sport,Hans Bonde
Sports Law,Gardiner et al
Maximum Performance,M.D. Michael J. Ross
Dee Brown,News-Gazette
The Best Dallas - Fort Worth Sports Arguments (The Best Sports Arguments),Jaime Aron
Monsieur engels,Vachon
Der Olympische Friede,Andreas Höfer
SPORTS FOR LIFE,Sean T. Adams
National Lampoon Balls!,Steve Hofstetter
Working in sport & fitness,Mark Hillsdon
"Game, Set and Matched",Iain Fletcher
"Tod Papageorge: American Sports, 1970",Tod Papageorge
The Best Houston Sports Arguments (Best Sports Arguments),Jose De Jesus Ortiz
Razor Sharp,Drew Sharp
Ready to Play,Ron Chamberlain
The Mental Athlete,Kay Phd Porter
Las sociedades anónimas deportivas,Luis María Cazorla Prieto
We All Live In a Perry Groves World,Perry Groves
"Sport and recreation, and evangelism in the local church",Leonard Browne
Juliette fait du sport,Doris Lauer
One for the Ages,Sports Publishing
Texas A&M,Rusty Burson
HoopDaddy,Lee Feinswog
Willing to win,Willi Railo
Psych Factors Compet Sport,Davies & A
Legislação desportiva,Brazil
"""Sport Heil""",Jürgen Schultz
Legislação sobre esportes,Brazil
Who's Afraid of Niketown?,Friedrich Von Borries
Show Ring Style (Allen Photographic Guides),John Minoprio
What the Book Says About Sport,Stuart Weir
Best Seat in the House,Dan Wheeler
El entrenador personal,"Kim Forteza Soler, Josep Comellas Humet, Pablo López de Viñaspre García"
Quarterback sneak,Jake Maddox
University of Massachusetts Amherst Athletics (Images of Sports) (Images of Sports),Steven R. Sullivan
Snyder  County's  Sports  Heritage  (PA)  (Images  of  Sports),Jim  Campbell
Yale Football    (CT)   (Images of Sports),Sam Rubin
World Sports Encyclopedia,Wojciech Lipoński
Sports trivia quiz book,Matt Silverman
You Can Do It! Workbook,Lauren Catuzzi Grandcolas
The World Stare-Out Championship Final,Paul Hatcher
Maximising the value of sponsorship,Ardi Kolah
La Grèce d'à côté,Pierre Brulé
Careers For Women /Love Sports (Get in the Game! With Robin Roberts),Robin Roberts
NBA Jam 2000,"Bob Baker, Bobby McCarthy, Stacy Bricket"
Turok,David Boyle
WCW Mayhem,David Gibbon
"Been There, Done That",Ewan Carpenter
Sports injuries manual for trainers and coaches,Donald F. Featherstone
Instructional Course Lectures Shoulder and Elbow (Aaos Instructional Course Lectures),Jon J. P. Warner
Flexibility and Fitness for Riders,Van Laun
AFC East,K. C. Kelley
"The World of Sports (Wallace, Paula S. Life Around the World.)",Paula S. Wallace
Sports Hall of Weird,Kevin Sylvester
Sports Law,"Walter T., Jr. Champion"
How to develop effective sponsorship programme,Ardi Kolah
Alpine and freestyle skiing,Kylie Burns
Which Sport Is Right For You?,Robin Roberts
"El potrero, la pista y el ring",Eduardo P. Archetti
Advanced Pe & Sport,John Honeybourne
Sports and Fitness Illustrations CD-ROM and Book,"Dover Publications, Inc."
Crazy Lunch,"Dover Publications, Inc."
Start of play,Jonathan Rice
1953,Jonathan Rice
The best of Jim Murray,Jim Murray
The sporting world of Jim Murray,Jim Murray
From Surtees to Sassoon: some English contrasts (1838-1928),"Darton, F. J. Harvey"
Performance-Enhancing Drugs (Compact Research Series),Laura K. Egendorf
NASCAR Safety on the Track,Mark Stewart
Sports Medicine and Neuropsychology: the Neuropsychologist's Role in the Assessment and Management of Sports-related Concussions:a Special Issue of applied Neuropsychology (Applied Neuropsychology),Eric A. Zillmer
Glory,Richard Corman
Race and sport,"Thompson, Richard"
Winning Words,"Charles R. Jr Smith, Charles R. Smith"
Emotions in Sport,Yuri Hanin
Sports,Boy Scouts Of America
Object Talks from Sports Kids Love (Object Talks Lessons),Verna Kokmeyer
Grandes deportistas,Patricio Manns
Soccer skills,J Chris Roselius
Xtreme Sports,Rick McMillen
Cleveland Sports Legends,Bob Dyer
Health-related Fitness (Aspects of Physical Education),Heinemann
Winning Athletic Scholarships,Joseph Sponholz
Sportsman's Dinner Business,Paul Fletcher
"Diziałalność Akademickiego Zwia̧sku Sportowego w Poznaniu, 1919-1969",Seweryn Warsicki
The development of a survey instrument to profile donors to athletics,Veonica A. Hammersmith
Evaluation of the Washington State University intramural sports program,Nancy E. Rinaldi
Mongġolcud-un ulamjilaltu nayir naġadum,Altanvcir.
"A history of rugby football on Vancouver Island, 1876-1940",Donald Burgess
Prolonged activity and heart rate response in five and six year old children,Andrea Boucher
The effect of mental practice on the competitive free throw performance of intercollegiate basketball players,Robert D. Grisham
The relationship between intercollegiate athletic participation and academic achievement at Western Washington University 1980-1983,Kevin M. Bryant
Parent attitudes toward ninth grade physical education at Bellingham High School,Faye Eken
The effect of highlight videos upon the game performance of intercollegiate basketball players,David Paul Templin
Patterns of Irish sport behavior,Laurence M. McCarthy
Bhārata meṃ śārīrika śikshā,Bimalā Prasāda
Sport - a guide to historical sources in the UK,R. W. Cox
Index to sporting manuscripts in the UK,R. W. Cox
The sporting alphabet,Henry Heath
Zhongguo jin dai ti yu bian qian de wen hua jie du,Shiming Luo
al-Musabaqat wa-al-jawaiz wa-hukmuha fi al-shariah al-Islamiyah,Zakariya Muhammad Tahhan
"al-Tarbiyah al-badaniyah wa-al-riyadah fi al-turath al-Arabi al-Islami khilala al-Asr al-Abbasi, 132-656 H/749-1258 M",Abd al-Razzaq Tai
al-Mawsuah al-tarikhiyah li-tatawwur al-harakat al-riyadiyah fi al-hadarat al-qadimah wa-al-hadithah,Muhammad Khayyir Ali Mamsar
"Young people, sport and ethics",Martin J. Lee
A falcon on St. Paul's,James Wentworth Day
Western Washington University athletic history thru 1978,Paul Madison
"The relationship between sport-confidence, competitive orientation and performance on a muscular leg-endurance task",Bonnie Joy Jacobson
Perceptions of three Black leaders of the National Intramural-Recreational Sports Association,Roy Earl Yarbrough
Fourteenth series of Famous American athletes of today,F. E. Whitmarsh
Shug̲h̲al,Shafqat Tanvīr Mirzā
Fondements théoriques de l'administration du sport,Daniel Soucie
Complete moments in sport,Katherine Anne Welter
"The role of sport, games, and play in the development of society",Shella A. Mann
The life and professional contributions of Elmer Dayton Mitchell to American physical education and sport,Ella Walton Shannon
Attitude and/or conduct problems in church sports,David Michael Downing
Sport psychology,Linda Anne Bump
Sport and the fiction of John Updike and Philip Roth,Robert William Lewis
A photographic description of social problems in sport,Lorraine Ann Bennett
The role of the family in the socialization of female intercollegiate athletics,Judy Mikell Bohren
Le processus de communication dans la gestion du sport et de l'activité physique,Daniel Soucie
Gongheguo ti yu yuan xun,Wushen Xie
Zhonghua ti yu zhi zui,Luya Zhang
Ti yu wen hua li shi lun gao,Dali Cheng
Théorie et pratique de l'évaluation dans la pédagogie des activités physiques et sportives,Bernard Maccario
40 jeux de handball,Pierre Gueniffey
Jeux de basket-ball,Claudine Pecqueux
Qing mo min chu xin shi ti yu de chuan ru yu shan bian =,Qing Chen
Mongġol keu̇ked-u̇n ulamjilaltu naġadum,Jinbao Wu
"Moving and knowing in sport, dance, physical education",Eleanor Metheny
Symbols of sport,Donald W. Rothwell
"Alʹmanakh z nahody 10-litti︠a︡ dii︠a︡lʹnosty, 1948-1958 =",Ukraïnsʹkyĭ sportovyĭ kli︠u︡b v Ni︠u︡-Iorku
Kirche und Sport in Altertum und Mittelalter,Heinz Wilhelm Armin Ader
Zhongguo jin dai ti yu shi hua,Le-Chʻüan Tsʻui
Economics of sport,Ming Li
"City of Canterbury sports complex feasibility study, parts 1 & 2",Canterbury (District). Architecture and Planning Department.
Jeux et sports dans l'histoire,"Congrès national des sociétés historiques et scientifiques (120th 1995 Aix-en-Provence, France)"
Le Réel et le possible dans la pensée tactique,André Menaut
God in pieces,Andreas Konstantinides
"Cong ""dong Ya bing fu"" dao ti yu qiang guo",Cui Gao
Rules of the game,Diagram Visual Information Ltd.
Menlough,Bernard McHale
The experience of being a senior female competitive swimmer,Merrily Stratten
Cultural diversity and congruence in physical education and sport,International Society on Comparative Physical Education and Sport. Biennial Conference
Sifrut-sporṭ ʻIvrit ba-golah,Lipa Liṿyatan
Shōgai supōtsuron,Fumitaka Inoue
"Sports illusion, sports reality",Leonard Koppet
Watakushi no shōzōga,Tsuneyoshi Takeda
Lo sport nell'Unione Sovietica,Gianluigi Bragantin
Supōtsu no bunka keizaigaku,Jun Ōga
Sŭshtnost i proizkhod na bŭlgarskite i︠u︡nashki i khaĭdushki pesni vŭv vrŭzka s itrzenute v ti︠a︡kh sŭstezanii︠a︡,Evgeniĭ K. Teodorov
Sport et sante dans l'histoire =,"ISHPES Congress (4th 1997 Lyon, France)"
Hanʾguk kodae sŭpʻochʻŭ yŏnʾgu,Chin-su Yi
Sports physiology,Edward L. Fox
Physical education and sport ina changing society,William Hardin Freeman
Limits of human performance,American Academy of Physical Education. Meeting.
"Nutrition, alimentation et sport",Camille Charles Craplet
Die Entwicklung der Leibesübungen in Deutschland,"Deutsche Vereinigung für Sportwissenschaft. (1992 Reinhardsbrunn, Germany)"
L' atletica è leggera,Sergio Giuntini
Sifrut ha-sporṭ ṿeha-ḥinukh ha-gufani bi-Medinat Yiśraʾel,Sandu Grosman
La Genèse des sports,Jean Le Floc'hmoan
Interval training,Edward L Fox
Bases physiologiques de l'activité physique,Edward L Fox
Sports directory,"Sudbury and District Sports Central, Incorporated."
Issues in physical education and sports,George Henry McGlynn
"Pierre de Coubertin, sa vie par l'image",Geoffroy de Navacelle
al- Malāʻīb fī ʻaṣr salāṭīn al-Mamālīk,Nabīl Muḥammad ʻAbd al-ʻAzīz
One shining moment,David Barrett
Essaie de doctrine du sport,France. Commission de la doctrine du sport
The design and implementation of an eclectic process model to evaluate the Level-one Theory Course of the National Coaching Certification Program,Matthew John Robillard
"Sport, physical activity and T.V. role models",Dennis W. Hrycaiko
Sports science,"Commonwealth and International Conference on Sport, Physical Education, Dance, Recreation and Health (8th 1986 Glasgow)"
Körperliche Fremdheit,Bernd Bröskamp
Frontiers of activity and child health,"International Symposium of Paediatric Work Physiology Three Rivers, Que. 1975"
Nihon supōtsu sōseiki,Takeshi Asōzu
Lettre ouverte à un jeune sportif,"Vialar, Paul"
Le sport,"Vialar, Paul"
Sports reference catalogue,Sudbury and District Sports Central Inc.
Nationalsozialistische Expeditionspolitik,Peter Mierau
"Elite, Männlichkeit und Krieg",Sonja Levsen
Czechoslovakia and the international olympic movement,Jirí Kössl
The pleasure of the game,Stan Fillmore
Entraînement et performance athlétique,Richard Courtay
Sport and ethnic groups in Canada,Gérald Redmond
"Speaker's treasury of sports anecdotes, stories, and humor",Gerald Tomlinson
Toward a philosophy of sport. --,Harold J. VanderZwagg
"Uçantop, alantopu, masa topu terimleri sözlüǧü",Sinan Erdem
Vocabulaire russe-français du sport,Vladimir Ragozin
Transnational and comparative research in sport,Ian P. Henry
"Report of the first Canadian Olympic athletic team, 1908",J. Howard Crocker
Kūno kultūra ir sportas Lietuvoje,Antanas Vaupšas
Canadian sports headlines,Paul Romamuk
Quelle éthique du sport?,Léo-Paul Bordeleau
Forschung und Entwicklung im Sportsponsoring,Heidelberger Sportbusiness Forum (8th 2004)
Le sport,Lionel Arnaud
Politiques sportives et minorités ethniques,Lionel Arnaud
"Games, sports, festivals, and other pastimes of the people in India (1000-1526 A.D.)",Manik Chandra Prasad Shaw
"Irish Catholic sport, identity, and integration in Toronto, 1858-1920",Dennis P. Ryan
"TRANSNATIONAL AND COMPARATIVE RESEARCH IN SPORT: GLOBALISATION, GOVERNANCE AND SPORT POLICY","Henry, Ian P"
Vers l'an 2000,Canada. Groupe de travail sur la politique nationale du sport.
Mésothérapie et traumatologie sportive,Jacques LeCoz
Nutrition and the athlete,Joseph J. Morella
Mental imagery and expertise in swimming,Aoife Casby
The Red Smith reader,Red Smith
Sportpolitik an der Saar,Wolfgang Harres
Physical activity and legal liability,Dick Moriarty
"Proceedings, 6th Commonwealth Conference, Sport, Physical Education and Recreation, July 31-August 2, 1978, Edmonton, Alberta, Canada","Commonwealth Conference on Sport, Physical Education and Recreation (6th 1978 Edmonton, Alta.)"
Tu shuo ti yu jing ji shi,Zhongdan Chen
Serious fun,Robert Edelman
Juegos tradicionales y deportes autóctonos de Castilla y León,Juan Carlos Martín Nicolás
Noguchi Genzaburō ikōshū,Genzaburō Noguchi
Commercial sponsorship,John A. Meenaghan
Behind the superstars,Gerry Patterson
Sport et décolonisation,Evelyne Combeau-Mari
Sporting dystopias,No name
A dictionary of sports and scouting,Tarik Nasiri
Der Weg der Dritten Welt in die Olympische Bewegung,Hsiao-fei Liu
Zwischen deutscher Kulturtradition und zivilgesellschaftlichem Aufbruch,Hubert Dwertmann
Sport provision in schools in Grampian Region,David E.H Cox
Hokkaidō rikujō kyōgishi,Masao Sasaoka
The Cyclist's Touring Club,Stanley J. A. Cotterell
"Välis-Eesti spordielu, 1940-1991",Tiit Lääne
Parad spartyŭnaha maĭstėrstva,Dzmitryĭ Boldyraŭ
Usus al-ʻalāqāt al-ʻāmmah wa-al-majālāt al-riyāḍīyah wa-al-ijtimāʻīyah,Jalāl Muḥammad ʻAbd al-Wahhāb
Development of effective procedures for the assessment ofbody  mechanics in active sportspersons,A.W.S Watson
Nihon supōtsu bunka no genryū,Yūkō Kusaka
"1o. Encontro Nacional do SESI sobre Medicina Esportiva-Saude, 76",Encontro Nacional do SESI sobre Medicina Esportiva-Saude (1st 1976 Brazil)
ha- Degel ha-Tsiyoni me-ʻal ha-Bosforos,Daniyel Tsiper
A guide to jobs and qualifications in sport and recreation,John Potter
100 soruda Türkiye spor tarihi,Kurthan Fişek
Noble tennis,Tony Roth
Khed jagat dian batan,Sarwan Singh.
Sports,Canada. Canada. Minister's Task Force on Federal Sport Policy.
Corporate sponsorship,K.T Werner
Sports and society,Dennis Brailsford
A model to understand sport-confidence and sport competition anxiety of college varsity athletes,Seang Leol Yoo
Sports and active games,Ontario. Youth and Recreation Branch
Coping and affect in performance by youth swimmers,Kimberly Jane Isaak
Frauensport im Faschismus,Regina Landschoof
"Effect of hassles, stressful situations in basketball, state anxiety, trait anxiety and distractions on performance in basketball",Andrea Jill Blackwell
Supōtsu no gendaishi,Nobumasa Kawamoto
The impact of national leagues on Western Australian sport,Steve Simpson
Psikhologii︠a︡ obshchenii︠a︡ v sporte,I︠U︡. L. Khanin
Nos athlètes,Sylvie Jean
The first fifty years,Wilfred J. Foley
The carnivals,Brian Kino
Notational analysis of sport IV,"World Congress of Notational Analysis of Sport (4th 1998 Porto, Portugal)"
A sporting tour through the northern parts of England and great part of the Highlands of Scotland,Thomas Thornton
Archaies ellēnides athlētries,Anne C. Reese
Notational analysis of sport III,"World Congress of Notational Analysis of Sport (3rd 1996 Antalya, Turkey)"
Inuit-style wrestling,Michael K. Heine
Dene games,Michael K. Heine
Sports in Ukraine,Petro Rymarenko
The history of Hungarian sport,Corvina Kiadó
A report to the Social Exclusion Unit,Great Britain. Policy Action Team 10.
"Sopernichestvo, risk, samoobladanie v sporte",O. A. Chernikova
Bodyworks,Chris Liffen
Contemporary sport psychology,"World Congress in Sport Psychology (6th 1985 Copenhagen, Denmark)"
Proceedings of Sportswomen Step Forward Conference,"Sportswomen Step Forward (1991 Sydney, Australia)"
"Sports, virtues and vices",M. J. McNamee
"Research ethics in exercise, health and sport sciences",M. J. McNamee
Ultimate masculinities,Andrew Dale Thornton
Psychology of motor behavior and sport,North American Society for the Psychology of Sport and Physical Activity. Annual Conference
Zhongguo ti yu shi,Xifen Guo
Edinai︠a︡ vsesoi︠u︡znai︠a︡ sportivnai︠a︡ klassifikat︠s︡ii︠a︡ 1973-1976,Soviet Union. Komitet po fizicheskoĭ kulʹture i sportu
Lidé a hry,Věra Olivová
"Classification. Class G: Geography, anthropology, folklore, manners and customs recreation",Library of Congress. Subject Cataloging Division.
"Conference on Sports Injuries in Youth, Surveillance Strategies",Conference on Sports Injuries in Youth: Surveillance Strategies (1991 National Institutes of Health)
"Suicidal alcoholics, metrosexual family men and other heroes?",Mika Elovaara
Sport and American society,George H. Sage
The Olympic Games effect,John Davis
Ballet dancing,Kathryn Clay
The uses of sport,John Hughson
The wonder of motion,La Ferne Ellis Price
British rural sports,John Henry Walsh
Manual of British rural sports,John Henry Walsh
Supōtsu to geijutsu no shakaigaku,Shun Inoue
A comparative survey of sports information program in American colleges and universities,Frank Reysen
The State Office for Youth and Sports in Norway,Norway. State Office for Youth and Sports.
Erziehung und Sport in Korea im Kreuzgang fremder Kulturen und Mächte,Koo-Chul Jung
Fundamentos socio-culturales de la motricidad humana y el deporte,Angel Acuña Delgado
Toronto 2008 Olympic and Paralympic Games,Toronto 2008.
Zhongguo ti yu,Xiaozheng Xiong
Participation and excellence,City of Dublin Vocational Education Committee. Sports and Cultural Council.
All about ... Canadian sports,Barb McDermott
Le sport à la Martinique,Louis Boutrin
Atatürk ve spor,Cemal Tuzcuoğulları
The best Houston sports arguments,Jose de Jesus Ortiz
Children's perceptions of fun in organized youth sport settings,Amy T Harris
Sports history of St. Catharines,Frederick McNabb
Amending National Defense Act,United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on Military Affairs
The attitudes of Canadian Youth and coaches concerning fair play,Angus Reid Group
"Souvenir athletic program, monster track and field carnival",Emancipation Proclamation Commission of Pennsylvania. Athletic Committee
A British borderland,"Wilson, H. A."
Values and ethics in amateur sport,Marjorie Blackhurst
Future directions for performance related research in sports physiology,P. M. Jakeman
"A century to remember, 1893-1993",Helen Gurney
Brain of sport,Chris Rhys
The guide to careers in sports,Len Karlin
Game day,Thomas Boswell
Federal sports act of 1972,United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on Commerce
Sports Arbitration Board report,United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on Commerce
The dimensions of sport sociology,C.I.C. Symposium on the Sociology of Sport and Physical Activity (1978 University of Minnesota)
The future has begun,Brazilian Olympic Committee.
"Psychology of motor behavior and sport, 1979",NASPSPA (Organization)
Psychology of sport and motor behavior II,NASPSPA (Organization)
Hardiness and optimism as predictors of the frequency of flow athletes experience in sport,Nicole Christine Perritt
The impact of athletic participation on academic and career aspiration and achievement,Emil Bend
Vergleichende Studien zur Leistungsentwicklung von Spitzensportlern,Karl Feige
War games,Tony McCarthy
Powszechne dzieje wychowania fizycznego i sportu,Ryszard Wroczyński
An investigation of promotion strategies for marketing the athletic program at selected Division I colleges and universities,Mary C Kennedy
Eski Türk sporlarl üzerine araştirmalar,Halim Baki Kunter
Psychology of sport and motor behavior,Canadian Society for Psychomotor Learning and Sport Psychology. Conference
A hundred years of Trent Bridge,E. V. Lucas
Guide to free-loan sports films (16 mm),Daniel Sprecher
Attitude and/or conduct problems in church sports,David Michael Downing
Physical activity in middle-aged men,Arthur C Burgess
An assessment of sports information departments' policies and procedures concerning in-season football player media interviews in Division 1-A institutions,Jeffrey R Tarman
The development of a survey instrument to profile donors to athletics,Veronica A Hammersmith
Pitanie sportsmena,N. N. I︠A︡kovlev
Draft,Ontario. Ministry of Tourism and Recreation.
Women's rugby,Kendal Lee Broad
Sport club participation,Denise A Denomme
Ma jia jun diao cha,Yu Zhao
Fun and games with Alistair Cooke,Alistair Cooke
Sporting royals,Nicholas Courtney
Sprints and distances,L. Morrison
Sportsmaths,J.M Jodey
The international sporting trivia quiz book,James M. Riley
Olympics '92,Ann Griffiths
Sports quiz,Peter Eldin
Sports in American life,Frederick Warren Cozens
Medieval games,John Marshall Carter
"Some Sinhala combative, field and aquatic sports and games",Paulus Edward Pieries Deraniyagala
An analysis of school adjustment and extracurricular activities of lower achieving students,Erick L Cook
The Chicago Recreation Survey 1937,Chicago Recreation Commission [and] Northwestern University.
English sports and recreations,Lilly C Stone
The best of Milt Dunnell,Milt Dunnell
Settling the score,Mike North
OXFORD DICTIONARY OF SPORTS SCIENCE & MEDICINE,MICHAEL KENT
Derecho deportivo mexicano,Jalil Ascary del Carmen Clemente
Trends in sports sciences,"National Conference on Physical Education and Sport Sciences (3rd 1987 Kalyāṇī, India)"
Humour in sports,John Atkinson
Fizkulʹtura i sport v Blagoveshchenske,S. A. Kashuba
More than a game,Alf Van Hoose
La preparación psicológica del deportista,María Elisa Sánchez Acosta
The history of the Olympic Club,"Olympic Club (San Francisco, Calif.)"
The history and development of physical education and sports in the Philippines,Regino R. Ylanan
European integration and sport,European Association for Sociology of Sport. Conference
The cheer 'em on sports guide,Carol Cavanaugh
Arbitragem de futebol,Ademar Pedro Scheffler
"Bring your ""A"" game",Jennifer L. Etnier
Spalding's hand book of sporting rules and training,George H. Benedict
La patria del gol,Daniel Gómez Amat
Sport und Persönlichkeit,"Neumann, Otto"
Zhongguo da xue jing ji ti yu de fa zhan yan jiu,Haiyuan Liu
Honger naar de bal,Richard Krajicek
Dikt︠s︡ionar de terminʹ sportivʹ rus-moldovenesk,G. Grumeza
Lazer no espaço urbano,"Encontro Nacional de Recreação e Lazer (18th 2006 Curitiba, Brazil)"
"Sport, lélek, egészség",Bettina Pikó
BODY AND MIND: SPORT IN EUROPE FROM THE ROMAN EMPIRE TO THE RENAISSANCE,JOHN MCCLELLAND
Kalter Krieg auf der Aschenbahn: der deutsch-deutsche Sport 1950 - 1972; eine politische Geschichte,Uta A Balbier
"BOXING, MASCULINITY AND IDENTITY: THE 'I' OF THE TIGER",KATH WOODWARD
Die strafrechtliche Relevanz von Sportverletzungen,Lutz Hähle
The skate boarding field manual,Ryan Stutt
Head case,Sam T. Chambers
El deporte en la construcción del espacio social,Álvaro Rodríguez Díaz
Le sport et les hommes,Roland Barthes
Ahead of the game,Ken Ungar
More than a coach,David Lee Morgan
Opportunities for recreation in Greater Boston,United States. Works Progress Administration. National Youth Administration. Vocational Counseling Project. Massachusetts.
Kŭnse Hanʼguk sŭpʻochʻŭ yŏnpʻyo,Tʻae-sin Yi
"Mathematics in games, sports, and gambling",Roxanne Jean Gould
Onward Christian athletes,Tom Krattenmaker
Min zu chuan tong ti yu fa zhan lun ji,"Er shi yi shi ji min zu chuan tong ti yu fa zhan guo ji xue shu yan tao  hui (2005 Xiamen Shi, China)"
Segye 4-kang e orŭdŏn nal,Chip Kim
Chʻamyŏ chŏngbu munhwa kwanʼgwang chŏngchʻaek paeksŏ,Korea (South). Munhwa Kwanʼgwangbu.
Glory beyond the sport,National Wrestling Hall of Fame & Museum.
Die Sportförderung,Sozialdemokratische Partei Deutschlands.
Turnvater Jahn und die deutschen Turnfeste,Oliver Ohmann
Bear with me,Patrick McCaskey
"Die entlarvten falschen Spieler, oder, Beleuchtung aller derjenigen Betrügereien",I. B. Montag
Ueber die kleine Jagd zum Gebrauch angehender Jagdliebhaber: 1-2 Theil,Friedrich Ernst Jester
Mental toughness,Michael Sheard
You'll be a man if you play rugby,Graeme W. Ferguson
Gymnastics,Catherine Vietch
Sports competitions for adults over 40,Thomas A. Jones
Oltre il limite,Raffaella Ferrero Camoletto
"""El deporte federado a debate""","Congreso de Federaciones Deportivas Españolas (1st 2005 Madrid, Spain)"
Swines a la nostalgia,Elio Menéndez
All you can be,Curtis Granderson
Sŭpʻochʻŭ sanŏp chŏnmun illyŏk yangsŏng saŏp kyogwa kwajŏng kaesŏn,Ŭi-dong Yu
Saenghwal chʻeyuk tongyŏngsang pʻŭrogŭraem kaebal chŏllyak mit intʻŏnet hongbo pangan,Yang-nye Kim
Kukka taepʻyo sŏnsuyong simni kŏmsaji kyujun (Norm) kaebal,Pyŏng-hyŏn Kim
The best Wisconsin sports arguments,Andy Kendeigh
Sport en mededingingsrecht,Marjan Olfers
al-Alʻāb wa-al-riyāḍāt al-shaʻbīyah,ʻAlī Yaḥyá Manṣūrī
Zhongguo chuan tong ti yu,Guochao Feng
Sŭpʻochʻŭ Kʻoria pʻantʻaji,Hŭi-jun Chŏng
Vzaimodeĭstvie storon v upravlenii regionalʹnoĭ sistemoĭ fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta,V. V. Novokreshchenov
Fat guys shouldn't be dancin' at halftime,Chet Coppock
Idrott och lek,Johan Götlind
Honderd jaar sport,M. J. Adriani Engles
Terapia para el emperador,Manuel Llórens
Aḥkām al-musābaqāt fī al-sharīʻah al-Islāmīyah wa-taṭbīqātuh al-muʻāṣirah,ʻAbd al-Ṣamad ibn Muḥammad Balḥājjī
Slaying the dragon,Michael Johnson
Les obstacles linguistiques à l'accès au sport de haut niveau,Mira Svoboda
Anomalies anatomiques et pathologie sportive,"Journée de traumatologie du sport de la Pitié-Salpêtière (22e 2004 Paris, France)"
"Women, sport &performance",Christine L. Wells
Sports logo guide,John M. Fulgaro
Sport psychology,"Lavallee, David PhD."
La crónica taurina actual,María Celia Forneas
Jin dai Zhongguo nü zi de yun dong tu xiang,Jianming . You
Mathematics and sports,L. E. Sadovskiĭ
"Adolescentes, adolescents en pratiques sportives",Jaoued Bouslimi
al- Riyāḍah wa-al-shabāb fī ʻashr sanawāt,Ḥasan ʻImād
Lasst eure Verse teilnehmen am Sportfest,Johannes Robert Becher
Sport: the way ahead: the report of the Minister's Task Force on Federal Sport Policy,Canada. Health and Welfare Canada. Minister's Task Force on Federal Sport Policy.
Sport: the way ahead: an overview of the Task Force report,Canada. Health and Welfare Canada. Minister's Task Force on Federal Sport Policy.
BLACK AND ASIAN ATHLETES IN BRITISH SPORT AND SOCIETY: A SPORTING CHANCE?,PATRICK ISMOND
Hanʼguk sŭpʻochʻŭ-pŏp immun,Sŭng-jae Chŏng
"In the matter of an investigation under Section 46 of the Police Act R.S.C. 1950, Chapter 279, as to the arrest and detention of Robert Wright and Michael Griffin",Ontario. Inquiry into the Arrest and Detention of Robert Wright and Michael Griffin.
"Play healthy, stay healthy",Gary N. Guten
Lexique de Sport Canada,Elizabeth Fragua
Proceedings of XXII International Symposium of Biomechanics in Sports,"International Symposium of Biomechanics in Sports (22nd 2004 Ottawa, Ont.)"
Vers une médecine de l'homme en mouvement,Henri Périé
Dictionnaire encyclopédique de pédiatrie en médecine du sport,P. Pilardeau
La hanche du sportif,Ch Mansat
Sports en formes,"Journée d'études ""L'institutionnalisation du sport"" (2000 Neuchâtel, Suisse)"
Jeunesse & sports,Michel Héluwaert
An introduction tohuman movement,Charles H Shea
Mouvements & cerveau,Christian Collet
Les territoires de l'excellence sportive,Marina Honta
Sport und prozessunabhängige Qualifikationsmerkmale,Siegfried Meyer
Jugend und Freizeitsport,Hans-Gert Artus
The bald truth,David Falk
Youth sport in Ireland,Seán Connor
"YOUTH SPORT IN IRELAND: THE SPORTING, LEISURE AND LIFESTYLE PATTERNS OF IRISH ADOLESCENTS",SEAN CONNOR
"BEGINNINGS OF A COMMERCIAL SPORTING CULTURE IN BRITAIN, 1793-1850",ADRIAN HARVEY
Waqāʾiʻ al-Muʾtamar al-Riyāḍī al-ʻIlmī al-Thālith,"Muʾtamar al-Riyāḍī al-ʻIlmī (3rd 1996 Amman, Jordan)"
Sportul Românesc de-a lungul anilor,Emil Ghibu
Sport participation in Canada,Canada. Canadian Heritage. Sport Canada.
"Sport, Kritik und Eigensinn",Sven Güldenpfennig
Supōtsu rinri o tou,Hidenori Tomozoe
Looking inside sports aerodynamics,Ron Schultz
A wilderness of spite,John Cheffers
Leistungssport als Denkmodell,Karl Adam
Leistungssport,Karl Adam
Den institutionaliserade tävlingsidrotten,Paul Sjöblom
Guinness book of sports facts,Stan Greenberg
Out of bounds,Tom McMillen
Supōtsu shakaigaku,Sadao Morikawa
"Jeux, gymnastique et sports dans le Var, 1860-1940",Jean-Claude Gaugain
Sport und sozialer Wandel =,"ISHPES Congress (5th 1998 Sunny Beach, Bulgaria)"
Les politiques sportives en France,Jean-Paul Callède
"Manuel pour la formation et l'usage du Répertoire bibliographique universel de la locomotion et des sports (tourisme, cyclisme et automobilsme) établi d'aprés la classification bibliographique décimale",International Federation for Documentation.
Time management,Lesley Cramman
Gürbüz ve yavuz evlatlar,Yiğit Akın
Les cultures sportives,Christain Pociello
Sport colonial,André Jean Benoit
Biomechanics of sport,Thomas P Martin
Culture Statistics,"Statistics Canada. Travel, Tourism and Recreation Section"
Portrait of an athlete,Brice Durbin
How you play the game,"International Conference on Sports and Human Rights (1st 1999 Sydney, Australia)"
"Recreational activities, 1976","Canada. Statistics Canada. Education, Science and Culture Division. Travel, Tourism and Recreation Section."
A sociology of sport,Howard L. Nixon
Supōtsu bunka no datsukōchiku,Masahiro Inagaki
Environmental effects on work performance,Pan American Congress on Sports Medicine 5th University of Manitoba 1967.
Innovation and application of physical education and sports science in the new millennium,International Conference for Physical Educators (2000 Hong Kong)
Toronto as host to the 100th anniversary Olympics,"Cresap, McCormick and Paget/Barnard"
"With gun, rifle and bow",James Douglas
Sportphotographie 1860-1960,Jean Lattes
Taiiku supōtsushi =,Tsukiko Tanimoto
"Les sports et les jeux, le zoo, le cirque",Constance Legentil
"The perceptions of the FAI, GAA, IRFU, and their respective games among Dublin males",Donall O'Keeffe
50 años de olimpismo,Joaquín Martínez-Rousset
La gestion mentale du stress,Édith Perreaut-Pierre
A competitive anxiety review,Stephen D. Mellalieu
Foods nutrition and sports performance,"Consensus Conference on Foods, Nutrition and Sports Performance (1991 Feb. 4-6 Lausanne)."
"Proceedings of the 2nd annual meeting of the Canadian Society for Exercise Physiology (Société canadienne de physiologié de l'exercice) at  Hamilton, Ontario, Canada, October 26-29, 1994",Canadian Society for Exercise Physiology.
"Proceedings of the 3rd annual Meeting of the Canadian Society for Exercise Physiology, Société Canadienne de Physiologie de l'Exercice",Canadian Society for Exercise Physiology. Meeting
"L' enseignement des activités physiques, sportives et artistiques",Raphaël Leca
Osmanlı devleti'nde spor,Âtıf Kahraman
The encyclopedia of sports,Frank G. Menke
Les bienfaits du sport,Christophe Delong
Proceedings of the second Canadian Symposium on the History of Sport and Physical Education,Canadian Symposium on the History of Sport and Physical Education (2nd 1972 University of Windsor)
Linguistic barriers to access to high performance sport,Mira Svoboda
Sin egen hälsas smed,Hans Bolling
A sporting life,Waddy Wadsworth
Les grands thèmes de la sociologie du sport,G. Dominique Baillet
El deporte a la luz de la verdad moral,Esteban Orriols Marqués
The design and implementation of an eclectic process model to evaluate the Level-one Theory Course of the National Coaching Certification Program,Matthew John Robillard
Marshall's Games Depot and Toy Emporium,Marshall's Games Depot and Toy Emporium.
Report of the Core Sport Commissioner,Canada. Core Sport Commission.
Le parler du Stade Vélodrome,Jacques-Gérard Bouis
The communication effects of positioning brands with sporting events,Stephen Ray McDaniel
Strategic insights into sport sponsorship,Timothy Berret
Sport sponsorship in Canada,Robert P. Copeland
L' Union européenne et le sport,"Commission européenne. Direction générale information, communication, culture, audiovisuel."
Scientific basis of athletic conditioning,Clayne R. Jensen
Sponsorship in sport,Brian T. O'Donoghue
The evolution and exploitation of sponsorship,Martin G. Crowley
Sports spectatorship,Sea n. De Bu rca
Sports facts,Norman Barrett
Sot︠s︡ial'no-ėkonomicheskie problemy fizicheskoĭ kul'tury i sporta,B. S. Kuz'mak
"British and American sporting authors, their writings and biographies",Alexander Henry Higginson
Polskie wspo??czesne s?ownictwo sportowe,Jan Ożdżyński
The summer solstice games,J. Goulstone
Mongolyn U̇ndėsniĭ Olimpiĭn Khoroony taĭlan,"Mongolyn U̇ndėsniĭ Olimpiĭn Khoroo (Ulaanbaatar, Mongolia)"
Athletic injuries with primary and home treatments,Cliff Bould
Osnovy kachestvennogo biomekhanicheskogo analiza,V. B. Korenberg
Sign up for sport,North West Council for Sport and Recreation.
Irish sponsorship,Brian T. O'Donoghue
Biomechanical assessment of the elite athlete,R. M. Bartlett
In pine-tree jungles,Bangor and Aroostook Railroad Company.
Nuut︠s︡ naadam,Choĭzhilyn Damdindorzh
The effect of a mental skills training program on the confidence and performance of intercollegiate volleyball players,Dean Snider
Sport as a functional equivalent of religion,Brian Gerard Milton
A procedural model for sport development in Nigeria,S. Okoli Umedum
The sports studies reader,Alan Tomlinson
Fishing in the city,Gary Edwards
Sports geography,John Bale
A study of the effects of concentrated versus repetitive shooting practice on free throw performance,Michelle Renae Bruns
Cognitive practice and motor skill performance,Jeffrey Paul Neubauer
Elite athletes in flow,Susan A. Jackson
A comparative study of personality traits and profiles among five junior high school athletic groups,Robert Logan Putnam
The second cooperative sports & games book,Terry Orlick
Términos deportivos en el habla cotidiana,Jesús Castañón Rodríguez
Traumatologie du sport en pratique médicale courante,Jean Genety
L' imporatance économique du sport,Jean-Paul Minquet
Food and fluid related aspects in highly trained athletes,"Brouns, Fredericus Johannes Petrus Henricus"
Fifty years of battle,Jim Hagen
Zainichi wa naze supōtsu ni tsuyoi no ka,Hŭi-bong Kang
Chorwackie słownictwo sportowe,Robert Bońkowski
"Polski ruch sportowy w Republice Litewskiej, 1919 -1940",Andrzej Gąsiorowski
Magica agonistica,Jan Tremel
Mustang tales,Helen Luckman
Fachtextsorten kontrastiv,Eva Cassandra Trumpp
The Effects of participation in selected risk college physical education casses on a student's self concept,Carole Ann Shawver
B urgerlicher Sport in der DDR und Polen: 1945 - 1989,Dorota Winiarska
Bürgerlicher Sport in der DDR und Polen,Dorota Winiarska
Analyse der politischen Netzwerke und politischen Strategie im Bereich des Breitensports in der Deutschen Demokratischen Republik,Chung-ho Park
Penkiasde*simt sportinės veiklos met*u i*seivijoje =,S. Kra*sauskas
Programmirovanoe obuchenie i sport,S. V. Malinovskiĭ
"Modern physical education, knowledge and understanding",Gerald James Hase
Spezialwörterbuch für Sport und Spiel,Horst Axtmann
"Welt der Spiele : politische, soziale und pädagogische Aspekte =","ISHPES Congress (2nd 1993 Berlin, Germany)"
Spiele der Welt--Welt der Spiele,"ISHPES Congress (2nd 1993 Berlin, Germany)"
Çağlarboyu Türkler'de spor,Doğan Yıldız
Československo země sportu,Rudolf Dušek
Siegertypen,Christine Walther
Principes d'anatomie et de physiologie,Benôit Léon Roblot
Einstellungen von ostdeutschen Jugendlichen im Kontext des Gesellschaftsbereiches Sport,Iris Gerloff
"Sport, leisure and ergonomics","International Conference on Sport, Leisure and Ergonomics (3rd 1995 The Wirral, England)"
Le sport,Canada. Condition physique et sport amateur.
Traumatologie et rééducation en médecine du sport,Gérard Abeillon
Fair-play et esprit sportif au Canada,Léo Paul Bordeleau
L' image de l'athlète d'Homère à la fin du Ve siècle avant J.-C,Valérie Visa-Ondarçuhu
Contemporary psychology of sport,"International Congress of Sport Psychology (2d 1968 Washington, D.C.)"
Le sport sans risques,C. Got
Les trois enjeux du sport français,Nelson Paillou
Traumatologie sportive,Jean Bénassy
Natürlichkeit und Künstlichkeit,Deutsche Vereinigung für Sportwissenschaft. Sektion Sportphilosophie. Tagung
A history of women's sport in Canada prior to World War I,Margaret Ann Hall
Sports policy of India,S. R. Sharma
L' enseignement sportif son animation et sa réglementation,Jacques Mignot
Motivation in sport,Kongress Für Leibeserziehung
The sport marketing encyclopedia,David G. Wilkinson
Hanʼguk kŭndae chʻeyuksa yŏnʼgu,Hang-nae Yi
Pukhan chʻeyuk charyojip,Hang-nae Yi
Pukhan ŭi chʻeyuk,Hang-nae Yi
Hanʾguk chʻeyuksa yŏnʾgu,Hang-nae Yi
"Consolidation through integration, health, physical education, recreation, sport","ACHPER. (13th 1981 Melbourne, Vic.)"
Bizepsaristokraten: Sport als Thema der essayistischen Literatur zwischen 1880 und 1930,Hanns-Marcus M uller
Blaski i cienie długiego życia,Janusz Regulski
The Event Management and Marketing Institute,David G. Wilkinson
Wettkampf- und Übungsstätten in Griechenland,Willy Zschietzschmann
Sportökologie,Fritz Seewald
Traumatologie du sport en pratique médicale courante,Jean Genéty
"Ukrainsʹkyĭ sportovyĭ kli︠u︡b ""Dovbush""-Chernivtsi, ta ukrainsʹkyĭ sport na Bukovyni, 1920-1940",Wolodymyr Karpowycz
The engineering of sport,"International Conference on the Engineering of Sport (2nd 1998 Sheffield, England)"
Traumatologie sportive et ludique de l'enfant,Jacques Gaubert
Kkŭt ŏmnŭn ŏndŏk,Kwan-sik Min
Folklig idrott,Maximilian Stejskal
The physiological effects of exercise programs on adults,Thomas Kirk Cureton
Leistungssport und Biographie,Anke Delow
Shao shu min zu chuan tong ti yu wen hua yan jiu =,Zhongjun Yao
Modern principles of athletic training,Carl Ernest Klafs
Éclipse et renaissance des jeux populaires,Jean-Jacques Barreau
La psicología deportiva en España,José Roig Ibáñez
Sport and the Australian Greek,Steve Georgakis
The ancient Olympiads,James M. Lynch
"Current issues in: sports law, music law, motion picture & television law, funding for arts and entertainment",American Bar Association. Forum on the Entertainment and Sports Industries. Meeting
Duaḥ ha-Kenes ha-artsi ha-sheni li-psikhologyah ule-sotsyologyah shel ha-sporṭ ṿeha-ḥinukh ha-gufani,Kenes ha-artsi li-psikhologyah ule-sotsyologyah shel ha-sporṭ ṿeha-ḥinukh ha-gufani. (2nd 1985 Mekhon Ṿingeṭ le-ḥinukh gufani ụli-sporṭ)
Sport als Institution,Norbert Pösl
Die Tennisfachsprache deutsch-schwedisch im kontrastiven Vergleich,Petra Wenghoffer
Fair sport,A. W. Leveridge
Beijing Ao yun da shang ji =,Chang Wang
Dokumente zur Gründung und zum Aufbau einer wissenschaftlichen Hochschule auf dem Gebiete des Sports,Carl-Diem-Institut
Sport activity and cardiovascular diseases,"European Society of Cardiology. Working Group on Exercise Physiology, Physiopathology and Electrocardiography. International Symposium"
Think sports,Kenneth Swan
Entwicklungszusammenarbeit und Breitensport,Michael Bauer
El valor humano y cristiano del deporte según del magisterio pontificio,Luis Alberto Duque Salas
The Soviet road to Olympus,"Shneidman, Noah Norman"
"Jeux, sports et divertissements des rois de France","Carré, Henri"
Northeastern Ontario sport resource directory,Northeastern Ontario Regional Sports Committee.
Zhongguo gu dai ti yu wen hua shi,Xiangdong Yang
Down the stretch,William Abraham Hewitt
Le sport et l'activité physique et les services en français,Conseil des affaires franco-ontariennes.
The National Sports of Great Britain: Fifty Engravings with Descriptions,Henry Thomas Alken
"Manual of British Rural Sports: Comprising Shooting, Hunting, Coursing ..",John Henry Walsh
Sport et psychologie,Marc Leveque
La conquête du sport,Donald Guay
Silberpfeil und Hakenkreuz: Autorennsport im Nationalsozialismus,Uwe Day
Marketing the sports organisation,Alain Ferrand
Athletes All,Walter Camp
Les revendications des organismes franco-ontariens en matière d'activités physiques et sportives face au gouvernement ontarien,Christine Dallaire
Fitness for the average man,Adolphe Abrahams
Guide de préparation au brevet d'état d'éducateur sportif 1er degré,José Caja
"Sport, entraînement et régulation hormonale",Charles-Yannick Guezennec
Türklerde spor,Kâmil Kepecioğlu
"Le jeu, la balle et nous",Jean Arramendy
Faites du sport sans risque,Christian Daulouède
"Lo sport e la ""Grande Guerra""",Sergio Giuntini
Anthologie de la littérature du sport,H. Le Targat
Sepettopu terimleri sözlüǧü,Cem Atabeyoǧlu
Using statistics in sport and exercise science research,Joanne L. Fallowfield
"""Private Eye's"" Colemanballs (Private Eye)",Ian Hislop
Ji ti you xi,Ru Zhang
Sponsorship,Nick Tale
The encyclopedia of sports,Frank Grant Menke
Actes =,"Scientific Congress of International Association for Sports Information (10th 1997 Paris, France)"
O desporto e as estruturas sociais,José Esteves
Sport en recht,Belgium.
Maritime sport stars on parade,Alex Nickerson
al- Ḥarakah al-riyādīyah al-Filasṭīnīyah fī al-shatāt,Khālid ʻAjjāwī
Utilitarismus und Sportethik,Claudia Pawlenka
"Idrott, borgerlig folkfostran och frihet",Rolf Haslum
"Rapport final : sport, solidarité et coopération internationale =","Euromediterranean Forum (1994 Padua, Venice)"
Le sport est-il bon pour la santé?,Stéphane Cascua
The games they played,D. A. Noverr
Le sport au Canada,Canada. Parlement. Chambre des communes. Sous-comité de l'étude du sport au Canada.
"The stronger women get, the more men love football",Mariah Burton
Nihon supotsu hyakunen no ayumi,Nihon Taiiku Gakkai. Taiikushi Semmon Bunkakai
Statement of strategy 1998-2001,"Ireland. Department of Tourism, Sport and Recreation."
Comparative analysis of the factors contributing to olympic success,Ming-chʻang Hsü
Hockey,Ray McClellan
Sportanglizismen im modernen Französisch,Karlheinz Becker
Great save!,Rob Childs
The search for sporting excellence,Richard J. Fischer
Organizational and financial responses to changing policy for physical education in a university community,Mohamed Mokhtar Serag El-Din
L'éducation en France,André G. Delion
Xut!  (1922-1936),Lluis Solà i Dachs
The Canadian book of games and other activities,Gordon Brandreth
Yun dong da guan,Shuqing Yang
Vāzhgān-i jāmiʻ-i varzishī,ʻAlā al-Dīn Pāzārgadī
Sports talk,Lisa Beckelhimer
CPI do futebol,Alvaro Dias
"V world congress on sport for all, Uruguay '94, March 10th - 13th 1994, Punta del Este, Uruguay","World Congress on Sport for All (5th 1994 Punta del Este, Uruguay)"
Innovations in Sport Psychology,World Congress of Sport Psychology (9th 1997 Israel)
Termau chwaraeon ac adloniant,Wales. University. School of Education
INTRODUCTION TO SPORTS BIOMECHANICS,ROGER xzo BARTLETT
Trends in sports participation,ASH Partnership.
Taxation and sport,Richard Baldwin
Sports participation in Scotland (1987-1989),ASH Partnership.
An analysis of the positivistic and naturalistic paradigms for inquiry,Kimberley Ann Klint
Cougars of any color,Katherine E. Lopez
Deviance and social control in sport,Michael Atkinson
Sustainable sport management,David Chernushenko
"Trends in women's sports as reported in the Portland Oregonian (Portland, Oregon) 1850-1900 ..",Alice Elizabeth Roose
Dressage,Penny Dowdy
Xtreme athletes,Kerrily Sapet
"The function of the tavern in Toronto 1834 to 1875, with special reference to sport",Howard Angus Christie
Tennis,Anne Wendorff
Soccer,Anne Wendorff
Uṣūl al-laʻib wa-al-tarwīḥ wa-al-riyāḍah fī al-mujtamaʻ al-Islāmī,ʻAdnān ibn Darwīsh Jallūn
How do people play?,A. Lukacsy
A game of polo with a headless goat,Emma Levine
A step-by-step guide to SPSS for sport and exercise studies,Nikos Ntoumanis
Australian sport psychology,National Sport Psychology Conference (1st 1983 Australian National University)
Why can't I play?,David Cameron Lougheed
"Sport as symbol, symbols in sport",ISHPES Congress (3rd 1995 Cape Town)
Let's talk basketball,Laura Friedman
Shaun White,Mike Kennedy
Socio-cultural foundations of physical education & educational sport,Earle F Zeigler
Catalogue of old English sporting plates in color,M. Knoedler & Co.
"Crossing sidelines, crossing cultures",Joel S Franks
Physical fitness and its laboratory assessment,"Conference on Laboratory Assessment of Physical Fitness, Charles University 1968"
Zur Sportentwicklung in Südkorea,Hyeong-Seok Song
Sport management,Robert N Lussier
Essentials of sports law,Glenn M Wong
Taehan Chʻeyukhoe sa,Taehan Chʻeyukhoe.
Notational analysis of sport I & II,"World Congress of Notational Analysis of Sport (1st 1992 Merseyside, England)"
Culture statistics,"Statistics Canada. Travel, Tourism and Recreation Section."
Kreislauffunktion beim Sportler,Klaus Werner Schneider
Readings in sports psychology,Harold Thomas Anthony Whiting
Contemporary psychology of sport,"International Congress of Sport Psychology, 2d, Washington, D.C. 1968"
Finance for sport and leisure managers,Robert Wilson
Conférence mondiale sur le sport et l'environnement,"Conférence mondiale sur le sport et l'environnement (1995 Lausanne, Switzerland)"
Basketball injuries and treatment,Frank H. Bassett
The engineering of sport,"International Conference on the Engineering of Sport (1st 1996 Sheffield, England)"
Íslenzkir afreksmenn á leikvangi og í threkraunum daglegs lífs frá landnámsöld til 1911,Gunnar M. Magnúss
Al- Riyāḍah al-badanīyah 'inda al-'Arab,Muḥammad Kāmil 'Alawī
Las grandes hazañas del deporte,Alejandro Marti
Actes du IVe Congrès de psychologie du sport =,"International Congress on Sport Psychology (4th 1987 Brussels, Belgium)"
"Legal liability in recreation, sports, and tourism",Bruce Hronek
Nutrición y dietetica deportiva en Colombia,Cecilia Malagón de García
Sociology of sport,Paul Redekop
American sports (1785-1835),Jennie Holliman
Comparative physical education and sport,International Seminar on Comparative Physical Education and Sport (5th 1986 University of British Columbia)
"Les communistes et le sport à l'heure de Munich [par] Paul Laurent, Robert Barran [et] Jean-Jacques Faure",Pol Eugène
An introduction to sports physiology,Martin A. Farrally
Lactate threshold training,Peter G. J. M. Janssen
A century of Boston sports,Dick Johnson
Meaning found in the acts of surfing and skiing,Roselyn Elizabeth Stone
A phenomenological analysis of the other in sport,Robert Scott Kretchmar
Proceedings World Summit on Physical Education,"World Summit on Physical Education (1999 Berlin, Germany)"
Beyond the Pitch,Shamberger
Guncrank Diaries HC,John Connor
Historia del deporte en Tucumán,Luis Armando Benejam
Houston by Morning,Fran Harris
DIY Guns Home Gunsmithing Projects #30,Tom McHale
Motorcycle Streamliner,Denis Manning
Mi Temporada de Baloncesto,Karleen Tauszik
Summary of Fergus White's Ascent into Hell,Irb Media
The Book of Lucha : Lucha Legends Series No. 5,"Paul Barile, César Ayala Delgado"
Canu clod y campau,Lowri Roberts
Sports coaching and learning,Neil D. Fleming
Ti yu jing ji xue,"Yufeng Zhang, Yue Wang"
Grand Slam for God,Burke Masters
Apprendre la photo de sport,Denis Brodeur
Amazing Sports from Around the World (Vietnamese-English),"Douglas McLaughlin, Michelle Griffis, Bùi Hung"
"Backcountry Ski Map, Cameron Pass, CO",Rodney Ley
How's Your Mental?,Jordan Tolbert
Mi Temporada Como Animadora,Karleen Tauszik
Mi Temporada de Fútbol,Karleen Tauszik
Dream Season Paperback,Fran Harris
Thrive,Juan Pablo Quiñonez
Climb Maryland Volume I,Mark Kochte
Sport Literate,Pint Size Publications
Summary of Booker T. Washington's up from Slavery,Irb Media
Sports Betting down to the Bones - Beginner's Guide,Vangela LLC
8 Week Amateur to Ace Volleyball Program,"Avery Tronson, Emily Tronson"
Ti yu zhi shi bo lan,Bohan Liu
Motocross the Golden Era,David Dewhurst
"Backcountry Ski Map, East Side, Washington",Matt Schonwald
Never Never Quit/Laminated Edition,Mike Shields
From Confused Soccer Parent to Confident Coach,Paul O'Haver
"RV Travel Journal & Camping Notebook, RV There Yet",Enchanted Willow
How to Hit... . . Really Hard,Russell Stutely
Recreation,Julian Rowe
Sports,Julian Rowe
Guide des raids de sports nature,Claude Abitbol
Horse Welfare,"Hall, Christopher, Roly Owers"
Athletes,Kyle Carter
Book of NRL Lists,"Nick Tedeschi, Will Evans"
Store norske sportsbragder i 1000 år,Knut Bjørnsen
Sport Enterprise,Chrystal Denmark Porter
Jake kicks a goal,Annette Smith
Energy of an Athlete,J. K. Dickinson
Et si on arrêtait de se mentir,Erwann Menthéour
Sporting Heroes,Jason Hook
Amazing Sports from Around the World (Farsi-English),"Douglas McLaughlin, Michelle Griffis, Farimah Youssefirad"
Around & about Mount Hood 4th Edition,"Sonia Buist, Anne Ashford, Bill Vollmer, Paul Erdman"
Bahamian Rhapsody,"Ian Douglass, Steve Keirn, Kevin Sullivan"
True Grit,Rick Thompson
Story of Shelter Harbor Golf Club,"George Peper, Legendary Publishing & Media Group"
Grommet Goes Blogging,Bennett Evans
Spirited,Carlie Hardy
Diving Report,"Enrique Quevedo, Johnny Acton"
My Life on and off the Diamond,"Bradford Riddle, Traci Draper"
Classic Speedway Venues - Updated Edition : Past and P,Phillip Dalling
Confessions of a Long-Distance Sailor,Paul Lutus
Harmincnégy év a testnevelés és a sport szolgálatában,"Balázs, Pál"
Beginner Shooter's Log,Nikkita Gordon
Scrapbooking Sports,"Kerry Arquette, Andrea Zocchi"
Le guide complet du judo,Louis Arpin
Summary of John Volanthen's Thirteen Lessons That Saved Thirteen Lives,Irb Media
Sport and leisure provision for the township of Ikageng,Gert J. L. Scholtz
Safe practice in physical education and school sport,"Peter Whitlam, Glen Beaumont"
Journey to Our Unknown,Curt Krull
Sports Betting down to the Bones,Manuel Angela
Jessie Kresa Is ODB,"Kenny Casanova, Jessie Kresa"
Epic Drama,"Dwight Knowlton, Bill Pack, Lionel Ferreira, Lyn St. James, Jason Vansickle"
VICTOR McLAGLEN MOTOR CORPS MEMBERS,"Ruth Fisher, Jacqueline Neill Heck"
Football Crosswords,T. R. Grady
Patriot Way,Craig Sesker
Protective devices for sports & work,Mary R. Bartone
"Camping Journal & RV Travel Logbook, Red Vintage Camper",Enchanted Willow
John Taffin's Book of the . 45 Caliber,John Taffin
Técnicas de Luxación de Piernas,Jose F. Cuspinera Navarro
Football Superstar,"Yetta Yvette, Danielle Johnston"
Clearing the Ice Trilogy,Robyn M. Ryan
"Ants, Dust and Flies in my Coffee...",Andrew Hooker
Shape of Space,"Robin Crane, Malcolm Dixon"
NOW HEAR THIS! All Hands Pass the Word!,Jesse W. Thompson
Puck Heaven,Jim Hoey
Junior Bounous and the Joys of Skiing,Ayja Bounous
Dans l'œil d'un coach,Dany Dubé
"Backcountry Skiing Rocky Mountain National Park, CO",Michael Soucy
"Why Not, Coach?",Gregory Ryan
"Pirates, Soldiers & Fat Little Girlfriends","Burton, Alan"
Sports matters,Michael McGuffee
"Leaves on the Wind, Volume VI",Christopher Dow
Mets Triviology,Christopher Walsh
Weekend in the Saddle,Daniel Williams
"Camping Journal & RV Travel Logbook, Blue Vintage Camper",Enchanted Willow
Hometown Heroes,Jim O'Brien
Science & medicine of sports,"Bartone, John C."
How God Prepared and Inspired Me to Be a Writer Nd Author,Herbert K. Naito
Mascots in Baseball : 2nd Edition,Norm Coleman
ABU Legacy,Wayne Real
Undefeated Athlete,Michael McCree
Jim Pollard,Dolph Grundman
Sports-Based Youth Development,"Youth Development Staff, Daniel F. Perkins, Suzanne Le Menestrel"
Way of the Master Teacher,"Mizu Tama Dojo, Karma Palden Sherab"
Introducing Cutter America's Unfiltered Caddie,Steve Burke
Last First Kiss,Ava Lohan
Kiwi Bikers,Ken Downie
Emergency Companion,Jon Winge
Football College Recruiting Measurements,Selwyn G. Roberts
Basketball Crosswords,T. R. Grady
Sun Road Training Journal,Carla Jojola
When Heads Come Together,David Smith
Best Buena Vista and Salida Hikes,Penelope Purdy
My First Game Day,Willie Wood
Mental Conditioning Playbook for Athletes,Sam Nott
Sollevamento Pesi e Allenamento Della Forza,Tina A. Cooper
Imaging of sports injuries,Thomas H. Berquist
Worksheets for Volleyball Coaches,Total Sports
On Skating,"Gerhard Ulrich Anton Vieth, B. A. Thurber"
Paid,Paul Gonnella
My Track and Field Planner/Journal,Alexandria Gibson
Always a Pleasure,Chuck Swirsky
Are you ready?,Fred Kroner
From Banks to blow-ups,John M. O'Donnell
Sports Dream,Qiava Martinez
Pocket dictionary of sport,n/a
Bow Valley Rock,"Chris Perry, Joe Josephson"
Wildest Sport of All,Prakash Singh
50 classic cycle climbs,James Allen
Bad Days in Sport,Jon Marthaler
Sportswear,Alison Hawes
Words of Wisdom,"Thomas, Joe, Sr."
Words of Wisdom III Edition,"Thomas, Joe, Sr."
101 ways to tell if you're a real Buckeye!,Susan Stanton
Your personal trainer,"Kathy Fulcher, Patrick Fox"
"Legal aspects of waivers in sport, recreation & fitness activities",Doyice Cotten
La gestion du risque dans le sport,"François, Pierre inspecteur général honoraire, Laurence Munoz"
Ohio State football,Robert J. Roman
De la hanche aux doigts de pieds,Myles J. Schneider
Tales of a Blue Water Cruiser,"Williams, J. R."
Sports Pharmacy,"David Gregory, Erin Holmes, Shannon Singletary, Marvin Wilson"
"Our Amplified Earth, Episode 8, Customer Buttcheeks, Act I",Patrick Francis Waters
Sprinting into history,Delano Franklyn
Designing curriculum and learning,Vincent Melograno
Mental skills,"C. Sellars, National Coaching Foundation"
Wonder boy,Lawrence Knorr
Curses! Why Cleveland Sports Fans Deserve to Be Miserable,Tim Long
Cleveland Sports Trivia Quizbook (Trivia Fun),Tim Long
Winning Is Not a Strategy,Zac Logsdon
Treasures of the Trails - Kayak Fishing Citrus County,"Michael N. Schulman, Gary Rankel"
History of the Hawthorn Hawks,Matthew Geddes
From the guys who were there ...,Bill Althaus
Equestrian Rockstars,Nancy Dye
Story of the Connecticut Cancer Foundation,James Smith
Upon This Ground I Trod,Patrick A. Morrison
Ultramarathon,James E. Shapiro
Introduction to Scuba Diving,"Stephen J. Craig Murray, ITTB ITDA Technical Training Board"
Accidental Heroes,Pete McGinty
Open Water Scuba Diver (Was Resort Diver / Dry Suit Diver Programs),"Stephen J. Craig-Murray, ITDA - ITTB International Technical Training Board"
Shark Diver,"Stephen J. Craig-Murray, ITDA Advisory Board"
"Snatch, the Clean and Jerk",Andrew Charniga
Betrayed All the Wey,Stuart Phillips
Goosebery ATV Tail Map,Bad D. Barnson
Science of Golf and Life,"Debbie Crews, Candace Pert"
FlyStream Annual 2018/19,Andrew Fuller
My Life As a Motorcycle History,Bob Chase
Brute Power,"Buggsy McGraw, Ian Douglass"
Kommunale Sportentwicklung,Klaus Bös
Dimensionen sportmotorischer Leistungen,Klaus Bös
Shooting from the lip,Mike Lupica
Tremont vs. Onita Exploding Barbed Wire Deathmatch Signed Limited Edition 16x20 Poster,Christopher Grasso
Marketing Analysis in Sport Business,"Kevin K Byon, Brian H Yim, James J Zhang"
Safe practice,"Angela James, Jill Elbourn"
"Paris, les lieux mythiques du sport",François Thomazeau
Sports facts 1980,G. Edge
"Class G, geography, maps, anthropology, recreation","Rita Runchock, Kathleen D. Droste"
Sportsmanship,Tim Delaney
Sport in Australasian Society,J. A. Mangan
Physical education and sport: sociological and cultural perspectives,J. A. Mangan
What would Yogi do?,John D. McCarthy
"Science Behind Football, Volleyball, Cycling and Other Popular Sports",Stephanie Watson
MidNight Game,Nick Arellano
Sven-Göran Eriksson on management,"Sven-Goran Eriksson, Willi Railo, Hakan Matson"
Children at play,Peter Sloan
Super Rams,KCI Sports Publishing
Get Going,Mike O'Hare
Break the Line,Phil Sharpe
Quest Complete - San Francisco 49ers Super Bowl Champs,Bay Area News Group
Michigan Nat Title,Detroit News
Against All Odds - Celerating the Bengals' First NFL Championship,KCI Sports Publishing
Crowned Again - KC Chiefs SB Champions,KCI Sports
Bubbles on the Slopes,Lilo
International gods of sport,Ric Chapman
Champion Mindset(Football),Khristen McAfee
Ski Bird and Powder Piggy,Julianne Stokes
Legal aspects of sport entrepreneurship,Dianne B. O'Brien
Buckmasters Trophy Records Eighth Edition,"Mike Handley, Linda O'Connor, Ryan Noffsinger"
K,The Charlotte Observer
Chili Dog MVP,"David Fletcher, John Owens"
Trap Collectors Guide Third Revised Edition,Blaise Andreski
Fifty years of cheers and jeers,"Jackson, Phil."
Ultimate Michigan Football Program and Ticket Guide,"Brian Snider, Ken Magee"
Drills and skills for youth basketball,Rich Grawer
Science of Sports,Wendy H. Lanier
Most Notorious Curses of All Time,Dave Campbell
Oddest Superstitions of All Time,Will Graves
Most Dominant Dynasties of All Time,Brian Trusdell
Biggest Upsets of All Time,Barry Wilner
Life in the Past Lane,Joe Verdegan
Greatest Coaches of All Time,Barry Wilner
Baseball America 2021 Prospect Handbook Digital Edition,The Editors The Editors of Baseball America
Training Mission Five - Spiral Bound,"W. Hock Hochheim, Jane Eden"
Teach Me to Play,"Sasha Guillaume, Olivia Hutchison"
Lacrosse,Ellen Labrecque
Baseball,Jim Gigliotti
"Rogues, Rotters, Rascals and Cheats",John Perry
"Blood, sweat, & Bears",Richard Dent
"Ski & Snowshoe Routes, Colorado's Front Range",Alan Apt
Fitness,"Miller, David K. and Allen, T. Earl"
The American marathon,"Cooper, Pamela"
Really riotous sports jokes,n/a
The ancient Olympic games,Charles River Editors
Good Sports,Highlights for Children
Hanging on to My Dreams,Arnold Henry
King of Russia,"King, Dave"
Houston Astros World Series Champions,KCI Sports Publishing
Boston Red Sox World Series Champions,KCI Sports Publishing
Mr John,John Nils Nordstrom
Guy on the Wall,Bob Leffler
High-Tech Sports Classroom Collection,"Thomas K. Adamson, Shane Frederick, Suzanne Slade"
Galilee High,Justin Strickland
Hidden in Plain Sight - PDF,Ellis Amdur
Purpose over Position,Vad Lee
"Sport, Professionalism and Pain","Howe, David"
Race in Sports Media Coverage,"Duchess Harris, Jill C. Wheeler"
Por Amor a la Pelota,"Nicolás Campisi, Shawn Stein"
LARRY LUITJENS a Coach of Influence,"Robert Parsons, Lance Luitjens"
Dino-SCORE-Rus,"Gina Attard, Chloe Vergeldt"
Familiar Waters,"David Stuver, Daniel J. Rice"
Fly Fishing for Bass and Trout,Johnson Charles
Under the Halo,"Los Angeles Angels of Anaheim, Pete Donovan, Artemio Moreno, Tim Salmon, Mike Scioscia"
Sports Math Classroom Collection,"Thomas K. Adamson, Shane Frederick"
???????????,YuBo Cao
"Proceedings of the 5th International Conference on Sports, Health, and Physical Education, ISMINA 2021, 28-29 April 2021, Semarang, Central Java, Indonesia","Anggit Wicaksono, Natalia Desy Putriningtyas, Nur Siyam Amin"
Musashi's Dokkodo,"Miyamoto Musashi, Lawrence Kane, Kris Wilder"
Greatest Story in Sports - Green Bay Packers 1919 -2019,"Cliff Christl, Green Bay Packers"
You Can Be Powerful - Kid's Sports Edition,Abigail Harrison
Fight for Your Dreams,"Kaytlin Neil, Travis Hoki"
Race and College Sports,"Duchess Harris, Tom Streissguth"
Ultramarathon,James Shapiro
Under Fire,M. E. Carter
Ware's Boys of Summer,"Katz, Stephen"
ABC's of Motocross,Kelly Noll
Jamie Whistler Plays Out of the Park Baseball Because It's the Only Thing That Matters,R. J. O'Sullivan
My Road,Julie Hughes
Lead Horse,Debby Buck DeJonge
Run to Boston,Julie B. Hughes
Run to Boston,Julie Hughes
Golf for Beginners,Jason Haugh
"Nutrition for Health, Fitness,&Sport 6th",Melvin H. Williams
Meditations from the Breakdown Lane,James Shapiro
Meditations from the Breakdown Lane,James E. Shapiro
The net effect,Clyde Wells
Ronaldoman - a Real-Life Superhero,Gutter Margin
Sports Math,Rae Simons
World Gone Mad for Marathons,Sam Korsmoe
Day with the Toledo Mud Hens,Gabriel Pinciotti
Sports Scuba Diver,"Stephen J. Craig-Murray, ITDA Group International Advisory Board"
Modern Sports Bayonet Fencing,"Vladimir Gutkovsky, Stanislav Gutkovsky"
Dive Leader / Assistant Instructor and Pro Guide,Stephen J. Craig-Murray
Essays from Sportivny Press,Andrew Charniga
Aquatic Rescue Program (Safe Surface Rescues),"Stephen John Craig-Murray, ITDA Group Advisory Board"
Why Is Mommy Sad on Sunday?,Scott Kevin O'Brien
Nolan Ryan's Pitcher's Bible,Tom House
Type of Life,Boti Nagy
Karate - Welcome to the Dojo,Marko Fagerroos
70 Colourful Years,"Andrew Dellow, Trevor Kennedy"
Perfect Score,Highlights for Children
Classic Bodybuilders of the Golden Age,Bill Dobbins
"Hey Buddy, Not So Fast !!","James ""Big Bird"" Telfer, Kelly Telfer"
"Don Garlits, R.E.D. Part 2",Mickey Bryant
System of Multi - Year Training in Weightlifting,"Alexei Siderovitch Medvedyev, Andrew Charniga"
100 Years of Football in the Lower Murray the History of Murray Bridge United Soccer Club,David Trenam
Ted Talks,John Freeman
Take a Hike,Heather Smith
Character is everything,Russell Wayne Gough
Fish This!,Andrew Cremata
"5-10-32 - Mcbride, Parker, Anvelink",Joe Verdegan
Proud Athletic History,John Iamarino
To Hunt Ducks,Matt Wemple
Indiana High School Boys' Basketball State Tournament Brackets 1911-2021,Daniel Symonds
Pitcher's Guide,Arjun Alwis
Wilsontown Lynx,Bobby Wilkins
3 Scoring Clubs,Jim McLean
"Blood, Steel and Canvas",Craig Alan Wilson
Chicago Blackhawks,Tab Bamford
Slices of Americana,Jason Love
Major Decision,Jeremiah Kleckner
My Horses Have Something to Say,David De Wispelaere
Atlanta Braves Official 2021 World Series Championship Book,Skybox Press
Foundations of Horsemanship,"Owen Marquis Mac Swiney of Mashanaglass, Kip Mistral"
North Wash Canyoneering,Derek A. Wolfe
Physical education for life,"Bucher, Charles Augustus"
Physical education and sport,"Bucher, Charles Augustus"
So You Want to Learn about Pitching,John Petre
Loop - America's #1 Recreational Trail,B. G. Boyd
How to Match Your Golf Clubs,Gisle Solhaug
Elegant Art of Skating,Deborah L. Stevenson
Soul of a Swimmer,Carla Albano
PGA TOUR Vault,Vault Media Group
PGA TOUR Vault Classic,Vault Media Group
Reflections on High Places,Hugh W Morton
Binghams Bakelite Centrepins,Tom Bingham
Smarty Marty's Official Gameday Scorebook,Amy Gutierrez
On Course!,James L. Alty
Falvey's Guide to Fishing Long Island,Kevin Falvey
Accidents in north american mountaineering 2016,American Alpine Club
Footwork and Maneuvering,"Hock Hochheim, Jane Eden"
Better Soccer Blueprint,David Copeland-Smith
Athlete's Ultimate Speed Training Manual,Ruben J. Clement
Advanced Karate Kata of the Okinawan Shorin School,Donald S. Bitanga
Sunfish Sailing,"Chaille Kelly, Larry Kelly, Adrienne Nunez"
L'entraînement dans les sports,Daniel Lévesque
"Destined for Glory, St. Cloud State Wrestling",Craig Sesker
Adventurous Use of the Sea,"Timothy Murphy - undifferentiated, Sheila McCurdy"
Time to Shine,Allen Williams
Baseball's Greatest Players,James Smith
See You at the Plate,Stephen A. Strange
Right Kind of Boy,Bruce Blizard
"Sport, economy, and society in Britain, 1750-1914",N. L. Tranter
Howard Hates Sports,"Ryan Acra, Mark Douglas"
History of Ice Skating,Deborah L. Stevenson
Born for the Game,Mike DeLucia
4 Weeks to Stronger Knees,Teresa S. Landry
Unorganized Territories,Pat Cassier
Varsity Series Box Set,Ginger Scott
Catch,"La Macchia, John B., Jr."
Spectator Sports Made Simple,Dan Bartges
Staling the Shark,Carl Vigeland
In the ballpark,George Gmelch
Backcountry Cuisine,Valerie Askren
"Peak performance, personal records, ultimate fitness, and winning athletic competitions with behavior analytic training",Stephen Ray Flora
Jocks 2,Dan Woog
Le jour de sport dans la jungle,Jill Newton
The high performance athlete,Jason Winkle
The world's tallest midget,Frank Deford
Endurance,Dave Pye
Twist,"La Macchia, John B., Jr."
Grass Is Always Greener,Brian Gushue
"History of Fishing in Star Valley, Wyoming 2nd Edition",T. Paul Stauffer
Championship thinking,Keith F. Bell
Championship sports psychology,Keith F. Bell
Master Chinese Chess Xiangqi Basics Volume 1,Michael Hu
Touchdown for Ryley,Robert Ryley Stone
Hidden Secrets and Pleasures of Having Fun at Ski Resorts,Herbert K. Naito
The ultimate guide to weight training for running,Robert G. Price
Paradoxes of Youth and Sport,"Margaret Gatz, Michael A. Messner, Sandra J. Ball-Rokeach"
St. Francis Desales Boys Soccer 2021 Season,Aaron Hatcher
Tales of a Texas Game Warden,Benny Richards
Bryley's Run,A. A. Edwards
Physical Education Curriculum and Teaching Theory in the Middle and Primary School,"HouBo Chen, Jian Li, Jinzhi Zhang, Jun Chen, ChuangGuang Huang"
Hit Hard,Heidi van 't Riet
Magic of the Moment,"Dima Raynova, Radostina Petrova"
Golf Shot Tracker and Journal,FleetsBay Goods
Shakespeare makes the playoffs,Ronald Koertge
Results Generate Results,"Jhonnatan Medina Alvarez, Laura Poe"
B Is for Basketball,Tyrone Sanders
Messi,duopress books
"Huddle up, Hutch!","Miller, Steve"
73-0! Bears over Redskins,Lew Freedman
Wacky Moments in Sports,Alix Wood
Beanstown Sports Trivia,Mark Silverman
Red Feather Lakes Climbing Guide,Bennett Scott
No Guarantee,"Becca Moore, Nate Moore"
Akiket megérintett a világhír szele,"Varga, László"
Swing the Fly Anthology 2022,Zack Williams
"Adjusting, Adapting, and Managing Expectations of Overseas Basketball",Dominique Johnson
Obvious Isn't...in Baseball,Winston Perez
Philosophical Athlete,Heather Lynne Reid
Snowy Torrents,"Spencer Logan, Blase Reardon"
Owing Our Game,Heike Martin
Recruiters Bible - 3rd Edition,Stephen Brennan
Safe Sports Equipment,Kaitlyn Duling
Mickey Mantle,Steve Lane
Fighting for Life,Lew Freedman
For People Who Love Sports,Carla Mooney
Champions of Character,"Mary Fichtner, Julie Taylor, Rowan Fichtner"
Sports and Relationship Building,"Tekemia Dorsey, Beloved Joshua Simons, Halee Simons"
Sports and Education Success,"Tekemia Dorsey, Beloved Joshua Simons, Halee Simons"
"Water Views, Volume 2",Karen Jewell
Sports and Character Development,"Tekemia Dorsey, Beloved Joshua Simons, Halee Simons"
Sun Road Running Journal,Carla Jojola
Gridiron Gypsies,Thomas Ray Benjey
Butler Way,Woods David
Carolina Rocks,"Garrett Davis, Erica Lineberry"
Cody Rodeo,Lew Freedman
Lacrosse,Ryan Nagelhout
Michelle Kwan,Rosemary Wallner
Kultura fizyczna mniejszości niemieckiej w Polsce w latach 1918-1939,Tomasz Jurek
"Unofficial Jets Trivia, Puzzles and History Book",Dale Ratermann
S Is for Score!,Laura Purdie Salas
Rock Climbing Arkansas Third Edition : Volume 1,Cole Fennel
Forgotten Moments and Memories from America's Best Sports Town,Ed Wheatley
Atoning Season,Jude Houghton
Tennis in NYC,"Pete Voelker, Erika Allen"
Point Wisconsin!,Dennis Punzel
Soccer Goalkeeper Training Manual,"Lorenzo Dilorio, Ferretto Ferretti"
Peter Pan & cricket,David Rayvern Allen
"Unofficial Colts Trivia Book, Vol 2",Dale Ratermann
Wacky Team Sports,Alix Wood
Wacky Throwing Sports,Alix Wood
Rising from the Ashes,Terry Hutchens
Sports Rivalries,"Matt Doeden, Matt Chandler, Tracy Nelson Maurer, Hans Hetrick"
Center Courtship,Marylee Brown
Great Sports,Teddy Borth
Hottest Race Cars,Erin Egan
Bradman and Packer,Daniel Brettig
Datos Geniales Sobre Deportes/Cool Sports Facts,"Kathryn Clay, Abby Czeskleba, Strictly Spanish LLC. Staff, Gail Saunders-Smith"
Hoosiers Through and Through,Terry Hutchens
Amazing Sports and Science,Time for Kids Magazine Staff
Wacky Races,Alix Wood
Hoosier Killers,Ed Wenck
Baby Loves Sports 6-Pack,duopress books
Rise of the Crimson Tide,Cecil Hurt
Hottest Sports Cars,Bob Woods
Gopher Teammates Forever,Douglas Edmonson
Moving Rio,Ruth Fleury
Indianapolis 500,Lew Freedman
Coach and Teacher's Life,Tim Pehrson
(Available),"duopress labs, Jon Stollberg"
Soccer Made in St. Louis 2nd Edition,Dave Lange
In the Lion's Den,Graham Spanier
"Little Book of Sports : (Children's Book about Sports, Teamwork, Sportsmanship, Safety, Individual and Team Sports, Kids Ages 3 10, Preschool, Kindergarten, First Grade)","Zack Bush, Laurie Friedman"
Running on Thin Ice,"Nicole Rizzo, Ebook Launch"
Deportes y Actividades,"Terri DeGezelle, Jan Mader, Heather Adamson"
Best of the Blues,"O'Neill, Dan"
Yes I Have Gymnastics Fever,"Natilee Stouya, Misti Stephen"
X Games,"Ian Young, Timothy V. Rasinski"
Fantasy Sports Math,"Allan Morey, Matt Doeden, Shane Frederick"
Inside Recruiting,Stephen Brennan
Glass Backboards,"Charles Ripp, Stephanie Gamez"
Sports and Leadership Development,"Tekemia Dorsey, Beloved Joshua Simons"
"So, You Want to Be a Coach...","Mike Tharp, John Brown, Joe Brickner"
Red Sox Legends,Lew Freedman
One Last Turn,"Martin Rudow, Dave Gaddis"
Sports and Mental Health Balance,"Tekemia Dorsey, Beloved Joshua Simons, Halee Simons"
Mia Hamm,Clay Latimer
Nothin' finer Carolina,David Smale
"Ėkh ty, matushka Rossii͡a︡",Gennadiĭ Minaev
Pacers All-In,Conrad Brunner
Dream Jobs in Sports Media,Daniel E. Harmon
Sports on the Map,Alix Wood
Classic Rivalries,Mark Stewart
"Totally Epic, True and Wacky Soccer Facts and Stories 6-Pack",duopress books
Colors of Sports,Laura Purdie Salas
We Are a Team,"Sharon Gordon, National Geographic Learning Staff, Edward R. Ricciuti"
Interstate '85,Marshall Garvey
Dream Jobs in Sports Law,Kathy Furgang
Epic Sports Records,Thom Storden
Detroit Red Wings,"H. W. Kondras, Bob Kondras"
Toe the Mark,David Bruhn
21st. Century Golf Swing in German Language in Matte Color Picture,Shauger
Basketball Coaching Principles,Manuel Narvaez
In the Lions' Den,Graham Spanier
Owning the Mat,"Dan Blanchard, Brian Preece"
Saving Buffalo Baseball,"Henry, Howard W., Jr."
League of Friends,UNKNOWN AUTHOR
How to Create a Successful Ski Lesson for Senior Citizen,Herbert K. Naito
21st. Century Golf Swing in German Language,Shauger
"ABC, Let's Go Ski!","Kassandra Lemons, NIck Sivils"
Champions,Jack Batten
Igry i nat͡s︡ionalʹnye vidy sporta nivkhov Amura i Sakhalina,V. I. Prokopenko
Exploring Virginia's Waterways,Edward Gertler
Scoring the Boss,Kristin Lee
Kabir Sharma,Ruthwik S M
Home Run Rooster 100 Page Baseball-Themed Note Pad,Joe Lacey
Soccer and Society in Dublin,Conor Curran
Tough Shots in the Bunker and Bunker Play,"Christina Ricci, Robyn Neild"
More Distance Off the Tee and Get Solid from the Fairway,"Christina Ricci, Robyn Neild"
Around and on the Green Get It Close,Christina RIcci
"Rough, Slopes and Uneven Lies","Christina Ricci, Robyn Neild"
Golf Rules and Etiquette for Junior Players,Christina Ricci
Golf Set-Ups & Fundamentals,"Christina Ricci, Robyn Neild"
Parallel,Michael Furnish
Adventures of a Once Reluctant Sailor,Michele McClintock Sharp
Wacky Sports,Virginia Loh-Hagan
Tomassini's Trophy,William Daye
Pickleball Proverbs,Andy Potter
Psychologie sportive,H. T. A. Whiting
Sports law handbook for coaches and administrators,"Glover, William H. Jr"
The Herman Hickman reader,Herman Hickman
Proceedings of the National Olympic Academy IV,National Olympic Academy (4th 1980 Indiana University)
Official rules of sports & games,
The athletic Finn,K. P. Silberg
"History of Canadian Tackle, Volume One",Ken Kerr
Adorn my life ... with tennis,Diane Griffin
Marketing your sport to others,Ian Stoddart
Communicating with sports organizations,"Wilkinson, John"
Aqa Pe As Student Unit Guide,"Symond Burrows, Michaela Byrne, Sue Young"
IMSA 50 Years,"Mitch Bishop, Mark Raffauf"
Speed and Style,"Earl of March, Rob Widdows, Ewan McGregor, Nick Clements"
Orange handbook,Bob Snyder
Little Bit Sideways (ePub),Scott Huler
Harmonic Dressage Part 2,"Gail Hoff, Daniel Marhuenda Donadeu, Jan Eisner"
Ten Things You Thought You Knew about Golf Clubs,Tom Wishon
Just Japan Notebooks - Judo,Shin Yamoto
2023 Ultimate Sailing Calendar,"Windward Productions, Sharon Green"
Athletics 2022,Peter Matthews
Summary of Danny Dreyer & Katherine Dreyer's ChiRunning,Irb Media
Sport is my lifeline,"O'Connor, Ulick."
Girl&apos;s on-Course Survival Guide to Golf,"Christina Ricci, Pam Jaccarino, Lori Jones, Robyn Neild"
Carving Water Birds,Anthony HIllman
"Unit 1 - Opportunities for, and the Effects of, Leading a Healthy and Active Lifestyle","Symond Burrows, Michaela Byrne, Sue Young"
Friday Afternoon BTEC First Sport,Rob Armstrong
Survey of College Athletics Department Advancement and Fundraising Efforts,Primary Research Group Staff
Short Season,"Jake Gronsky, G. David Bohner"
Association of Firearm Instructors Glossary of Firearm Terms,Suzanne N. Cole
2021 Rugby Almanack,"Clive Akers, Adrian Hill, Campbell Burnes"
Painting Duck Decoys,Anthony Hillman
Olympic Stars Set 3 (Set),"Anthony Hewson, Morgan Martinson"
Sports Innovations (Set),"Douglas Hustad, Chris Sheridan, Kristan Dryer"
Girls' Lacrosse,Brendan Flynn
Sports Encyclopedias for Kids (Set),"Brenden Flynn, Chros McDougall"
Idrott och moral,Mikael Lindfelt
Isle of Man TT Course,Ian Lawton
"Lance, Spear, Sword, and Messer",Christian Henry Tobler
The final season,Maria M. Cornelius
Back in the game,Richard King
Sports market place directory,"Grey House Publishing, Inc"
Mon encyclopédie du sport,Valentine Palfrey
PE/Sports Studies,"Carl Atherton, Symond Burrows, Sue Young"
Judging Hunters and Equitation WTF?,"Julie Winkel, Tricia Booker"
It's Been a Journey,"Kevin Robbins, Legendary Publishing & Media Group"
Legend of Aguila Azul : Lucha Legends Series No. 1,"Paul Barile, Julia Guerra, César Ayala Delgado, Raúl Ariza-Barile"
Extreme Sports 101,Pamela Hutchinson
Sports science,"Libby Mooney, Andy Rivers"
Yes I Have Soccer Fever,"Natilee Stouya, Misti Stephen"
Out of bounds,"Fred Shank, Chris Fisher"
Australian sport through time,
Ensanchar la vida,Jorge Font
Sporting brain games,Charles Phillips
My seasons,"Welch, Bob"
Baseball Junkie,Aubrey Huff
Summary of Nick Winkelman's the Language of Coaching,Irb Media
Ike and Me,Rich King
Double Cup Beast Mode the Athlete's Cheat Code,TeJuan Maddox
Team Policies,Scott Rosberg
Reportazh bez mikrofona,Konstantin Ivanovich Makharadze
Defensive Firearms Selection & Use,Suzanne N. Fuher
Personal Journey Through the World of Sports,John Rayburn
Judo,Shin Yamoto
Painting Shorebird Decoys,Anthony Hillman
"Evolution of Skating Vol 1 : Live, Love, Sk8 to Tell",Amirah Palmer
Summary of Shi Yan Ming's the Shaolin Workout,Irb Media
"Evolution of Skating Vol I : Live Love, Sk8 to Tell",Amirah Palmer
An introduction to sports physiology,"Martin R. Farrally, National Coaching Foundation"
World's greatest sports brawls,John McGran
Girl&apos;s on-Course Survival Guide to Golf (Yellow Book),"Christina Ricci, Tracie L. Miller-Nobles, Robyn Neild"
A handbook for teaching sports,
Sporting legends of the south,Garry Allison
Sports math,Denise Kiernan
50 years at the game,John K. Moynahan
PE in action,Sarah McQuade
Youth Baseball Practice Games,"Michael O'Connell, Deven Morgan, Ben Harley"
WCW vs. nWo World Tour,Brian Boyle
American sporting books series,M. L. Biscotti
"Guide to the Rogue River Wild and Scenic River, Oregon","Duwain Whitis, Barbara Vinson"
Working in sport & leisure,Sarah Marten
Iditarod,Pam Flowers
Tuning Your Compound Bow,Larry Wise
SurvivalSOS,Joseph Howard
Journey Within - a Bird Hunter's Diary,"Peterson, Mark"
Gabe Paul,"Cook, William"
"Developments in sport, leisure & tourism during the 20th century",Philip Star
Strawberry sportcake,Susan A. McCreary
New York Yankees 2022 Official Media Guide and Record Book,New York Yankees Media Relations Department
Coaching Youth Baseball,"David Grossman, AnderssonPublishing"
More Than Wolverine,Jeremiah Wood
Are you bigger than the game?,Gordon Kener
Summer & Winter Olympic Games Research Handbook,"Sarah Janisse Brown, Rachel Charity Brown"
Summary of Mark Schatzker's the End of Craving,IRB Media
Summary of Christopher Canwell's Atomic Attraction,IRB Media
Yellow Honeysuckle Is the Sweetest,"Will Primos, Steven Manchester, Bill Fentress"
Traveling Outdoor Climber's Logbook,Kristen Pizzuti
Somewhere South,Clay Ferguson
21 : the Illustrated Journal of Outsider Baseball,Gary Cieradkowski
A harvest,Con Houlihan
Delivered,The Red & Black
Lake Jocassee Paddling Adventure Guide Notes,"Nate Trappe, Adventure Nerds"
AS/A2 PE/Sport Studies,Nesta Wiggins-James
Reflections on the mental side of sports,Marie Dalloway
Risk Taking,Marie Dalloway
1000 things you should know about sport,Christopher Rigby
I hope the hell I win,Steven M. Rosenberg
Teaching students to play games 11-16,Sports Council
Less than a minute to go,William King Thierfelder
Who plays this sport?,Charles Reasoner
Sports psychology,n/a
"L'alimentation, clé de la performance",Steve Wootton
Covid technology جائحة الكنولوجيا,Ahmad haydar x
Mj,Henry Charles
Everything You Need to Know about GOLF,Don Peterson
Raising Ballers,"Chris Harris, Fran Harris"
978-1-944243-66-1,Andrew S. Dolloway
Beginner's Guide to Guns and Shooting,"Clair Rees, Adrienne Nunez"
Surfing Guide to Southern California,"David Stern, William Cleary, Adrienne Nunez"
Norwood,Don Reddick
Summary of Jeff Benedict's the Dynasty,I. R. B. Media
Summary of Leigh Cowart's Hurts So Good,I. R. B. Media
Summary of Lisa Suzanne's Turnover,I. R. B. Media
Complete Surfing Guide for Coaches,Bruce Gabrielson
Premier League,Matthew Geddes
"Policy and politics in sport, physical education and leisure","Scott Fleming, Margaret Talbot, Alan Tomlinson"
Rescue Diver,"Stephen J. Craig-Murray, ITDA Advisory Board"
Summary of Phil Jackson and Hugh Delehanty's Eleven Rings,I. R. B. Media
Summary of James Kerr's Legacy,I. R. B. Media
Behind the Scenes,"Diane McGraw, McGraw Productions"
Summary of Steven Kotler's the Rise of Superman,I. R. B. Media
Referee,Marty Gitlin
Buck Em Rodeo Stories of Locals and Legends,Allen Oliver
Managing the Training of Weightlifters,Andrew Charniga
What Drives Winning Environments,"Lisa Kuntz, Brett Ledbetter"
Jeux Sourdlympiques 1924-2018 (in French),Rafael Pinchas
Los Juegos Sordolimpicos 1924-2018 (in Spanish),Rafael Pinchas
Legends of Cricket,Rohan Wijesinghe
Mastering Chess Sight 1,Vladimir Romanenko
Forty Classic Scrambles of North America,Sean O'Rourke
California's Fourteeners,Sean O'Rourke
Golf Progress Tracker,Shella Sylla
Golf Travel Journal,Shella Sylla
Learn to Ski with Me!,"Cristina Berna, Eric Thomsen"
Run for Your Life,Ben Tan
Season of Preacher Jack,Lew Holton
2020 New Zealand Cricket Almanack,Francis Payne
Big Climb,Stephen Norman
Moments in time,Paul M. Baker
Mindful Cricket,Winter Graham
Reach Your Goals Survival Guide to Golf,"Christina Ricci, Karen Baicker, Robyn Neild"
The Jam Street puzzle,Margaret McAllister
Century bhoys,Paul Cuddihy
All My Golf Shit,Hartwell Press
Research on the Review and Innovation of University Physical Education,ChongFei Li
Baseball under the Palms : The History of Miami Minor League Baseball Volume Two,"Sam Zygner, Barbra Cabrera, Fredi Gonzalez"
Volleyball Coaches Planner (XL),The Art of Coaching Volleyball
Revelations of Rapier,"Robert Childs, Robert Rutherfoord"
My Mom Thinks She's My Volleyball Coach...but She's Not!,"Julia Cook, Allison Valentine"
Jackson Hole Sidecountry Map,WS Publishing
Joy of Martial Arts,Thomas Sotis
It's Great to Be a Fan in Ohio,Todd Kortemeier
It's Great to Be a Fan in Colorado,Todd Kortemeier
Images des Sports in Osterreich,Matthias Marschik
It's Great to Be a Fan in Pennsylvania,Joanne Mattern
It's Great to Be a Fan in Florida,Matthew McCabe
Frozen Hearts,Teegan Loy
Summary of Peter M. Wayne's the Harvard Medical School Guide to Tai Chi,Irb Media
Buckeye Tailgate - the Best Damn Tailgates in the Land!,Trevor Zaharara
Long Guns and Great Fishing Runs,Rhodney Honeycutt
Libro Del Reto de Los 75 Días,Pick Me Read Me Press
"The rise of Cornell rowing, 1871-1920",Eric R. Langstedt
HockeyWorld,"Nevik, Maxwell, 1st"
Spectacular Stories for Curious Kids Sports Edition,Sullivan
Dribble Dribble,"James Schooler, G. Lens Creative"
Joy of Heeling,"Julie Flanery, Teresa Hall"
Moralen kodeks na bŭlgarskii͡a︡ sportist,Kiril Neshev
Help Me Be Good Being a Bad Sport,"Joy Berry, Bartholomew"
Fly Fishing Minnesota,Carl Haensel
Sparring Science,Dennis Tosten
Summary of Tyler Hamilton & Daniel Coyle 's the Secret Race,Irb Media
Basketball,Larry Millet
Summary of Steven Rinella's Outdoor Kids in an Inside World,Irb Media
Joey Plays Basketball,"Justin Koning, Rajib Mondal"
Above and Beyond,"Hans Burkhart, Peter Bansen, Vicky Shea, Laura Read"
TTIceLand,F. Michael Sheehan
Beginner's Guide to Flytying,"Chris Mann, Terry Griffiths"
Amazing Sports from Around the World (French-English),"Douglas McLaughlin, Michelle Griffis, Marine Rocamora"
Future of Youth Sports,"Attention Span Media LLC, Josh McHugh"
My Favorite 18 Holes,Rick Schlaud
Way of the Surgeon,"Maclin, Melvin, 2nd, Wendell Goins, Patrick Dorsey"
"Classic Arena Programs #22 - Jacksonville, Florida - July 1976-July 1977","Scott Teal, Dotty Curtis"
Deadball Trailblazers,Ronald Waldo
Word Search Puzzles for Runners,Why She Runs
Debate about Paying College Athletes,Gail Terp
It's game time somewhere,Tim Forbes
Everything Matters in Baseball,"Glenn Guilbeau, Leo Honeycutt"
Excellent Short Walks in the North Island,Peter Janssen
Tales for all seasons,Neil Marks
Pub time sports trivia,Marty Strassen
Sports address bible & almanac,Edward T. Kobak
Seven Letters That Saved My Life - E-book,Dotte Lessard
Michigan Tech Football - the First 100 Years,"William Sproule, Calvin Larson, Joe Berger"
It's Great to Be a Fan in California,Todd Kortemeier
It's Great to Be a Fan in Texas,Matthew McCabe
Kampen om idretten,Erling Waldal
Excellent Short Walks in the South Island,Peter Janssen
De Londres a Tokio Juegos Olímpicos una Mirada Desde Puerto Rico 1948-2020,Carlos Uriarte
Comin' Thru,Colleen McInerney Meagher
Are you a sports nut?,"E. Schuman, Eric Schuman"
First Season,Dennis Barker
Mi Temporada de Voleibol,Karleen Tauszik
75 Day Hard Challenge Book,Pick Me Read Me Press
"Backcountry Ski Map, Marble, CO",Louis Dawson
League of Friends,Mary K. Miller
Recruiting Process-A Baseball Recruiting Guidebook for High School Players and Their Families,"Walter A. Beede, Butch Baccala"
Newport Nightmare,"Jimmy Owens, Dave Argabright"
Le judo,Gérard de La Taille
Psychology and performance,Penny Crisfield
"Classic Arena Programs #24 - Jacksonville, Florida - May 1978-July 7, 1980","Scott Teal, Dotty Curtis"
Halftime,Jenna Fields
Winning & Losing,Ian J. King
Psycho-pédagogie des activités du corps,Guy Missoum
Numbers Game,Tracy Solheim
It's Great to Be a Fan in Illinois,Todd Kortemeier
Climb Injury-Free,Jared Vagy
"Classic Arena Programs #23 - Jacksonville, Florida - July 1977-May 1978","Scott Teal, Dotty Curtis"
Mi Temporada de Béisbol,Karleen Tauszik
Emma,Jessica Lawry
Summary of John Daly's My Life in and Out of the Rough,Irb Media
"Wushu Doctor, Year One",Graceffo Antonio
'Encyclopedia' of Pool Hustlers,"Freddy Bentivegna, Catherine Adami, George Fels"
Zvëzdy sporta,Dmitriĭ Gordon
"Alex, un gros zéro?",Gilles Tibo
It's Great to Be a Fan in New York,Joanne Mattern
It's Great to Be a Fan in Minnesota,Matthew McCabe
Historical Fencing Manual,Francesco Loda
Pop,Jess Cunningham
Caught Looking,Kimberly Readnour
Year and a Day,"Stevin Smith, Angie Ransome-Jones"
Karch Kiraly's Guide to Greatness,"Karch Kiraly, Don Patterson"
Covey,"Deitz, Harry, Jr."
American Football,Louanne Silver
Seven Letters That Saved My Life - Kindle,Dottie Lessard
Banner Year,"Brian Hanni, Bill Self, David McCormack"
Summary of Pia Nilsson & Lynn Marriott's Be a Player,Irb Media
Hockey-The Passionate Game,Rhonda McClure
"Upatjara penbukaan stadion utama Senajan Pidato dan laporan Maj. Djen. Suprajogi, dan amanat Presiden Sukarno di stadion utama Senajan tanggal 21 Djuli 1962",Indonesia. Departemen Penerangan.
My Serendipitous Life,Carl Herakovich
How to Improve the NBA,Jeremy Arkes
"Antecedentes históricos, mitos y realidades sobre la práctica deportiva en la mujer",Edmundo Quintanilla M.
Sometimes life gets in the way,Michael Farber
Two Out of Three Falls,Clem Flowers
George Mitrovich's Baseball Notes,"George Mitrovich, Tim Peeler, Timothy Mitrovich"
Complete Guide to Sports,Dennis Pernu
Race in Sports Media Coverage,"Duchess Harris, Jill C. Wheeler"
Sport's open secrets,Gordon W. Russell
Your Coaching Philosophy,Scott Rosberg
Penitente,"Nate Liles, Bob D'Antonio"
Stinger,D. E. Ritterbusch
Don't rock the boat,Peter Wilkins
DIY Guns 2021 B&W,Tom McHale
I Was Only Four-Years-old,Carlos V. Kaigler C'vaughn'K Graphic Designs The Poet B.GKL
Concealed Carry & Self Defense B&W,Tom McHale
Istine o savremenom sportu,Milovan Stamatović
Leaves on the Wind Volume III,Christopher Dow
Schnoodles,Christina Earley
Goldendoodles,Christina Earley
Vikingarnas lekar,Bertil Wahlqvist
Gender and Race in Sports,"Duchess Harris, Kate Conley"
Outside the Box,Kristy Stark
Sue Nami's Swimming Journey,Cindy Klein
Finale d'enfer!,Patrick Bruno
Goody,Harold Michael Harvey
Mi Temporada de Sóftbol,Karleen Tauszik
Hapkido Black Belt Course,Marshall Gagne
All's Fair : Lucha Legends Series No. 4,"Paul Barile, César Ayala Delgado"
Mi Temporada de Hockey,Karleen Tauszik
Mi Temporada de Fútbol Americano,Karleen Tauszik
Rick Sanders in the Moment,"Bahne Bahnson, Josephine Funk"
Finding Tommy : Lucha Legends Series No. 7,"Paul Barile, César Ayala Delgado"
Grande Ambition : Lucha Legends Series No. 3,"Paul Barile, César Ayala Delgado"
Spot the Difference Photo Book of Golf,"Ashley Walker, AWCOstudio"
Le Sport et la femme,
Elevated : Lucha Legends Series No. 6,"Paul Barile, César Ayala Delgado"
Central Montana Rock,Jake Mergenthaler
"Wrestling Archive Project, Vol. 3",Scott Teal
Historical Fighting Fundamentals,Kyle Griswold
2022 Rugby Almanack,"Clive Akers, Adrian Hill, Campbell Burnes"
Run Around,Jenna Fields
Vira Copo 25 Anos de Histórias e Estórias,"Emerson Felipe Da Silva, Sidnei Felipe Da Silva"
It's Great to Be a Fan in North Carolina,Donna B. McKinney
Jordan Spieth,Marty Gitlin
It's Great to Be a Fan in Michigan,Tom Streissguth
Ready to Run,Jenna Fields
Like Real People Do,E.L. Massey
Niño de Karate Quien Se Puede,"Jenifer Tull-Gauger, Dwayn Rodríguez, Onix Gamboa"
Marketing deportivo,Andrés Camargo Salcedo
A superb century,Wayne Smith
Fishing the Edge,John Skinner
Franchise Issue 07,Franchise Media
My Favorite Sports,"Monique Dorcely, Jehovahnie Dorcely, Christmead Dorcely, Gabrielle Dorcely, Angelique Dorcely"
Seven Letters That Saved My Life - Nook,Dottie Lessard
Hail to the Victors 2022,"Seth Fisher, MGoBlog Inc, Brian Cook"
Footballogy,Timothy Wahl
Hiking Journal,Alice Devon
Never Go Sailing with Somebody You Met at a Bar,"Kyle Newport, Janice Newport"
Cincinnati Boy's High School Basketball Encyclopedia,Kent Stephens
Waterford Little League,Don Richmond
Summary of Kyle Petty & Ellis Henican's Swerve or Die,Irb Media
Men in Back - Quarterback,Andy Vodopia
Fast and Fierce,Jack Viera
Leaves on the Wind Volume II,Christopher Dow
Lords of Smashmouth,"John Baskin, Michael O'Bryant"
Early American Fishing Rods,Todd Larson
2022 New Zealand Cricket Almanack,"Francis Payne, Ian Smith"
My Proudest Moment,"Lindsay Achtman, Andra Pana"
Beagle Tales Christmas,Bob Ford
From Bones to Blades,B. A. Thurber
"Summary of Steve House, Scott Johnston & Kilian Jornet's Training for the Uphill Athlete",Irb Media
Enid@ Eighty,Cecly Ann Mitchell
Coach's Guide to Hazing Prevention,"Timothy Marchell, Norman J. Pollard, R. Brian Crow, Janet P. Judge"
Kansas City Royals 50 Seasons Book,Skybox Press
Soccer,Cecilia Minden
Tennis,Katie Marsico
Baseball,Cecilia Minden
Teach Yourself to Swim Like a Pro,Trius Publishing
Sir Alex Talks Soccer,Alex H. ter Weele
2024 the Love of Golf Wall Calendar,Bright Day Calendars
Coach's Bulletin Board,Jamy Bechler
Summary of Mike Sielski's the Rise,Irb Media
Urban Market Magazine Issue 2,"Tekemia Dorsey, Halee Simons, Beloved Joshua Simons"
Pro Teams KumiteSport,Dexter V. Kennedy
Building Your Brand 101,Ed Robinson
When Heroes Were Giants,James Witherell
My Best Day Basketball,Mark Keys
"Backcountry Skiing Cameron Pass, Colorado",Rodney Ley
Triathlon Model for Urban Youth,Tekemia Dorsey
Softball - Batter Up!,"Destiny Isabella, Zari Denim"
Running and Returning,Vicki Ash Hunter
Cincinnati Sports Chronicle - Volume 1,"Farmer, James, Sr."
Quiet Masterpiece,"James Dodson, Legendary Publishing & Media Group"
Ask the Master,Ian J. King
Summary of David Miller's AWOL on the Appalachian Trail,Irb Media
"My Backpacking Book - Wilderness Journeys for the Soul, Heart & Mind",HomeTrees Press
Social sciences of sport,Benjamin Lowe
Summary of Ron Blomberg & Dan Epstein's the Captain & Me,Irb Media
How's Tommy Doing?,"Ronald Bennett, Tomas Johnson"
More Pars Fitness Level 1 & 2,"Christina Ricci, Robyn Neild"
Stealing First and Other Old-Time Baseball Stories,Chris Williams
Gaming and Professional Sports Teams,Douglas Hustad
Rabbit Stew for Your Soul,Bob Ford
Whitewater of the Southern Appalachians Vol 2,Kirk Eddlemon
Football,Katie Marsico
Aiden's Activity Workbook!,Suzan Johnson
Wrestling Demons : Two Novellas about High School Wrestling Plus Coaching Manual,Ron Helmboldt
Play the Way to Par,Judy Shasek
Truckee River Access Map - 2022 (1st Edition),Ibershof
McCloud River Access Map - 2022 (3rdEdition),Ibershof
Denis Menke,Gene E. Miller
Water Views,Karen Jewell
Orange Belt Instructional Guide 2nd Edition B,"H. C. Hwang, Kee Hwang"
Official Professional Wrestling Rulebook,Joe Matterazzo
Putting from the Tips,"Miller, Roy, 2nd"
Ride / Write Book2,Reg Kittrelle
75 Scientifically Proven Ways to Lose Weight and Keep It Off,Scott Geist
Summary of Stephen Goodwin's Dream Golf,Irb Media
Ten Grief Lessons from Golf,Robin Chodak
Plan B Curling,Darrin Bergman
Closer,Alan Mindell
Russian River Access Map - 3rd Edition (2022),Ibershof
Top Notch Stories,Reg Dinsmore
Wrecks of West Lake Okoboji,Lloyd B. Cunningham
More Pars,Christina R
Golf Rules You Gotta Know,Christina Ricci
Speed Skating,Katie Marsico
Swimming,Cecilia Minden
Collector's guide to Sports illustrated & sports publications,Philip W. Regli
Fishing with Grandpa,"Kevin Lovegreen, James Monroe, Margarita Sikorskaia"
Tennis Coach Approach,Valerie Clarke
Off the Top of My Bald Head,Barry Warner
I3putt,John Fee
Power Spike 2,Chanseng Thounsavath
Challenge How to Succeed Beyond Your Dreams,"Hobie Billingsley, Pete Andersen"
Canada at the Olympics 1984,Canada. Health and Welfare Canada.
30 Day Reset Journal -V2,Priscilla Tallman
Matthew's Lesson Learned,"Amy Clayton, Nardin Hany"
Summary of Tom Coyne's Paper Tiger,Irb Media
Alley Cat Bowling Score Pad with 100 Score Sheets and 10 Note Pages,Joe Lacey
Summary of Gary Mack & David Casstevens's Mind Gym,Irb Media
Join the Race Committee Team!,United States Sailing Association
Trumpet Call to Victory,Joe Farley
7 Foot Man-Eating Chicken,Keith Glass
How to Write Strength Training Programs,Ian J. King
Lucky-Anil Nayar's Story,Jean Nayar
Born to Fish Bred to Hunt,Ron Helmboldt
Cubs triviology,Christopher J. Walsh
Wanna Play?,"Molly Tischler, Johnson Simon"
Summary of Russell Carleton's the Shift,Irb Media
Tradit͡s︡ionnoe fizicheskoe vospitanie nanait͡s︡ev,V. I. Prokopenko
Summary of Mark Frost's the Match,Irb Media
Tradit͡s︡ii fizicheskogo vospitanii͡a︡ narodov Severa,V. I. Prokopenko
2023 HardFitness Calendar,HardFitness
Half a Chance,John Perrotta
The sporting royal family,Serge Lemoine
First Splish Splash Journal & Activity Book,Lotta D.
Detroit Tigers Hat,Jonathan Turnbull
"Wahrnehmung, Gedächtnis und Aufmerksamkeit im Sport",Jürgen Maxeiner
Informationsverarbeitung im Sport,Jürgen Maxeiner
Set Sail and Live Your Dreams,"April Winship, Bruce Winship"
Book de Tour,"Greig Leach, Sheree Whatley"
"Belleair Country Club, 125th Anniversary Edition","Hal Bodley, Belleair Country Club"
Summary of Jake Fischer's Built to Lose,Irb Media
Amazing Sports from Around the World (Russian-English),"Douglas McLaughlin, Michelle Griffis, Vladislav Tolokontsev"
Biltmore Forest -- a Celebration of 100 Years,Lee Pace
United States of America and the Deaflympic Games,Rafael Pinchas
Thru the Tunnel,"Paul McDonald, Jack Baric"
Testing the Faith - How to Persevere Through Training & Trials,Perserverance Sports
Odvěké kouzlo sportu,Věra Olivová
Athletics,International Symposium of Science in Athletics (1978 University of Alberta)
Summary of Ross Bentley's Ultimate Speed Secrets,Irb Media
Tiroler Sportgeschichte,Karl Graf
Sport in Berlin,Sportmuseum Berlin.
Big Fix,Ray Hartley
Mediamark Research sports & recreation report,Mediamark Research Inc
"Challenging opportunities for special populations in aquatic, outdoor, and winter activities",Information and Research Utilization Center in Physical Education and Recreation for the Handicapped
Air Force sports manual,United States Departmet of the Air Force
Great American sports humor,Mac Davis
Summary of Diane Cardwell's Rockaway,Irb Media
Summary of Jack Daniels's Daniels' Running Formula,Irb Media
Guide pratique de la préparation psychologique du sportif,"Edgar Thill, Philippe Fleurance"
Sport international,Charles Harvey
Golden State Bouldering,"Kimbrough Moore, Shannon Joslin, Leo Popovic"
Moo Do Chul Hahk,"Kee Hwang, H. C. Hwang"
"The year book of sports medicine, 1996","James Lee Anderson, Roy J. Shephard"
"Biegam, skaczę, pływam",Anna Edyk-Psut
Uplifting Balloon Art Coloring Book,"Honor Heindl, Anderson Abruzzo International Balloon Museum Foundation"
"Indianapolis 500 Yearbook, 1988 (Indianapolis 500 Yearbook)",Donald C. Davidson [racing historian]
Slam Dunk Dog 100 Page Basketball-Themed Note Pad,Joe Lacey
Physical education index,
"Olympism, a movement of the people",Tex.) United States Olympic Academy (7th 1983 Lubbock
Robert Dover and the Cotswold Games,Christopher Whitfield
My Swim Life Journal and Sketchbook for Kids,Lotta Todd
A history of the concept of professionalism in Canadian sport,"Cosentino, Frank"
Sportsponsoring als Marketing-Konzept,Michael Dinkel
Head over Wheels,Ken Mercurio
"The ""win-win"" book","Garo Yepremian, Anthony Rubbo"
Mass Yoga,Yingman Wu
Awesome NFL records,Matt Tustison
Urban Market Magazine Issue 3,"Tekemia Dorsey, Nicole Willoughy"
Lose Less,John Cutts
Professional Wrestling and the Tennessee Athletic Commission : Volume 1,"Tim Dills, Scott Teal"
"Fairways, Greens, Lost Balls, & Bad Lies",David Cottrell
Cincinnati Sports Chronicle - Volume 2,"Farmer, James, Sr."
Boom,Randy Blake
Golf Road,Lawrence Malestic
Marvelous Magic of Plows Candy,"Gary Simpson, James Lyle"
3 Fires of Sanchin Kata : Science and the Path to Higher Performance,"Kris Wilder, Lawrence Kane"
Are You a Baseball Guy?,"Steve Physioc, Rex Hudler, Rob Peters"
NCAA fund raising manual,National Collegiate Athletic Association
La diététique des arts martiaux et sports de combat,Damien Galtier
John Taffin's Book of Double-Action Sixguns,John Taffin
Techniktraining unter konditioneller Belastung,Norbert Olivier
Fitness and amateur sport act in Alberta,David Robert Wilkie
Cronici afurisite,Fănuș Neagu
Science and Skiing VII,"Erich Müller, Josef Kröll, Stefan Lindinger, Jürgen Pfusterschmied, Jörg Spörri"
Team Alberta Western Canada Summer Games,Team Alberta
"Developing People, Developing Schools","Peter Earley, Sara Bubb"
Challenging Mountain Nature,Robert A. Stebbins
"Swimming, skating, rinking, and sleighing",George Frederick Pardon
Indoor-Sport und Ökologie,"Kuhn, Peter"
Laochra na hÉireann,Séamus Ware
"Laochra na hÉireann agus na Cluichí Oilimpeacha, 1896-1996",Séamus Ware
Filosofia dello sport,Fabrizio Ravaglioli
Brett Hull,"Carl R. Green, Roxanne Ford"
Broad-sword and Single-Stick,"R.G. Allanson-Winn, C. Phillipps-Wolley"
Ralph Doubell,Michael Sharp
Colin Chapman Wayward Genius,Mike Lawrence
Sports,Te Neues Publishing Company
Fins At 50 : The Miami Dolphins,Greg Cote
Hochleistungssport und Immunsystem,Helmut H. H. Lötzerich
"Hoyle's games, improved and enlarged by new and practical treatises",Edmond Hoyle
La partie de C?aliballon,Bill Scollon
BTEC level 2 firsts in sport,Rob Commons
Action safety,Sharon Parsons
Sport crazy,Desmond Lynam
Vehicles for Fun and Sports,RIGBY
Bicycle Touring How-To,"Debbie Bishop, Tim Bishop"
Using Math in Sports,Carla Mooney
The best after-dinner sports tales,W. R. Chignell
Collins Sportwatcher's Guide,Paul Wade
Young people and sport in Wales =,Great Britain. Welsh Office.
Sport development strategy into the 1990's,Alberta Sport Council
Today and Tomorrow Volume 25 Sport and Leisure,"Briggs, Joad, Mitchell, Sandilands, Joad"
23 ways to get to first base,"Gary Belsky, Neil Fine"
1996 New Zealand sporting year,Terry Maddaford
Sport in the UK,Cara Acred
Sports without pain,"Ben E. Benjamin, Ben E Benjamin PhD"
Sporting profiles,Michael Parkinson
Sporting pastimes,Dorothea Hall
Sport in the 80's,Ian Wooldridge
Sport and event marketing,"Nigel Pope, Doug Turco"
La danse classique,"Marie-Laure Médova, Hélène Fuggetta, Gérard Dupuy, Dominique Chauvet"
British rural sports,"Walsh, J. H."
Serious play,Martin Kimeldorf
Essential Diver's Log Book : (Simple 50-Dive Diving Log Book),Dived Up Publications
Mahalli Oyun ve Kültürünün Spor Pratigine Yansimasi,Ziya Boyraz Yahya Dogar
Maxi-performance,Charles A. Garfield
"Marketing learning in sports, leisure & recreation",Michelle Wake
Advanced physical education & sport,"John Honeybourne, Michael Hill, Helen Moors"
Facts & dates of American sports,Gorton Carruth
Bos Zaman Rekreasyon ve Islamiyet,Suat Karaküçük
L'animateur d'activités physiques pour tous,Nicole Dechavanne
Sports and recreational activities,"Dale P Mood, Frank F. Musker, Judith E Rink"
"Pearson REVISE BTEC Tech Award Sport, Activity and Fitness Revision Guide",
Building a Better Runner,"Terry Hamlin, Bill Rodgers"
Turkish Waters and Cyprus Pilot,Author
Cumhuriyet Kazanimlari,Kolektif
Türkiye'de Yerel Yönetimler ve Spor Hizmetleri,Ali Serdar Yücel
Gagner le match,W. Timothy Gallwey
East Coast Pilot,"Garth Cooper, Dick Holness"
Go!,Penguin India
Anabolic Steroids,"Tom Fahey, Frank Katch"
Best in the Land,"Paul Keels, Chad Thompson"
Fly Fishing from Head to Toe,"Emily Johnson, V. . . . Vaughan"
Real Deal,Michael Anderson
2022 CCA Sportfishing Tide Calendar,"Varney, Bill, Jr."
Be your own hero,Noel McBride
High Performance Fencing,Ed Rogers
Utter balls,Matthew Norman
Touch Both Lines,"Harold Russell, Dallas Russell, Jim McCarty"
Grove,Tom Ward
The adventures of Trefor the curling rock,Kim Perkins
De sportcanon,Jungmann
A load of old balls,Simon Inglis
Riadah menurut pandangan Islam,Fakhrulrazi Hj. Ashaari.
Jeux du monde,Paul Chartier
It never rains in Autzen stadium,Chuck Wenstrom
Springboard and highboard diving,Steve Still
Osmanlı'dan Cumhuriyet'e Azınlık Spor Kulüpleri ve Sporcular,Orhan Şevki
Türkiye Spor Tarihinde Yahudi Sporcular,Metin Delevi
Sports finance,Abdul Fazal
Beckett Baseball Almanac #27,Beckett collectibles Inc.
Beckett Basketball Price Guide #30,Beckett Collectibles Inc.
Beckett Racing Price Guide # 33,Beckett Collectibles Inc.
Beckett Hockey Price Guide #32,Beckett Collectibles Inc.
Beckett Football Card Price Guide #39,Beckett Collectibles Inc.
Beckett Star Wars Collectibles #7,Beckett Collectibles Inc.
Sailing for Blondes,Joyce Matlock
Total Lacrosse,Paul D Bowker
Best All Around,Rick Birk
Coach 'Em Up,"Skip Hall, Heather Goetter"
Michigan Tech Hockey - 100 Years of Memories,"William Sproule, Calvin Larson"
Lefty's Bowling Journal,LuAnn Zettle
Capoeira,Cécile Bennegent
Sport & Dance Injury Recovery Group : Psychoeducation Group,"John Coumbe-Lilley, Amber Shipherd"
Water Ready,Mike Davenport
Action!,Cap Lavin
Fly a Kite! : Safari Library,Liberty Source Publishing
Age is Just a Number : Safari Library,Liberty Source Publishing
Tee to Green : Safari Library,Liberty Source Publishing
Hot Dog! : Safari Library,Liberty Source Publishing
Runs and catches,Tony Pawson
Addysg gorfforol ac astudio chwaraeon,"Davis, Bob (Lecturer in physical education)"
BTEC first sport,Mark Adams
Pittsburgh proud,Jim O'Brien
Peaks and Ponds,"Bobby Clark, Cat Hadlow"
The ultimate sports challenge,John A. White
Baseball Under the Palms,"Sam Zygner, Barbra Cabrera"
Sneakerhead Coloring Book 2,Davinci
Behind the Glass,Randy Merkin
1998 coach of the year clinics football manual,Earl Browning
Beckett Baseball Card Price Guide #44,Beckett Collectibles Inc.
Rethinking Fandom,Craig Calcaterra
Beckett Vintage Almanac #8,Beckett Collectibles Inc.
Beckett Non-Sports Price Guide #8,Beckett Collectibles Inc.
Wrestling Price Guide #4,Beckett Collectibles Inc.
Beckett Gaming Almanac #13,Beckett Collectibles Inc.
Beckett Graded Card Price Guide #22,Beckett Collectibles Inc.
Beckett Graded Card Price Guide #21,Beckett Collectibles Inc.
Les Mots du sport,Jean-Philippe Bouchard
Ride / Write,Reg Kittrelle
Faith restored,John Heisler
Running Away to Sea. Voyage 1 : Miami,Andrew Moriarty
World of sport sportwatcher's guide,"Dickie Davies, Paul Wade"
Une femme dans le vestiaire des hommes,Josée Lemieux
Quality and quantity,"Colin Robson, Barry Cripps, Hannah Steinberg"
Handlungsmuster Leistungssport,"Karl Adam, Rolf Andresen, Hans Lenk"
Ve công tác thể dục thể thao,
"Pittsburgh, the story of the city of champions",Marty Wolfson
The world's weirdest sports,Paul Connolly
Journées givrées,Ellie O'Ryan
Ti yu sai shi he tong,Xiaowei Zhang
Private Eye Colemanballs 14,"Barry Fantoni, Bill Tidy"
Private eye Colemanballs 12,Barry Fantoni
Creating a safe coaching environment,Paul Hackett
Feats and defeats,Publications International Ltd.
You can canoe,Diana Short Yurkovic
Weird-but-true facts about sports,Arnold Ringstad
Level 2 higher diploma sport and active leisure,Jennifer Stafford-Brown
El ponche de 4 strikes,Carlos Tamargo
Les sports,
Les sports en plein air,Jean-Pierre Féret
Les sports,Nick Winnick
Sports technology,Geoff Thompson
Athey's field,"Justine C. Hendricks, John S. Lang, Marcia C. Landskroener"
AQA PE for AS,Graham Thompson
The athletic $cholarship eligibility coach,"Jones, Marlynn R., Esq"
The little book of football,Michael Heatley
It's only a game,Tony Husband
Great sporting quotations,"Pickering, David"
GAA quiz book,Dáire Brennan
The Picador book of sportswriting,Nick Coleman
Champion crack-ups,Gary Swift
C'est du sport!,Mellow
Champion à quel prix ?,Frédéric de Monicault
Everything animals,Catherine Nichols
Extreme sports,Robert Coupe
Forces and motion in sports,Glen Phelan
The sports puzzle book,Neil Somerville
Sobre héroes y hazañas,Gilberto Prado Galán
Sports carnival,Yvette Poshoglian
Sports illustrated almanac 2010,Sports Illustrated Editors
Sports illustrated kids all new access,The Editors of Sports Illustrated Kids
The sports book,Dorling Kindersley Publishing Staff
Sporting success,James Kerr
Sport and society,Lisa Firth
Sport in our society,Cara Acred
The sports industry,Ewan McLeish
Les exercices qui vous soignent,Jean Drouin
The Carling sports fact & quiz book,Peter Sterling
The cowpat-throwing contest,Brian Moses
Scholastic Year in Sports 2011,"Buckley,  James, Jr."
Diamond Madness,William A. Cook
Never Shut Up,Marcellus Wiley
La Gang des hors-la-loi,Jean Beaudry
Sixty years & sixty heroes,Ross Bernstein
Wacky races,Alix Wood
One day better (Guys),Jere Johnson
Encyclopédie des sports,Bureau laitier du Canada
Applied ethics for sport & physical activity professionals,Earle F. Zeigler
Whitaker's almanack sport quiz book,
Weird sports,Michael Teitelbaum
Weight training for running,Robert G. Price
Who has the ball?,Julio Ricardo Varela
Ti yu xin li xue,Shuhui Liu
"Art, culture and sport",Jon Richards
This is the year,Chicago Tribune (Firm)
The thrill of victory,Michael Benedict
Lucie en patinage de vitesse,Lisa Bowes
Plunkett's sports industry almanac,Jack W. Plunkett
Physiologie du sport et de l'exercice physique,Jack H. Wilmore
Gold rush,Michael Johnson
Great moments in Australian sport,Jim Shepherd
You know you're in trouble when--,Paul Fischer
You cannot be serious,Matthew Norman
Beyond the box $core,Richard B. Horrow
The Science of Speed The Art of the Sprint,"Tom Tellez, Christopher J. Arellano Ph.D., Kerry B. Sprick, Carl Lewis"
100 greats in sports,
A career in sports,Michelle Wells
Advanced physical education & sport,"Michael Hill, Helen Moors, John Honeybourne"
Money in Sport,Nick Hunter
OCR GCSE PE,John Honeybourne
I Hate Sport,Prue Storer
Infinity zone,Paul Mayberry
Va va Froome,David Sharp
"Ukraïnsʹka Olimpii︠a︡da i zdvyh molodi, Fili︠a︡delʹfii︠a︡, 1988",Alexander Lushnycky
Sport for all structures in Asian and Oceanian countries,ASFAA
Les nouvelles territorialités du sport dans la ville,"Jean-Pierre Augustin, Sylvain Lefebvre, Romain Roult"
Fan long duan fa shi ye xia de ti yu chan ye,Yang Pei
El deporte que nos une,Humberto Salerno
Rückbesinnung auf ein puristisches Sportverständnis,Sven Güldenpfennig
Yazhou ti yu,Xiuwu Liu
Nova Lei Pelé,Alvaro Melo Filho
Legislação desportiva,Brazil
TEISS-Modell,Peter Weigel
Krasnodar--gorod chempionov,A. M. Bannikov
In Praise of Failure,Mark H. Anshel
Surviving Logan,"Erik Bjarnason, Cathi Shaw"
The Maccabees of sport,Maciej Władysław Belda
Grundlagen der Sportentwicklung in Soest,Horst Hübner
Um presente para o futuro,José Oksenberg
Les coups du sport,Laurent Luyat
Complete Handbook of Pro Football 1984,Zander Hollander
"Psychology of motor behavior and sport, 1976",NASPSPA (Organization)
Sport in Jamaica,Delano Franklyn
Bild und Mitbewegung,Wilfrid Ennenbach
Sports and Fitness,Celicia Scott
"The boy's handy book of sports, pastimes, games and amusements",
Einzelfallanalysen im Hochleistungssport,Wolfgang Schlicht
Sport und Primärprävention,Wolfgang Schlicht
Medieval games,Jeffrey A. DeLuca
Sport in Australian drama,Richard Fotheringham
Sporṭ 2003,Jerusalem. Rashut ha-sporṭ ha-ʻironit
3 taʻarukhot,Elon taʻarukhot be-ʻe.m.
Sporṭ 2002,Jerusalem. Rashut ha-sporṭ ha-ʻironit
CAS jurisprudence and new developments in international sports law,"Michele Bernasconi, Antonio Rigozzi"
L'idéologie sportive,Quel sport
Le sport saisi dans son évolution récente,France) Université sportive d'été (29th 2011 Montpellier
Handlungspsychologische Analyse des Freizeitsports,"Thomas, Alexander"
Handlungspsychologische Analyse sportlicher Übungsprozesse,"Thomas, Alexander"
Zlatan frälsaren och andra texter om religion och idrott,"Susanne Olsson, Olof Sundqvist, David Thurfjell"
Výstup na Eiger,Ota Pavel
Recht im Sport,Franziska Jaufer
Beating the odds,
Ḳayits bari bi-Yerushalayim,Jerusalem. Minhal tarbut u-fenai. Agaf ha-sporṭ
Yom shel ḥaṿayah u-sporṭ ba-ṭevaʻ li-neʻarot,Minhal ḳehilati Romemah (Jerusalem)
Geviʻa rosh ha-ʻir 2014,Jerusalem. Rashut ha-sporṭ ha-ʻironit. Maḥlaḳah le-miśḥaḳe kadur
Ḳayits ben ha-zemanim 768,Jerusalem. Rashut ha-sporṭ ha-ʻironit. Maḥlaḳah la-tsibur ha-ḥaredi
Kenes Ṿingaiṭ bi-Yerushalayim,Jerusalem
Yom sporṭ le-ʻovde ʻiriyat Yerushalayim,Jerusalem. Agaf ha-sporṭ
ha-Matnasiʼadah ha-artsit Yerushalayim,Israel. Minhal ha-tarbut ṿeha-sporṭ
Athlētiko hodoiporiko,Zacharias Kyriakou
Paradise of sport,Richard I. Cashman
Sport in the national imagination,Richard I. Cashman
Conflit et lien social,Jean-Luc Boilleau
Wellington Indian Sports Club,Wellington Indian Sports Club (N.Z.). Jubilee Committee (2010)
"Deyang Shi ti yu zhi, 1995-2006","""Deyang Shi ti yu zhi"" bian zuan wei yuan hui"
PP Dewsweepers,James Dodson
Kants Beitrag zur Theorie und Praxis von Spiel und Sport,Jürgen Court
Sports Development Planning,Sue Burgess
Kritik ethischer Modelle des Leistungssports,Jürgen Court
Instructional programs,Diane K. Belz
Zeiten für Helden -- Zeiten für Berühmtheiten im Sport,Helden und Heldinnen : Veränderungen in der Darstellung berühmter Sportler und Sportlerinnen in den Massenmedien (9th 2006 Niedersächsisches Institut für Sportgeschichte Hoya) Hoyaer Tagung Sport stars
Jeux et sports dans l'histoire,"Congrès national des sociétés savantes (116th 1991 Chambéry, France)"
They Think It's All over Annual,ANON.
Mythes d'origine des jeux olympiques grecs,Michel Bon
Die Olympischen-Spiele 1936 in Berlin und Garmisch-Partenkirchen,
L' empire du sport,Centre des archives d'outre-mer (France)
"Le sport, diffusion globale & pratiques locales","David Sudre, Matthieu Genty"
The sporting image,Maxwell Leo Howell
"An historical survey of the role of sport in society, with particular reference to Canada since 1700",Maxwell Leo Howell
Les COMPÉTENCES AU TRAVAIL,William Gasparini et Lilian Pichot
European sport under Nazism,Mémorial de la Shoah
Jogos populares portugueses,"Cabral, António."
Os Jogos Populares,"Cabral, António."
"Il était une fois le bataillon de Joinville, 150e RI",Mario Graneri-Clavé
The book of sports,"Martin, William"
The boy's book of sports and games,John Uncle
Click,Carlos Lorch
Playing On the Periphery,Tara Brabazon
With God On Their Side,Timothy Chandler
Histoire du sport en Hongrie,Jenö Boskovics
Drugs in Sport,Nicholas Brasch
Cruzadas olímpicas en la Ciudad de México,Ana Laura de la Torre Saavedra
Philosophy in sport made science in earnest,
Sport et imaginaire,Frédéric Monneyron
Zona de strikes,Edgard Rodríguez Centeno
Sponsoring sportif,Gary Tribou
Golfer's Stroke Saving,"Shankland, Craig, Lupo, Benjamin"
Sport and development policy in Africa,"Marion Keim, Christo de Coning"
Review of South African sport,Cheryl Roberts
Sport in chains,Cheryl Roberts
ha-Makabiyah ha-15,Riḳi Kats
Katalog russkoĭ upri͡azhi,O. V. Fomina
Ofanayim bi-Yerushalayim,Jerusalem. Agaf ha-sporṭ. Maḥlaḳah la-tsibur ha-ḥaredi
Les gladiateurs de l'Amérique,Paul E. Ohl
Rajul min al-Sūdān fī dhākirat al-wijdān,ʻAlawī Sālim ʻUmar Mudʹhar
The Book of one thousand tales and amusing adventures,
Vidbyvanka,Stepan Haĭduchok
Every little boy's book,
"Chicks, kicks & glory",Jasmijn Rana
Our boys,William Stoddart
Sporting art in Greco-Roman antiquity,Emanuel Hübner
Idrottsvåld och idrottstvister,Krister Malmsten
How Sport Is Organized,Kirk Bizley
Les spectacles sportifs,Philippe Gaboriau
Sport v sisteme sot︠s︡ialʹnoĭ mobilʹnosti i zhiznennoĭ samorealizat︠s︡ii molodezhi v Rossii,S. S. Kosinov
Sport and recreation in the natural environment,J. W. Aitchison
A sporting chance for the countryside,J. W. Aitchison
"Klootschiessen, Bosseln, Schleuderball",Helge Kujas
Il finanziamento degli impianti sportivi,Tonino De Juliis
Gli atleti eroi,Tonino De Juliis
Il CONI di Giulio Onesti,Tonino De Juliis
Sporting success in ancient Greece and Rome,Audrey Briers
Golfer's Stroke Saving,"Craig Shankland, Benjamin Lupo"
Most Dominant Dynasties of All Time (Legendary World of Sports),Brian Trusdell
Kleingruppenforschung und gruppe im sport,Günther Lüschen
Sportnata slava na Veliko Tŭrnovo,Angel Borislavov Gant︠s︡arov
"Zwischen Politik, Protokoll und Pragmatismus",Juliane Lanz
Kinder- und Jugendsport zwischen Gegenwarts- und Zukunftsorientierung,Frederik Borkenhagen
Looking for a new carrier,Li Peng
Virtuelles Spiel und realer Sport,Jan Sohnsmeyer
Vom Wollen und Handeln,Christina Niermann
Qingtian lao nian ti yu zhi,Peixiong Ye
Enseigner le sport,Pierre Pfefferlé
Little Charley's games and sports,
"Every boy's book of games, sports, and diversions, or, The school boy's manual of amusement, instruction, and health",E. Pearson
Yi guo shi wu de zhuan yi,"Zhang, Ning (Writer on Culture)"
Muchuan Xian wen ti zhi (1930-2006),Muchuan Xian (China). wen ti ju
The boy's holiday book,T. E. Fuller
Chit chat for boys and girls,
Athletic sports for boys,
Le donne e gli agoni nel mondo greco-romano,Diva Di Nanni
Políticas públicas de esporte e lazer,"Temístocles Damasceno Silva, Fernando Augusto Starepravo"
Bewegtes Alter(n),Ilse Hartmann-Tews
Europäische Sportmodelle,Eike Emrich
Sportivnai︠a︡ otvetstvennostʹ,M. O. Bui︠a︡nova
Sunrise study on atheletic trainers,Florida. Legislature. House of Representatives. Committee on Business and Professional Regulation.
Frolic and fun for daughter and son,Isabel Allardyce
Terapia de la felicidad,Gastón Julián Gil
"FOOTBALL, RELIGION ET POLITIQUE EN AFRIQUE - Sociologie du football africain",Tado Oumarou Pierre Chazaud
Computer Sports Matchups,"Julian E. Campton, Bruce M. Nash"
Um novo rumo para o desporto,José Manuel Constantino
Desporto e municípios,José Manuel Constantino
El deporte dominicano y su entorno,Gonzalo Mejía A.
Hechos y protagonistas del deporte boliviano,Tito de la Viña
Iranahay anwani marzikner,"Hawan, Alfred 1934 or 5-"
Mega-events as economies of the imagination,Rodanthi Tzanelli
China's sports,Yongheng Zhang
Celebrando a Pátria Amada,Bruno Duarte Rei
Romanovy i sport,"E. I︠A︡ Kalʹnit︠s︡kai︠a︡, A. S. Belousov"
Des jeux du stade aux jeux du cirque,Pierre Cattelain
Topsport intriges,Peter Bonthuis
al-Riyāḍah wa-al-kashshāfah lil-banāt fī al-madāris wa-al-jāmiʻāt,ʻAbd al-Raḥmān ibn Saʻd Shathrī
Bhāratīya kheloṃ kā itihāsa,Rūpeśa Kumāra Dīkshita
Passion supporter,Pierre Bognon
Yoku wakaru supōtsu bunkaron,"Shun Inoue, Kōichi Kiku"
"""Frohe Gemeinschaft""",Christoph Korb
Sport im Verein,"Christian Siegel, Detlef Kuhlmann"
Kreativität -- Innovation -- Leistung,Germany) Sportwissenschaftlicher Hochschultag (20th 2011 Halle
De psychologie van de topsporter,Bert de Cuyper
Die Sportbranche,"Gerhard Trosien, Michael Dinkel, Anja Siegert, Laura Brager"
Die Schweizer Sportvereine,Markus Lamprecht
Sportzuschauer,"Strauss, Bernd"
İzmir kent ansiklopedisi,"Okan Yüksel, Ajlan Eğrihancı"
Crossing boundaries,Hoosain Ayob
The international politics of sport in the twentieth century,"Riordan, James, Arnd Krüger"
Teikoku Nihon to ekkyōsuru asurīto,"Kō Takashima, Makoto Kin"
Mienai supōtsu zukan,Asa Itō
Always Striving,Dan Eddy
Complete Handbook of Pro Football 1978,Zander Hollander
Monografija EYOF 2019,Izet Rađo
Sports Innovation Management,Vanessa Ratten
New Professional Hockey Almanac,Spencer
"Kindai Nihon, Chōsen to supōtsu",Makoto Kin
Türk sporunda sorunlar ve çözüm önerileri,Ahmet Ak
Magic from Your Pocket,Bill Severn
Jallikattu,N. Sathiya Moorthy
Tarihsel süreç içinde Muş'ta spor kültürü,Ömer Kaynar
Khālid al-Ḥarbān wa-al-zaman al-jamīl,ʻAbd Allāh Muḥammad Shammarī
El Comité Olímpico de Puerto Rico,Vilma E. Bujosa Rosario
P'iro sahoe wa sŭp'och'ŭ,"Yi, Hong-gu (Professor of leisure sports)"
Figyua sukēto to jendā,Taisuke Gotō
The athlete's body,Ken Sprague
Zu Ehren des Zeus,Umberto Pappalardo
Nambuk ch'eyuk kyoryu wa Hanbando p'yŏnghwa,Hang-nae Yi
Gladiatori,Valeria Sampaolo
"Roar, lion, roar -- a celebration of Columbia football","Jocelyn Wilk, Joanna Rios"
Sport i razvoj,Bracko Kovačević
Qiu qian shi hua,Shouhe Cao
Çukurova yöresi Karakucak güreşi,Yasin Karaca
Ethical decisions in sport,Edward J. Shea
The psychological significance of team participation,Gerald Paul Pillsbury
Zhongguo ti yu zhi shi chan quan bao hu zhi du yan jiu,Yuchao Zhang
Insaʼīklopīḍiyā Pākistān sporṭs,Ṣafdar Ḥusain Anjum
Tamashii no sōkoku,Hiroshi Ōshima
Sportivnye zhetony i znaki Rossiĭskoĭ imperii iz sobranii︠a︡ Istoricheskogo muzei︠a︡,I. S. Matusevich
Han'guk kŭndae sŭp'och'ŭ ŭi palchach'wi,Hwan Son
Do Brasil™ e outras marcas,Michel Nicolau
Supōtsu-tsū,Kenzō Hirose
Die Anfänge eines Massenphänomens,Ioana Florea
Mianyang Shi ti yu zhi,Mianyang Shi ti yu yun dong wei yuan hui
Edo no supōtsu rekishi jiten,Hironori Tanigama
Per gioco e per passione,
Olympia,Karin Kreuzpaintner
Sport in globalised societies,European Association for Sociology of Sport. Conference
Quellen zum antiken Sport,Peter Mauritsch
Supōtsu bijinesu no hō to bunka,Glenn M. Wong
Mongol bȯkhiĭn tu̇u̇khėn tovchoon,Batmȯnkhiĭn Bui︠a︡ndėlgėr
Haykakan marzadaran,Avetis Bayramyan
Le sport européen à l'ápreuve du nazisme,Mémorial de la Shoah
Sakha tȯru̇t oonnʹuulara,A. S. Fedorov
Un jour en Septembre,Michael Douglas
Power games,David Stuttard
Too black to wear whites,Jonty Winch
Taĭnata istorii︠a︡ na bŭlgarskii︠a︡ futbol,Stanil Ĭotov
"T︠S︡SKA, 70 godini","Todor Shabanski, Boi︠a︡n Boĭchev, Bonchuk Andonov"
Zur Konstitution des Sportmanagements als Betriebswirtschaftslehre des Sports,Lutz Thieme
Sport ist Spitze,"Germany) Internationalen Workshop ""Talentsuche und Talentförderung"" (26th 2011 Cologne"
Menadžment i komunikacija u sportu,Ivan Tomić
Han'guk sŭp'och'ŭ ch'oech'o ŭi yŏngungdŭl,Ŭn-sik Kim
"Sich'ŏng esŏ pip'yŏng ŭro, t'ellebijŏn pogi",Chun-yŏng Chŏng
Delito & torcedor,Ulisses Augusto Pascolati Junior
Muş yöresine ait geleneksel oyunlar,Metin Karayol
Min jian ti yu zu zhi,Xiaoli Feng
Mirae rŭl hyanghan Han'guk ch'eyuksa ŭi mesiji,Chun-ho Cho
Ti yu fa xue zhuan ti yan jiu,"Xiaoping Wang, Hongjun Ma"
"Kankō, goraku, supōtsu","Makoto Takeuchi, Shirasaka, Shigeru, 1943-, Hiroshi Arai"
Verdammt zum Siegen?! Was ist Sport Wert? sportethische Gedanken,Michael Jahn
Desporto,Francisco Pinheiro
Paris sportifs et corruption,Pascal Boniface
Die Geschichte des Sportrechts,Horst Hilpert
al-Aḥkām al-mutaʻalliqah bi-al-riyāḍah wa-al-alʻāb,Shawqī Ibrāhīm ʻAbd al-Karīm ʻAllām
Shijiazhuang Diqu ti yu zhi,Shijiazhuang Diqu ti yu shi zhi bian wei hui
Tongshan Xian ti yu zhi,Guangtai Tong
"Pathama ʼa krimʻ ʼA myuiʺ sāʺ ʼĀʺ ka cāʺ Pvai toʻ mhatʻ tamʻʺ, 1992","ʼA myuiʺ sāʺ ʼĀʺ ka cāʺ Pvai toʻ (1st 1992 Rangoon, Burma)"
L'activite et l'espace,"Piermarco Zen-Ruffinen, Pascal Mahon"
"Disciplinar cuerpos, normalizar ciudadanos",Miguel Lisbona
Yantai Shi ti yu zhi (1893-1985),Yantai Shi ti yu yun dong wei yuan hui
Bosanski visovi,Asim Osmanbašić
"Herzfrequenzvariabilität: Gesundheitsförderung, Trainingssteuerung, Biofeedback","Kuno Hottenrott, Olaf Hoos, Hans Dieter Esperer"
Ziel-Interessen-Divergenzen in freiwilligen Sportorganisationen,Christoffer Klenk
1000 Jahre Wolmirstedt,Günter Oelze
Es lebe der Sport,"Thomas Sternberg, Ludger Schulte-Roling"
Sport in den USA,Annette R. Hofmann
"Le sport, l'université, la société",France) Université sportive d'été (25th 2007 Paris
Virtualité et sport,France) Université sportive d'été (28th 2010 Aix-en-Provence
Puka,Riza Tafilaku
Esir şehirde spor,Mehmet Yüce
Naprej!,Rostislav Švácha
La nación atlética,Walter R. Bonilla
Lesgól,Péter Pető
We wuz robbed!,Bud Greenspan
Idols of the game,Robert Lipsyte
The complete book of shotgunning games,Tom Migdalski
Cómo Llegar y Consolidarte en Primera División,"Fernando Castillejo Rodarte, Editorial Shanti Nilaya"
Fishing Log Book,Art Magnificent
Vermont's Trophy Trout Waters,Peter Shea
Sandlot Manifesto,"Jack Sanders, John Spong, Daedelus Hoffman, Lindsay Starr"
In praise of athletic beauty,Hans Ulrich Gumbrecht
"Subaru-Able Brookie Venues in South Park, Colorado",Michele White
The language of sport,Tim Considine
Iya Mohammed,Sandeau Nlomtiti
High Jump,Frank Ryan
Türk spor tarihi,Doğan Yıldız
The sporting life,"Lynd, Robert"
Asurītotachi ga kaeru supōtsu to shintai no mirai,Atsuhisa Yamamoto
Report and recommendations,Western Australia. Development Plan Funding Review Committee.
"Cal Ripken, Jr.","Cal Ripken, Mike Bryan"
ha-Sokhen,Dudu Dahan
Law and sports in India,Mukul Mudgal
al-Islām wa-al-riyāḍah,Turkī Nāṣir Sudayrī
Sport am Nil,Wolfgang Decker
Achtung! Fertig!! los!!!,Marcus G. Patka
Anthologie du sport guadeloupéen,Harry P. Mephon
Sŭp'ot'ŭsŭk'eip'ŭ,Sang-gŏn Yu
Bŭlgarii︠a︡ na Olimp,Vladimir Pamukov
Songyang Xian lao nian ti yu zhi (1990-2010),Songyang Xian (China). Lao nian ti yu xie hui
Athlètes de Dieu,François Hochepied
Petites histoires de vélo et de soupe salée,Vincent Gavistan
Aunt Louisa's alphabet book,L. Valentine
al-Alʻāb al-riyāḍīyah,Khālid Suʻād Kanw
Shevuʻa ha-kadur kef sheli ʻim aba,Alon Leṿi
Trifon Ivanov - zheleznii︠a︡,Dobromir Dobrev
Jenseits von Bier und Tulpen,Annette Zimmer
La triche dans le sport,Jean Damien Lesay
Ao hui mo shi zhi xing cheng shi liao hui bian,"Huifen Ye, Qiumin Lin, Shiju Chen"
Playing the beautiful game,Jag Shoker
A imprensa calça as chuteiras na pátria,Chico Brinati
Schlichtung und Schiedsgerichtsbarkeit im Sport,"Bettina Nunner-Krautgasser, Gert-Peter Reissner"
Pleset͡skiĭ sport,Nikolaĭ Makarov
"Sport féminin, tradition, et islam au Sénégal",Mouhamed Ndongo
Keizai gakusha ga kataru supōtsu no chikara,Masaru Sasaki
Guida alla psicologia dello sport,Flavio Nascimbene
Sport w literaturze i kulturze,Michał Mazurkiewicz
"Campos de juego, arenas rituales, espacios de afición","Guillermo Alonso Meneses, Mónica de la Vega Carregha"
Boy's book of sports,
Yicheng jiao yu ti yu zhi (1986-2005),Yicheng Shi (China). Jiao yu ti yu ju
Aolinpike zhi meng,Guoqi Xu
Senza essere eroi,Lucio Rizzica
Changzhou sheng yun hui zhi,Changzhou sheng yun hui zhi bian zuan wei yuan hui
Beha-Poʻel Migdal Yerushalayim,Poʻel Migdal Yerushalayim
Los inicios de la lucha libre en Tijuana,José Cruz Nava Moreno
"Columbia/Barnard Athletic Consortium, Division of Women's Intercollegiate Athletics",Columbia University. Office of Sports Information
Il nuovo goliardo,Erminio Fonzo
al-Jamʻīyah al-Riyāḍīyah al-ʻAdanīyah,Muḥammad ʻAbduh ʻAlī
Games and sports for young boys,John Gilbert
Festival artistico-deportivo,Asociación Cooperadora del Instituto de Rehabilitacion del Lisiado
Riben shi dai Taiwan yun dong yuan de ao yun meng,Xiangbin Jin
Les élites indochinoises et l'enjeu politique de la jeunesse (1858-1945),Brice Fossard
Mens sana in corpore sano,Stefano Guindani
Markenmanagement im Sport,Deutscher Sportökonomie-Kongress (7 2010 Köln)
Futebol globalizado,José Eduardo Coutinho Filho
"Sport und Gesundheit im Spannungsfeld von Sportwissenschaft, Public Health und gesundheitspolitischen Anforderungen",Siw Waffenschmidt
Spettacolo e sport in Etruria,M. Martinelli
Davy Samaai,Michael Lucien Arnaud Le Cordeur
Country pastimes for boys,P. Anderson Graham
The Favourite holiday book for boys,Edmund Evans
Le sport,Jean Giraudoux
"The cost of select recreation and leisure activities, 1993",David A. Olson
Tarbiyat-i badanī dar āyīnah-i farhang va adabīyāt-i Īrān,Muḥammad Nīkūbakht
Sport,"Sylwia Skuza, Lech Zieliński"
Sports studies,
Sports Extra,-
Basquetebol de areia,Djalma Leite Rosas
Pukhan ŭi ch'eyuk chŏngch'aek kwa ch'eyuk munhwa,Tong-sŏn Kim
North Melbourne Football Club Illustrative History,"Nick Bowen, Charlie Happell, Dan Eddy, Martin Blake"
2019 Presidents Cup,David Shedloski
New Professional Hockey Almanac,Spencer
Capelle On 9-Ball,Philip Capelle
Hey Sensei!,"Kris Wilder, Lawrence Kane"
Xiamen ti yu zi liao xuan bian,Buren Hong
The sports performance factors,James M. Rippe
Champions of Bowling,Penguin Books Staff
"SportSpectator Track and Field Guide, with Cross Country (Basic Track and Field Rules and Strategies)",Bryan Jones
Vuvuzela dawn,Luke Alfred
Spectator's Guide to Sports,Consumer Guide Editors
Norie's,Imray
Racing in Australia Guide to Season 2018/19,Danny Power
Triggercise,Michael Mansfield
Norm Smith Medal,The Slattery Media Group
Life and Death : Bridie o'Donnell,Bridie O¿Donnell
Maximum Composure,"Stephanie Cunha, Lisa Lucchesi"
Joshi manējā no tanjō to media,Masashi Takai
The New York Clipper annual for 1899,Frank Queen Publishing Company
Gimnastyka w Polsce w latach 1919-1939,Joanna Kuriańska-Wołoszyn
Sport z dystansu,Zygmunt Jaworski
Sport kobiet i mężczyzn,n/a
England,William Lychack
Russia,William Lychack
Vocabulário taurino ilustrado,Antonio Rodovalho Duro
Ch'eyuk kwa rek'ŭrieisyŏn,Chong-gak Yi
The sports of the world,Frederick G. Aflalo
"Svitohli︠a︡d v ukraïnsʹkomu rukopashi ""Spas""",Oleksandr Leontiĭovych Prytula
Major league winners,Mark S. Rosentraub
Supōtsu de chiiki o hiraku,"Satoru Kida, Takahashi, Yoshio (Sports sociologist), Mitsunori Fujiguchi"
Don't choke,"Scott, Michael D."
Opstanak i povratak,Đorđe Perišić
Polscy sportowcy w świecie,Zbigniew Judycki
Sport w kulturze,"Beata Walęciuk-Dejneka, Ryszard Polak"
Social psychology and physical activity,Rainer Martens
"Norfolk broads and rivers, or, The water-ways, lagoons, and decoys of East Anglia",G. Christopher Davies
Qiannan min zu ti yu,Ling Luo
Min zu ti yu fa zhan yan jiu,China) Quan guo min zu ti yu xue shu yan tao hui (2nd 2012 Pu'er Shi
The treasury of clean sports jokes,Tal D. Bonham
Zimni︠a︡i︠a︡ olimpiada v subtropikakh,Boris Nemt͡sov
Power at play,Michael A. Messner
En Venezuela gana el deporte,Yves Bonnefoy
Die Steinzeile in der Laufbahn des Stadions von Olympia,Jan Tremel
Xizang gu dai ti yu wen hua,Linghui Ding
Sport polonijny w zbiorach Muzeum Sportu i Turystyki w Warszawie,Iwona Grys
Mortal engines,John M. Hoberman
De volksvermaken,J. ter Gouw
Histoire de l'éducation physique et du sport (baccalauréat 1 staps) 15 heures,Salvator Nahimana
In the zone,J. Mitchell Perry
Chimbacalle con alma de ferrocarril,Víctor H. Salgado Estrella
"Sex, violence & power in sports",Michael A. Messner
Rossiĭskiĭ khokkeĭ,Fedor Razzakov
The father and son,Friend to youth
Kindai Nihon no shintai hyōshō,"Kunihiro Seto, Chizuru Sugiyama"
Beyond winning,S. S. Hanna
21-seiki supōtsu daijiten,"Toshio Nakamura, Takeo Takahashi, Tsuneo Sōgawa, Hidenori Tomozoe"
Coaches guide to sport psychology,Rainer Martens
Sport physiology for coaches,Brian J. Sharkey
O esporte e as Forças Armadas na Primeira República,Karina Cancella
Zhonghua min zu chuan tong ti yu zhi,Zhongguo ti yu bo wu guan
"Sistema, ili, razmyshlenii︠a︡ o tom, kakim byl, stal i mozhet statʹ futbol",Oleg Bazilevich
Kindai Nihon o tsukutta shintai,Tsuneo Sōgawa
The life of the Hon. Robert Grimston,Frederick Gale
Popular cultures,"Rowe, David"
"Sport, culture and the media","Rowe, David"
Adventure sports in Florida,"Hunt, Bruce"
The gender structure of national sport organizations,M. Ann Hall
Sport and gender,M. Ann Hall
A pocket tour of sports on the Internet,Terry Fain
Sports collectibles for fun & profit,"Ketchum, William C."
A lifetime shooting sports and beauty,Walter Iooss
Shooting for the gold,Walter Iooss
Sports & games,Neil Jameson
Land of sport and glory,Derek Birley
Sport and the making of Britain,Derek Birley
"Funding sources in physical education, exercise, and sport science","Copeland, Barry W."
You can't play the game if you don't know the rules,David M. Carter
Keeping score,David M. Carter
Dickie V's top 40 all-everything teams,Dick Vitale
Forgive Us Our Press Passes,Mickey Herskowitz
The Mickey Herskowitz collection II,Mickey Herskowitz
The Mickey Herskowitz collection,Mickey Herskowitz
India,Dale E. Howard
The sporting exception in European Union law,Richard Parrish
The conquering heroes,Peter Gent
Science in sports,George Coulter
Coubertin's Olympics,Davida Kristy
Track & field warming up,James R. Rothaus
Olympic jokes,James R. Rothaus
Fundamental snowboarding,Jon Lurie
Geotrivia sports,Elizabeth Fagan Adelman
"Physical Activity, Aging and Sports: Toward Healthy Aging : International Perspectives, Part 1",Sara Harris
College Athletic Scholarships,Marc Nolan
Are you still coaching?,Johnny Halpert
"Fenway, Football, Heroes and God",Patrick Cronin
80,"Eve Chandler, Corey Buhay, Bonfire Collective, James Lucas"
From Glory to Greatness,Lou Macaluso
Batter Up!,Doug Brooker
Black Robe,"David Tavares, Zach Royer"
Summary of Marc 'Elvis' Priestley's the Mechanic,Irb Media
Summary of Brad Gilbert & Steve Jamison's Winning Ugly,Irb Media
Lightning in a Throttle,Kristen Hall-Geisler
Pirates Strike at Tennis,Samuel Thomas
When Athletes Pray,Charlotte Smith
50 Aniversario Hit 300 Roberto Clemente,Jorge Lopez Velez
Summary of Bob Rotella's Putting Out of Your Mind,Irb Media
Butterflies on the Bases,"Jami June, Word-2-Kindle"
Butteflies on the Bases,"Jami June, Word-2-Kindle"
Jiu Jitsu,"Diego Vasquez, Jorge M. Vasquez"
Baseball America 2023 Almanac,The Editors The Editors of Baseball America
Ice Hockey,Sports Illustrated
The Golf secret,H.A. Murray
Gym Upstairs,Conor Hogan
Do Gymnastics Like Simone Biles,J. J. Bryant
Our Game - New Zealand Rugby At 150,Ron Palenski
The sports photography of Robert Riger,Bob Riger
Kansas Missouri Prep Sports,Michael Taylor
Sports,"Weiss, Paul"
Total Sports Experience for Kids,"Fine, Ed.D., Aubrey H, Michael L. Sachs"
I hate Colorado,Paul Finebaum
The story of English sport,Neil Wigglesworth
European Sports Law,Stephen Weatherill
My Grandpa and Baseball,"Dalton Duguid, Stephanie Duguid"
Marathon Training Plan,Richard Diaz
Embrace Challenge,"Jesse Danger, Cristina Latici, Steve Zavitz, Ivan Procopovich"
Adventure of Bear Huff : the Little Golfer,James A. Huff
Sammy Swims,"Jamal Hill, Todd Civin, Angelo France"
Inside Baseball in the Time of Covid,Patrick Cronin
"Dude, Where's My Sock?","Sandra J. Payne, Kerrie E. Nichols"
Down to One,Steamy Designs
Unfair Pair,Claire Lantero
2023 the A.T. Guide,"David ""Awol"" Miller, AntiGravityGear"
Drew Litton's 2023 Classic Cartoons Sports Calendar,Drew Litton
Back from the Edge of Hell,John Greenburg
Stolen Title,"Gary Tippings, Helikar, James"
Summary of Alyssa Padgett's a Beginner's Guide to Living in an RV,Irb Media
Sweetest Game,Cookie O'Gorman
New England Grouse Shooting,William Foster
Summary of Rick Reilly's So Help Me Golf,Irb Media
Research on Physical Teaching and Exercise Training in Colleges and Universities,Yong Ma
Hiking Journal for Kids,HomeTrees Press
Beyond the Skills and Drills,Bill Bommarito
Training the Dark Side,Richard Diaz
Promotion for sportdirectors,"Johnson, John R."
Book of champions,Michigan High School Athletic Association
Sport U. S. A.,Saturday evening post
Two Are Better,"Tim Bishop, Debbie Bishop, Dan Miller"
Chwarae Teg,
Understanding biomechanics for physical education and sports,"Michael Koh, John Tan"
Perez on sports,José S. Perez
Sport business,Barbara Smit
Grand Slams of Tennis,Eamon Evans
Strong and courageous,Kevin Vande Streek
Gone Fishin' with Russell Armstrong,Russell Armstrong
50 bonnes raisons de ne pas faire de sport,Sabine Duhamel
I Ain't Got a Buck,Sidney M. Jackson
Most Extraordinary Life,Sally Moore Huss
Men up Front - Penn State,Andrew Vodopia
Baseball America 2023 Directory,The Editors The Editors at Baseball America
'Twas the Night Before Cubbies,Sam Barlow
In the Zone,Steve Picchi
Bill Schonely Story,Kerry Eggers
Upper Grip,Lalit Bhonsle
Sports and recreation,"Ritchie, David"
"Fly Rods, Rodmaking, and Bamboo","Robert Page Lincoln, Todd E. A. Larson"
My Life of Cheer!,"Kaylee Cann, Jaylin Monroe"
Lost Art and Science of Professional Wrestling,David Chapman
Wild Waterslide Race,"Dave Ball, Design Pickle"
A sociology of sport,Howard L. Nixon
Sport and social organization,Howard L. Nixon
Sport in a changing world,Howard L. Nixon
Coaching Youth Sports Effectively,Homer Drew
I hate Stanford,Paul Finebaum
I hate Purdue,Paul Finebaum
Boi na pista!,Adriana Priscilla Costa Cavalcanti
Los cubanos y el fútbol en la prensa,Santiago Prado Pérez de Peñamil
Careers inside the world of sports and entertainment,Bruce McGlothlin
Arşiv belgelerine göre Osmanlı'da spor,Kemal Gurulkan
Cyril,Geoff Slattery
"On, brave old Army team",James Blackwell
Hobey Baker Memorial Award,"Brian Shaughnessy, Hobey Baker Memorial Award Foundation, Carlson Print Group, Rob Bignell"
Stormy Legacy of Windansea,Christopher Briscoe
Complete,"Michael French, Leah Arruda"
Top Super Bowls,Ryan James
Sports Nostalgia Quiz Book,"Zander Hollander, Schultz - undifferentiated"
Judaism's Encounter With American Sports (Modern Jewish Experience),Jeffrey S. Gurock
Spitfire,Leslie C. Smith
Play Tennis Like Serena Williams,J. J. Bryant
Official N. F. L. Record Manual 1974,Penguin Books Staff
Undong hanŭn ai ka haengbok hada,Han'guk Pangsong Kongsa. Undongjang P'ŭrojekt'ŭ Chejakt'im
Story of Megalodon,Jaxon Hayes
Play Basketball Like Stephen Curry,J. J. Bryant
Story of el Toro Loco,Jaxon Hayes
Cumhuriyet dönemi Türk spor tarihinde Carl Diem ve raporu,Erol Akcan
Baseball Is in My DNA,Glenn Cashion
Top NCAA Men's Basketball Championship Games,Ryan James
Teenage Hotrodders Book Four,Retro Comic Reprints
A Spot the Difference Photobook of Baseball,Ashley Walker
Teenage Hotrodders Book Two,Retro Comic Reprints
Futbolun kasabalı yılları,Osman Oktay
Story of Son-Uva Digger,Jaxon Hayes
Play Baseball Like Mike Trout,J. J. Bryant
Case 360 - Sports Diplomacy in Africa,Lindsay Krasnoff
Teenage Hotrodders Book Three,Retro Comic Reprints
Houston Astros Official 2022 World Series Championship Book,Skybox Press
Story of Grave Digger,Jaxon Hayes
Story of Mohawk Warrior,Jaxon Hayes
Story of BroDozer,Jaxon Hayes
Story of Maximum Destruction,Jaxon Hayes
Story of Zombie,Jaxon Hayes
Sŭp'och'ŭ e tap i itta,Ch'ŏr-wŏn Yi
Action Sports Coloring Book,Christine Gansberger
Biological rhythms and exercise,"Reilly, Thomas"
Ringside Guide to Wrestle,Penguin Books Staff
Official N. F. L. Guide 1974,Penguin Books Staff
Complete Handbook of Baseball 1977,Zander Hollander
Mental Preparation of Fencers and Others,Aladar Kogler
Sŭp'och'ŭ nŭn t'onghanda,Yŏng-no Ki
Sportŭt v antichna Trakii︠a︡,Peti︠a︡ Andreeva
Cong Chang'an dao Yadian,Qilin Sun
Strange and Incredible Sports Happenings,Mac Davis
Official N. F. L. Record Manual 1972,Penguin Books Staff
Lively World Hockey,Penguin Books Staff
"Nai wu nai wen, wei jing wei yi",Yujiao Hu
Taehan Min'guk ch'eyuksa,Sang-sŭng Yang
"Lun xin de""ju guo ti zhi""","Zha, Ping (College teacher)"
Fight to the Finish,Ron J. Jackson
How to Get a Golf Scholarship to Stanford,Richard Sinay
Instant Cricket Library,Dan Liebke
Complete Handbook of Soccer 1979,Zander Hollander
Complete Handbook of Baseball 1978,Zander Hollander
Boy's and girl's book of sports,"Clarke, William"
Broken Field Runner,Penguin Books Staff
Wo guo ti yu chan ye xin xi wang zhan yun ying mo shi yan jiu,Chunping Zhang
Broken Field Runner,Penguin Books Staff
Advanced Bass Fishing,Weiss
Reformer Pilates : A No-Nonsense How-To Guide for Newbies,Tracy Hayes
Samurai Strategies for Fencers,Quincy / Day Rabôt
ACT Test Prep Flash Cards Algebra 2-Trig Review,Ace Academics
Running 365,Stephen Modzelewski
Exploring decolonising themes in SA sport history,F. Cleophas
Last At-Bat,Stephen Davis
Top College Football National Championship Games,Ryan James
Raquetbol,"Eduardo Aaron Palomino-gonzalez, Osniel Urquillo-gonzalez, Gerardo Omar Mendoza-paredes, Aaron Mariano Castanon-holguin"
A Spot the Difference Photobook of Sneakers,Ashley Walker
Na trajetória dos noventa,Dídimo de Castro
Modern Saber Fencing,"Zbigniew Borysiuk, Edward Korfanty"
Gutie,Sean Christopher
Break Shot Patterns,
Racismo y Baseball Cubano,Juan A. Martinez de Osaba
Story of Soldier Fortune,Jaxon Hayes
Inspiring Stories of Sportsmanship,Brad Herzog
The ultimate sports nutrition handbook,Ellen Coleman
Game,Robert Benson
NFL Football Guide,Frank Gifford
Larrikins and Legends,Dan Eddy
Zai Zhongguo sheng huo he yun dong,Oliver George Ready
Goroshiny Spasa,Sergeĭ Demin
Polly Farmer,"Steve Hawke, Sam Newman, Gareth Andrews"
Phoenix Rises,"Ross Oakley, Jonathan Green, Geoff Slattery"
Complete Handbook of the Summer Olympic Games 1976,Zander Hollander
Complete Handbook of Pro Hockey 1985,Zander Hollander
Official N. F. L. Guide 1972,Penguin Books Staff
High Hard One,"K. Higbe, M. Quigley"
N. F. L. Report 1984,Penguin Books Staff
Dat ha-sheririm,Mosche Zimmermann
Complete Handbook of Soccer 1977,Zander Hollander
Complete Handbook of Baseball 1976,Zander Hollander
Supōtsu ronshū,Yukio Mishima
The satirical world of José Perez,Wayman Spence
Gling sgrung las byung baʼi lus rtsal rig gnas kyi rtog dpyod dang zhib ʼjug,Jo-ru Chab-ʼgag
"Tokubetsuten, Edo no supōtsu to Tōkyō Orinpikku",Edo Tōkyō Hakubutsukan
Supōtsu o hiraku shakaigaku,"Takahiro Imaizumi, Tetsuya Ōno"
"Nasledie ""antichnogo"" geroi︠a︡","Evgeniĭ Tevi︠a︡shov, Aleksandr Naumovich Sadikov"
Battaglie sportive,Felice Fabrizio
Game,David Halberstam
Ardahan'da çocuk oyunları ve spor kültürü,Talha Murathan
Complete Handbook of Pro Basketball 1978,Zander Hollander
Complete Handbook of Pro Basketball 1980,Zander Hollander
Life in Golf 2018,"Peter Thomson, Steve Perkin"
Wei Taiwan ti yu zhao chu lu,Yixiong Xu
Complete Handbook of Pro Basketball 1977,Zander Hollander
Football Register 1978,Sporting News Staff
"Esportes, lazer e vigilância",Cristiano Neves da Rosa
Telegraph Book of Sporting Champions,Martin Smith
Aide memoire for the 25th Educatin and Sports Sector review (ESSR),Uganda. Ministry of Education and Sports ( -2014)
El juego de San Andrés,Santiago Castro Ventura
Sŭp'och'ŭ simnihak ŭi ihae wa chŏgyong,Ch'ŏng-hŭi Chŏng
Cazaly,"Allen, Robert"
Golf Word Search Book,Great Point Publishing LLC
Commanding Performance,Cody Commander
Grip Strength At-Home,Melissa Rohall
Wingfield,George Alexander
Storm Warning,Steven Krull
Gold Medal Doc from Goals to GOAT - 30 Day Affirmation Guide,"Erin Hassler, Xavier Hassler-Godfrey"
Postmodern dönemde Türkiye'de futbol endüstrisi ve taraftar profilleri,Ahmet Gökçe Aslaner
Fish Tales,"Bill Dance, Taylor Wilson, Jacque Hillman, Kim Stewart, Katie Gould"
Big Show Off,Sue Byrd
Frozen in Time,Brian Shaughnessy
Peters Ammunition,Peters Cartridge Company
Two Moments of Glory,Frank Spragg
Just Add Water,Don Norton
Old School Versus New School Baseball,Kenneth Ardizzone
Mesēmvrias enthymion,
Nutrition and the female athlete,Jaime S. Ruud
Sports planning diary,Ed Sobel
Golfer's Excuse Handbook,Kurt Taylor
Chuan tong jiao yu shi jiao xia Zhongguo gu dai ti yu wen hua yan jiu,Shihong Li
My Grandma Is the Coach,"Markevia Mincey, Jeremy Mincey"
U Can Do It !!! New Advanced Skills,Terry Ray Walters
Omniverse Sports League,Justin Curtis Ermer Lacche
This Is Falling,Ginger Scott
Cascadia/Portland Sasquatch Official 2022 Yearbook,Justin Curtis Ermer Lacche
H-Town Crowned,KCI Sports Publishing
Top FIFA Men's World Cup Finals,Ryan James
Ekkyō no yakyūshi,Satoshi Mori
"Program III. Dělnické Olympiady československé v Praze, 1934",Ladislav Sutnar
Historie tělesné výchovy a sportu,Ján Málinka
Complete Handbook of Pro Hockey 1980,Zander Hollander
Head Hits I Remember,Hank Bjorklund
Top World Series,Ryan James
Putting : Formula Theory and Practice,Andrew Cameron
Education and sports sector,Uganda. Ministry of Education and Sports (-2014)
Spor ve tasavvuf,Ali Çavuşoğlu
Hockey Crosswords,T. R. Grady
Long Fix,Stephen Graf
Great Sports Humor,Mac Davis
Guandu Qu wen hua ti yu lü you zhi (1978-2012),China). Wen hua ti yu lü you ju Guandu Qu (Kunming Shi
Great E-Sports Debates (Great Sports Debates),Meg Marquardt
"""Wie vom anderen Stern"" - Jüdischer Fußball in Wien (1909-1938)",Michael Lechner
Sports Clothes,Carmel Reilly
Offbeat Sports (Wild World of Sports),Jon Marthaler
Woman Enough,"Worley, Kristen, Schneller, Johanna"
"Spectacles sportifs, dispositifs d'écritures",Jean-François Diana
Las escuelas de la identidad,Eduardo Santa Cruz A.
"Sport, genre et vulnérabilité au XXe siècle",
Cena vítězství,Ota Pavel
Race in Play,Carl E. James
Xinjin Xian wen hua ti yu zhi (1984-2008),China). Wen hua ti yu guang bo dian shi he xin wen chu ban ju Xinjin Xian (Sichuan Sheng
Vividha krīḍāprakāra,Hiraji Sukadeo Patil
ha-Ḥaṿayah ha-olimpit,
(Un)fair zum Sieg?,Michael Jahn
L'innovation dans l'événement sportif,Olivier Bessy
Zu ausgewählten Einflussfaktoren der willkürlich initiierbaren Schnelligkeit,Uwe Wenzel
Naissance des sports dans le Morbihan,Stéphane Gachet
Sport en politiek,Bob van den Bos
"""Co mnie tak dzier-zy przi Tobie Orawo?""",Marek Liszka
Puteshestvie v stranu igr,A. Galit͡skiĭ
TSN 25 Years,The Sports Network
Great Sporting Moments,"Ian Harrison, Dave King"
I Am More Than My Name,Vance Singletary
Karatedo Esoteric Wisdom,Kousaku Yokota
Mensani,Ciaran Byrne
Sport and International Politics,Pierre Arnaud
Heritage Sites in the Borders,"Dent, J., McDonald, R."
Fizicheskai͡a︡ kulʹtura i sport v uslovii͡a︡kh rynka,M. S. Mirsaidov
Festivals and Events,n/a
Walking a Cross-Country Course,"Ian Stark, Tim Smith"
Sport et liberté,Pierre Mazeaud
Sport e libertà: utopia?,Vittorio Peri
Circus bodies,Peta Tait
Confessions of a Coach,Abby Minihan
Sports Crosswords,T. R. Grady
On the Ice,Christine Hjorth
"""Collie J"" Grambling's Man with the Golden Pen",Michael Hurd
Soccer Facts,Christine Hjorth
Official N. F. L. Record Manual 1973,Penguin Books Staff
Cheerleading,Thomas Kingsley Troupe
Baseball,Thomas Kingsley Troupe
Mad Dog,Tom McAuliffe
Cooperstown at the Crossroads,G. Scott Thomas
It ain't over 'til the fat lady sings,
Issues in sport,
Modificazioni reo-epatografiche dopo attività fisica,F. Brunelli
"Feel fit, come alive",Sports Council Staff
Zūrkhānah dar Īrān,Mahdī Abū al-Ḥasanī Taraqqī
Suicide in professional and amateur athletes,"David Lester, John F. Gunn"
Sportrecht,Lucien William Valloni
Goodrum Principle,"Tim Goodrum, Harold Michael Harvey"
Ultimate Tennessee Titans Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Sporcuların harbi 1877-1923,"Sönmez Buğra Yılmaz, İlker Şaffak"
Sports,Godfrey Robert
"Yun dong chuang shang xue, tui na yu an mo","Luping Zhang, Guoyao Chen"
Osmanlı'dan günümüze Bursa'da spor,İsmail Kemankaş
O pası gol yapamadım,Kerem Öncel
Ent'ŏt'einmŏnt'ŭ simnihak,Ŭn-yŏng Na
Shōwa Tennō to supōtsu,Yasuhiro Sakaue
Dang dai ti yu yi hua yan jiu,Weimin He
Sh!t about Movement You Should Know,"Brett Winchester, Andrew Hauser, Alan Jaeger, Will Carroll, Conor Harris"
9 Inning Dream un Sueño de Nueve Entradas,"Nicole Fernandez, Wendy Bustillo de Arco"
In-Game Individual Offensive Basketball,"Dean Graves, Markus Weinfurter, Tim Jeffers"
You and Everything After,Ginger Scott
Hawaiian Islands Ocean Dragons,Justin Curtis Ermer Lacche
Zhong yang Su qu hong se ti yu,Zhendong Ma
Sportyvni tovarystva i orhanizat︠s︡iï Z︠H︡ytomyrshchyny,O. S. Kukharsʹkyĭ
Sportparks,Christine Kämmerer
Xin Zhongguo ti yu 70 nian,China. Guo jia ti yu zong ju
WHAT the HORSE TOLD ME Volume Two : What's Next?,"Vaughn Knudsen, Kim Corpany-Knudsen"
Antarctica Altcoins,Justin Curtis Ermer Lacche
Summary of Cameron Hanes' Endure,I. R. B. Media
Anti-Bullying Through Sports,"Fred Spencer, Blyden, Elijah, Sr."
"Shashin de miru taiiku, supōtsu hyakunenshi",Hachirō Kaminuma
Story of Bigfoot,Jaxon Hayes
Story of Scooby-Doo,Jaxon Hayes
Story of Monster Mutt,Jaxon Hayes
Biker to Sailor,Bob Bitchin
From the press box,Buck Turnbull
Moon Meteorverse,Justin Curtis Ermer Laccje
Play Football Like Patrick Mahomes,J. J. Bryant
Sogang Min Kwan-sik kwa kŭ ŭi k'ŏlleksyŏn,Suwŏn Pangmulgwan
Dēta de miru supōtsu to jendā,Nihon Supōtsu to Jendā Gakkai
Domaći teren,Ozren Biti
Play Soccer Like Alex Morgan,J. J. Bryant
Whole Athlete Journal,Jordan Green
Diversión y Juegos,Kristy Stark
Mars Mahi-Mahi 2022 Official Yearbook,Justin Curtis Ermer Lacche
Summary of Brianna Madia's Nowhere for Very Long,I. R. B. Media
Cloverdale Forager,"Jim DeMartini, Sophia DeMartini"
Beaverton Baseball and Cricket Badshahs 2022 Yearbook,Justin Curtis Ermer Lacche
My Daddy Loves Clemson Football,"Michael Shoule, Christina Chiaramonte, Sara Lucas, Gus Katsanevakis"
Desporto em vez de política no São Tomé e Príncipe colonial,Augusto Nascimento
Nougo and His Basketball,Charles Levin
Research on the Teaching and Training System of Aerobics,Yiyuan Yang
Exploration on the Reform and Development of Senior Middle School Physical Education Teaching,Yongquan Cao
"Undong hanŭn mom kwa segye, ch'ŏrhak ŭl mannada",Sun-t'ae Ch'oe
Sailing at the U.S. Naval Academy,Robert W. McNitt
Sports facts,Norman S. Barrett
Yoga for sports,B. K. S. Iyengar
Filozoficzne i społeczne aspekty sportu i turystyki,"Jerzy Kosiewicz, Eligiusz Małolepszy"
The principles of sport marketing,Gary Bernstein
Šport a športovci Jánošíka 1937-2017,Martin Listmajer
Gli agoni olimpici,Luca Urciuoli
Kindai Nihon no budōron,Tetsuya Nakajima
"Fala, Galvão!",Galvão Bueno
Sport a hry ve starovékém světě,Věra Olivová
"Passione, gioco e agonismo",Italy) Biblioteca civica Villa Amoretti (Turin
He Luo ti yu shi,Songshan Gao
Esportes nos confins da civilização,Cleber Augusto Gonçalves Dias
Kumir,Arkadiĭ Rybak
Min zu min jian ti yu xue,Dongsheng Jiang
Xian Qin shen ti guan yu jing xia de Zhongguo gu dai ti yu wen hua,Yuanyuan Liu
Current issues in contemporary sport development,European Sport Development Network. Conference
Le sport en France à l'épreuve du racisme du XIXe siècle à nos jours,"Claude Boli, Patrick Clastres, Marianne Lassus, Patrick Kanner"
Ardahan'da geçmişten günümüze sporun yolculuğu,Talha Murathan
Olympic effort,W. Sim Butler
"Maboroshi no Tōkyō Gorin, Banpaku, 1940",Shin'ichi Fuma
Brasil,"Orlando Alves dos Santos Junior, Christopher Gaffney, Luiz Cesar de Queiroz Ribeiro"
Jia gu wen yu min zu chuan tong ti yu yin su yan jiu,Jinfeng Lu
Han'guk ch'eyuksa,"Yi, Che-hong (College teacher of physical education)"
Yūgeki to sono hokori,Shūji Terayama
Parità di genere nello sport,Luciano Senatori
Amari and Aida SOCCER Coloring & Activity Workbook for Kids!,"Carline Constant, Gregory Constant"
Harria,Juan Antonio Palacios
Erie Baseball & Softball 360 Volume 2,"Alan Swigonski, Patrick Cuneo"
Numbers and sports,"Patten, J. M."
Move! the Jack Smith Era of Savage Wrestling 1964-1988,"Kevin Hammes, Lyle Hammes, C. C. Hoffman"
Ancient Greek athletics,Harold D. Evjen
Agility Challenge Purposeful Practice Dog Agility Training Journal,Daisy Peel
La patria deportiva,"Walter R. Bonilla, Carlos Mendoza Acevedo"
Han'guk ŭi sŭp'och'ŭhak 70-yŏn,Yŏng-il Na
Sŭp'och'ŭ simnihak ŭi ihae wa chŏgyong,Chŏng-hŭi Chŏng
Big Ben Bolt,John Cullen Murphy
Les héros du sport,Sylvain Dufraisse
Courage makes the champion,Gene Schoor
Futbol yazıları,Ahmet Talimciler
"Nutrition for health, fitness, & sport",Melvin H Williams
World Cup & chuyện cá độ,Nhà xuất bản Lao động-xã hội
Sports and athletes,Noel Merino
"Sport, culture and society",Jerzy Kosiewicz
"Kỷ yếu Hội nghị triển khai công tác văn hóa, thể thao và du lịch năm 2008","Vietnam. Bộ văn hóa, thể thao, và du lịch"
Musculoskeletal and sports injuries,A. B. Corrigan
Sŭpʻochʻŭ wa pipʻyŏng,
Tairyoku supōtsu ni kansuru seron chōsa,Japan. Naikaku Sōri Daijin Kanbō. Kōhōshitsu
The sports rules book,Human Kinetics (Organization)
Winning!,Michael Lynberg
International research in sports biomechanics,Youlian Hong
Taehan chʻeyuk insa chʻongnam =,
Players all,Robert E. Rinehart
"Osnovy otbora, prognoza i kontroli︠a︡ v sporte",V. V. Afanasʹev
Olympic cities: 2012 and the remaking of London,Gavin Poynter
Sport und Gesellschaft,Thomas Kutsch
Rare and rugged sports,Albert Orbaan
International Olympic Academy,
Le sport est-il éducatif ?,
Lésions médullaires en pratique sportive,
Sports management,
Anthologie commentée des textes historiques de l'éducation physique et du sport,"Georges Vigarello, Gilbert Andrieu"
Les compétences,
Les adolescents et le sport,
Économie politique du sport,Wladimir Andreff
Momentaufnahmen,Klaus Ullrich
Nihon supōtsu jiten,Nichigai Asoshiētsu. Henshūbu
Sports involvement in changing Europe,"Jerzy Kosiewicz, Kazimierz Obodyński"
"Fighting Talk: Flimsy Facts, Sweeping Statements and Inspired Sporting Hunches","Murray, Colin"
The political economy of sport,John Nauright
Sport and American society,George H. Sage
Écrire le sport,"Philippe Baudorre, Myriam Boucharenc"
L'organisation sportive,William Gasparini
I discorsi per le feste e per i giochi,Pseudo-Dionysius of Halicarnassus
Vers les métiers de l'animation et du sport,Jean-Pierre Augustin
Les Émotions,
International perspectives on sport and exercise psychology,José Alves
O desporto para além do óbvio,Alexandre Mestre
Sports medicine,Bruce Reider
"Yowamushi Pedal, Vol. 2",Wataru Watanabe
Weltsportler als Christuszeugen,Helmfried Riecker
Outre-terre 08 - des peuples et des jeux (French Edition),Collectif
Sports comparisons,Diagram Group
On the Sports Field (First Sports Science),Nikki Bundey
Scottish/national vocational qualification in sport and recreation,
Statistics in Sport (Arnold Applications of Statistics Series),Jay Bennett
"Istorii︠a︡, sostoi︠a︡nie i problemy razvitii︠a︡ olimpiĭskogo dvizhenii︠a︡, fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta",
Sports and the adolescent,Paul G. Dyment
ISBS '92,n/a
Johnny Depp,Sarah Tieck
1985-yŏndo sŭpʻochʻŭ kwahak yŏng̕u kwaje chonghap pogosŏ,
Dicionário crítico de educação física,Fernando Jaime González
Employment law,Gil Fried
Tradyt︠s︡iï fizychnoï kulʹtury v Ukraïni,
Zhongguo ti yu tong shi jian bian,
"Jews, sports, and the rites of citizenship",Jack Kugelmass
Uncle John's bathroom reader sports spectacular,
Mongolyn úndésniĭ bókhiĭn túúkhén khurluud,B. T︠S︡ogtbaatar
"Two players, one goal?",Walter Tokarski
Chwaraeon a hamdden egnïol yng Nghymru,
Le Temps de l'excellence,
Sports illustrated for kids year in sports 2007,Sports Illustrated for Kids
La vita e altri giochi di squadra,Candido Cannavò
Nam-Pukhan chʻeyuk saŏp pigyo yŏnʼgu,Hang-nae Yi
Purnell's encyclopedia of sport,Norman S. Barrett
Law & amateur sports,Ronald J. Waicukauski
Can sport be bought?,
"Sport, culture, and the modern state",Richard S. Gruneau
Entertainment law in Canada,
Estudios sobre deporte,
Kỷ yếu Hội thảo phát triển kinh tế thể dục thể thao khi Việt Nam gia nhập WTO (26-28/12/2006),
Quest for excitement,Norbert Elias
Povijest sporta grada Osijeka,Zlata Živaković-Kerže
Sporṭ u-poliṭiḳah benleʼumit,Uriel Simri
Toppidrettens pris,Sigmund Loland
Rules of the game,Billy Wright
Outdoor sports,Gene Brown
Memorandum für die Entwicklung des Sports in Venezuela =,Liselott Diem
Sports and leisure careers,Geoff Barker
Thể dục thể thao cách mạng Việt Nam,
Suomi uskoi urheiluun,Antero Heikkinen
Sport a Torino,
Yedras labālanebratu,Fantāhun H̲āylé.
Idrottskamrater minns,
Sport,Hans Wieland
Nambuk chʻeyuk kyoryu kukche haksul taehoe pogosŏ,
Histoire du sport en France,Philippe Tétart
"Sipuro shel ""ha-Poʻel""",Emmanuel Gill
Event-sponsor personality fit and sponsor identification,Seema Gupta
Sportpolitik,"Günther Lüschen, Alfred Rütten"
Zur Messung der Flimmerverschmelzungsfrequenz im Sport,"Norbert Olivier, Reinhard Daugs"
Sociologie du sport,Eliane Perrin
Sportethik,"Claudia Pawlenka, Volker Caysa"
Nikephoros. 19. Jahrgang (2006),
Can lan Zhonghua wen ming,"Binjie Liu, Yang Wu"
Les métamorphoses du sport du XXe au XXIe siècle,Charles-Louis Foulon
The Complete book of indoor sports,Gene Brown
"Activités physiques et sportives, santé publique, prévention des conduites dopantes",
Safe practice in physical education,British Association of Advisers and Lecturers in Physical Education
"Jeux, sports et francophonie","Jean-Pierre Augustin, Christine Dallaire"
Guide to America's best sports bars,Mike Lessiter
La prima palestra fu di Ermes...,
Economics applied to sports,"Claude Jeanrenaud, Stefan Késenne"
Sport in the modern world: chances and problems,"Ommo Grupe, Helmut Baitsch"
Zhongguo Ao yun xian qu Zhang Boling,
"The legal status of sportsmen and sportswomen under international, European and Belgian national and regional law",R. Blanpain
Indoor sports,Gene Brown
Är idrotten fri?,"Mats Wickman, Gunder Andersson"
Normativnoe pravovoe obespechenie sfery fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i sporta,
Aspects penaux du droit du sport,André Kuhn
Sociologie du sport,Catherine Louveau
Sport in Denmark,
Illustrierte Geschichte des Arbeitersports (German Edition),"Hans Joachim Teichler, Gerhard Hauk"
L'opium sportif,Henri Vaugrand
Sports stories,Alan Durant
"Schulsport, Leistungssport, Breitensport",Gerhard Hecker
Australian sport--better by design?,Bob Stewart
Sportas tarpukario Lietuvoje,S. Stonkus
Sport en wetenschap,Hidde van der Ploeg
Sport in unserer Zeit,Ingomar Reinartz
Baranya megye testnevelés- és sporttörténete,Győző Bezerédy
100 Jahre Sportfotografie,Heinz Maegerlein
Ensayos sobre deportes,Luis Cantarero
Bedingungen sportwissenschaftlicher Forschung an Hochschulen in der Bundesrepublik Deutschland,Hermann Rieder
Sportmedizinische Grundlagen der Körpererziehung und des sportlichen Trainings,Gernot Badtke
Sports classics,Howard Siner
Unterrichtsforschung und Unterrichtsplanung,"Josef Recla, Karl Koch"
Sports and physical education in Finland,Joel Juppi
El Deporte en el libro antiguo,
Sports law,Mark Fewell
Soziologie des Sports,"Joachim Winkler, Kurt Weis"
The sociology of sport and physical education,Anthony Laker
Zwischen Kirchturm und Arena,"Ommo Grupe, Wolfgang Huber"
Freizeit- und Breitensport '85,Harald Binnewies
Whistle! W,Daisuke Higuchi
Swimming with piranhas,Howard Brody
It’s Great to Be a Fan in Colorado,Todd Kortemeier
Strategic Sport Marketing (Sport Management Series),David Shilbury
Advanced Marine Electrics and Electronics Troubleshooting,Ed Sherman
Remembering the Stick,Steven Travers
Training for the Uphill Athlete,"Steve House, Scott Johnston, Kilian Jornet"
Some Stories,Yvon Chouinard
Life in the trash lane,Mel Levine
Communicate! Sports Speeches,Ben Nussbaum
The Cost of These Dreams,Wright Thompson
Character education,"Donald R. Glover, Leigh Ann Anderson"
Ping Pong,Taiyō Matsumoto
Fair and foul,D. Stanley Eitzen
High-performance training for sports,"David Joyce, Daniel Lewindon"
This Day in Sports,Ernie Gross
Aolinpike jiao yu,Lihong Xu
Weird but true sports,National Geographic Kids
Introduction to Sport Marketing (Sport Management Series),Aaron C.T. Smith
The book of wildly spectacular sports science,"Connolly, Sean"
The best American sports writing,"Rick Telander, Glenn Stout"
Dream Catcher,Melinda Folse
Penn State sports stories and more,Mickey Bergstein
Zhong Mei zhi ye lan qiu lian sai wen hua jie du,Lei Wei
Level the playing field,Kristina Rutherford
Teaching sport concepts and skills : a tactical games approach for ages 7 to 18 - 3. edición,"Mitchell, Stephen A., Judith L. Oslin"
"Sport psychology : performance enhancement, performance inhibition, individuals, and teams - 2. edición",Nicholas T. Gallucci
Handbook of Embodied Cognition and Sport Psychology,Massimiliano Cappuccio
"Amazing Young Sports People Level 1 (Cambridge Discovery Readers, Level 1)",Mandy Loader
Children's Book of Sport,
Wounded lions,Ronald A. Smith
Disco Demolition,Steve Dahl
101 Wacky Sports Quotes,Jeff Parietti
More truly stupid sports quotes,Jeff Parietti
Everything sports,Eric Zweig
"Igor, Spot champion",Guido van Genechten
"The greatest sports excuses, alibis, and explanations",Jeff Parietti
San Francisco Bay Area sports,"Rita Liberti, Maureen Smith"
Good night yoga,Diane Kovanda
Game-day gigglers,Sam Schultz
An organizational case analysis of a voluntary sport organization,Trevor Slack
Girls with Guts!,Debbie Gonzales
Major Problems in American Sport History,Steven A. Riess
Tuesday Night at the Gardens - PRO WRESTLING IN LOUISVILLE,"Mark James, Jim Cornette"
More Than a Game,Matt Doeden
Vrachebnyĭ kontrolʹ v fitnese,S. D. Runenko
The Power of Sports,Michael Serazio
VINCE'S SECRET LOCKER Volume 2,KARL COYNE
Fightin' Words,Hock Hochheim
"The Complete Guide to Metal Boats, Third Edition",Bruce Roberts-Goodson
Boat Joinery and Cabinetmaking Simplified,Fred P. Bingham
Bodyslams!,Gary Michael Cappetta
Buying & selling sports collectibles on eBay,Bill Froloff
Kick Start,Dr. Emmet Thompson II
Sixgun Cartridges & Loads,Emer Keith
"Athletes, Ethics, and Morality",Martin Gitlin
"Athletes, Ethics, and Morality",Martin Gitlin
Elite Wrestling,"Tom Ryan, Julie Sampson"
The complete book of baseball signs and plays,Harold S. Southworth
A Mountaineer's Life,Allen Steck
Stadiums,Chris Bowman
Losing isn't everything,Curt Menefee
Update/1980,Gene Brown
The edge,"Pielke, Roger A. Jr"
Mentales Training,Jan Mayer
The PlayStation 2 & PlayStation Encyclopedia,"Paul Curthoys, Dan Amrich, Danny W. Lam, Lindsay Young, Lindsay Young, Jake Blackford"
Wicked good year,Steve Buckley
Keepers of the game,Dennis D'Agostino
Sport stinks,Justin Kemp
"In prusuit of the ""Mad"" Mullah","Malcolm McNeill , Arthur Charles Hugh Dixon"
World Cup expert,Pete May
Playing pro football,Paul Bowker
The executive athlete,Richard F. Gerson
Eight men out,"Sayles, John, Barbara Boyle, Jerry Offsay, Sarah Pillsbury, Midge Sanford"
The Julian Messner sports question & answer book,Edward F. Dolan
Performers and players,Irene M. Franck
Just joking sports,Joe Funk
The heritage,Howard Bryant
Athletics for all,Fred H. Harrison
The 7 Secrets of World Class Athletes,"Steven Yellin, Buddy Biancalana"
FINS AT 50: The Miami Dolphins: 50th Anniversary,Greg Cote
Home Ice Advantage,Tom Earle
Scholastic year in sports 2019,"Buckley, James, Jr"
Circling the bases,Andrew S. Zimbalist
Dochiratomo iemasen,Hideo Okuda
Yang yang yun dong hui,"Minggang Huang, Haihui Lai"
Yang yang yun dong hui,"Minggang Huang, Haihui Lai"
Any number can play,"Sullivan, George"
The sports curmudgeon,"Sullivan, George"
"Montevideo,  bog te video!",Vladimir Stanković
Yang yang yun dong hui,"Minggang Huang, Haihui Lai"
The math of sports,"Hope Martin, Susan Guengerich"
Gli sport,Emmanuelle Paroissien
All the right angles,Joel Levy
Te wu chao xin xing,Jingyi
Why we win,Billy Packer
Cheated,Jay M. Smith
The top of his game,W. C. Heinz
The big mile race,Leonard P. Kessler
Playing pro baseball,Brian Howell
The political economy of sport,John Nauright
It beats working,John Lardner
The ultimate book of sports lists,"Andrew Postman, Larry Stone"
Riding the magic carpet,Tom Anderson
The SAGE dictionary of sports studies,Dominic Malcolm
"A complete guide to fitness, sports & nutrition",Mary Anderson
It's only a game,"Charles M. Schulz, Jim Sasseville"
The Mad Dog 100,"Chris Russo, St. John, Allen."
Contest,Gary Genosko
Bay Area legends,Brian Michnowski
Entrenamiento de base en fútbol sala,Jesús Velasco Tejada
Go get that scholarship!,Nate Mast
The Anthropology of Sport and Human Movement: A Biocultural Perspective,Robert R. Sands
Thrill sports catalog,Consumer Guide Editors
Show me a hero,Jeanne Schinto
Free money for athletic scholarships,Laurie Blum
More Stan Fishchler's Sports Stumpers,Stan Fischler
Stan Fischler's Sports stumpers (Tempo books),Stan Fischler
Texte und Spiele,
Sport psychology,"David Lavalle, John Kremer, Aidan P. Morgan, Mark Williams"
The sports gene,David J. Epstein
Three men on third,Carl Sifakis
Hawaiʻi sports,Dan Cisco
Yang yang yun dong hui,"Minggang Huang, Haihui Lai"
Économie du sport,Jean-François Bourg
Yang yang yun dong hui,"Minggang Huang, Haihui Lai"
Yang yang yun dong hui,"Minggang Huang, Haihui Lai"
Yang yang yun dong hui,"Minggang Huang, Haihui Lai"
Hub fans bid kid adieu,John Updike
Budō,Alexander Bennett
Maehok kwa yŏlgwang,Hans Ulrich Gumbrecht
The prince of tennis,Takeshi Konomi
The best American sports writing 2013,"J. R. Moehringer, Glenn Stout"
Colin Kaepernick,Paul Hoblin
The SNES Omnibus,Brett Weiss
The SNES Omnibus,Brett Weiss
"Grand slams, hat tricks, and alley-oops",Robert Hendrickson
Exercise prescription,Kate Woolf-May
Wan pao ren sheng,Wenqi Zeng
The prince of tennis,Takeshi Konomi
The prince of tennis,Takeshi Konomi
Champion dans la tête,François Ducasse
Gol! Davaĭte igratʹ! =,Joe Marriott
Real-resumes for sports industry jobs,Anne McKinney
American pastimes,Red Smith
Ni yun dong dui le ma?,Siyuan Gan
The champion's mind,James A. Afremow
Pat Summerall's sports in America,Pat Summerall
Breaking ground,Alan Lelchuk
Ming ren yun dong jia xiao gu shi,Shumei Fang
Ökonomie des Tourismus durch Sportgrossveranstaltungen,Holger Preuss
The little book of fitness law,"Kuhne, Cecil C. III"
Welcome to Shopville,Jenne Simon
Computer science in sport,Arnold Baca
Yun dong Ying yu tong =,Shixiong Lai
Mariano Rivera,Jesse Florea
Análisis y control del rendimiento deportivo,A. A. Viru
Zvezdy olimpiĭskoĭ sbornoĭ Rossii,Konstantin Osipov
2010 el ano de los campeones,Josep González
The sporting repository,
A smart girl's guide to boys,Nancy Holyoke
Me encanta el fútbol =,Ryan Nagelhout
How champions think in sports and in life,Robert J. Rotella
"Fútbol, Jews, and the making of Argentina",Raanan Rein
Shin undō no seiri kagaku,"Ono, Mitsutsugu"
Landsailing,Scott Robert Hays
Know all about games & sports,Vijay Asthana
Strange sports stories,"Lauren Beukes, Natacha Bustos, Giulia Brusco, Wes Abbott, Mitchell, Mike (Comic book artist), Paul Pope"
Forging genius,Steven Goldman
Nate el grande,Lincoln Peirce
Fit not healthy,Vanessa Alford
This sporting life,David Storey
Legends,"Al LoCasale, Dave Newhouse"
On level terms,Ted Philipakos
Super gear,Jennifer Swanson
Ball sport trivia,Alf Alderson
Supōtsu senryū,Iizuka Shoten
De organisatie van de sport,R. Blanpain
The Gathering,
Povijest sporta u Virovitici,
Sports in the Aftermath of Tragedy: From Kennedy to Katrina,Michael Gavin
Raising money,Mel Welch
Concentration skills training in sport,Aidan P. Moran
Sport und soziale Arbeit,Norbert Fessler
Het Sociaal-rechtelijk statuut van de sportbeoefenaar,R. Blanpain
Sport e giochi nella Basilicata antica,Salvatore Bianco
SPORT AND FESTIVAL IN THE ANCIENT GREEK WORLD; ED. BY DAVID J. PHILLIPS,"David J. Phillips, Pritchard, David Dr, Ben Brown"
Yün dong da guan,Norman S. Barrett
The Language of Sport (Intertext),Adrian Beard
Voor lichaam & geest,Roland Renson
International sociology of sport,"Günther Lüschen, Karl-Heinrich Bette, Alfred Rütten"
Sport und Sozialisation,
Yorkshire at play,"Gary Firth, James Hagerty, Keith Laybourn"
Spirit of sport,Constance Sullivan
Kultura fizyczna-sport,Zbigniew Krawczyk
Championship track and field for women,"Fred Wilt, Tom Ecker, James G. Hay"
Psychological perspectives in youth sports,"Frank L. Smoll, Smith, Ronald Edward"
Media -- eros -- przemoc,Andrzej Gwóźdź
CRICKETING CULTURES IN CONFLICT: WORLD CUP 2003; ED. BY BORIA MAJUMDAR,"Boria Majumdar, J. A. Mangan"
Sport en recht,N. J. P. Giltay Veth
European cultures in sport,"Riordan, James, Arnd Krüger"
Bewegungslehre Sportmotorik,GÃƒÂ¼nter Schnabel
Law for recreation and sport managers,Doyice Cotten
1979 season,Zander Hollander
The U.S. sports nutritionals market,Packaged Facts (Firm)
La forme sociale des organisations sportives,Margareta Baddeley
"Dokumente zu Sport, Sporterziehung und Sportwissenschaft",Wilfried Kindermann
Psicología del deporte,Dietmar Martin Samulski
Exciting Entertainment Inventions (Awesome Inventions You Use Every Day),Ryan Jacobson
The social roles of sport in Caribbean societies,Michael A. Malec
Český olympismus-100 let,
A Catalogue of sports films,Sports Council
Great American sports and adventure vacations,
Werbetätigkeit und Sportvermarktung,"Wolfgang Grunsky, Gunter Greffenius"
"By the kind permission of His Excellency the Governor, and under the patronage of Col. Benjamin S. Stebelin and officers of the Royal Engineers, the athletic sports, and races of the above corps, will take place on Wednesday the 28th May 1862 ...",
British pastimes,
Sporting Nation: Celebrating Australia's Sporting Life,Paul Cliff
Motive und Einstellungen im Sport,Ralf Erdmann
Dynamic development in todays sports information,Josef Recla
A l'école de l'aventure,"Christian Pociello, Daniel Denis"
It's a go!,Canada. Canadian Heritage
Ethique et spectacle sportif,Charles Coutel
Sport et collectivités locales,
Sociedades anónimas deportivas,Ignacio Arroyo
"Pickle, pepper, and tip-in, too",Kevin Nelson
Sport sociology,"Andrew Yiannakis, Merrill J. Melnick, Thomas D. McIntyre"
Urheilun tulevaisuus,"Antti O. Arponen, Kalevi Heinilä"
Sport and physical education in Jewish history,Manfred Lämmer
How to play the game of your life,"Selleck, George A."
Hottest Dragsters and Funny Cars (Wild Wheels!),Jim Gigliotti
"Sport and Culture in Early Modern Europe / Le Sport dans la Civilisation de l'Europe Pré-Moderne (Essays and Studies, Vol. 20)",John McClelland
Position statement on the physiological assessment of the elitecompetitor,
"Meia encarnada, dura de sangue","Ruy Carlos Ostermann, Tabajara Ruas"
The practice of sport psychology,Gershon Tenenbaum
Sports Day,Nick Butterworth . Mick Inkpen
"Microbial diseases of occupations, sports, and recreations",C. H. Collins
Sport matters,
Volunteers in sports clubs,"Geoff Nichols, Michael F. Collins"
Great sporting moments,n/a
SPORT TOURISM: CONCEPTS AND THEORIES; ED. BY HEATHER GIBSON,Heather J. Gibson
Ao yun bai ke =,
The Lincoln library of sports champions,
Best practice in sport and recreation for tourism development within APEC economies,Asia Pacific Economic Cooperation (Organization)
Zur Sportspiel-Forschung,Rolf Andresen
Safe practice in physical education and school sport,
Most Notorious Curses of All Time (The Legendary World of Sports),Dave Campbell
The Asthmatic child in play and sport,"S. Oseid, A. M. Edwards"
Reading Power Set 4,Heather Feldman
Deporte y revolución,Mauro Pascolini
Marketing esportivo ao vivo,
Sport bewegt Europa,Diethelm Blecking
Dinamo. Entsiklopediya,Author
Vek futbola,P Lanfranshi
Sport im Alltag von Jugendlichen,"Wolf-Dietrich Brettschneider, Jürgen Baur, Andrea Abele"
"Official rules of sports & games, 1988-89",Reginald Moore
Sports of the times,"Gene Brown, Arleen Keylin, Daniel Lundy"
"Ethics, sport and leisure","Alan Tomlinson, Scott Fleming"
Sports law,"Jones, Michael E."
Manual of Athletic Taping,
"East Side, West Side","Ritter, Lawrence S."
"Oxygen uptake kinetics in sport, exercise and medicine",Andrew M. Jones
The Book of sports quotes,Bert Randolph Sugar
"Games, puzzles, and toys",Smithsonian Institution
"Die Entwicklung des Sports in Nordwestdeutschland, 1945-1949",Wolfgang Buss
Sport sociology,Andrew Yiannakis
Einführung in die Sportwissenschaft,Heinz-Egon Rösch
Seven-up book of Irish sport,Malachy Logan
Han Ying ti yu guan yong ci yu fen lei ci hui =,Weicheng Lin
A Sportágak pszichológiai problémái,
Sports et télévision,"Pierre Gabaston, Bernard Leconte"
ESPN,Howie Schwab
Sport and international relations,"Roger Levermore, Adrian Budd, Boria Majumdar, J. A. Mangan"
"SPORT, MEDIA, CULTURE: GLOBAL AND LOCAL DIMENSIONS; ED. BY ALINA BERNSTEIN","Kinsella, John, McKenzie Wark"
L'endurance,
"The 1904 Olympic Games: Results for All Competitors in All Events, With Commentary (History of the Early Olympic Games 3)",Bill Mallon
"Baseball Players of the 1950s: A Biographical Dictionary of All 1,560 Major Leaguers",Rich Marazzi
Racconti di gloria,Tommaso Pellizzari
Sports pioneers,"Dieter Buse, Jim Tester"
"Sport, the arts and social life in the past",
European Convention on Spectator Violence and Misbehaviour at Sports Events and in particular at Football Matches,Great Britain
The IOC and its cultural policy forum,
Success from within,
Beiträge zu Kognition und Motorik,Erwin Hahn
"Sports and games almanac, 1979",Norman Lewis Smith
Raising a good sport in an in-your-face world,"Selleck, George A."
Khelādhūlāẏa Tripurā,
Sporting triangles,Chris Rhys
The Commonwealth Games,Nick Hunter
Konzentration und Leistung,"Jan Peters Janssen, Erwin Hahn"
Sciences sociales et sports,Wladimir Andreff
"The Atlas of Sports: Who Plays What, Where, and Why",Alan Tomlinson
Hottest Muscle Cars (Wild Wheels!),Bob Woods
Hottest Motorcycles (Wild Wheels!) (Wild Wheels! (Enslow)),Bob Woods
The Sports collectors bible,Bert Randolph Sugar
Beiträge zur Zusammenarbeit im Sport mit der Dritten Welt,"Rolf Andresen, Hermann Rieder"
Vision and sport,"Ian M. Cockerill, William W. MacGillivary"
Zoloti storinky olimpiĭsʹkoho sportu Ukraïny,
"Sport, Racism and Social Media (Routledge Research in Sport, Culture and Society)","Neil Farrington, Lee Hall, Daniel Kilvington, John Price, Amir Saeed"
I heard it from the coach,DeWayne King
Catalogue de l'exposition,
Greatest Coaches of All Time (Legendary World of Sports),Barry Wilner
Personna year book of sports,Robert Martin
"TALHADAS ""Um olhar no passado""",Pedro de Bastos Veiga
Die Slawische Sokolbewegung,Diethelm Blecking
Sports and Games/Los Deportes y Los Juegos (Wordbooks/Libros De Palabras),Mary Berendes
Sport et développement humain,
Irasuto ni yoru saishin supōtsu rūru hyakka,
Beiträge zur psychischen Regulation sportlicher Handlungen,
Animal Antics,Neil Griffiths
Lillywhites sports injuries handbook,J. P. R. Williams
Gordie,Detroit Free Press
Should Girls Play Sports With Boys?,Amy B. Rogers
Tennis Balls and Rotten Prawns,Tim Power
Desktop Tetherball,Alan Goldsher
Namath,Mark Kriegel
Secrets of Aikido,John Stevens
Der SS-Sport,Berno Bahro
Nihon no dentō kyōgi,Tsuneo Sōgawa
Sports,Carol Diggory Shields
Sports analytics and data science,Thomas W. Miller
Sports economics,Paul Downward
The Sports illustrated 2001 sports almanac,Sports Illustrated.
Sports culture in Latin American history,David Sheinin
Weird sports and wacky games around the world,Victoria Williams
Daisy and the trouble with sports day,Kes Gray
Yue wan yue jian kang,Ye Liu
Sports business unplugged,Rick Burton
"The shared origins of football, rugby, and soccer",Christopher Rowley
The mindful athlete,George Mumford
Kandō nihon no daiichigō monogatari nanahyakunanajūnana,Nihon hajimete shūshū iinkai
"Get Set, Go!",Sasha Morton
"Qigong of the Center, Essence of Taijiquan",Jan Diepersloot
Sport in the Greek and Roman Worlds,Thomas Francis Scanlon
Financing the sport enterprise,Thomas H. Sawyer
Adventure Sports Coaching,"Matt Berry, Chris Hodgson"
Women in Sports,Katie Kawa
The Science of Basketball,Norman D. Graubart
Sociological Perspectives on Sport,Robert E. Washington
Heaven on the Hardwood,Brady Hammond
Cabinet 56,"Augusto Corriere, Leland Durantaye, Hal Foster, Adam Jasper, Carol Mavor, Carlin Wing"
Examining Sport Histories,"Richard Pringle, Murray Phillips"
Psychosocial Strategies for Athletic Training,"Megan D. Granquist PhD  ATC, Jennifer Jordan Hamson-Utley PhD  ATC  LAT, Laura J. Kenow MS  ATC, Jennifer Stiller-Ostrowski PhD  ATC  LAT"
New York City,Sam Moussavi
The Bob Verdi collection,Bob Verdi
The Most Fun You'll Have at a Cage Fight,Rory Douglas
Tons of top 10 sports lists,Brad Herzog
Big Stars Big Pictures,Sports Illustrated Kids
The Will to Carry on,Tarhonda White
"Science of Sport, Exercise and Physical Activity in the Tropics",Andrew Edwards
Great Sports,Teddy Borth
Surfing Guide to Southern California,David H. Stern
Workplace Concepts for Athletic Trainers,"Stephanie Mazerolle PhD  ATC  LAT, William Pitney EdD  ATC  FNATA"
"N64 Magazine Double Game Guide +, No. 15",
"N64 Magazine Double Game Guide +, No. 26",Mark Green
"N64 Magazine Double Game Guide +, No. 17",James Ashton
Careers in entertainment and sports,WetFeet (Firm)
Football and Literature in South America,David Wood
Advances in the Psychology of Sport and Exercise,Changiz Mohiyeddini
Golf Quotes,Joe Vanek
Patterns in Sports,Rebecca Felix Rebecca Felix
Aikido,John Stevens
Die Konstruktion des öffentlichen Sports und seiner Helden in der Tagespresse der Weimarer Republik,Swantje Scharenberg
Fast Break Sports,"Sue Carter, Dan Krier"
Kevin Durant in the Community,Matt Anniss
"N64 Magazine Double Game Guide +, No. 14",Daniel Glenfield
"N64 Magazine Double Game Guide +, No. 18",James Ashton
"N64 Magazine Double Game Guide +, No. 16","Daniel Glenfield, James Ashton"
Five Big Mountains,David Schaeffer
Duke Nukem 64,Craig Wessel
"N64 Magazine Double Game Guide +, No. 12",Daniel Glenfield
"N64 Magazine Double Game Guide +, No. 13",DMA Design
Beginner's Guide to Guns & Shooting,Clair F Rees
A Modern Dry-Fly Code,Vincent C. Marinaro
Fight Sports and American Masculinity,Christopher David Thrasher
Nine Innings for the King,Jim Leeke
Peyton & Eli Manning,Matt Anniss
Tales from the Trails,T Duren Jones
"Researching leisure, sport and tourism",Jonathan Long
Factfile Cymru,Alun Wyn Bevan
Freedom Found,Warren Miller
Strength and power in sport,
Technical signs,Mindy Hopper
Winning fights,Phillip M. Stephens
Superfans,George Dohrmann
Sports Emergency Care: A Team Approach,"Robb Rehberg PhD  ATC  CSCS  NREMT  CF, Jeff G. Konin PhD  ATC  PT  FACSM"
Yun dong xue Ying wen =,Yiping Liang
"Water Sports (Super Sports (Austin, Tex.).)",David Jefferis
Water sports,David Jefferis
Mr. Punch's sports and pastimes,
Toward a philosophy of sport,Harold J. VanderZwaag
The kids' guide to sports media,Shane Frederick
The Salt Lake loonie,Brett Matlock
Ripley's believe it or not!,Geoff Tibballs
Zhong xi fang ti yu wen hua bi jiao =,Tao Yang
Scrapbooking sports,Kerry Arquette
God bless the Spectrum,
100 questions & answers about sports nutrition and exercise,Lilah Al Masri
Chʻŏngsonyŏn kwa sahoe chʻeyuk,
Exploring exercise science,Gregory S. Wilson
Tarbut ha-bidur u-mivne ha-bidur la-hamonim be-Erets Yiśraʼel ha-Romit ṿe-hishtaḳfutam bi-meḳorot Ḥazal,Zeʼev Weiss
Principles and practice of sport management,"Carol A. Barr, Mary A. Hums"
INFO IPA SPORTS PA,Mike Meserole
DK ultimate sports lists,Mike Meserole
"The ultimate book of sports lists, 1998",Mike Meserole
Perspectives on cognition and action in sport,Markus Raab
Their sporting legacy,
Dressage,Penny Dowdy
Contemporary athletics compendium,James Harry Humphrey
"Xian dai Ying Han, Han Ying ti yu da ci dian",Hui Tian
Kakkuk ŭi Ollimpʻik mit chʻeyuk chinhŭng kwanʼgyepŏp,Korea (South). Pŏpchechʻŏ
INFO IPA SPORTS 96 PA (Espn Information Please Sports Almanac),Mike Meserole
Selected papers,Robert J. Paddick
Coping in sport,Adam R. Nicholls
"Comentarios a la ley contra la violencia, el racismo, la xenofobia y la intolerancia en el deporte","Alberto Palomar Olmeda, Eduardo Gamero Casado"
Making the team,Jay Johnson
Essential readings in sport and exercise psychology,Michael Bar-Eli
Psychology gets in the game,"Christopher D. Green, Ludy T. Benjamin"
Sports matters of fact,Damaine Vonada
Tairyoku supōtsu ni kansuru seron chōsa,Japan. Naikaku Sōri Daijin Kanbō. Kōhōshitsu
At play =,"Kathleen Petelinsek, E. Russell Primm"
"EU, sport, law and policy","Simon Gardiner, Richard Parrish, Robert C. R. Siekmann"
Formação e desenvolvimento de pessoal em lazer e esporte,"Seminário de Políticas Públicas de Esporte e Lazer (2nd 2002 Porto Alegre, Brazil)"
You're wrong and you're ugly,Sid Rosenberg
Philosophical perspectives on gender in sports,Paul Davis
Handbuch Sportmanagement,"Christoph Breuer, Ansgar Thiel, Michael Bar-Eli"
Supōtsu roppō,
Idei fizicheskogo vospitanii︠a︡ v istorii zarubezhnoĭ gumanisticheskoĭ pedagogiki,T. I. Lobacheva
Punch lines,Phil Berger
Sports et loisirs,Marcel Thouin
Zhongguo ti yu bai ke quan shu =,
"Sport, fête et société",
Nikephoros. 17. Jahrgang (2004),
Biomechanical characteristics of technique in certain chosen sports,
The main event,Sherrie Voss Matthews
Medical problems in athletes,Peter A. Fricker
Sportphilosophie,Jürgen Court
Tuyển tập nghiên cứu khoa học thể dục thẻ̂ thao năm 2005,
Sport et marketing public,Christopher Hautbois
"Sportpsychologie, wofür? =","Guido Schilling, Gunter Pilz"
"Sefer ha-""Makabi""","Histadrut ""Makabi"" Yiśraʼel. Ṿeʻidah ha-Artsit"
Quy định mới về chính sách khuyến khích phát triển các cơ sở cung ứng dịch vụ ngoài công lập,Nhà xuất bản Chính trị quốc gia
Mother's taxi,Shona M. Thompson
Pragmaṭiyut mul zikaron,Eyal Gerṭman
"Aspeḳṭim shel ""Modernah"" ba-""Shṭeṭl"" be-Polin",Leʼah Eldor
Istorii︠a︡ sporta Bolʹshogo Sochi,S. A. Arti︠u︡khov
China,Kim Dramer
Sport e fascismo,"Maria Canella, Sergio Giuntini"
Advances in sport psychology,Thelma S. Horn
Sŭpʻochʻŭ yongŏ sajŏn,
Fat guys shouldn't be dancin' at halftime,Chet Coppock
"Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura, sport, biomekhanika, bezopasnostʹ zhiznedei︠a︡telʹnosti",I︠A︡. K. Koblev
The economics of sports,Michael Leeds
Klassiker und Wegbereiter der Sportwissenschaft,"Jürgen Court, Eckhard Meinberg"
Sports,Ferguson Publishing
Sociology of sport and social theory,Earl Smith
Istorii︠a︡ sporta Bolʹshogo Sochi,S. A. Arti︠u︡khov
Imagen social de los Juegos Mediterráneos y hábitos deportivos de la sociedad almeriense,"Vicente Añó Sanz, Cornelio Águila Soto"
"Lịch sử thẻ̂ dục thẻ̂ thao tỉnh Bá̆c Giang, 1945-2005",
Testkultúra-elméleti és kutatás-módszertani alapismeretek,György Gyetvai
Psikhicheskai︠a︡ nagruzka v sporte vysshikh dostizheniĭ,B. P. I︠A︡kovlev
Sto godina športa na Sveučilištu u Zagrebu,
"Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura, sport, biomekhanika, bezopasnostʹ zhiznedei︠a︡telʹnosti",I︠A︡. K. Koblev
Managing voluntary sport organizations,"Robinson, Leigh, Richard Palmer"
Elapsed time at the Olympics,John Lockyer
Pangsong silsi chonghap pogosŏ,
Shintai no seiji gijutsu,"Kurihara, Akira"
Exercise and sports cardiology,
Handbuch Sport und Geschlecht,"Ilse Hartmann-Tews, Dorothee Alfermann"
Umbruch und Kontinuität im Sport,"Andreas Luh, Edgar Beckers"
"Idrott, krig och nationell gemenskap",Johnny Wijk
Moskva azarta i zabav,Marina Kudimova
ha-Sporṭ bi-reʼi ha-mishpaṭ,Derorah Pilpel
"SNIPES journal index, 1978-1987",
Ruby scores a goal,Rosemary Wells
Milah zo milah,Uri Afek
Sport in America,David Kenneth Wiggins
The complete idiot's guide to sports nutrition,"Dawn Weatherwax, Sonia Weiss"
"Hergele ḳeriʼah, bilui ṿi-sporṭ",Israel. Lishkah ha-merkazit li-sṭaṭisṭiḳah
"Introduction to physical education, excercise science, and sport studies",Angela Lumpkin
Rules of the game,"Matthew Mills Stevenson, Michael Martin"
Korruption im Sport,
"Bobsleigh, luge, and skeleton",Robin Johnson
ha-Makabiyot be-Erets-Yiśraʼel,Haim Wein
Performance-enhancing technologies in sports,Thomas H. Murray
Il gioco duro dell'integrazione : l'intercultura sui campi da gioco,Davide Zoletto
Esli b snova nachatʹ,I︠U︡ Volozhanin
Nambuk tʻongil kiban chosŏng kwa minjok chŏntʻong chʻeyuk,Minjok T'ongil Ch'eyuk Yŏn'guwŏn (Korea)
Psychology in football,Mark Nesti
ha-ʻArvim be-Yiśraʼel ṿeha-sporṭ ha-Yiśreʼeli,Simpozyon le-zikhro shel seren Yitsḥaḳ Hokhman (1999)
USA today snapshots,USA Today Staff
Führerwettkampfordnung der Hitler-Jugend,
Régimen jurídico de la violencia en el deporte,
Addysg gorfforol ac astudio chwaraeon,Colin Isaac
Zhong Ying Han Aolinpike ti yu ci dian =,Honglie Tian
Batboys and the world of baseball,Neil David Isaacs
From season to season,Joseph L. Price
The Total Package: A Novel,Stephanie Evanovich
"Racing on the Tour de France, and other stories of sports",Zaner-Bloser (Firm)
The law of sport,Legal Research Foundation (University of Auckland)
Le Dirigeant sportif bénévole,Eric Bournazel
"Sports, jeunesses et logiques d'insertion",Bertrand Sachs
All sports alphabetical price guide,"Krause Publications, Inc"
The Sports collectors bible,Bert Randolph Sugar
Sport and modern social theorists,Richard Giulianotti
Pour un humanisme du sport,Pierre de Coubertin
Informationsverarbeitung und Handlungskontrolle im Sportspiel,"Jan Peters Janssen, Heinz Mechling"
Sport for all,"Joy Standeven, Ken Hardman, Dick Fisher"
Sport nach der Lebensmitte,"Paul Jakobi, Heinz Egon Rösch"
"How to watch the Olympic games, summer 1976",Andy O'Brien
Sportyvnyĭ olimp Ukraïny,Vadym Bolhov
"Sportove tovarystvo ""Ukraïna"" (Lʹviv)",
Leistungssport in der Erfolgsgesellschaft,Frank Grube
Sports vision,
Sport and leisure,"Rowe, David, Geoffrey Lawrence"
"Blood, sweat & tears",Neil Cadigan
Transformación de clubes de futbol y baloncesto en sociedades anónimas deportivas,
"Kültür ve spor, 1930-1995","Ahmet Kal'a, Sedat Murat"
Idræt og sundhed,
"SPORT AND GENDER IDENTITIES: MASCULINITIES, FEMININITIES AND...; ED. BY CARA CARMICHAEL AITCHISON",Cara Aitchison
True Gris,Ed Grisamore
Erbe und Auftrag,
Sport in the classroom,David L. Vanderwerken
La santé et le sport amateur,
The fastest game on two feet,Alice Low
"Citius, altius, fortius",
A pie plate in the sky and other poems about how sports began,Alice Low
Safe practice in physical education,
Juventud y deporte : ley gneral de la juventud,
Make the right call,Drew Bledsoe
Országos Testnevelés- és Sportegészségügyi Intézet,
The Penguin book of Australian sporting anecdotes,"Richard Smart, Philip Derriman"
Körperkultur und Sport in der DDR,Hajo Bernett
Human resource management in Olympic sport organisations,P. Chelladurai
El caso Bosman,R. Blanpain
Professional sport,
Nat︠s︡ionalʹnoe zakonodatelʹstvo o fizicheskoĭ kulʹture i sporte,
Interceptive actions in sport,K. Davids
Black sportsmen,Ernest Cashmore
Sport in the global village,Ralph C. Wilcox
(Re)Presenting Wilma Rudolph (Sports and Entertainment),"Rita Liberti, Maureen M. Smith"
Japan,Philip Brooks
United States,Philip Brooks
Scottish/National vocational qualification in sport and recreation,
Sport and the working class in modern Britain,"Holt, Richard"
Principles of Athletic Training Ready Notes,Daniel D. Arnheim
Közművelődési és sportstatisztika,Hungary. Központi Statisztikai Hivatal
Sports schools in Finland,Ian Thomson
Physiologie appliquée de l'activité physique,François Péronnet
"Bewegung, Spiel und Lernen im Sport",
"Evolution de l'emploi du temps au Québec, 1986-1992",
Il pomeriggio dell'atleta stanco,Nicola Fano
Sports and public health,
Le Sport,
"Sport, Dienst am Menschen","Paul Jakobi, Heinz-Egon Rösch"
Aspects de la réussite sportive,
Research methodology for sport and exercise science,J. Borms
Texte zur Soziologie des Sports,"Kurt Hammerich, Heinemann, Klaus"
Watch it!,
Venster op sport,
John Cena,Tim O'Shei
Fizicheskai︠a︡ kulʹtura i sport Rossii--kto estʹ kto,
The Undertaker,Tim O'Shei
Trends in sports,"T. J. Kamphorst, Kenneth Roberts"
A sporting declaration,Manfred Jurgensen
Die Anfänge des modernen Sports in der Renaissance,Arnd Krüger
"Zhongguo ti tan da ju jiao, 1949-1999",
Hombres en juego,Edgar Montiel
Legislación deportiva y reglamentos de los juegos,
"Sportwissenschaftliche Erkenntnis, sportpraktische Erfahrung",
Il diritto dello sport,"A. Merone, Mario Tortora"
Sport,"Williams, Gareth"
"Physical education, sport and leisure","Jean O'Neill, Elizabeth B. Murdoch, Scott Fleming"
Sport policy,Nils Asle Bergsgard
Italy,Miles Harvey
Understanding business & legal aspects of the sports industry,
Relevant topics in athletic training,Edmund J. Burke
Turn- und Sportvereine,Helmut Digel
Enciclopedia Salvat de los deportes,Juan Salvat
Alltagssport in der DDR,
Hole-in-One Adverbs (Grammar All-Stars),"Doris Fisher, D. L. Gibbs"
Song Yuan hui hua,
SoccerTalk,"Gardner, Paul"
Sports participation in Scotland 1990,
Les cahiers de droit du sport,
Ocio y deporte en España,
Management in Sportvereinen und -verbänden,Christoph Niessen
Sport und Sportwissenschaft,"Manfred Letzelter, Norbert Müller"
"Ying Han, Han Ying ti yu da pei ci dian =",Yuling Chen
Arbitral and disciplinary rules of international sports organisations,Janwillem Soek
Go for it!,n/a
Making the right decisions,
Aolinpike ci hui da quan,
Desporto português,
Sport and national identity in the post-war world,"Smith, Adrian"
What's the Score,Rolf E. Aaseng
The 1929 Bunion Derby: Johnny Salo and the Great Footrace across America (Sports and Entertainment),Charles Kastner
Die wirtschaftliche Bedeutung des Sports,
"Arbeit, Sport und DDR-Gesellschaft","Dieter Voigt, Sabine Gries"
So you think you're a sports fan?,
Into the field of play,"Jones, Lloyd"
Handlungsansätze des Hochschulsports im vereinten Deutschland,"Karin Fehres, Sven Güldenpfennig"
Rowing,
Die Soziologie des Sports,"Günther Lüschen, Kurt Weis"
Grass roots & schoolyards,Nelson Campbell
Official rules of sports & games,H. Radcliffe Wilson
Le Sport en Grande-Bretagne et aux Etats-Unis,"Atherton, John"
Arts and entertainment in Louisiana,Patricia Brady
The Guinness dictionary of sports quotations,
"The International Olympic Academy IOA through its lectures, 1961-1998",Norbert Müller
Nagy szentesi  sportkönyv,
Von den ritterlichen Exercitien zur modernen Bewegungskultur,Wolfgang Buss
Sport mit Sondergruppen,"Hermann Rieder, Jochen Werle"
The best American sports writing,David Halberstam
Si chou zhi lu ti yu wen hua lun ji,"Chongshen Li, Jinmei Li"
Menschen im Sport,Heinz-Egon Rösch
Sports science projects,Madeline P. Goodstein
Reference Shelf: Sports in America,H. W. Wilson
Les politiques au stade,Denis Jallat
Le Sport en pleine mutation,
Violence in sports,Jeffrey A. Margolis
Sport and values,Jerzy Kosiewicz
Das Grosse Trimm-Buch,
Beiträge zum visuomotorischen Lernen im Sport,Reinhard Daugs
"Aufsuchende, akzeptierende, abenteur- und bewegungsorientierte, subjektbezogene Sozialarbeit mit rechten, gewaltbereiten jungen Menschen",Gunter Pilz
"Arts, culture, sports & recreation",Canada. Human Resources Development Canada
Empirische Methoden in der Sportpsychologie,Hermann Rieder
Sports in modern America,"William J. Baker, Carroll, John M."
"Managing sport, fitness, and recreation programs",William F. Stier
La Recherche de la performance,
Il rapporto di lavoro dello sportivo,
"Hopscotch, hangman, hot-potato, and ha, ha, ha",Jack Maguire
"The rock, the curse, and the hub",Randy Roberts
Wild places and gentle breezes,Jim Klobuchar
Encyclopedia of sports,Martin Tyler
L'Histoire en mouvements: Le sport dans la société française (XIXe-XXe siècle) (French Edition),Ronald H. Hubscher
Entertainment law and sports law,Gordon I. Kirke
Sport : Photographier l'exploit,Gilbert Grellet
"Gender, Body and Sport in Historical and Transnational Perspectives",Annette R. Hofmann & Arnd Krüger (eds.) Susan J. Bandy
Le Développement du système de transport de l'oxygène chez les jeunes adultes,Claude Bouchard
Sportwissenschaft im Aufriss,
Sport tourism,Joy Standeven
Sports of the Times,"Gene Brown, Arleen Keylin, Daniel Lundy"
Traditionelle Bewegungskultur und moderner Sport,Knut Dietrich
Sportförderung in Argentinien,Liselott Diem
Biologie et pratique sportive,"Henri Lamendin, G. Avanzini"
Sports & entertainment marketing,Lois Schneider Farese
Inside the minds,
Rééducation des traumatismes sportifs,"Simon, Lucien"
Sports in America,Sarah Flowers
Sports and the humanities,William J. Baker
Sport zwischen Disziplinierung und neuen sozialen Bewegungen,"Hubert Ch Ehalt, Otmar Weiss"
"Play, leisure, and quality of life",Maria Allison
"Sport, éducation et art, XIXe-XXe siècles",Thierry Terret
Directory of psychological tests in the sport and exercise sciences,Andrew C. Ostrow
Sport et progrès de l'homme,
Sports,"Gene Brown, Arleen Keylin"
Heart of a champion,Pirjo Kristiina Virtanen
Girls got game,Sue Macy
"Concurso de relatos ""Navarra deporte""",
Sports jokes,Viki Woodworth
Future sports,"Jack Dann, Gardner R. Dozois"
Sportphilosophie,Volker Caysa
Essays on sport history and sport mythology,"Allen Guttmann, Donald G. Kyle, Gary D. Stark"
SPORT IN SOUTH ASIAN SOCIETY: PAST AND PRESENT; ED. BY BORIA MAJUMDAR,"Boria Majumdar, J. A. Mangan"
Management des organisations de services sportifs,
Wychowanie fizyczne i sport w badaniach naukowych,Eugeniusz Wachowski
Sport im kommunalen Wirkungskreis,"Burmeister, Joachim"
Fifty years of great writing,Rob Fleder
50 år med Stockholms-alliansen,
Idrett og jus,
The tournaments,Paul J. Deegan
World of sport,
"Rheumatology, The Interdisciplinary Concept",
Sport leadership,
Andrology in Latin countries,
"Körper, Kultur und Ideologie",
Une histoire culturelle du sport,
Sport and the economy of Scotland,Pieda (Firm)
2007 ESPN sports almanac,"Mike Morrison, Gerry Brown"
Careers in sport compendium,Carolynn Rankin
Sports fitness and sports injuries,Thomas Reilly
Risikosportarten,Wolfgang Gitter
Sport and identity in the North of England,"Hill, Jeff, Williams, Jack"
Sports and games in Canadian children's books,Irene Elizabeth Aubrey
Physiologie du sport et de l'exercice,Jack H. Wilmore
Exercise and Sport Sciences Review,Jack H. Wilmore
The Story of Rhodesian sport,
We'll support you evermore,"Ian Archer, Trevor Royle"
Huarong xian wen hua ti yu zhi,
Ti yu da ci dian,
Nutrition in exercise and sport,Ira Wolinsky
Soziale Einflüsse im Sport,Dorothee Alfermann
Le rôle du sport dans la société,
Wychowanie fizyczne i sport w badaniach naukowych,Eugeniusz Wachowski
Sport worlds,Joseph A. Maguire
Sport psychology,"Jerry R. May, Michael J. Asken"
San Diego sports guide,Alex Farnsley
The cultural bond,J. A. Mangan
The Oxford companion to Australian sport,Wray Vamplew
Encyklopedie tělesné kultury,
Sport- und Kultursponsoring,Arnold Hermanns
Oikonomia kai athlētismos,Loukēs Athanasiou
Educação física/ciências do esporte,Silvana Vilodre Goellner
"Sport, psychanalyse et science",Marie-Hélène Brousse
The best of Benson,Lee Benson
Personality and performance in physical education and sport,H. T. A. Whiting
The asphalt athlete,Barry Tarshis
Entertainment and sports law,Graham Henderson
Entertainment and sports law,Graham Henderson
The European Union and sport,
L'Archeologia racconta lo sport nell'antichità,Florence (Italy)
Fysiologische achtergronden van lichamelijke opvoeding en sport,Han C. G. Kemper
Sport business,Peter J. Graham
Sports medicine--sports science,"Robert C. Cantu, William J. Gillespie"
Derecho del deporte,"Luis María Cazorla Prieto, Enrique Arnaldo Alcubilla"
I Signori del gioco,Jean Marie Brohm
Sport im Ruhrgebiet,
Sport im Brennpunkt,Jürgen Court
Informatik im Sport,"Jürgen Perl, Martin Lames, Wolf-Dietrich Miethling, Klaus Bonath"
The quotable ESPN,Jenny Ford
Dentro lo sport,
The history of physical education & sport from European perspectives,Arnd Krüger
Magyar sportkalauz,
Kinanthropometry VI,"Kevin Norton, Tim Olds"
An introduction to biomechanics of sport and exercise,"Watkins, James"
Un autre sport?,
"Gender, sexuality, and sport",Caroline Symons
Gender & sport from European perspectives,"Else Trangbæk, Arnd Krüger"
France and the 1998 World Cup,"Hugh Dauncey, Geoff Hare"
Sport et changement social,
Official languages in the Canadian sport system,Canada. Office of the Commissioner of Official Languages
Unsportsmanlike conduct,
International directory of sports organizations under the auspices of the International Association for Sports Information (IASI),Josef Recla
Ti yu bo wu guan lun tan,Tengda Wu
COMMERCIALISATION OF SPORT; ED. BY TREVOR SLACK,Trevor Slack
Guinness sports challenge,"Chris Rhys, Julian Farino"
Exercise and Sport Sciences Reviews,Jack H. Wilmore
The Cleveland sports legacy since 1945,Mark Hodermarsky
Sportmedizinische Untersuchungen im Spitzensport 1974-1977,
150 years of baseball,"Stephen Hanks, Mark Rucker"
Lo sport nei documenti pontifici,
Sport and postmodern times,Geneviève Rail
Sports en Suisse,
Urheilutieto,Risto Nieminen
On Target for Tuning Your Compound Bow (On Target),"Wise, Larry."
Sportivnai︠a︡ Rossii︠a︡,
Sport und Recht,Hans Nater
For sportens skyld,
Sport under communism,"Riordan, James"
Slovnyk terminiv zi sportyvnoho prava,
Sport z satelity,
Entwicklungstendenzen im Sport,
The Encyclopaedia of sport,"Henry Charles Howard, Hedley Peek, Frederick G. Aflalo"
Altersspezifische Grundlagen der körperlichen Erziehung,N. A. Fomin
Enduring words for the athlete,Margaret Miller
Wie pädagogisch soll der Schulsport sein?,"Eckart Balz, Peter Neumann"
Sport wetenschappelijk onderzocht,H. van der Brug
Recreation and Conservation,J. Allan Patmore
"The case of the sneaker snatcher, and other mysteries",L. E. Wolfe
Játék,
Successful sport fund-raising,William F. Stier
Sportwirklichkeit,"Erwin Niedermann, Sepp Redl"
Fodor's great American sports and adventure vacations,Fodor's
American Indian games,"Miller, Jay"
Readings in sports psychology 2,Harold Thomas Anthony Whiting
"""Shintai supōtsu"" e no manazashi",Meiji Daigaku. Jinbun Kagaku Kenkyūjo
Ways of grace,James Blake
Yu bei -- Peng,Yutaka Nakagaki
Cognitive sport psychology,"William F. Straub, Jean M. Williams"
Game changer,Fergus Connolly
SCIENCE AND FOOTBALL V: PROCEEDINGS OF THE FIFTH WORLD CONGRESS ON SCIENCE AND FOOTBALL; ED. BY THOMAS REILLY,"Thomas Reilly, Jan Cabri"
Supōtsu to tanoshimi no nedan,"Chie Fujita, Hiroe Masumoto"
Bowling Alley Adjectives (Grammar All-Stars),"Doris Fisher, D. L. Gibbs"
"Power Play: Sport, the Media and Popular Culture","Raymond Boyle, Richard Haynes"
The anniversary book,"Sports Illustrated Editors, Rob Fleder"
Historia del deporte chileno,
"The history of sport in Britain, 1880-1914",Martin Polley
Research in Physical Educacl,Andrew C. Sparkes
Rechtliche Aspekte bei Sportgrossveranstaltungen,Wolfgang Schild
Children's sports injuries,David Howell
Der Sport in der Bundesrepublik Deutschland,Karlheinz Gieseler
Chronik des DDR-Sports,
Recreation,
Manuel de psychologie du sport,Christine Le Scanff
Biomechanik und sportliche Leistung,W. Baumann
No Contact (Lorimer Sports Stories),Sandra Diersch
The 10 Greatest Sports Dynasties,"Ben Katz, Debbie Nyman"
The South African Game: Sport and Non-Sport Racialism in South Africa,Robert Archer
Life and sport in China,Oliver George Ready
Essential ultimate,"Michael Baccarini, Tiina Booth"
Mindgym,Wouter de Jong
The young champion's mind,James A. Afremow
The Debrett season,n/a
The encyclopedia of sports,Frank G. Menke
Spalding book of rules,
Sport ist Mord,"Norbert Bartnik, Uschi Heusel"
Deporte y delito,Antonio J. Cancino Moreno
Remarkable Stories of Teamwork in Sports (Count on Me: Sports),Brad Herzog
Eurofunding for sport and recreation,
Sport and national identity in the post-war world,"Smith, Adrian"
"The best, worst and most unusual in sports",Stan Fischler
"Cent ans de congrès olympiques,1894-1994",Norbert Müller
Turnen und Sport in der Geschichte Österreichs,Ernst Bruckmüller
Évaluation physiologique de l'athlète de haut niveau,"Howard J. Green, Howard A. Wenger"
Cases in sport marketing,Mark A. McDonald
Health promotion and physical activity,Joachim Mester
Češi a Němci ve světě tělovýchovy a sportu =,
Menschenbilder im Sport,Michael Krüger
Lexikon der Ethik im Sport,"Ommo Grupe, Christoph Hübenthal, Dietmar Mieth"
The sportsman in Ireland,"Robert Allan, John Dix, John Ross Dix"
How you played the game,"Harper, William A."
Play Practice: Engaging and Developing Skilled Players from Beginner to Elite,"Alan G Launder, Wendy Piltz"
101 Basketball Rebound. V.III,"George Matthew; Stotts, Terry; Johnson, Price Karl"
How Andover solved the athletics problem,H. J. Case
Sportrecht in Europa,"Michael R. Will, Christian Autexier"
Sport und Naturschutz im Konflikt,
The bizarre world of European sports,"Daley, Robert"
Understanding sport,"Horne, John"
"In sports, money talks",Edward F. Dolan
The best American sports writing,"Howard Bryant, Glenn Stout"
Swell,"Clark, Liz (Sailor)"
The Roger Kahn reader,Roger Kahn
"Play ball, Pikachu!",Sonia Sander
Sport ist herrlich,Ole Könnecke
Got game,Pat Williams
Huan le yun dong =,Tong nian mei shu she ji you xian gong si
Jia ting yun dong hui,Stan Berenstain
"Festivals, games and amusements","Horace Smith, Samuel Woodworth, J. & J . Harper"
Bei bao ke,Hugh McManners
Yi jue sheng fu! jin pai xuan shou de 50 zhao yun dong xin li xue,Yoshihide Takahata
Zhongguo zhi zui,Zhenyu Liu
Spot loves sports,Eric Hill
All you can be,Dwight Howard
Ispovedʹ divergenta,Andreĭ Vulʹf
Upon Further Review,Blair Kerkhoff
Tiger Woods (Sports Idols),Jason Glaser
The big fella,Jane Leavy
"The best American sports writing, 1995","Dan Jenkins, Glenn Stout"
"Salud, ejercicio y deporte",Jürgen Weineck
Yesterday in sport,
Don't skip out on me,Willy Vlautin
Adventure sports,British Broadcasting Corporation
Sport and leisure,British Broadcasting Corporation
The Derrydale prints,John T. Ordeman
Yesterday in sports,"Durant, John"
Encyclopedia Brown's book of wacky sports,Donald J. Sobol
Under pressure,Alex Morgan
Women's sports,Jaime Schultz
"Playing to Win: Sports, Video Games, and the Culture of Play (Digital Game Studies)",Robert Alan Brookey
"Serum creatine phosphikinase changes in running, football and rugby",Mary Kelly
Spectacles sportifs et scéniques dans le monde étrusco-italique: Actes de la table ronde (Collection de l'Ecole française de Rome) (French Edition),
Handbook of social science of sport,"Günther Lüschen, George Harvey Sage"
Sport Canadiana,"Gerald Redmond, Barbara Schrodt"
Zhonghua renmin gongheguo ti yu ke ji fa zhan shi,
Manuel de psychologie du sport,n/a
"Le Grand livre des sports : règlements, aspects techniques, équipement, tactiques, infractions",
Spectacle des joutes : Sport et courtoisie à la fin du Moyen Age,Sébastien Nadot
Grandes figures sportives du Nord-Pas de Calais,"Christian Dorvillé, Collectif"
"Le sport et la guerre, XIXe et XXe siècles","Luc Robène, Collectif"
Puck!,Chuck Carlson
"Schneller, höher, weiter: Eine Geschichte des Sports (German Edition)",Hans Sarkowicz
We Could Be Heroes,dirs-ben-fordyce-tom
The achievement zone,Shane M. Murphy
The Sport Psych Handbook,Shane M. Murphy
In einem Jugendberghaus fing es an : 50 Jahre Deutsche Sportjugend,Friedrich Mevert
The sporting Scot,Brian D. Osborne
"Review of sport, recreation and leisure degree courses",
Fantastic finishes,
"Psychology of sports, exercise, and fitness",Louis Diamant
Primeras fotografías,
"Hopscotch, hangman, hot-potato, and ha, ha, ha","Maguire, Jack"
Na samom kraeshke Rossii--,A. Lunin
Medical and psychological aspects of sport and exercise,"David I. Mostofsky, Leonard D. Zaichkowsky"
Epizody przyjaźni,
Sport zwischen Freiheit und Zwang,"Paul Jakobi, Heinz Egon Rösch"
Courting the Yankees,Ettie Ward
Sport in Freizeit und Umwelt,"Paul Jakobi, Heinz Egon Rösch"
"Sport Canada, Programme d'aide aux athlètes",
Great sports stories as reported in the New York times,Microfilming Corporation of America
Science and sporting performance,"Bruce Davies, Geoffrey Thomas"
"PHILOSOPHY AND THE SCIENCES OF EXERCISE, HEALTH AND SPORT: CRITICAL PERSPECTIVES ON...; ED. BY MIKE MCNAMEE",M. J. McNamee
Video und Computer im Leistungssport der Sportspiele,K. Weber
Emanzipation im Sport?,
Sports vision,
Mwy o chwarae teg,Curriculum Council for Wales
1979 season,Zander Hollander
Ao yun Ying yu 3000 ju =,Yue Wang
A Magyar sport 40 éve,
Sportlexikon,
Nikephoros. 18. Jahrgang (2005),
Le Sport et toi,Nicole Ferron
"Tanárképzés, testnevelés, sport",
Valeurs du sport,
Martial arts & sports in Japan,Nihon Kōtsū Kōsha
The business of sport,
Sport zwischen Ost und West,"Stefan Rohdewald, Stefan Wiederkehr"
Power magazine,"Christine McClymont, Jane Hutchison"
Pharmacology in exercise and sports,Satu M. Somani
"Ideologie, Sport, Aussenseiter","Ingomar Weiler, Christoph Ulf"
Understanding business & legal aspects of the sports industry,
Scottish/national vocational qualification in sport and recreation,
Sports pages of the Los Angeles times,Bill Shirley
Sports and law,Herb Appenzeller
World of sport,"Michael Archer, Michael Leitch"
"Europe, sport, world",J. A. Mangan
Where the boys are,Lindsay Fitzclarence
Sport business management in New Zealand,Linda Trenberth
"Corps, espaces et pratiques sportives",
Sportärztliche und sportpädagogische Betreuung,
Preparing for a career in sports,J.G. Ferguson Publishing Company
Sensumotorisches Lernen und Sportspielforschung,"Kurt Kohl, Erwin Hahn, Hermann Rieder, Rolf Andresen"
Ti yu ci dian =,
Sciences des activités physiques et sportives,"Nancy Midol, Claude Roggero"
Sport sociology,Andrew Yiannakis
Encyclopedia of International Sports Studies Volume Two,Roger Bartlett
Encyclopedia of International Sports Studies Volume Three,Roger Bartlett
Encyclopedia of International Sports Studies Volume One,Roger Bartlett
Psychological and sociological factors in sport,"Peter Klavora, Kirk A. W. Wipper"
A Sportról,
Des jeux et des sports,Alfred Wahl
Computers in sport,Arnold Baca
Sport in der Antike,Ulrich Sinn
Rechtsprobleme der Sportwette,
Situations éducatives de jeux collectifs,
Sporting pastimes,"Dorothea Hall, Gordon Robertson, Curtis, Tony"
Der Sport in der Bundesrepublik Deutschland,Karlheinz Gieseler
L'Homme en mouvement,"Maurice Boutin, Eric Volant, Jean-Claude Petit"
Az Edzés és versenyzés pszichológiája,
Zwischen Arbeitnehmerinteressen und Unternehmenspolitik,Gertrud Pfister
Teilnahme am Sport als Rechtsproblem,"Erwin Deutsch, Fritz Roth, Klaus Vieweg"
Manuel de psychologie du sport,
Get Her Off the Pitch!: How Sport Took Over My Life,Lynne Truss
GET HER OFF THE PITCH PB,Lynne Truss
Sport ohne Ethos?,"Paul Jakobi, Heinz Egon Rösch"
"Canadian/American sport, fitness, and the law",
Cento vite per lo sport,"Vincenzo Prunelli, Giuseppe Bruni"
Sportlaste tehnikaalase ja psühholoogilise ettevalmistuse küsimusi =,
"Sport, power, and society",Robert E. Washington
Nambuk tʻongil chʻeyuk ŭi chŏngchʻijŏk kwaje,
La couverture médicale des compétitions sportives,Guy Azémar
Sports Babylon,Jeff Rovin
1001 Great Sports Jokes,Jeff Rovin
Philosophy of sport,Mark Holowchak
Evaluating sport and active leisure for young people,"Kevin Hylton, Jonathan Long"
Conditioning for the high school athlete,Allan M. Levy
Starry night,David Spohn
Sports in North America,Thomas L. Altherr
Wychowanie fizyczne i sport w badaniach naukowych,"Eugeniusz Wachowski, Ryszard Strzelczyk"
Les Athlètes de la République,Gilbert Andrieu
Éducation et politique sportives XIXe-XXe siècles (Jeux et sports dans l'histoire) (French Edition),Thierry Terret
Sport and education,Martin Lee
Serebro-zoloto,Andreĭ Bitov
Reclams Sportführer,Karlheinz Grindler
Sports Memories of Sonoma County   (CA)  (Images of  Sports),Lee Torliatt
Sport for development and peace,
La musculation,Georges Lambert
The sportsman's library,Ernest R. Gee
One Play Many Ways,Kenny Simpson
Andy & Elena,Nicholas Paxton
Ultimate Jacksonville Jaguars Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Ultimate San Diego Padres Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Andy & Elena,Nicholas Paxton Paxton
Ultimate Arizona Diamondbacks Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Ultimate Los Angeles Rams Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Game time,Jen Mueller
Ultimate Sheffield United FC Trivia Book,Ray Walker
Come on Baby,Kristin Lee
Ultimate Tampa Bay Buccaneers Trivia Book,Ray Walker
"La Semeuse, 1904-2004",Yvan Gastaut
"Porlock Vale Riding School, 1946-1961",Jacqueline Peck
Rl 5 Nf 3 Having a Ball Is,Rigby
"Hearts' greatest ever season, 1957-58",Mike Buckle
La naissance des jeux olympiques et le sport dans l'antiquité,Violaine Vanoyeke
Serbski Sokoł,Alfons Wićaz
Sports in literature,Henry B. Chapin
Does This Make Me Look Fat?,J. Alexander Poulton
Developing agility and quickness,"Jay Dawes, Mark Roozen"
Musculoskeletal Trauma,Gary Delforge
Where Finbarr played,"Murphy, John A."
Sport and exercise psychology,"Tony Morris, Peter Terry, Sandy Gordon"
Disney fairies,"Tea Orsi, Marino Gentile, Monica Catalano, Manuela Razzi"
Pixie Hollow Games,Kitty Richards
Voices of the Razorbacks,Hoyt H. Purvis
Involvement in sport,Dorothy V. Harris
Excelling in sports through thinking straight,June E. Meyer
Keys to the Batter's Box,Shawn Powell
The Average Joe's Super Sports Almanac,Steve Riach
WIPS,T&J Publishers
Skydiving,Bill FitzSimons
"Local Agenda 21, local authorities and tourism",Fiona Muir David Leslie
Making violence part of the game,John C. Bridges
Internships in sport management,Rob Ammon
The Complete Handbook of Pro Football 1976,Zander Hollander
Etnología de la carrera de bola y ariweta rarámuris,Angel Acuña Delgado
Muscular Christianity and the Colonial and Post-Colonial World (Sport in the Global Society),John J. Macaloo
St Patrick's blue & saffron,Patrick N Meenan
Embodied Masculinities in Global Sport,"Jorge Knijnik, Daryl Adair"
The Backpacker's Field Manual,Rick Curtis
Fitness in China,Unknown
Cognitive issues in motor expertise,
Gender and Competition,Kathleen J. Deboer
Peak performance,"John Hawley, Louise Burke"
Bodies of discourse,Cornel Sandvoss
Sporting Lodges,"J. C. Jeremy Hobson, David S. D. Jones"
Infographic guide to sports,Daniel Tatarsky
Carling's Men,Mick Cleary
Sports =,Hakan Şan Borteçin
Psycho-Social Issues and Interventions in Elite Sports,Dieter Hackfort
Against the Odds,Matt Te Pou
Kayaking the Sea Roads,Ed Ley-Wilson
Encyclopedia of Extreme Sports,"Steven W. Pope, Robert E. Rinehart"
Careers in sports law,Kenneth L. Shropshire
The Sports encyclopedia,
A Game For Life,Gene Westmoreland
"Crashing and Splashing (Little Ark Book (Sydney, N.S.W.).)",Alison Lester
Duffer's Handbook of Golf,Grantland Rice
2024 Ultimate Sailing Calendar,"Windward Productions, Sharon Green"
Sports,Marshall E. Nunn
Sports and antitrust law,American Bar Association. Section of Antitrust Law
Safety at Sea,United States Sailing Association
ABCs of Figure Skating from Axel to Zamboni,Barbara Rankin
Women in Sports,"Adrienne N. Milner, Jomills H. Braddock"
Glamorgan Cricketers 1980-1997,Andrew Hignell
The best New York sports arguments,Peter Handrinos
Run like you stole something,Damian Farrow
Choke!,Tony Davis
The Coaches Little Playbook,"George, Jr. Hetzel"
Stars of the All Blacks Poster Book,Inc. Staff Getty Images
Scotland's Gift,Charles MacDonald
This round's on me,Lorne Rubenstein
Praeger handbook of sports medicine and athlete health,Claude T. Moorman
Using sports for reading and writing activities,Lance M. Gentile
"The encyclopedia of exercise, sport and health","Dr. Peter Brukner, Dr. Karim Khan, John Kron"
Perfect Golf Swing in Minutes,J. D. Deleon
Slippery When Wet,"Rick Ianniello, Valerie Huitzil, Jolie Varela"
These Old Blue Skis,. . . Thomas
In Deep,Matt George
Super Chiefs!,Kci Sports Publishing
In the Ring with Jack Dempsey - Part II,Adam Pollack
How to Transfer Strength Training,Ian J. King
"Camping Journal & RV Travel Logbook, Purple Vintage Camper, Not in Use",Enchanted Willow
Clarity vs. Chaos,"Kris Wilder, Lawrence Kane, Sun Tzu, Mark Raffan"
Story of FIBArk First in Boating the Arkansas,Donna Rhoads
Haaland,House of Ballers
Never Limit Yourself!,Linda Paulding
"Camping Journal & RV Travel Logbook, Red Vintage Camper, Not in Use",Enchanted Willow
"Camping Journal & RV Travel Logbook, Blue Vintage Camper, Not in Use",Enchanted Willow
You and Me Are on the Tee,"Tim Satava, Keith Williams"
52-Trail Hiking Journal and Logbook,Jason Robinson
Burton : Peak Snowboard Producer,Paul D. Bowker
Skin in the Game,Sharon Braxton
Formula 1,Heather Ayer
Mbappé,House of Ballers
Rolling into Bed,"Anthony Walls, Widhi Saputro"
Hiking Journal and Logbook,Jason Robinson
Sporty Kids Rock,S. Oakley
"Camping Journal & RV Travel Logbook, Camper Blue",Enchanted Willow
"Camping Journal & RV Travel Logbook, Happy Camper",Enchanted Willow
Lifer,Russ Clune
New Five,Ralph Dennis
How to Teach Strength Training Exercises,Ian J. King
Two studies in the history of ancient Greek athletics,Thomas Heine Nielsen
Invisible Obstacles,Foote Courtney
Joe Jackson vs Chicago White Sox,David Fletcher
Building Block,"John Block, John Freeman, Chris Ahrens"
2023 Maine ATV Trail Atlas,Angela Quintal-Snowman
Research on Theory and Practice of National Aerobics,Yiyuan Yang
Mek & Dad Race Supercars,Reji Maindrid
Las Vegas Slots,Rick Ianniello
"Camping Journal Log Book & RV Trip Planner, RV There Yet",Enchanted Willow
Don't Back Down,"Mike O'Neill, Sarah Fox, Damon Freeman"
Training Guide for Climbers,Rob Miller
Hatteras At 'Easter,"Porter, Richard, Jr."
Hiking Garden of the Gods,"Stewart M. Green, Susan Joy Paul"
Granite Mariner,"Long, John"
Niente è Impossibile,"Theresa Marrama, Katherine Cannamela, Maria Vicari"
Tales of a Sport Fisherman (vol 1),Jeff Klassen
"Camping Journal & RV Travel Logbook, Camper Green",Enchanted Willow
"Camping Journal & RV Travel Logbook, Wander Not Lost",Enchanted Willow
Addiction Surf Magazine #2,"Jeff Grimes, Evan apRoberts"
Crowfoot Jeet Kune Do,"Guro John Bruce Daniels, Sifu Richard Whittle"
Thirteenth International Conference on Sport & Society. Conference Proceedings,Jörg Krieger
Little Slice of Heaven,. . . Thomas
Giochi Diplomatici. Sport e Politica Estera Nell'Italia Del Secondo Dopoguerra,Nicola Sbetti
Neymar,House of Ballers
Rocky Mountain National Park Bouldering Guide,Jamie Emerson
Arkansaw High Country Route Guidebook,Chuck Campbell
Fountain of Youth,"Hugh Janney, Madeline Finch"
"Mayan Whitewater el Salvador, Honduras, & Nicaragua",Greg Schwendinger
Sport und Grossstadt 1870 bis 1930,Stefan Nielsen
Sho-Time,Jeff Fletcher
Bears vs. Packers,"John Martin, Anthony K. Hewson"
"Greek Music, Drama, Sport, and Fauna",Calum Maciver
"Patrick Collins, the sportswriter","Collins, Patrick"
Wirkungen der Sportwerbung,Klaus Deimel
More than a game,Philip Watson
Die Sportveranstaltungsausfallversicherung,Peter Caninenberg
Die emotional-kognitive Bewältigung von Ärger und Aggressivität durch Sport,Monika Stützle-Hebel
El futbol a sol y sombra / Soccer in Sun or Shade,Eduardo Galeano
Head to Head,G. Beattie
Bill Beaumont's Sporting year,Bill Beaumont
Spin Casting Brilliantly,"Michael Rutter, J. Alan Baumgarten"
"Sportler im ""Jahrhundert der Lager""",Diethelm Blecking
Balance Exercises for Seniors,Scott Hamrick
Detroit Lions,Thomas E. Hall
Tana Tumbles,Jenna Colburn
Yellowstone National Park Hiking Trails Map,Greg Tanaka
Judo Greats,"Jae Brown-Jobb, Andor Paposi-Jobb"
Small Boat Level 2 Instructor Manual,United States Sailing Association
Texas Reds,"Moore, Chester, Jr."
Inside the Mind of a Scout,Jeremy Booth
Right Mind for Putting,Barry Lotz
Eight-Man Cowboy,C. W. Wells
Mbappé : the Complete Story of a Football Superstar,House of Ballers
Roberto Clemente Hit Tras Hit,Ricardo Olivencia
Sixty Years. One Remarkable Journey,Douglas A. Froelich
Iron Tigers,David Neil Drews
Aaliyah Kikumoto? Dare 2 Dream- Be AMAZING,"Aj Kikumoto, Aaliyah Kikumoto, Karen Huertas"
Unleash Your Cowgirl Workbook : Volume 1,"Taylor Shepard, Ellen Walker, Tista Wicklow, Guru Khalsa"
Hockey Shot Guide.  8 Step Breakdown of Reed Larson's Legendary Shot,"Reed Larson, Jeff Olson, Bob Motzko"
Soccer Sparks,David Copeland Smith
Go Out and Play Soccer,"Disha Avadhani, Mike Cañas"
Thirty Rites of Passage,Hunter Jewett
Paddle Maine's Moose River Loop & Bow Trip,Angela Quintal-Snowman
Pong Player and the Professor,Richard Sosis
Rivals We Hate,Brooke O'Brien
Sports law,Matthew J. Mitten
Sport and exercise psychology research advances,
Sport and democracy in the ancient and modern worlds,Paul Christesen
It's a whole new ballgame,Jimmy Sanderson
Psychology of Sport Excellence TsungMin Hung Ronnie Lidor Dieter Hackfort Editors,Tsung-Min Hung
Sports law in a nutshell,"Champion, Walter T. Jr"
Fight like a physicist,Jason Thalken
'I Was There',Norman (edit) Barrett
Sports Book Unabashed Assemblage of Hero,Min Ed Yee
God's game plan,Richard A. Hasler
The sports address book,Scott Callis
The public responsibility and legal liability of outdoor educators in Canada,Glenda Wuyda
Entertainment Law Settlements and Negotiations,Aspatore Books Staff
"Sport for Development, Peace, and Social Justice","Robert Schinke, Stephanie Hanrahan"
Massage for sport performance,Michael McGillicuddy
Stress in College Athletics,"James Harry Humphrey, Deborah A. Yow, William W. Bowden"
Sports Exercise Health Science,John Sproule
Golf Courses of Seth Raynor,"Michael Wolf, James Sitar, Jon Cavalier"
Summary of Joshua Robinson and Jonathan Clegg's the Club,I. R. B. Media
Superhero Legends Alphabet,"Beck Feiner, Alphabet Legends Pty Ltd"
Car Legends Alphabet,"Beck Feiner, Alphabet Legends Pty Ltd"
"Abbreviated Compendium for Navigating the NCAA Name, Image, and Likeness Landscape",Tanner Simkins
Light & Easy,"Tara Dower, Pete Schreiner"
Bulls Legends Alphabet,"Beck Feiner, Alphabet Legends Pty Ltd"
Summary of Jeff Pearlman's the Last Folk Hero,I. R. B. Media
Could You Be the Reason Your Kid Is Trash,Dorian Lee
Saturdays in the South,"Morris, G. a, III"
101 DB Tips,Chad Wilson
Champs,"Marlon Johnson, Henry Grandison"
Fifty Years of Tailgate Tales,Steve Koreivo
Fitness Workout Journal,Black Horse Publishing
Greatest Soccer Player in the Galaxy,"Brandi Konopinski, Mike Konopinski, Kelly Kincaid"
Andiamo Let's Go!,Shirley Manthorne
Sport in the Making of Celtic Culture (Sport and Nation),Grant Jarvie
Olympic Champions,Richard Tippett
"The rules book, 1997-2000",Eric Twiname
Sports Biomechanics The Basics Optimising Human Performance,Anthony J. Blazevich
Spirit of Dancing Warrior Book,Jerry Lynch;Chungliang Al Huang
So you think you know Welsh sport?,Matthew Jones
Mostly golf,Bernard Darwin
English costume for sports and outdoor recreation from the sixteenth to the nineteenth centuries,Phillis Emily Cunnington
"Pan-Asian sports and the emergence of modern Asia, 1913-74",Stefan Huebner
Moosehead Lake Fishing Depth Maps,Angela Quintal-Snowman
Influence and the Creator's Game,"Kelly, Frank, 3rd"
2022-2023 Maine Snowmobile Trail Map Atlas,Angela Quintal-Snowman
Make Them Miss & Make Them Pay Simultaneously,"Nathan Menaged, Michael Heinz"
Saturdays in the South,Gus Morris
Adventure Guide to Maine's Abandoned Locomotives,Angela Quintal-Snowman
50 Fun Facts about the Chicago Cubs,"Sean McCandless, Mike McCandless"
Outdoor Encyclopedias (Set),Abdo
Centennial of the Olympic Winter Games 1924-2024,rafael pinchas
Dunker,"Beard, Alferd, Jr."
Cricketers,Rodel
Undefeated,Sanborn
PBR,"Andy Watson, Kacie Albert, Sean Gleason, John Sohigan"
Adventure Guide to Maine's down East Sunrise Trail,Angela Quintal-Snowman
Early Sports Encyclopedias (Set),Abdo
Back Nine,E. A. Briginshaw
Walking Rhode Island,John Kostrzewa
Soccer,Chrös McDougall
Saltar a La Cuerda,Mimi Chapra
Starting the US Open,Ron Read
Max Out Mindset,Larry Widman
Get Your Spirit On!,Michelle Medlock Adams
Temptation,Chiquita Dennie
Canyoning in the Pacific Northwest,Kevin Clark
"Goodbye, Papa Golf",Chip Bearden
Financial aid for college-bound athletes,Marlene Lazar
Hockeytown In High Def The Detroit Red Wings 2008 Championship Season In Photos,The Detroit News
Sport and sociology,Dominic Malcolm
On the field,Nikki Bundey
Psychic Reprieve : A Crime Thriller,Mitchell Nevin
Official 2006 Ncaa Football Records Book,
Cheerleading,Thomas Kingsley Troupe
Let the Big Dog Eat,"Aaron Brogan, Remy Zimmerman"
Method Endeavors DOPE Book,Johnny Moonraker
Farm Foundation,John Platz
Football,Thomas Kingsley Troupe
"SPORT, RHETORIC, AND GENDER: HISTORICAL PERSPECTIVES AND MEDIA REPRESENTATIONS; ED. BY LINDA K. FULLER",Linda K. Fuller
Sports Sponsorship,John A. Fortunato
"Sports fans, identity, and socialization exploring the fandemonium","Adam C. Earnheardt, Paul M. Haridakis, Barbara S. Hugenberg"
Where Sport Marketing Theory Meets Practice,Brenda G. Pitts
One Clue Beyond,"Otto Penzler, Michele B. Slung"
The Philosophy of Baseball,Raymond A. Belliotti
It's more than just a game,Stan Smith
Peakbagging Montana,Cedron Jones
Anger management in sport,Mitch Abrams
Inspiring sport stories,C. M. Ward
Soccer style,Simon Doonan
The will to win,Rod McKuen
Sports and Courts,Frederick J. Day
"Sport, physical activity and antisocial behaviour in youth",Leesa Morris
You Cannot Be Serious,"John; Kaplan, James McEnroe"
Who was Babe Ruth?,Joan Holub
Family sports adventures,Megan Stine
A taste of smoke,Marion Dane Bauer
Technical Foul,Rich Wallace
"Thinking body, dancing mind",
Team Canada 1972,Andrew Podnieks
The Mad Dog 100,Christopher Russo
Tour de Lance: the extraordinary story of Lance Armstrong's fight to reclaim the Tour De France,Bill Strickland
Wherever I wind up,R. A. Dickey
Soccer sabotage,"O'Donnell, Liam"
Extreme Sports Boxed Set,Matt Christopher
"Sport, peace, and development",Keith Gilbert
Sports guy,Charles P. Pierce
The sports pages,"Jon Scieszka, Dustin Brown, Dan Santat"
The sportsman,Dhani Jones
"So, you think you know sports?",Ron Smith
The Ultimate Guide to Cheerleading,Leslie Wilson
Athletic protective equipment,"Scott A. Street, Debra Runkle"
Sport Marketing,Paul Blakey
Korea's Olympic Icon,David Miller
Enhancing the Contribution of Sport to the Sustainable Development Goals,Iain Lindsey
Boise Trail Guide,Steve Stuebner
Tourism as Fair Trade,Angela Kalisch
Al Bate,Sue Muller Hacking
Soccer Smarts for Teens,Andrew Latham
Red zone,Tiki Barber
Puella magi,"Masugitsune, William Flanagan"
Key concepts in sport & exercise sciences,David Kirk
Encyclopedia of sports medicine,Lyle J. Micheli
More Thoughts of Chairman Moore,Brian Moore
Bob Huggins,"Bob Huggins, Mike Bass"
Sports-Specific Rehabilitation,Robert A. Donatelli
"Foot and Ankle Athletic Injuries, An Issue of Clinics in Podiatric Medicine and Surgery",Bob Baravarian DPM  FACFAS
"""You call it sports, but i say it's a jungle out there"".",Dan Jenkins
Sport And Exercise Science,Melissa Day
Cool sports dad,"Fischer, David"
Relentless,Tim Grover
"Intro to PE, Fitness & Sport 1e Im",Siedentop
Rehabilitation techniques in sports medicine,William E. Prentice
What if the Babe had kept his Red Sox?,Bill Gutman
HARKEN 2024 Ultimate Sailing Calendar,"Windward Productions, Sharon Green"
Outdoor Encyclopedias,Abdo
Big Sports Brands,Abdo
Judo,Clint Sharp
Forest Hills,Bill Sullivan
Unmovable,"Roy Williams, Andrew Martin"
Heart of the Horse,Shelley Trevor
Desarrollo de Aptitudes Basado en Principios,"Russ Smith, Patrick McCarthy, Marcus Davila, Fred Lohse, Juan Luis Cadenas de Llano Bajo"
"Olimpolis, Sede Permanente de Los Juegos Olimpicos",Orlando De la Rosa Tirado
Inspirational Football Stories for Young Readers,Mike Johnson
Live Like a Champion,Lori Brazier
Gatorade,Rebecca Rowell
PIVOT Magazine Issue 11,"Jason Miller, Chris O'Byrne"
Sports Skills Value Book,D. D. J. Publishing
Champion in a Man's World,"David E. Outerbridge, Julian P. Graham"
Shot. the Reed Larson Hockey Story,"Reed Larson, Jeff Olson, Larry Robinson"
Wheels of Courage,Kathleen Carolle
From the Tree Stand and Beyond,Carl Schock
Fishing ... Mexican Style!,Jeffrey Klassen
Hit by His Ptich,M. J. Compton
Pickleball Fever,Rory Mason
Adidas,J. R. Kinley
Early Sports Encyclopedias,Abdo
Burton,Paul D. Bowker
Inspirational Hockey Stories for Young Readers,Mike Johnson
Espn,Kristian R. Dyer
Nike,Rebecca Rowell
"Proceedings of the 8th ACPES  International Conference, ACPES 2022, October 28th - 30th, 2022, Medan, North Sumatera, Indonesia","Benny Aprial M, Alan Alfiansyah Putra Karo-karo, Eka Abdurrahman"
Black Gold,Colin Martin Tatz
Sports in the 20th century,Tom Raabe
Sport and leisure operations management,"Una McMahon-Beattie, Ian Yeoman"
Heads up!,Dave Branon
Sport and national identity in the European media,Neil Blain
Frog Book Buddy (Pocket Pals (Safari Ltd)),Micheal Twinn
British Sporting Greats,John Inverdale
Sports devotional Bible,Dave Branon
The champion,Annie Kubler
Chang Jin-Ming's Guide to Refereeing Stare-out,Chang Jin-Ming
Landscapes of modern sport,John Bale
Competing Identities,Robert Paul Seesengood
The complete guide to sport motivation,Ken Hodge
Fyny yma,Iolo ap Gwynn.
Ar ben y byd,Shane Williams
Sport and Race (Key Texts in Sports Studies),Richard Campbell King
Egyptian Games and Sports (Shire Egyptology),Joyce Tyldesley
Yellowstone National Park Fishing Map,Greg Tanaka
White Belt Instructional Guide 2nd Edition,"Hwang Kee, H. C. Hwang"
"Camping Journal & RV Travel Logbook, Purple Vintage Camper",Enchanted Willow
On This Run,Alex Moehn
Every Season Tells a Story - Sports Parent's Journal,"Keith Grabowski, Michelle Buttari"
Caddie Days,E. B. McKee
Ticket to Glide,"Shaw, Bob, Jr."
Holy Cow St. Louis!,Mike Mitchell
EdgeX - a Ballglove Revolution,Nokona Ballgloves
New York Islanders Official 50th Anniversary Book,New York Islanders Hockey Club
Giants Glory,Alan Ross
John Cena,Alex Mogging
Surplus Military & Classic Firearms #91,FMG Publications
Modern Tennis Instruction,John Carpenter
Part Time Nomads,Anne M. Breedlove
How sports came to be,Don L. Wulffson
Teaching cues for sport skills for secondary school students,Hilda Ann Fronske
Playgrounds of the gods,Ian Stafford
Sport in social context,Kalevi Heinilä
Sport And Social Movements From The Local To The Global,John Horne
Wirtschaftlicher und sportlicher Wettbewerb,"Rainer Gömmel, Markus A. Denzel, Margarete Wagner-Braun"
Cricketers-Bobby the Bowler,Mike Heimos
The Pride Of Columbia,Chad Pio
Spoiled Sports,Garret L Kolb
"If winning were easy, everyone would do it","Charlie Jones, Kim Doren"
Good sports,"Thomas, Bob"
Ludi publici,Frank Bernstein
"Hello, Hooter",Naren Aryal
Grandpa Is A White Sox Fan Daddy Is A White Sox Fan I Am A White Sox Fan,Stephen Davern
Villains The Bad Boys And Girls Of Sports,Ken Rappoport
The Tank McNamara chronicles,Jeff Millar
A is for Arizona,J. S. Monroe-Daley
Hello Will D Cat,Naren Aryal
Gator ABC Book,Mark Dahmon
Der Sport im augusteischen Rom,Rigobert W. Fortuin
Understanding sport as a religious phenomenon,Eric Bain-Selbo
A Big Shot in Lawrence,Chad Pio
"Hello, Willy!",Jared Sumsion
Cardinal's First Game,"Erin Callier, Daniel McCarthy"
Florida State ABC's,"Jolee Sanborn, Charity Sanborn"
Crazy With The Papers To Prove It Stories About The Most Unusual Eccentric And Outlandish People Ive Known In Four Decades As A Sports Journalist,Dan Coughlin
Hotty and Toddy Spirit!,T. Baird Morris
Abbie Gets Fit,Doug Werner
Husker Game Day,Tiffany Everett
This Little Tiger,"Josh Torres, Wendy Torres"
Cricketers-Qualifying Tests!,A.C. Rodel
Champ Wide Retriever,Christy Brown
War Eagle Story,"Francesca Adler-Baeder, Patrick Baeder"
This Little Elephant,Wendy Torres
"When I Grow Up, I'll Be A Gator!",Amy Hammond
Rebel and the Hotty Toddy Spirit,"T. Baird Morris, Rafael Nazario"
"Hello, Big Blue!",Big Blue
Carolina A to Z,Anne Aldridge Webb
Impact sports,Bo Boshers
The Pride of Pittsburg,Chad Pio
Dungeon of Death,Scott Keith
Sports for All (Explorers),Robert Coupe
Gold Prospector's Field Guide,M. J. Grover
Sports and games in verse and rhyme,Allan D. Jacobs
Applied Exercise and Sport Physiology,Terry J. Housh; Dona J. Housh; Herbert A. DeVries
Recovery-Stress Questionnaire for Athletes,"Michael Kellmann, K. Wolfgang Kallus"
The mental game plan,Stephen John Bull
City of Champions,"Stefan Szymanski, Silke-Maria Weineck"
1968,James C. Nicholson
When Granny Won Olympic Gold And Other Medalwinning Poems,Graham Denton
Cofio Tomos,Huw Owen
Mountain walking and trekking,Alun Richardson
Sportwetten in Deutschland,Kölner Sportrechtstag (3rd 2011)
Xxx,"John Wiles, International Association of Electrical Inspectors"
Clase de Yoga,"Uma Krishnaswami, Stephanie Roth"
Yo Juego Fútbol,"Mary Cappellini, George Crespo"
Impact of Technology in Sports,Matthew Anniss
Cricketers - Bobby the Bowler,Rodel
Ambrose Goes for Gold,Tor Freeman
I Remember Pat Summitt,Mike Towle
The Leprechaun's game day rules,Sherri Graves Smith
Raymonds Gameday Adventure,Danny Moore
Learning Football With Duke Dog,Sarah Marshall
Little Tate And The Say Hey Glove,Greg Tetreault
Baseball's LOST Tradition,"Thompson, Eric"
Stupid sports,Leland Gregory
"Sport, popular culture and identity",Maurice Roche
Taking sport seriously,Lincoln Allison
Designed to Race,Peter Williams
"Education, sport and leisure","Graham McFee, Alan Tomlinson"
Core Fitness Ultimate Guide To Achieving Peak Level Fitness With Australias Body Coach,Paul Collins
Wesen und Lehre des Sports,Carl Diem
Gun Book for Boys,"Silvio Calabi, Steve Helsley, Roger Sanger"
"Gloves, mitts & pads",Mary Elizabeth Salzmann
Warrior in the Ring,"Brian D""Ambrosio"
Office Olympic Games,Richard Stark
Pferdegymnastik,Sadko G. Solinski
Who is Jimmy Dash?,Jeremy Diamond
Die Manipulation sportlicher Wettbewerbe als Herausforderung für das Recht des Staates und der Verbände,Germany) WFV-Sportrechtsseminar (2006 Wangen im Allgäu
Athletika,Nigel B. Crowther
Sports Secrets and Spirit Stuff,Therese Kauchak
Lifelong Training (Ironman),"Henry Ash, Barbara Warren"
England Til I Die,David Lane
Lifelong Success (Ironman),"Henry Ash, Barbara Warren"
"Ethics, Sport & Leisure","Manufactured by Meyer & Meyer Verlag, Tomlinson, Alan."
Cultural Diversity & Congruence in Physical Education & Sport,Ken Hardman
Volleyball Drills,Dr. Chris Kroeger
The Ultimate Nordic Pole Walking Book,Klaus Schwanbeck
Science and Skiing VI,"Erich Müller, Stefan Lindiger, Jürgen Pfusterschmied, Thomas Stöggl"
Physical Education and Sport Changes and Challenges,
Coach,"John Powers, Geoff Slattery"
Mighty Mites,Chris Castell
To chase a dream,Paul Kapsalis
The Olympic Games of the European Union,Hélène Trova
"Nikephoros Beihefte, Bd. 9: Von der Linie (gramm)̌ zur Hysplex",Barbara Rieger
Stage and stadium,David H. J. Larmour
A Sporting Eye,Fionnbar Callanan
Surfing Sisterhood Hawai'I,Mindy Penny Backer
Table Setters Manual,Frederick Taylor
Training the Trainers Flashcards,"The J.F. Shea Center for Therapeutic Riding, Ride Verbatim LLC, MyStride Equestrian LLC"
Habits That Make a Champion,Allistair McCaw
Pickleball Courts Construction & Maintenance Manual,American Sports Builders Association
Grand Canyoneering2,"Todd Martin, Tom Jones, Rich Rudow"
Marisa and Miranda Discover Field Hockey,Janice Rhodes
Win Like a Girl,Maureen Electa Monte
Trinity Alps California Ski Atlas,Alpenglow Publishing
Indian Class Sailboat Design,Gail Martin
Sooners Forever,Dennis G. Kelly
When the Buzzer Sounds,Lisa Willis
Lassen Shasta Ski Atlas,Alpenglow Publishing
Mongui Realeza and the Stinky Brothers,Alfred Valdez
C Is for Cougar,Dave McCann
Singularite du Tennis Dans le Sport et la Societe,Karim Adyel
Friday Night Memories,Paden Nation
Beyond 94 Feet,Rakimm Rogers
Peak Performance Habits,Mat Park
North of Forty,"Lauren Hurst, Nick Cinea, Kelly Clark, Simon Thompson"
God Squad,Matt Sieger
My Tennis Journal,Christine Calabrese
Siglo XXI,LÁZARO Lanier LÓPEZ Llerena
Powerful Fitness Transformation,B. gowri naidu
"Love, Lure and Lore of the Candy Boats",Gail Martin
Big Fish Better Boats,"Bethany Bradsher, Jessica Loose"
Dispositivos o Servicios Tecnológicos Durante la Práctica de Actividad Física para Personas con Enfermedad:,Amara García Belloso
Bilder vom Sport,Anke Bohne
Starting Out (Ironman),"Paul Huddle, Roch Frey"
Archery Lexicon,Kay Koppedrayer
Diamonds in the Rough,"Daniel Couet, Lauren Zaknoun"
Mountaintop,"Nick Baumgardner, Mark Snyder"
Rolling Stones Legends Alphabet,"Beck Feiner, Alphabet Legends Pty Ltd"
Bucks Legends Alphabet,"Beck Feiner, Alphabet Legends Pty Ltd"
Trail Blazers Legends Alphabet,"Beck Feiner, Alphabet Legends Pty Ltd"
Forms Notebook for Martial Artists,Piper Jornales
My Ringside Seat to the AWA,Joyce Paustian
Juan Terin Pizarro,Jorge F. Lopez Velez
Highboy Rings down the Curtain,"George Agnew Chamberlain, Randi Ward"
Knicks Legends Alphabet,"Beck Feiner, Alphabet Legends Pty Ltd"
Harry Styles Legends Alphabet,"Beck Feiner, Alphabet Legends Pty Ltd"
Taylor Swift Legends Alphabet,"Beck Feiner, Alphabet Legends Pty Ltd"
Suns Legends Alphabet,"Beck Feiner, Alphabet Legends Pty Ltd"
Warriors Legends Alphabet,"Beck Feiner, Alphabet Legends Pty Ltd"
Plunge,Christy Winn
Win from Within,"Sydney, Harry, 3rd, Joe Montana"
Arm Plane,Kevin Skruch
Olympic National Park Backpacking Adventure Guide Notes,"Doug Emory, Nate Trappe"
Pickleball Paul and the Missing Paddle,Will Terry
They Played Baseball for the Giants?,Jeff Wagner
2023 Rugby Almanack,"Adrian Hill, Campbell Burnes, Clive Akers"
Cocky Catcher,Chiquita Dennie
Arnold Palmer,Martin Davis
Pressure,Chiquita Dennie
She's All I Need,Chiquita Dennie
Rich Rod vs Graham,Shane Dale
Not a Book,Shane Crabtree
Extra Innings,Tim Madigan
Last Dance,Edward Porcelli
Introduction to Sports Analytics Using R -- Class Test Version - Fall 2023,"Ryan Elmore, Andrew Urbaczewski"
Tennis,Thomas Kingsley Troupe
Shelby 1923,Todd Aaron Jensen
Journal of My Adventurous Life : Your Travel and Camping Notebook,Rhonda Cavner
Challenge,"Hobie Billingsley, Pete Andersen"
Hockey,Thomas Kingsley Troupe
My 2004 Budo Journal,Michael DeMarco
Wrestling,Thomas Kingsley Troupe
F5000 Profile,Will Silk
Ageless Athletic Spirit,"Collins, William"
WNC New Boulders,Mike Reardon
COZ-A Story of Life on the Run,Robert Cozens
Breakaway,Kris Butler
Way the Heart Breaks,M. J. Fields
True Golf,Tom Woods
Karate Cow,Tyler Hundley
Unbeatable,"Swearing Mormon Productions, Ben Stapley"
Basketball,Thomas Kingsley Troupe
Ego,Chuck Thompson
Soccer,Thomas Kingsley Troupe
Sunny Jim Bottomley,Kent Krause
Don't Say Plan B or Backup Plan to an Aspiring Pro Athlete,"Williams, Belford, Jr."
Under the Lights,Shannon Stacey
Total sports,DK Publishing
The Kids Got It Right How The Texas Allstars Kicked Down Racial Walls,Jim Dent
The hurt artist,Shane Niemeyer
¡Clemente!,Willie Perdomo
Go Girl! #4,Vicki Steggall
A life well played,Arnold Palmer
Careers in sports,Valerie Menard
"Hot hands, draft hype, & DiMaggio's streak",Sheldon Hirsch
Missing in action,Dean Hughes
The big show : a tribute to ESPN's SportsCenter,"Keith Olbermann, Dan Patrick"
Research scientist,Shirley Brinkerhoff
Eating the dinosaur,Chuck Klosterman
SPORT STAR: MODERN SPORT AND THE CULTURAL ECONOMY OF SPORTING CELEBRITY,BARRY SMART
The timeless swing,Tom Watson
Sexual minorities in sports,Melanie L. Sartore-Baldwin
UNDERSTANDING SPORTS CULTURE,TONY SCHIRATO
The last natural,Rob Miech
Tales from the Maryland Terrapins,David Ungrady
Travel math,Helen Thompson
Psychologist,Shirley Brinkerhoff
Onward to victory,Murray A. Sperber
Living out loud,"Sager, Craig Sr"
Researching Sport and Exercise,Chris Lynch
Great men die twice,Mark Kram
BLEEDING BLUE,WENDEL CLARK
Chicken soup for the sports fan's soul,Jack Canfield
The Wimbledon Final That Never Was,David Wood
Rushing Amy,Julie Brannagh
The rough guide to cult sport,Lloyd Bradley
The great book of Seattle sports lists,Mike Gastineau
Seemed Like a Good Idea at the Time,David Goodwillie
The roar of the crowd,Rich Wallace
The roar of the crowd,Rich Wallace
Room for improvement,John Casey
Safe at home,Mike Lupica
"So, you want to work in sports?",Joanne Mattern
Tarnished Heisman,Don Yaeger
Cardiovascular Physiology In Exercise And Sport,Christopher Bell
"Introduction to physical education, fitness, and sport",Daryl Siedentop
Working with volunteers in sport,Graham Cuskelly
"Race, sport and politics",Ben Carrington
The physiology of training,Gregory P. Whyte
Little Book for Dads,Adams Media
How Fantasy Sports Explains The World What Pujols And Peyton Can Teach Us About Wookiees And Wall Street,A. J. Mass
Applied sport psychology,Jean M. Williams
Applied sport psychology,Jean M. Williams
Stillpower,Garret Kramer
Introduction to PE Fitness and Sport,Siedentop
Intro PE Fit Sport 2e Im,Siedentop
Applied sport psychology,Jean M. Williams
Fundamentals of exercise physiology,Robert A. Robergs
More Thoughts of Chairman Moore,Brian Moore
Missing in Action,Dean Hughes
Ripley's believe it or not!,Robert L. Ripley
Strange but true,
Stealing Home,Sherryl Woods
Split decision,Todd Hafer
Sports In America,Phil Barber
Sporty Babies Wear Sweats,Michelle Sinclair Colman
"Sporting Life, The",Bill Barich
Turpin Times,Jim Turpin
Integrated sports massage therapy,Anders Jelvéus
Theyve Kicked It Away Again The Thoughts Of Chairman Moore,Brian Moore
"Working Out, Working Within",Jerry Lynch
The outdoor handy book,Daniel Carter Beard
Sport in history,Jeffrey Hill
Sport and exercise psychology,Joanne Thatcher
Dream on,John Richardson
The B.A.A. at 125,John Hanc
Truck driver,Connor Syrewicz
Counting the days while my mind slips away,Ben Utecht
Introduction to kinesiology,Angela Lumpkin
Win forever,Pete Carroll
You Herd Me!: I'll Say It If Nobody Else Will,Colin Cowherd
Sport Hypnosis,Donald Liggett
Assessment of Athletic Injuries (Athletic Training Education Series),David H. Perrin
Therapeutic Exercise for Athletic Injuries (Athletic Training Education Series),Peggy A. Houglum
Sport Mechanics for Coaches,Gerald A. Carr
Psyched to win,Robert M. Nideffer
Slam Dunk! God's Words of Life from the NIV Sports Devotional Bible,Zondervan Publishing Company
Practical philosophy of sport,R. Scott Kretchmar
Teaching team sports,Joan A. Philipp
More team building challenges,Daniel W. Midura
The biophysical foundations of human movement,Bruce Abernethy
Sports Power,David Sandler
Promotion for sport directors,"Johnson, John R."
Practical math for health fitness professionals,Dennis K. Flood
Advances in sport psychology,
Instructor Manual for on the Guard II,YMCA of the USA Staff
Contemporary sport management,Janet B. Parks
PE2theMAX,J. D. Hughes
Contemporary sport management,Janet B. Parks
Sport finance,"Gil Fried, Steven J. Shapiro, Timothy D. Deschriver"
Dictionary of the sport and exercise sciences,Mark H. Anshel
Philosophic inquiry in sport,"William John Morgan, Klaus V. Meier"
Climbing walls,"Jim Stiehl, Tim B. Ramsey"
Instructional Programs,"Diane K. Belz, Vicki Highstreet, Nancy Rapp"
Special Events Manual,National Intramural-Recreational Sports
Program evaluation for sportdirectors [sic],James L. Kestner
Mistakes Worth Making,Susan Halden-Brown
Sportskill Basic,National Association for Sport & Pe &Nas
Advanced sports nutrition,Dan Benardot
Foundations of Sport and Exercise Package,Daniel Gould Robert S. Weinberg
Biomechanics of running shoes,Benno M. Nigg
European perspectives on exercise and sport psychology,Stuart Biddle
Performing in extreme environments,Lawrence E. Armstrong
Physiological tests for elite athletes,Christopher John Gore
Le sport et les français pendant l'occupation 1940-1944 tome 1,Arnaud /Terret /Gros
Sports Fans Guide to Christian Athletes and Sports Trivia,Dave Branon
National sports policies,"Laurence Hilmond Chalip, Johnson, Arthur T."
Managing sport business,Linda Trenberth
The legend of Jesse Smoke,Robert Bausch
Disputed pleasures,Thomas S. Henricks
Psychology of champions,James J. Barrell
Controversies of the sports world,Douglas T. Putnam
Encyclopedia of British Sport,Grant Jarvie
The rules of the game,Alan Gregor Cobley
To show what an Indian can do,John Bloom
Essentials of Sports Law,Glenn M. Wong
SportCult,"Martin, Randy, Toby Miller"
Sport and leisure cultures,"Tomlinson, Alan."
"Awesome, Disgusting, Unusual Facts About Sports",Julia Garstecki
Racquetball,George S. Fichter
Sport und Recht,"Werner, Fritz"
Sport Ethnography,Robert R. Sands
The Olympic Games in New York,NYC2012 (Organization)
Mawsuat tarikh al-harakah al-riyadiyah fi al-Mamlakah al-Arabiyah al-Saudiyah,Amin Saati
"L'autre, l'étranger ; Sports et loisirs",Christian Cannuyer
Media sports stars,Garry Whannel
My Life and Battles,Jack Johnson
Among The Fans,Patrick Collins
Sports ethics,Lawrence H. Berlow
Sports and games of the Renaissance,Andrew Leibs
Sports and Physical Education,Bonnie Gratch
Sports and games of ancient Egypt,Wolfgang Decker
"Sports, ethics and education",Peter J. Arnold
"Sport, cultures, and identities in South Africa",John Nauright
Sports ethics in America,Donald G. Jones
Sport and corporate nationalisms,"Michael L. Silk, David Lawrence Andrews, Cheryl L. Cole"
"Sport, sectarianism, and society in Ireland",John Peter Sugden
Team talk,Julian Walker
Sports and games of the 18th and 19th centuries,Robert Crego
The economics of sport,"Robert Sandy, Peter Sloane, Mark Rosentraub"
Tutenkhamens Tracksuit The History Of Sport In 100ish Objects,Alan Tyers
Historical dictionary of the modern Olympic movement,"John E. Findling, Kimberly D. Pelle"
World sports,Maylon Hanold
Women's sport and spectacle,Gina Daddario
Sport psychology,David Lavallee
Bmx And Mountain Biking The Worlds Best Parks Trails Streets And Techniques,Paul Mason
The Right Way to Win,Mike Blaylock
Sport Italia,Simon Martin
"Sport, identity, and ethnicity",Jeremy MacClancy
The 100 most important sporting events in American history,Lew Freedman
American Sports [4 volumes],Murry R. Nelson
Biographical dictionary of American sports,David L. Porter
Sport psychology,Mark H. Anshel
Sport and Exercise Psychology,Peter Crocker
Teaching cues for sport skills for secondary school students,Hilda Ann Fronske
Sports heroes of ancient Greece,"Mason, Paul"
Read on...sports,Craig A. Clark
Skateboarding,"Mason, Paul"
So You Want To Be Captain,Declan Gane
"Sport, Leisure, and Culture in Twentieth-Century Britain",Jeff Hill
Warriors on horseback,"Carter, John M."
Yankees to Fighting Irish,Michael Leo Donovan
Honus Wagner and the most famous baseball card ever,Jane Yolen
"Always Picked Last
            
                Choose Your Own Adventure Dragonlarks",R. A. Montgomery
Sport psychology,
Ace your sports science project,Robert Gardner
About Three Bricks Shy Of A Load,Roy Blount Jr.
Here Come the Harlem Globetrotters,Larry Dobrow
Good Sports: A Large Print Anthology of Great Sports Writing,Renee Shur
Podium,Ben Oakley
The female athlete,"Carol C. Teitz, Elizabeth A. Arendt"
Representative American Speeches 2012-2013,Brian Boucher
Electric October,Kevin Cook
Extreme mountain biking,Arlene Bourgeois Molzahn
Full throttle,Matthew Reilly
Emperors and gladiators,Thomas E. J. Wiedemann
The Black Bruins,"Johnson, James W."
Game On,Sharon Kizziah-Holmes
Total Knockout,Cookie O'Gorman
"Backcountry Ski Map, Crested Butte, Colorado",Andy Sovick
2024 the A.T. Guide,"David ""Awol"" Miller, AntiGravityGear"
Long Range Shooting Handy Reference Guide,Karin Christensen
Finding & Growing Your Field,Jabbar Juluke
Switch Kicker,Lane Walker
Second Sunrise,John Trent
Keep It Real,Kevin Batchelor
The athlete's dilemma,John Parry
Buckeyes A To Z,Mark Walter
First Sport,"Simon Chalk, Carl Halliday"
Osmanlı'dan günümüze Ermeni - Rum - Musevi kulüpleri ve sporcuları,Ergun Hiçyılmaz
Camp So-and-So,Mary McCoy
Japanese Sports,Allen Guttmann
Hockey and Philosophy,"Normand Baillargeon, Christian Boissinot, Scott Irving"
Inside the sports pages,Mark Douglas Lowes
Spartak Moscow,Robert Edelman
Beyond The Final Score The Politics Of Sport In Asia,Victor D. Cha
Transnational sport,Rachael Miyung Joo
Aboriginal Peoples And Sport In Canada Historical Foundations And Contemporary Issues,Janice Evelyn
Psychology of motor behavior and sport - 1979,North American Society for the Psychology of Sport and Physical Activity. Annual Conference
Physiology of sport and exercise study guide,"Christine M. Drews, Jack H. Wilmore"
Heart of Dixie a Second Chance Small Town Romantic Comedy,Ruthie Henrick
"Confident, Calm and Clutch",Valerie R. Alston
Day at the Ballpark,"Dalton Kendall, Dom Sahadewa"
2024 Nicklaus Golf Calendar,Legendary Publishing & Media Group LLC
Patrick Mahomes,Cristian Aluas
Children's Fun Sports Theory and Practice Course,Jia Liu
Recycled Hearts,"Liz Beth Rogan, David Berens"
"Passion for the Beautiful Game, Soccer",Eugene Ventriglia
Morganton Aggies,"Phifer, Edward, 3rd"
Tbd,Aaron Linsdau
Making Contact,James Dillon
Born to Play Béisbol,Christian Paniagua
Golf Caddy Process,"Huggett, Gilton, Jr."
Serious Runner Handbook,Stephen Daniel Gnoza
A-Z Gymnastics Coloring Book,"Danielle Soucy Mills, Kim Soderberg"
Cope,"Brock Beard, Hamilton, Russ, Sr., Charlie Berch Collection, Ryan Daley, Robert Taylor"
Pickleball Is [Not] Life,Teresa Jungling
Golf It's All Mental,Larry Eichenauer
Basketball from a to Zen,Doug Saylor
Dixie Cragger's Atlas - a Climber's Guide to Alabama and Georgia,Chris Watford
"SomaVeda® Thai Fire Stretch¿ Coach, Active, Assisted Stretching, Flexibility & Mobility Coaching : Certificate Course",Anthony B. James
Boys Hoopster 23-24,The Hoopster
Miss Hoopster,The Hoopster
Fly Fishing on the Lower Clark Fork River,Frazer Thompson
Mafia,"Travis Carlson, Pan-American Film Division"
Super Fun Hockey Activity Book for 6 - 9 Year Old Girls and Boys,"Copper Penny Puzzles, Penelope M. Klatell"
Growing up Wrestling 2,Victor Rook
Total Browns,"Bob Carroll, Michael Gershman, David S. Neft, John Thorn"
Psychology of sport injury,"Heil, John."
Children in sport,"Richard A. Magill, Michael J. Ash, Frank L. Smoll"
Tennis,Marjorie DeWitt
Hiking Mt. Baker and the North Cascades,John D'Onofrio
Prison Basketball the Championship Dreams of Ron Jordan and Other Stories,Seth Ferranti
Ode to Olympic Dreams,Janice Kehler
Sports Journal,Jamilah Abdul-Haqq
Baseball Mitt,Brianna Boedeker-Welsh
Empower Young Girls in Flag Football,Tommie Womack
All-Time Dodgers Art Book,"Dave Hobrecht, Colletti, Ned, Jr., Hershiser, Orel, IV"
Jackie Joyner-Kersee Corriendo Por el Oro,"Jackie Joyner-Kersee, Laval Belle"
Life,Brian Gaines
Wingshooting in Argentina My Golden Years,Doily E. Fulcher Sr.
7 Days to Golf,Kelley Brooke
"My Favorite Sport, Pickleball",Sharon Kizziah-Holmes
"Dunks, Threes and Palm Trees",David Dorsey
Stuff-It Golf Journal,Rick Diaz
Liberty Athletic Club,"Alda Cossi, Viki Bok, Anne Shreffler"
Underdogs,Eugene Siegel
Wicked Games & Ends,Isla Vaughn
Icarus Syndrome,John Long Long
Back-2-Back Carroll County High School State Championships,"Jerry Carter, Kris Richardson, Rebecca McDowell, A cast of many"
Robbers Roost Canyoneering,Derek A. Wolfe
Why I Love Golf,Layla Jack
Homicide Hank,Kenneth Bridgham
Ring the Bell,"Joe Bertagna, Robert Fitzpatrick"
Off Course,Tiffany Noelle Chacon
My Favorite Year,Mike Boryla
"Backcountry Ski Map, Mount Hood, Oregon",Eric Schmidgall
Baseball,Sharon Kizziah-Holmes
Oklahoma Roots of One Pocket,Rabbi Hippie
Bird Dog Man,"William Titus, James McCafferty"
Epee 2.6,"Johan Harmenberg, Jack Metzler"
What People Have Said about Eddie Mathews,Tom Weber
Mental Toughness for Athletes-WORKBOOK,A. J. Kikumoto
"Datos, Métricas y Otros Números en el Deporte",José María Izquierdo Velasco
Walk Thru Neverland,Dyana Carmella
Run. Train. Race,Jim Fischer
Stories of the Orchestrated Youth,ethan james
Trampoline Fundamentals,Nicholas Minney
101 best of Tunney Side of sports columns,Jim Tunney
My Daddy Loves Michigan State Football,"Michael Shoule, Christopher Nugent, Christina Chiaramonte"
My Daddy Loves Florida Football,"Michael Shoule, Melanie Cook, Eve Cook, Christina Chiaramonte"
R-R-Respect,"Jenny Dearinger, Wayne Fields"
Baseball Looking Back,"Smirch, John, Sr."
2024 Women of Climbing Calendar,Sharp End Publishing
Pickleball Inside the Zone,Rob Polishook
Money games,David M. Carter
Play football!,Trace Taylor
Play baseball,Trace Taylor
Playing with God,William J. Baker
Gaming the world,Andrei S. Markovits
Playing for dollars,Paul D. Staudohar
Sport: readings from a sociological perspective,Eric Dunning
The long and the short of it,Gary Wolstenholme
The Country of Football: Soccer and the Making of Modern Brazil (Sport in World History),Roger Kittleson
101 Ways to Motivate Athletes,Keith T. Manos
Sportsmaths,J.M Jodey
Glow pucks and 10-cent beer,Greg Wyshynski
"Sporting bodies, damaged selves",Kevin Young
Aboriginal Peoples And Sport In Canada Historical Foundations And Contemporary Issues,Janice Evelyn
Mounting danger,Karis Walsh
Worth the risk,Karis Walsh
I love basketball,Trace Taylor
Sources of information on play and recreation,Russell Sage Foundation. Dept. of Recreation.
Sources of information on play and recreation,Lee F. Hanmer
Sources of information on play and recreation,Russell Sage Foundation. Dept. of Recreation.
لمحات من ماضي التعليم والرياضة والكشافة في الكويت,ʻĀdil Muḥammad ʻAbd al-Mughnī
Professional sport in the European Union,"Andrew Caiger, Simon Gardiner"
Sport Business in the Global Marketplace (Finance and Capital Markets),"Hans Westerbeek, Aaron Smith"
International sport,Richard William Cox
Roman Sports and Spectacles,Anne Mahoney
Study on National Sports Legislation in Europe,Andre Noel Chaker
British sport,Richard William Cox
Japan at play,"Joy Hendry, Massimo Raveri"
God bolʹshikh sobytiĭ,Ilʹi͡a Vitalʹevich Baru
"al-Rāfidayn, majd wa-ḥaḍārah",Jūrj Khazūm
Sīmānta Bāṃlāra lokakrīṛā,"Mukhopādhyāẏa, Subrata."
Türk kültür tarihinde spor,Hasan Basri Öngel
"Africa, football, and FIFA",Paul Darby
Exercise and sport in feminist therapy,"Ruth L. Hall, Carole A. Oglesby"
"Crossing sidelines, crossing cultures",Joel S. Franks
Steele Here,Robert Steele
Sports around the world,"John Nauright, Charles Parrish"
Playing with anger,Howard C. Stevenson
The reason for sports,Ted Kluck
The silent season of a hero,"Michael Rosenwald, Gay Talese"
Working out,Justine J. Reel
Sport and society in the global age,Timothy Marjoribanks
Encyclopedia of world sport,"David Levinson, Karen Christensen"
"Sport, media, and society",Eileen Kennedy
Secrets Of Sport The Technology That Makes Champions,James De Winter
Blastin' the blues,Loren Long
Sport in consumer culture,"Horne, John"
Athletic training,"Fahey, Thomas D."
Scholastic year in sports 2014,"Buckley, James Jr"
Muhammad Ali,Walter Dean Myers
American History Through American Sports From Colonial Lacrosse To Extreme Sports,Danielle S. Coombs
Golden,"Marcus Thompson, II"
Scholastic year in sports 2017,Scholastic Inc.
The struggle for Canadian sport,Bruce Kidd
Sports In America,John Walters
The champion mindset,Joanna Zeiger
Jack Buck,Rob Rains
The big field,Mike Lupica
Secrets of sport,James De Winter
Sports law,Michael J. Cozzillio
Praeger Handbook of Sports Medicine and Athlete Health,Claude T. Moorman
101 youth netball drills,"Chris Sheryn, Anna Sheryn"
Sport in Ancient Times (Praeger Series on the Ancient World),Nigel B. Crowther
Adolescent worlds,Mary Frances Stuck
Get in the game,Tony Evans
A Lifetime Of Training For Just Ten Seconds Olympians In Their Own Words,Richard Witt
Encyclopedia of women and sports,Victoria Sherrow
Psyche and sports,"Murray Stein, James Hillman"
Sex segregation in sports,Adrienne N. Milner
Sell Up and Cruise,Bill Cooper
SPORTS HISTORY: A PRACTICAL GUIDE,Martin Polley
Sport and politics,Bill Shaikin
Unique games and sports around the world,John Cheffers
Wisden On India,Jonathan Rice
"Sport, culture and politics","Clyde Binfield, Stevenson, John"
Sport in Asia and Africa,Eric A. Wagner
Scottish sport in the making of the nation,"Grant Jarvie, Graham S. Walker"
Encyclopedia of sport and exercise psychology,"Robert C. Eklund, Gershon Tenenbaum"
The event safety guide,Health & Safety Executive
Scholastic year in sports 2018,"Buckley, James Jr"
Scholastic Year in Sports 2015,"Buckley, James Jr"
The mighty book of sports knowledge,Steve Wulf
Rivals!,Richard O. Davies
The Future Of Sports Law In The European Union Beyond The Eu Reform Treaty And The White Paper,Roger Blanpain
Crash course,Matthew Reilly
Scholastic year in sports 2016,"Buckley, James Jr"
An annotated bibliography of Latin American sport,Joseph Arbena
The Runaway Spell,Lexi Connor
Endurance in sport,Roy J. Shephard
J.R.,Jeremy Roenick
Mawsūʻat al-qarn,Muhammad Sadiq
Eros and Greek athletics,Thomas Francis Scanlon
"Histoire culturelle des activités physiques, XIXe et XXe siècles",Bertrand During
Die psychgologische Theorie des Sports ...,Wilhelm Benary
Der sport als individual -- und sozial-erscheinung,Wilhelm Benary
ha-Degel ha-Tsiyoni me-ʻal ha-Bosforos,Daniyel Tsiper
Report of the Committee on Recreation,Minnesota State Planning Board
Athlet und Polis im archaischen und frühklassischen Griechenland,Christian Mann
Sports,Kayele M. Kambombo
Camping,
The ultimate guide to sports marketing,Stedman Graham
Exploring sport and exercise psychology,Judy L. Van Raalte
The traditional sport,I. R. Kagongi
The king's book of sports,L. A. Govett
Guide to sports and outdoor recreations,Wilson Marcy Ranck
"Reformers, sport, modernizers",J. A. Mangan
Staatliche Sportförderung in Österreich in der Ersten Republik,Alexandra Neubauer
Power plays,John M. Barry
Dāstān-i varzish-i Īrān,Ismāʻīl Shafīʻī Sarvistānī
The sport of life and death,E. Michael Whittington
Paradoxes of youth and sport,"Margaret Gatz, Michael A. Messner, Sandra Ball-Rokeach"
Psychology in sports,"Richard M. Suinn, Robert D. Clayton"
The Best American Sports Writing 1996 (Best American Sports Writing),John Feinstein
The best American sports writing 2004,"Glenn Stout, Richard Ben Cramer"
101 Youth Netball Drills,Anna Sheryn
Economics of sport,Mark J Eschenfelder
"Rugby skills, tactics and rules","Tony Williams, Gordon Hunter"
Sport: a contemporary view,Donna Mae Miller
Golden Years,David B. Tuuk
Fair or foul,Christopher S. Kudlac
Handbook of sports studies,"Jay J. Coakley, Eric Dunning"
A son of the game,James Dodson
Le sport est-il inhumain?,Robert Redeker
Sports scandals,Peter S. Finley
Great Australian sporting moments,"Roberts, Michael"
江西省第十屆运动会志,Mingsheng Lu
Soziale Talente im Sport,Steffen Bahlke
Sportvereine im Wandel,"Nagel, Siegfried Prof. Dr."
Le Olimpiadi di Pechino,"Francesco Campo, Carmela Silvia Messina"
NL28 Olympic Fire,"Winy Maas, Ole Bouman"
Spitzensport und Publikum,Lars Riedl
Sportökonomik,Erich Thöni
Marzik HMĚM pashtonatʻertʻi khmbagrakanner,Hay Marmnakrtʻakan Ěndhanur Miutʻiwn. Kedronakan Varchʻutʻiwn.
Gameface,Erica Boeke
Sporting Cultures,David Wood
A People's History of Sports in the United States: From Bull-Baiting to Barry Bonds,David Zirin
The image of God in the human body,Donald L. Deardorff
Handwörterbuch des Sportmanagements,Thomas Bezold
Die Ökonomie des Dopings,Frank Daumann
Metabolic Tuning statt Doping,Uwe Gröber
Steuerung im organisierten Sport,Deutsche Vereinigung für Sportwissenschaft. Sektion Sportsoziologie. Tagung
Sport in China,"Volker Klöpsch, Manfred Lämmer, Walter Tokarski"
Old Mother Hubbard's dog takes up sport,John Yeoman
Yo estuve ahí,Héctor Devia
The linguistics of football,Eva Lavric
عبد الله الفيصل,Muḥammad ibn ʻAlī Qaddādī
Bob Wilsons Ultimate Collection Of Peculiar Sporting Lingo,Bob Wilson
Jump for joy,Gena Caponi-Tabery
L'Italia a pedali,Luigi Spitali
"Sport, Stress und Gesundheit bei Jugendlichen","Gerber, Markus Dr."
Sport und Selbstkonzept,Achim Conzelmann
Handbuch Sportsoziologie,"Kurt; Gugutzer, Robert Weis"
Qualitative Forschungsmethoden in der Sportpädagogik,"Wolf-Dietrich Miethling, Matthias Schierz, Dirk Blotzheim"
Asian Pacific Americans and baseball,Joel S. Franks
Sport in the Lives of Young Australians,Richard Light
Die Gleichwertigkeit von Leistung und Zufall im Wettkampfsport,Günter Kirschling
Neue Perspektiven ökonomischer Sportforschung,"Marie-Luise Klein, Markus Kurscheidt"
"Gesunde Kommune, gesunder Mensch?",Dorit Bödefeld
Management und Marketing im Sport,"Gerd Nufer, André Bühler, Christoph Breuer"
Sport und Christentum,"Wissenschaftliches Symposium ""Zur Christlichen Sicht des Sports"" (2007 Akademie des Bistums Mainz)"
Motivation und Volition in der Sport- und Bewegungstherapie,Gorden Sudeck
Girls Only! vol. 2,Beverly Lewis
Z tradycji wychowania fizycznego i sportu w czasach zaborów i II RP (1883-1939),"Stanisław Zaborniak, Paweł Król"
El deporte en la revolución bolivariana,Pedro García Avendaño
Géographie du sport à la Réunion,Olivier Naria
Sport e Chiesa,Giovanni Battista Gandolfo
בין רעננה לבאר־שבע,Aryeh Rapaport
Our Olympic century,Joseph.852 Romanos
L'avenir du football européen en question,Guy Bono
Martindale's Drugs Restricted in Sport 2008,Sean C. Sweetman
I miti dello sport,Gian Paolo Ormezzano
Tribal play,"Michael Atkinson, Kevin Young"
Global Olympics,"Kevin Young, Kevin B. Wamsley"
All-stars & movie stars,Ron Briley
Nemeōn athlōn diēgēsis,Giōrgos P. Kōstouros
Dawna Łódź sportowa 1824-1945,Andrzej Bogusz
Guinness book of women's sports records,Norris Dewar McWhirter
Guinness book of sports spectaculars,Norris Dewar McWhirter
Guinness book of superstunts & staggering statistics,Norris Dewar McWhirter
Dream Jobs in Stadium and Sports Facility Operations,Kathy Furgang
Meeting competence needs in the hotel and catering industry,
More than a game,Jan Stradling
Jogos populares portugueses de jovens e de adultos,"Cabral, António."
Fast break,Al Janssen
"Olympic Technology
            
                Mathematics Readers",John Lockyer
Olympic Dreams,Guoqi Xu
15 Sports Myths and Why Theyre Wrong,Jason Winfree
National identity and global sports events,"Alan Tomlinson, Christopher Young"
Powerful Moments in Sports,Martin Gitlin
Sport and the Christian religion,Nick J. Watson
Revise BTEC National Sport Revision Workbook,"Sue Hartigan, Kelly Sharp"
Sustainable Rural Tourism (CCP S.),Countryside Commission
That's gotta hurt,"Geier, David Dr"
Transforming Student-Athletes into Dynamic Team Leaders,Cory L. Dobbs
WORKING OUT MY SALVATION: THE CONTEMPORARY GYM AND THE PROMISE OF 'SELF' TRANSFORMATION,WILLIAM JAMES HOVERD
Pearson REVISE BTEC National Sport and Exercise Science Revision Guide,"Louise Sutton, Tracy Richardson, Laura Fisher, Danielle Toward, Katie Jones"
Race to Win,Derek Daley
Howard Cosell,Mark Ribowsky
Mantenerse en Forma con Deportes,Dona Herweck Rice
Quest for Personal Best,Lisa Greathouse
Keeping Fit with Sports Level 8 (Early Readers from TIME For Kids) (Early Readers),RICE
Next One up Mindset,Grant Parr
Sportscenter Poems,"Christoph Paul, Jim Agpalza"
Hosting the Olympic Summer Games,Dianne Irving
Asian American basketball,Joel S. Franks
Therapeutic modalities for athletic injuries,Craig R Denegar
The history of exercise and sport science,"John D. Massengale, Swanson, Richard A."
Personnel management for sport directors,Timothy E. Flannery
Creatine,Melvin H. Williams
More fantastic fundraisers for sport and recreation,William F. Stier
Recreational sport management,Richard F. Mull
Chronicles,Ray Barrington
Doc Stull's Sports Today and In the Day,Richard Arlin Stull
Strength training,Lee E. Brown
Sport Marketing,Bernard James Mullin
Strength band training,Phillip Page
Management Strategies In Athletic Training (Athletic Training Education Series),David H. Perrin
2007-2008 NFHS Basketball,"Mary E. Struckhoff, Human Kinetics Staff"
2007-2009 NFHS Basketball Official's Manual,"Mary E. Struckhoff, Human Kinetics Staff"
Soccer Clinician's Kit I 2007-2008,National Intramural Recreational and Sport Association
Physiological Aspects of Sport Training and Performance,Jay Hoffman
"Power, politics, and the Olympic Games",Alfred Erich Senn
Chile,Imray
FEMINISM AND SPORTING BODIES: ESSAYS ON THEORY AND PRACTICE,M. ANN HALL
Teaching sport concepts and skills,Linda L. Griffin
Contemporary sport management,Janet B. Parks
Nutrition for Serious Athletes,"Dan, Ph.D. Benardot"
Sport psychology,Tony Morris
The Olympic Games effect,John Davis
Sports marketing,Howard Schlossberg
Sport and spectacle in the ancient world,Donald G Kyle
Complete Athlete,"Don Yaeger, Dave Coggin, Walid Khoury, Ziad Khoury, Tiffany Brooks"
Performing under pressure,Saul Miller
Campeones del fútbol mundial / Champions of Men's Soccer,Ann Killion
Coach,Jess M. Brallier
What to Doodle? All Sorts of Sports!,Chuck Whelon
Nutritional needs of athletes,F. Brouns
How to get a job in sports,John Taylor
Five O'Clock Lightning,Frommer
Adherence issues in sport and exercise,S. J. Bull
Adherence issues in sport and exercise,S. J. Bull
Born in the bleachers,Steve Moore
Training in sport,J. Mester
The Olympic Textbook of Science in Sport (Encyclopedia of Sports Medicine),Ron Maughan
The Olympic book of sports medicine,"Howard G. Knuttgen, Kurt Tittel"
The Olympic book of sports medicine,"Howard G. Knuttgen, Kurt Tittel"
Sport and physical activity for mental health,David Carless
Biochemistry for sport and exercise metabolism,D. MacLaren
Sports gynecology,Michelle P. Warren
Sports in American life,Richard O. Davies
Presidential lies,Shep Campbell
Physik des Golfspiels,Ivan Egry
Stanley Cup Fever,McFarlane
The importance of administration in international action,Ordway Tead
Money games,Ann E. Weiss
Physiology of sport and exercise,W. Larry Kenney
Shag do vershiny,Sergey Artemyev
Should drug cheats be banned for life?,Neil Morris
"El ""sport"" en España",Pedro Rico
Der massensport,Fritz Hammer
"""Starke Jugend, freies Volk""",Markus Giuliani
Kheloẏāṛadera saṅge,Cirañjība
Olympic victor monuments and Greek athletic art,"Hyde, Walter Woodburn"
Motion,"Noah Blaustein, John Edgar Wideman"
Chinyelu,Pierre Meunier
L'OMS du Port --ou le pari du sport pour tous et toutes,Raymond Lauret
Vom Idealismus zur Identität,Matthias Marschik
Stadium (notas de sport),Jacinto Miquelarena
"The Kings Maiesties declaration to his subiects, concerning lawfull sports to be vsed. London",England and Wales. Sovereign (1603-1625 : James I)
Guinness book of sports facts,Stan Greenberg
Golf God's way,Gus Bernardoni
The King's Men (All for the Game #3),Nora Sakavic
Kettlebell Conditioning for MMA and Other Fight Sports,Scott Shetler Forward by Donovan Craig
Italian Job,B. S. Levy
Greatest sporting memories,
Pacing in sport and exercise,Andrew Edwards
Psyched!,Terry Orlick
Help Me Be Good about Being a Bad Sport,Joy Berry
The haywire heart,Chris Case
"Hoosiers All, 2nd Edition",Emerson Houck
Legends of the Leagues,Pete DiPrimio
Olympic champions in Manchester,James W. Bancroft
Principles and Practice in EU Sports Law,Stephen Weatherill
The haunted shortstop,Allan Zullo
Research methods and design in sport management,Damon Andrew
Philadelphia sports quiz,Brenda Alesii
Science of Sports,Wendy H Lanier
Shatterproof,Richard Sowers
Rick Barry's Super Sports Trivia Game (Buzztime Trivia),Rick Barry
The Physical Education Teacher's Book of Lists (J-B Ed: Book of Lists),Marian D. Milliken
Mom's guide to sports,Vicki Poretta
The child and adolescent athlete,Oded Bar-Or
Fantasy sports online for dummies,James Edward Keogh
Global Sport,Joseph Maguire
Deadlines and overtimes,Bill Lyon
"Higher, further, faster",Stewart Ross
50 Greatest Tigers Every Fan Should Know,Lew Freedman
Ladybird Book of Balls,"Jason Hazeley, Joel Morris"
Barstool Book of Sports,"Andrew Daniels, Joseph Applegate"
Baseball,Holly Karapetkova
Developing sport psychology within your clinical practice,Jack J. Lesyk
Delaware sports legends,Joe Nye
Daily Fitness Journal,"Chiliving Staff, Danny Dreyer, Katherine Dreyer"
Deskathlon!,Meir Sered
The physical self,Kenneth R. Fox
"Chen T'ai Chi, Volume 1","Michael DeMarco, Asr Berwick, Stephan Cordes"
Core Sports Package (Steps to Success),Jim Brown
Olympic miracle,Pete Birle
Bigger Than Basketball,Larry Hansgen
Original Strength Performance,"Tim Anderson, Chip Morton, Mark Shropshire"
Little Green Book of Tennis,Tom aArham
The Best Ski Touring Routes,"Alan Apt, Kay Turnbaugh"
Pressing Reset for the Everyday Person,Original Strength
Pole Vault,David Butler
Original Strength Performance,John Usedom
Soccer Smarts,Brian Hurley
Not Your Average Joe,Joseph E. Prince
Thoughs for Tuesday,Bobby Simpson
Jiu Jitsu Why Even Bother,D. J. Stephens
The profile of a winner,James G. Bennett
Applied anatomy and biomechanics in sport,Timothy R. Ackland
Strength training for sport,William J. Kraemer
Exercise and sport in diabetes,Dinesh Nagi
A dictionary of sports,"Harewood, Harry pseud.?, Harry Harewood"
Key Concepts In,Milena Parent
Sport in the city,"Chris Gratton, Ian P. Henry"
Atalanta,G. S. Sandilands
Sportanlagen ...,Eduard Schmitt
Bāṅālīra khelādhūla,Sankar Sen Gupta
Domestic Competition Regulations 2007-2008,"Kinda S. Lenberg, Human Kinetics Staff"
"Mental toughness for sport, business and life",Robert S. Weinberg
Teamwork and tactics,Jon Richards
Souled out?,Shaun Powell
Championship Gymnastics,"Gerald S. George, James H. Stephenson, Abie Grossfeld"
Soccer Clinician's Kit II 2007-2008,National Intramural Recreation and Sport Association
Soccer Student Official's Kit 2007-2008,National Intramural Recreational and Sport Association
True competition,David Lyle Shields
Mr Mulligan,Tom McAuliffe
Applied sociology of sport,"Andrew Yiannakis, Susan L. Greendorfer"
Standardizing biomechanical testing in sport,David A. Dainty
Sport foundations for elementary physical education,"Stephen A. Mitchell, Judith L. Oslin, Linda L. Griffin"
Discover the YMCA,Mary B. Zoller
Health Fitness Hanbook,"Edward Howley, Don Franks, Yuruk Iyriboz"
Sports Speed,"George Dintiman, Bob Ward, Tom Tellez"
Self-Defense Techniquest and Tactics,Joseph Walker
Weight management,Melvin H. Williams
Fighting El Fuego,Pete Birle
Hockey Dreams,Gil Conrad
Safe At Home Touchdown Edition,James S. Mellett
"Play, Games and Sports in Cultural Contexts",Janet C. Harris
Sport and the American dream,Howard L. Nixon
Sports officiating,Alan S. Goldberger
Sport for children and youths,"Olympic Scientific Congress (1984 Eugene, Or.)"
Sports and fitness equipment design,"Ellen Kreighbaum, Smith, Mark A."
"Sport, Physical Activity, and the Law","Neil J. Dougherty, David Auxter, Alan S. Goldberger"
"Sport, culture, and personality",Donald W. Calhoun
Sport and Social Theory,C.Roger Rees
Test questions for physical education activities,Rosemary McGee
"Comparative physical education and sport, volume 5",International Seminar on Comparative Physical Education and Sport (5th 1986 University of British Columbia)
Youth sportdirector guide,Rainer Martens
YMCA youth super sports trainer's guide,National Board of the Young Men's Christian Associations
Programmed to Run,Thomas Miller
Sports Rule Book,"Thomas Hanlon, 'Human Kinetics"
Precision Pool and Billards,"Gerry Kanov, Shari Stauch"
Chasing The King,Ramey Temple
Keeper,Holly Goldberg Sloan
Sport mechanics for coaches,Brendan Burkett
"Proceedings of the Professional Preparation Conferences, National Athletic Trainers Association",Gerald W. Bell
Physical activity for individuals with mental retardation,Carl B. Eichstaedt
Sport and elite performers,"Olympic Scientific Congress (1984 Eugene, Or.)"
Sport and disabled athletes,"Olympic Scientific Congress (1984 Eugene, Or.)"
Sport bibliography,I. Draayer
Sport First Aid Classroom Course Study Guide,Melinda J. Flegel
Comparative Physical Education and Sport,March L. Krotee
Conquering athletic injuries,"Taylor, Paul M."
Joy and sadness in children's sports,Rainer Martens
Portrait of an athlete,Brice Durbin
Perspectives in kinanthropometry,"Olympic Scientific Congress (1984 Eugene, Or.)"
Hoop City,Scott Blumenthal
"Motocross Brother
            
                Dream Home Run Edition",Eric Hado
The Green,Debra Ginsberg
Exercise and sport biology,International Symposium on Sport Biology (1979
Fundraising for sport and recreation,William F. Stier
Psychology of sport injury,John Heil
Children in sport,"Frank L. Smoll, Richard A. Magill, Michael J. Ash"
Athletes and the American hero dilemma,Janet C. Harris
Analyzing physical education and sport instruction,"Paul W. Darst, Dorothy Zakrajsek, Victor H. Mancini"
Coaches guide to sport rehabilitation,Steven Tippett
Character development and physical activity,David Lyle Shields
Fit for life,Heinz W. Lenz
Competitive anxiety in sport,Rainer Martens
Future directions in exercise and sport science research,"Symposium on Future Directions in Exercise/Sport Research (1986 Tempe, Ariz.)"
Sport,"Gregory Baum, John Aloysius Coleman, Philip Hillyer"
Dictionary of the Sport and Exercise Science,Mark H. Anshel
Power and ideology in American sport,George H. Sage
The Long Way Around,Ramey Temple
Fighting El Fuego,Pete Birle
Sport and human genetics,"Olympic Scientific Congress (1984 Eugene, Or.)"
Serious Tennis,"Scott Williams, Randy Peterson"
Mental discipline,Michael K. Livingston
Limits of human performance,American Academy of Physical Education. Meeting
HPER-moving toward the 21st century,Liam Dugdale
Psychological foundations of sport,"John M. Silva, Robert S. Weinberg"
Sociology of sport,North American Society for the Sociology of Sport. Conference.
Motocross Brother,Eric Hado
Locals Only,Pete Birle
The story of worker sport,"Arnd Krüger, Riordan, James"
Exercise - Health Connection,David Nieman
Sports,Ron Berman
Sport and religion,Shirl J. Hoffman
Sport in social development,"Alan G. Ingham, John W. Loy"
Soviet sport background to the Olympics,"Riordan, James"
Sport and aging,"Olympic Scientific Congress (1984 Eugene, Or.)"
International perspectives on adapted physical activity,"International Symposium on Adapted Physical Activity (5th 1985 Toronto, Ont.)"
"Play, games, and sports in cultural contexts",Janet C. Harris
Learning experiences in sociology of sport,Susan L. Greendorfer
Motivation in sport and exercise,Glyn C. Roberts
Philosophic inquiry in sport,"William John Morgan, Klaus V. Meier"
Sport and politics,"Olympic Scientific Congress (1984 Eugene, Or.)"
"Sport, health, and nutrition","Olympic Scientific Congress (1984 Eugene, Or.)"
Sport pedagogy,"Olympic Scientific Congress (1984 Eugene, Or.)"
Sports rules encyclopedia,
Sport in China,Howard G. Knuttgen
The 1984 Olympic Scientific Congress proceedings,"Olympic Scientific Congress (1984 Eugene, Or.)"
Coaches guide to sport physiology,Brian J. Sharkey
Coaches training manual to psyching for sport,Terry Orlick
The Elite athlete,
Advances in sport psychology,Thelma S. Horn
The American sporting experience,Steven A. Riess
The athlete's guide to sports psychology,Dorothy V. Harris
Tennis in North Carolina,Troupe Noonan
Citizenship Through Sports Clinic Instructor Guide,"American Sport Education Program Staff, National Federation Interscholastic Coaches Education"
Citizenship Through Sports Clinic Study Guide,"American Sport Education Program Staff, National Federation Interscholastic Coaches Education"
Coaching Cooperative Youth Sports,Wayne Paulson
The metaphysics of ping-pong,Guido Mina Di Sospiro
5K Training Guide-Running with Dogs,Jt Clough
Understanding Sports Massage,Patricia J. Benjamin
The sports rules book,Human Kinetics (Organization)
Mormon athletes,William T. Black
"Social science of play, games, and sport",Glyn C. Roberts
Nutritional assessment of athletes,Judy A. Driskell
Horrid Henrys Sports,Francesca Simon
Cidadesportiva,Victor Andrade de Melo
Beyond the cheers,"C. Richard King - undifferentiated, Charles Fruehling Springwood"
Harvard varsity club,Harvard Varsity Club
"Classification. Class G: Geography, anthropology, sports and games",Library of Congress. Subject Cataloging Division.
Grand Canyon Nankoweap,Flood Hefley
Chicago White Sox,Richard Pennington
Colorado Rockies Trivia Teasers,Benjamin M. LeRoy
Cleveland Browns Trivia Teasers,Richard Pennington
Boone And Crockett Clubs 27th Big Game Awards 20072009 A Book Of The Boone And Crockett Club Containing Tabulations Of Outstanding North American Big Game Trophies Accepted During The 27th Awards Entry Period Of 20072009,Boone and Crockett Club
Badger Sports Trivia Teasers,Jerry Minnich
St. Louis Cardinals Trivia Teasers,Richard Pennington
The Boy Who Biked The World Riding The Americas,Alastair Humphreys
There's only one Dixie Deans,Dixie Deans
Sports Betting,Nicolae Sfetcu
Race in play,Carl James
The social amoebae,John Tyler Bonner
The Edge,Howard E. Ferguson
Certificate in Stretching & Flexibility,Brad Walker
Ultimate Guide to Stretching and Flexibility,Brad Walker
Lacrosse is for me,Robert E. Reynolds
Sport Marketing in the New Millennium,Brenda G. Pitts
Get Active! Orange Band,Anita Ganeri
Who Is the Greatest? 2 Wayfarers,Anita Ganeri
Roberto Clemente,Stew Thornley
Esquire's first sports reader,Herbert Butler Graffis
Berserk,Don Stradley
The ethics of sports coaching,Alun Hardman
English costume for sports and outdoor recreation,Phillis Emily Cunnington
"Grandpa Is a Cubs Fan, Daddy is a Cubs Fan, I am a Cubs Fan!",Stephen Davern
Memorias en blanco y negro,Alfredo Relaño
The Guardian book of sportsquotes,John Samuel
Looking after the money,Mel Welch
Collecting sports memorabilia,Michael McKeever
Monterey Peninsula's Sporting Heritage (CA) (Images of Sports),John W. Frost
Sporting activities,Clive Gifford
Imagery In Sport,Tony Morris
Kittansett Club,"H. John Steinbreder, Legendary Publishing & Media Group"
You Never Forget Your First,"Mark Rosenman, Howie Karpin, Michael Kay"
Baseball Theme Notebook,Douglas Schmitz
"Backcountry Skiing Mount Hood, Oregon",Eric Schmidgall
Then the World Moved On,Catherine Ann Johnson
My 2024 Kungfu Journal,Michael DeMarco
Swing the Fly Anthology 2023,Williams
My 2024 Tai Chi Journal,Michael DeMarco
Tar Heels : a History of UNC Basketball Volume Two,Ron Smith
Dawn of American Deer Hunting Volume III,Duncan Dobie
Rock Shop Wyoming,"Lloyd, David"
"Ski and Snowshoe Trails in the Adirondacks, 2nd Edition","Tony Goodwin, Adirondack Mountain Club"
"So, You Think You Know Tennis?",Henry Quinlan
Burton : Peak Snowboard Producer,Paul Bowker
SuperCharged 123's Count 1 to RaceCar!,Michael J. Myers
"Embassy Cruising Guide Chesapeake Bay to Florida & the ICW, 8th Edition Cape May, NJ to Fernandina Beach, FL Detailed Coverage of the Intracoastal Waterway",Maptech
Go-To Girl,Jenyth Gearhart
"Embassy Cruising Guide New England Coast, 15th Edition",Map tech
Misty Fairways,Hari Achanta
Epicenter of College Basketball,David Jablonski
Seaman's Manual,Alessandro La Rosa
Question-Based Leadership,"Brett Ledbetter, Lisa Kuntz"
YETI Presents Whitewater,"Ryan Heffernan, Grayson Schaffer, David Skolkin"
Pikmin 4 Game Guide,Bruce A. Jenkins
What Drives Winning Teams,"Lisa Kuntz, Brett Ledbetter"
Soccer Smarts,Charlie Slagle
Knockout Noel,Nobutaro Masai
Inspirational Basketball Stories for Young Readers,Mike Johns
Fall,Tiffany Noelle Chacon
Metodicheskoe Posobie Dlya Trenerov Po Obucheniyu Slepyh I Slabovidyashih Detej Igre V «Shahmaty»,Azamat Nauanov
In the Big Inning : Where Faith Meets Sports,John Strege
Ropes 10th Anniversary Edition,Derrick Harriell
Amazing Sports from Around the World (Karen (Sgaw)-English),"Douglas McLaughlin, Michelle Griffis, Saw Simon"
Golf Practice Log,gregory price
LCHS Sports,Martha Michelle Saunders
In Golf,David Funston
Samadhi Surf Psalms,Ray Pina
Golf Too Many Swing Shots,Larry Eichenaure
Football Coloring Book,Go Go Monday Llc
Jackson Hole Hiking Guide,Aaron Linsdau
Sports Word Search for Adults (Large Print),Skip Rocks Publishing
Rekatsi,Jon Deryck
Win a Day,Stuart Wittner
Climbing Red Rock Canyon Open Space,Stewart M. Green
Flip Turn,Christy Winn
My 2024 Karate Journal,Michael DeMarco
Wrestling Trivia Night,Tyler Cates
Skateboarding Notebook,Douglas Schmitz
"Light Tours of Tahoe, California",Richard Bothwell
Dreamer of the Day Photographic Edition,"John Nicholls, Jan Nicholls"
Bear Hunter,James McCafferty
Dictionary for Students of Japanese Martial Arts,Richard Ganey
Amazing Sports from Around the World (Nepali-English),"Douglas McLaughlin, Michelle Griffis, Anup Timilsina"
Chaz's Slam Dunk Dreams,Chaz Tucker
Throwback,Robert Weldon
2023-2025 Abridged USA Volleyball Indoor Rules Book,USA Volleyball
VolleyHope,Alyesha Shah
Young Athletes' Ultimate Guide to Mental Toughness Workbook,Chad Metcalf
Young Athletes' Ultimate Guide to Mental Toughness Journal,Chad Metcalf
Texas Tech,John Henry
Chess Notation Book,Sebastian Drake
"Backcountry Skiing Taos, New Mexico",James Marc Beverly
Entrenamiento con Bandas de Resistencia para Personas Mayores,Scott Hamrick
Because Kids Can Scuba Diving Log Book,Kaja Birkeland
Big Fight,Brandon Warren
What the Horse told me,"Vaughn Knudsen, Kim Corpany-Knudsen"
Living the Wahoos Life,"Bill Vilona, Bubba Watson"
"Backcountry Ski Map, Taos, New Mexico",James Marc Beverly
Bike Smart,"Poyorena, Rudolph, 1st"
Three Points Shy,Joe DeSantis
Slugger Journal,Richie Shaffer
CHAMPS Method,Terry Parks
2023-2025 USA Volleyball Indoor Rules Book,USA Volleyball
Resurgence,Jack Viera
Superbike,"Kevin Cameron, John Owens"
"So, You Think You Know Pickleball?",Nils Gulbranson
Angler for All Seasons,"David Atwood, William Harms"
"Scrub (Faith, Family, and Football Series, Book 2)",Janson Mancheski
All or Nothing,Lo Everett
Ultimate Softball Journal,Madison Doherty Tipton
Theoretical and Methodological Aspects of Sports Marketing,Nikolaj Sheremetyev
One Leg Up,Neil F. Hadley
Southern Wallowa Ski Atlas,Alpenglow Publishing Studio
Major Taylor,Marlene Brill
Great sports performances,
Dynamic Horse : ,Hilary Clayton
It Hurts to Win,Black Knight Sports and Entertainment LLC
Randi Smith on Coaching Adaptive Archery,Randi Smith
YETI Presents Ducks,"Ryan Heffernan, Grayson Schaffer, David Skolkin"
Hattie Goes Golfing,"Lexie Mitchell, Paige Spiranac, James Sitar"
Research on College Physical Education Teaching,Liao Jin
Amazing Stories of Cristiano Ronaldo,Jennifer Trace
Ultimate Softball,Madison Doherty Tipton
Gulf Stream Golf Club,"George Peper, Legendary Publishing and Media Group"
Avalanche Factor,Joseph Stock
Fly Like Chi!,Andrew Vodopia
Skydivers Know Why Birds Sing : (because They Can Fly),Ricki Thues
What's Really Important,"Brett Ledbetter, Lisa Kuntz"
LOMBARDI'S DESTINY,"Larry D Names, Wayne Mausser"
Vegan Bodybuilder's Cookbook,"Samantha Shorkey, Amy Longard"
Pelé,Pele
"Your Word, Lil Peter, Is Your Word","Peter Valdez, Tasche Laine, Mei Mei Leonard"
Playing Sideways,Erik C. Hansen
Bushido and Christianity,"Takemi Sasamori, Mark Hague"
Easy Running Plans,Jeff Gaudette
Coach,Matthew Kelly
Coach,Matthew Kelly
Offsides,Lori Z. Scott
LONESTAR : a Texas Football Novel,C. W. Wells
Pickleball Shots Unleashed Mastering Every Move on the Court,"Doug Devitre, Taylor Taylor"
Hoops and Seeds,Roger Johnson
What the Horse Told Me : Volume One,"Vaughn Knudsen, Kim Corpany-Knudsen"
Solitude of the Open Sea,Gregory Smith
Climbs of the Million Dollar Highway,"Jason Nelson, Michael Gilbert, Charlie Faust, Marc Ripperger"
Lágrima Del Dragón,Enrique Guillén
2023-2025 USA Volleyball Indoor Officiating and Scoring Guidelines,USA Volleyball
2023-2025 USA Volleyball Beach Rules Book,USA Volleyball
The Great Australian Sports Quiz Book,Philip Barclay
Sports Jokes,Brian Doyle
Interdisziplinare Sportwissenschaft,Jurgen Court
Sportförderung und Sportförderungsrecht als Staatsaufgabe,Volker Thom
One-eyed,"Douglas Booth, Colin Tatz"
Soldatenkaiser und Sport,"Wallner, Christian"
Sportmotorisches Lernen und Ausdauerbelastungen,Dirk Büsch
Der Aufbau und die Entwicklung von Körperkultur und Sport in der SBZ/DDR am Beispiel regionaler Entwicklungen im Land Brandenburg (Mai 1945-Juli 1952),Klaus Gallinat
Methodologische und analytische Bestimmungen sprachlichen Handelns des Sportlehrers,Georg Friedrich
Not just a game,"Andy Croft, Sue Dymoke"
Come on the Banner!,
Sport and the Irish,Alan Bairner
Don Wrights Guide to Free Campgrounds Eastern Edition - Now Includes Campgrounds 12 and Under in the 29 Eastern States,Don Wright
Playing on their nerves,Angela Patmore
War without weapons,Philip Goodhart
Complete book of sport,Euan Sutherland
Entwicklungszusammenarbeit Und Breitensport,Michael Bauer
"""World of Sport"" Quiz Book",Dickie Davies
Ahead of the Game,Jeremy Lazarus
The encyclopedia of sports stamps,Robert Bateman
Genetic and molecular aspects of sport performance,Claude Bouchard
Paul Parker,Paul Parker
The complete book of athletics,Tom McNab
Stiftung Deutsche Sporthilfe,Günter Pelshenke
How to market your student athlete,Robert L. Scott
The Big Book of Sports Insults,David Milsted
Black diamonds,Colin Martin Tatz
Soziale Schichtung im Sport,Klaus W. Tofahrn
Go for Gold,Ron Fountain
Rugby,"Brian Bartels, Kevin Messina"
Strengthening sport for development and peace,Oliver Dudfield
Formen altägyptischer Kulte und ihre Auswirkungen im leiblichen Bereich,Jutta Bartels
Öffentliche Sportförderung in der Bundesrepublik Deutschland,Christian Hockenjos
Synergien Der Sinne Für Die Bewegungsregulation,Alfred O. Effenberg
Global sports,Frank P. Jozsa
Sport und Umwelt,Radi Radeff
"Authentischer Sport, inszenierte Politik?",Georg Spitaler
Losing season,Jack Ridl
Arbeitsplatz Leistungssport,Andreas Völp
Managing risk in sport and recreation,Katharine Nohr
Tutankhamun and the sporting tradition,Zaki Ibrahim El Habashi
Sportsmen under stress,Angela Patmore
Sports splash,Carol H. Thomas
The Pleasure Principle,David Lawrence Andrews
Need for speed,Elizabeth M. Rees
Sport and violence,Lynn Marie Jamieson
The truth about the lie,Roman Dublan
"Legal liability in recreation, sports, and tourism",John O. Spengler
Lost Journalism of Ring Lardner,"Ring Lardner, Ron Rapoport, James Lardner"
WWF War Zone,Bill Kunkel
Cooperstown Corner,Lee Allen
Sport; a philosophic inquiry,"Weiss, Paul"
Xtreme Wrestling Royalty,Alex Monnig
Brock Lesner,Alex Monnig
Names of People I Beat at Tennis,Jennifer Huebner
Focus on Formula One,Abdo
Sports Illustrated,Gail Radley
Negro Leaguers in the Puerto Rico Winter League,Adolfo Rafael Lopez Ferrer
Inspirational Baseball Stories for Young Readers,Mike Johnson
Asian American Sporting Cultures,"Stanley I. Thangaraj, Judith Halberstam, Lisa Lowe"
Out in sport,"Anderson, Eric"
Sociology of sport,Richard Giulianotti
A Magical Season,Denver Post
Game faces,Thomas H. Pauly
Ten great moments in sports,Maury Allen
Nutrition And Enhanced Sports Performance Muscle Building Endurance And Strength,Debasis Bagchi
"Youth Sport, Physical Activity and Play","Andrew Parker, Don Vinson"
For the love of sport,Renate Wilson
Heroes of the NFL,Joe Smalley
WWF Attitude,Bill Banks
The Complete Handbook of the Winter Olympic Games 1980,Zander Hollander
Gnarly Sports Injuries,John Perritano
Winning,Rosey Grier
Techniques de renforcement musculaire en rééducation,Jürgen Buchbauer
"Sport, politics, and literature in the English Renaissance",Gregory M. Colón Semenza
Routledge handbook of applied sport psychology,Stephanie J. Hanrahan
The erotic in sports,Allen Guttmann
Sports Psychiatry,"Alan Currie, Bruce Owen"
Biomechanics and Sports Proceedings of the XI. Winter Universidas 2003,Paolo B. Pascolo
Zhongguo cheng shi ti yu xiu xian fu wu zu zhi ti xi yan jiu,Hanxiao Zhu
"Foundations of Canadian physical education, recreation, and sports studies",David F. Anderson
Women in Action Sport Cultures,"H. Thorpe, R. Olive"
Qualitative Research On Sport And Physical Culture,Kevin Young
Sport Fun And Enjoyment An Embodied Approach,Ian Wellard
Smell of Sweat,William Blake Tyrrell
Best Sports Cliches Ever!,Don R. Powell
Winning habits,B. P. Bam
Philosophy of sport and physical activity,Pasquale J. Galasso
Culture physique au regard de l'Église,Jean Marie Rodrigue Villeneuve
The Real Joy of Sailing,C. S. (Caleb Sprague) Henry
Sports colleges,Ofsted
Field Hockey Training,"Josef Marx, Gunter Wagner"
"Sport, Popular Culture and Identity (Chelsea School Research Centre)",Maurice Roche
Performance versus results,John H. Gibson
"Socio-Cultural Foundations of Physical Education & Educational Sport (Sport Culture and Society, Vol. 2)",Earl Zeigler
Leftist theories of sport,William John Morgan
Let's Throw The Dice (Let's Move),Heidi Lindner
Sporting reflections,"Leslie A. Howe, Keith Thompson"
The Business of professional sports,"Paul D. Staudohar, J. A. Mangan"
Sport and information technology,"Darlene Kluka, Denise Jones"
The Business of sport,"Darlene A. Kluka, Guido Schilling"
"Old borders, new borders, no borders","Jan Tolleneer, Roland Renson"
Sport in divided societies,"John Peter Sugden, Alan Bairner"
Taking sport seriously,Lincoln Allison
"Ethics, sport and leisure","Tomlinson, Fleming"
Sports and the Environment,Hans-Joachim Schemel
"Sexuality, Sport And the Culture of Risk",Keith Gilbert
"NATION BUILDING AT PLAY: SPORT AS A TOOL FOR INTEGRATION IN POST-APARTHEID SOUTH AFRICA, ...",MARION KEIM
Sports on the Net,Bob Temple
Integration Through Games and Sports (Meyer & Meyer Sport),Uwe Rheker
Tips for Success,Ulli Heldt
Nutrition in Sport,Georg Neumann
Zlatan,"Matt Oldfield, Tom Oldfield"
A Coach and A Miracle,Mike Latona Jim Johnson
Facetten des Sportrechts,Klaus Vieweg
Nicht Nur Sieg Und Niederlage,"Martin Furtwängler, Martin Ehlers, Martin Furtwängler, Martin Ehlers"
First Serve,Cynthia Sauer
Pharao Und Sport (Zaberns Bildbaende Zur Archaeologie),Wolfgang Decker
Yin Yoga,Diane Paylor
Ideology in American sports,Karsten Senkbeil
Doaker's Story,Neil D. Isaacs
Vo Rogue Show,Lynlea Small
Best and Fairest Sports Parenting,Nathan Burke
"Le Costume Ou Essai Sur Les Habillement Et Les Usages De Plusieurs Peuples De L'Antiquite, Prouve P",Andre Lens
Centre of excellence,David Barnes
Always a Badger,Vince Sweeney
Sports and recreation,Harvey H. Jackson
A Kid's Game Plan for Great Choices,"Michael Ross, Christopher Ross"
The Official Sports Maniacs Joke Book,Larry Wilde
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Kyaputen Tsubasa,Yoichi Takahashi
Skoda Felicia Service and Repair Manual (Haynes Service & Repair Manuals),"John Harold Haynes, Robert Jex"
Jenson Button,"Jenson Button, John Harold Haynes"
Champions!,"John Harold Haynes, John Blunsden"
Marlboro McLaren,"John Harold Haynes, Nigel Snowdon, Diana Burnett"
International sport events,Alan Fyall
Research Methods in Sport,Mark Smith
Research Methods In Sport A Practical Guide,Simon Darcy
A Contemporary History Of Womens Sport,Jean Williams
Německé tělovýchovné a sportovní spolky v českých zemích a Československu,Marek Waic
Sport,"Adam Lewis, Jonathan Taylor"
Sporting Justice,Ian Hewitt
"Taḳanon ha-beḥinot le-miḳtsoʻa ha-""Sporṭaʼi""","Histadrut ""Shomriyah"" be-Liṭa"
昆明市盘龙区《体育专志》,
Jin dai Zhongguo de Ao yun ji yi,Bo Zhang
The 1904 anthropology days and Olympic games,Susan Brownell
Luoghi tempi e numeri dello sport,"Anna Maria Pioletti, Luigi Bollani"
The metrosexual,David Coad
Sport verstehen und verantworten,Sven Güldenpfennig
Amazing Sports and Science Book of Why,Time for Kids Editors
Beneath the Mā̄ori moon,Malcolm Mulholland
Selbstkontrolle und Bewegungslernen,Andreas Bund
Global Sporting Arms Race,"Veerle De Bosscher, Jerry Bingham, Simon Shibli, Maarten Van Bottenburg, Paul De Knop"
The economics of professional team sports leagues,Markus Lang
Einzelsportler-Sponsoring als Instrument der Unternehmenskommunikation,Oliver Geyer
Trikotsponsoring in der Fussball-Bundesliga,Alfred E. Bär
Differentielle Sportpsychologie - sportwissenschaftliche Persönlichkeitsforschung,Arbeitsgemeinschaft für Sportpsychologie in der Bundesrepublik Deutschland. Tagung
"Diagnostik und Intervention, bridging the gap",Arbeitsgemeinschaft für Sportpsychologie in der Bundesrepublik Deutschland. Tagung
No Limit,Ines Geipel
Sport und Bewegung vermitteln,Deutsche Vereinigung für Sportwissenschaft. Sektion Sportpädagogik. Tagung
Ocherki po istorii otechestvennoĭ fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury i olimpiĭskogo dvizhenii︠a︡,G. S. Demeter
موسوعة الرياضة,"Hanā Ṣafā, Muhannad Maḥmūd Kaḥalūs"
Foul Play,Joe Humphreys
"Sport, Culture and Politics",ALAN KLEIN
Organisation von Sponsoringbeziehungen,Frank Grundmann
Le sport dans les quartiers,William Gasparini
La face obscure de l'élitisme sportif,Stéphane Proia
Vormenn Íslands,Jón M. Ívarsson
L' origine des sports olympiques dès les Chinois et les Egyptiens,Violaine Vanoyeke
Géographie des sports en France,Jean-Pierre Augustin
L'agonista,Luciano Russi
China gold,"Duncan Mackay, Karen Christensen"
100 years,John Coffey
Everyday masculinities and extreme sport,Victoria Robinson
Sport,Colin McGinn
Sport Als Stadtisches Ereignis,Christian Koller
Les spectacles antiques,"Augé de Lassus, Lucien."
Physics of Sports Science Projects,"Gardner, Robert"
Uma : Champion of the Seven Dojo,"Kris Wilder, Lawrence Kane"
Eddie and the Vegetarian Vampire,Dennis M. Desmond
Win one for Bumblelion,Mel Gilden
Cewri Campau Cymru,Alun Wyn Bevan
Psychology of sports,Seppo E. Iso-Ahola
Physical education and sports,Sheldon L. Fordham
The Goal Of My Life A Memoir,Roger Lajoie
Highest Number in the World,"Roy MacGregor, Genevieve Despres"
Leverage,Joshua C. Cohen
Lacrosse Firestorm,Matt Christopher
Knowing the score,David Papineau
Leverage,Joshua Cohen
Something like the gods,Stephen Amidon
The Mad Dog hall of fame,"Chris Russo, St. John, Allen."
The scientific aspects of sports training,Albert W. Taylor
The great book of Detroit sports lists,Mike Stone
One on one,John Feinstein
Ballpark Mysteries #2,David A. Kelly
Players first,John Calipari
Photo Finish (Hover Car Racer),Matthew Reilly
The Olympics,Matt Christopher
The only game in town,David Remnick
The best American sports writing of the century,"David Halberstam, Glenn Stout"
Papi,David Ortiz
The only game that matters : the Harvard/Yale rivalry,"Bernard M. Corbett, Paul Simpson"
Phil Jackson,Peter Richmond
Mr. Hockey,Gordie Howe
No easy way,Fred Bowen
Despierta el genio financiero de tus hijos,Robert T. Kiyosaki
Champion's Mind,Jim Afremow
The Best of In the Bleachers,Steve Moore
Complete idiot's guide to geocaching,Jack W. Peters
Sport,Andrew Langley
Dream team,Jack McCallum
The ecstasy of defeat,Onion Editors
Emergency quarterback,Rich Wallace
"Don't Put Me In, Coach: My Incredible NCAA Journey from the End of the Bench to the End of the Bench",Mark Titus
Beans Baker's best shot,Rich Torrey
The games do count,Brian Kilmeade
Hound of the sea,Garrett McNamara
Graphic Sports Primer,Andrew Janik
The great New York sports debate,Roger Rubin
A history of American sports in 100 objects,Cait Murphy
An incomplete and inaccurate history of sport,Kenny Mayne
The gold medal mess,David A. Kelly
How To Watch The Olympics The Essential Guide To The Rules Statistics Heroes And Zeroes Of Every Sport,Johnny Acton
Cracking the show,Thomas Boswell
The sports book,DK Publishing
My Padres Baseball Game,Jenny Werner
"SportsCac Mon the Thao
            
                My First Bilingual Book",Milet publishing
Sports Esporte Englishportuguese,Milet publishing
"SportsGli Sport
            
                My First Bilingual Book",Milet publishing
Sports Ti Yu,Milet publishing
"My First Bilingual BookSports EnglishFarsi
            
                My First Bilingual Book",Milet publishing
Sports Spor Englishturkish,Milet publishing
Sports Spoch Englishkorean,Milet publishing
Sports Sport Englishpolish,Milet publishing
Sports Deportes Englishspanish,Milet publishing
"SportsCiyaaro
            
                My First Bilingual Book",Milet publishing
"Sports
            
                My First Bilingual Book",Milet publishing
Sports Riyt Englisharabic,Milet publishing
"SportsLes Sports
            
                My First Bilingual Book",Milet publishing
Sports =,Milet publishing
Sports,Milet publishing
Rashford : the Complete Story of a Football Superstar,House of Ballers
The Babe didn't point,Bill Bryson
Charlie plays ball,Ree Drummond
The chief,Robert Lipsyte
The Fenway foul-up,David A. Kelly
The Field Guide to Sports Metaphors,Josh Chetwynd
A father first,Dwyane Wade
2009 ESPN sports almanac,"Gerry Brown, Michael Morrison"
Careers for Sport Fans,Andrew Kaplan
Champion's Comeback,Jim Afremow
Big Time (Football Genius #4),Tim Green
Casey Stengel,Martin Appel
"Body, mind, and sport",John Douillard
Blaze of glory,Mary Tillworth
The Ball Discovering The Object Of The Game,John Fox Jr.
The Berenstain bears' report card trouble,Stan Berenstain
The athletes book of home remedies,Jordan D. Metzl
Brady vs Manning,Gary Myers
Foul plays,Kenneth C. Davis
Sport in Canada,Canada. Parliament. House of Commons. Sub-Committee on the Study of Sport in Canada.
Baseball's war roster,Brett Kiser
First Off The Tee,Jr. Don Van Natta
"The colors of nature : culture, identity, and the natural world",Bruce Nash
Sport psychology,Robert A. Mechikoff
Messi,Leonardo Faccio
Leading your sports team,John C. Maxwell
Kiss 'em goodbye,Dennis Purdy
The L.A. Dodger,David A. Kelly
The last boys picked,Janet Sasson Edgette
Number two,Jay Onrait
The miracle of sports psychology,James G. Bennett
My Conference Can Beat Your Conference: Why the SEC Still Rules College Football,"Paul Finebaum, Gene Wojciechowski"
The Mad Dog hall of fame,"Chris Russo, St. John, Allen."
Modern New Zealand Cricket Greats,Dylan Cleaver
Coach Van,"Dennis Bateman, John Dahlem"
From Underdogs to Champions,"Justiss Hill, Angela Walsh"
Complete : Memories of a Climb,"Michael French, Leah Arruda"
Sport bei Quintilian,Olaf Grodde
Integration Through Games,Uwe Rheker
Mormon athletes II,William T. Black
Food as fuel,Kristin Petrie
Listening to the Ball,John Parrott
Ultimate Golfer's Logbook,80 Days Literature
LSU Women's Basketball National Champions,Kim Mulkey
LSU Baseball National Champions 2023,Jay Johnson
Against All Obstacles,Jennifer Safrey
Perfil de Riesgo de Abandono de la Actividad Deportiva,Alfredo Alain Mejía Olivo
Bengals Are 15-0 in Games When...,Vincent Croyle
Hoopspeak,Julia Weaver
Circadian Patterns in Cricket,jaweed saleem
Get Coached Up,Travis Johnson
Hunting Whitetail Deer,Roy Rivett
Strength and Fitness Log Book,80 Days Literature
Stories & Lessons from Regis Prograis,"Regis Prograis, Ross Williams"
Kane : the Complete Story of a Football Superstar,House of Ballers
Complete Fishing Log Book,80 Days Literature
Big Green Book,The Golfer's Journal
Sports at First Sight,Martha Jaworowski
It's Not about You,Tracy Douglas
Embassy Cruising Guides,Maptech
Lágrima Del Dragón,"Enrique Guillen Niño, Sara Carolina Zerpa"
Side Hustle,"Brad Taylor, Jennifer Wright"
Senior (55 & over) Golf Etiquitte,"Toerber, Larry, 1st, Clark, Mike, 1st"
"Embassy Cruising Guide New England Coast, 16th Edition",Maptech
"Embassy Cruising Guide Florida to Mobile Bay, 9th Edition",Maptech
Youth Social Influence,rameesh taju
Fundamentals of Freestyle Goju-Ryu,"Sajnog, Center Mass Group, Jon Bankson"
Curved along the Path,Vinod Naidu
"Nikephoros Beihefte, Bd. 10: Magica agonistica. Fluchtafeln im antiken Sport",Jan Tremel
Batting on the Bosphorus,Angus Bell
Seven steps to peak performance,Richard M. Suinn
Third sector organizations facing turbulent environments,"Adalbert Evers, Annette Zimmer"
The Elk Hunter,Don Laubach & Mark Henckel
The hunter,Robert C. Norton
Interesting Sports Facts for Kids,Max Bateman
Transición de Joven Talentoso a Deportista Excelente,Josean Arruza
Full Court Press,Kelly Fattman
Navigating the Gridiron Dreams,Sherman J. Morris
River Hawks Run,Jim Ferguson
Run Elite,Andrew Snow
Georgia's Long Road to Glory,Han Vance
Destination Spooner,Carlo Kumpula
Ethiopian Football Leadership Impact,emichael wold
Salah : the Complete Story of a Football Superstar,House of Ballers
Gameday! Winning with Sportsmanship,Jeff Eckert
Inspirational Soccer Stories for Young Readers,Mike Johnson
Athlete's Mindfulness and Mindset,Fred Lange
Cruel Hate & Love,Isla Vaughn
2024 HardFitness Calendar,Juan Carlos Lopez
Golf Is Runing My Life,Brooks Roddan
Fishing,Ben Chiodo
Malay Sport Personalities of Sri Lanka!,Tuan B Kamiss
College Football Unleashed,Sherman J. Morris
12 Month Runners Logbook,80 Days Literature
"Shoot first, pass later",Jeremy Roenick
Shooting hoops and skating loops,"Alannah Hegedus, Kaitlin Rainey"
Lucky seven,Matt Christopher
Scorecasting,Tobias J. Moskowitz
Soccernomics,Simon Kuper
Der internationale Arbeitersport,"Arnd Krüger, James Riordan"
Sport im Zivilisationsprozess,Norbert Elias
Aimez-vous les stades?,Alain Ehrenberg
Canchas de pelotas y reñideros de antaño,Ricardo M. Llanes
Lo Sport in Italia,Gianfranco Colasante
Strijd over sport,R. Stokvis
Annotierte Bibliographie zum Sport im alten Agypten,Wolfgang Decker
Back to the drawing board,Dave Elston
Gator greatness,Philip L. Ben
Life-time sports for the college student,Barry L. Sysler
An Appeal for the equipment of the Soldier's Field,Harvard University. Committee on the Regulation of Athletic Sports
ha-Sporṭ be-ʾErets-Yiśraʾel bi-yeme ḳedem,Zev Vilnay
Yovel ṿa-maʻlah 50 plus,Joseph Yekutieli
Albom ha-Makabi Yafo Tel Aviv,Maccabi Tel Aviv
Bibliyografyah Sporṭivit,Lipa Levitan
"Sefer zikaron le-""Makabi"" Ṿarshah",Mosheh Gelblum
Playing dirty,"Barry, Mike"
Legacy of the blues,Dorothy Burdeshaw
We are the champions,"Richard Heller, Virginia Salter"
"Arbeitersport in Deutschland, 1893-1933: Dokumentation und Analysen",Diethelm Blecking
Sport and the sociological imagination,"North American Society for the Sociology of Sport Conference (3rd 1982 Toronto, Ont.)"
Thai traditional games & sports,Chaleo Manilerd
Sipuro shel adam pashuṭ,Haim Wein
Private Eye's Colemanballs,Larry
The Jew in American sports,Harold Uriel Ribalow
Idræt i Østafrika,Niels Bjørn Larsen
In its own image,Benjamin G. Rader
Modern sports writers,John Byrne
Storia e storie dello sport in Italia,Remo Bassetti
"Apartheid, the real hurdle",Sam Ramsamy
Die Fussballweltmeisterschaft 1978 in der Tagespresse der Bundesrepublik Deutschland,Erich Laaser
Sport in der sozialwissenschaftlichen Diskussion,Sven Güldenpfennig
Soziologie des Sports,Hienz Risse
The Los Angeles times book of the 1984 Olympic Games,"Olympic Games (23rd 1984 Los Angeles, Calif.)"
Sport und Kulturwandel,Ernst J. Tetsch
Atleti in camicia nera,Renato Bianda
Manschettyrken idrott och hälsa,Bode Janzon
Die Kieler Sozialdemokraten und das Sozialistengesetz,Holger Rüdel
Arbeitersport in Österreich,Reinhard Krammer
Sport under Communism,"Riordan, James"
II Chiese racconta,Paolo Carpeggiani
The transformation of sport in South Africa,Anver Desai
Soziale Regulierung in informellen Sportgruppen,Tim Bindel
Individualisierung und Körperkultur in nationaler Moderne und globaler Postmoderne,Werner Hägele
"""Mens sana in corpore sano""",Deutsche Vereinigung für Sportwissenschaft. Sektion Sportgeschichte. Tagung
Fussball und Identität in Israel,Michael Schuster
"Sportpädagogik im Spannungsfeld gesellschaftlicher Erwartungen, wissenschaftlicher Ansprüche und empirischer Befunde",Deutsche Vereinigung für Sportwissenschaft. Sektion Sportpädagogik. Tagung
La naissance du sport en Chine (1900-1949),Aurélien Boucher
ג׳רי,G'eri Bet-Haleṿi
מועדון הכדורסל הפועל רמת גן גבעתיים 9־8791,Niḳ Ṿalḳ
Nicht nur Tore zählen,Roland Kentsch
Sport und Gewalt,Jï¿½rgen Hoffmann
Berufliche Handlungskompetenz und Sport,Martina Riedl
Sportspielkulturen erfolgreich gestalten,Germany) Sportspiel-Symposium (6th 2008 Konstanz
Sports and their fans,Kevin G. Quinn
Manuale Dell'Uomo Normale,Beppe Severgnini
Deporte y revolución en América Latina,"Eloy Altuve, Arley Fabio Ossa Montoya"
Sport - integration - Europe,"Petra Giess-Stüber, Diethelm Blecking"
Sozialisation und Sport im Lebensverlauf,Deutsche Vereinigung für Sportwissenschaft. Sektion Sportsoziologie. Jahrestagung
中国体育小百科,China. Guo wu yuan. Xin wen ban gong shi
Zhongguo shao shu min zu ti yu,Tao Zhang
运动无极限,Yiqi Song
Pionjärer och miljonärer,Inger Hultgren
عقد التدريب الرياضي و المسؤولية الناجمة عنه,Furāt Rustum Amīn Jāff
Sports Nutrition,Judy A. Driskell
Die vergnügungen der Angelsachsen,Wilhelm Pfändler
Wortschatz der Sportsprache Spaniens,Otto Pfändler
Sport and international development,Aaron Beacom
Beyond the final score,Victor D. Cha
Time-out,Dov Moshe Lipman
More than just the catch,David Tyree
The making of champions,Gary Lewis
"Teenager on first, geezer at bat, 4-F on deck",James Szalontai
Battleground sports,Michael Atkinson
Grï¿½n-Weiï¿½es Wunderland,Sven Bremer
Der Wortschatz deutschsprachiger Laufzeitschriften,Barbara Gabl
"Soins et techniques du corps en Chine, au Japon, et en Inde","Huard, Pierre."
Doping Im Fitness-Sport,Heiko Striegel
Sportentwicklung,Eckart Balz
Der Beitrag des Sports zu Soldier's Performance & Fitness,Klaus Zieglmeier
Grundlagen der Sportpsychologie,"Wolfgang Schlicht, Bernd Strauss"
Social and cultural diversity in a sporting world,"Chris Hallinan, Steven J. Jackson"
Football with the foe,Hans Bonde
Les enjeux de l'événement sportif,Nico Didry
Transformation of Modern Korean Sport,Gwang Ok
The Chicago sports reader,"Steven A. Riess, Gerald R. Gems"
Essays in sport and the law,Australian Society for Sports History
"Encyclopedia of sports in America, two volumes",Murry R. Nelson
Physiology for sportspeople,Peter Bursztyn
Zhongguo ti yu,Yongheng Zhang
Pushtūn qabāʼil ke khel,
Sport et politique en Algérie,Youcef Fatès
Women and sports,Sarah Vaill
Nederländskans komen och svenskans komma,Annika Johansson
The story of the GAA,Vincent McDonnell
Reuters--sports in the 21st Century,Reuters ltd
Le sport - de l'archive à l'histoire,"Françoise Bosman, Patrick Clastres, Paul Dietschy"
L'impasse du sport rural,Tony Froissart
Muistojen Hirvelä,Erkki Pärttö
An introduction to drugs in sport,Ivan Waddington
The best of the West,John Scally
Physics of rugby,Trevor Davis Lipscombe
Administration of high school athletics,"National Conference on Secondary School Athletic Administration (1st 1962 Washington, D. C.)"
It's all for the kids,Michael A. Messner
Ukraïnsʹka sportyvna periodyka Halychyny 20-30-kh rr. XX st,Vadym Kovpak
Kansakunta kilpasilla,Jouko Kokkonen
Der Einfluss des Englischen auf die französische Sportsprache der Gegenwart,Hans Seibold
Sports and Pastimes of Scotland,Robert Scott Fittis
Geschichte und Struktur der Arbeitersportbewegung 1893-1933,Heinz Timmermann
Die Beteiligung Deutschlands an den Olympischen Spielen 1900 in Paris und 1904 in St. Louis,Karl Lennartz
Die Sportberichterstattung der Presse,Hans Dieter Kroppach
Nurmon historia,Armas Luukko
"NCAA, the voice of college sports",Jack Falla
National folk sports in the USSR,I︠U︡ Lukashin
Sport,Walter Gloede
Playbooks and checkbooks,Stefan Szymanski
Sport ist Spitze,Germany) Internationaler Workshop/Sportgespräch der Ruhrolympiade (22nd 2007 Hattingen
Bella è la sera--,Giuseppe Castelnovi
Stadionatmosphäre als verhaltenswissenschaftliches Konstrukt im Sportmarketing,Sebastian Uhrich
Den Sport gestalten,Frank Becker
Radio's Morning Show Personalities,Philip A. Lieberman
Il compagno Tommie Smith e altre storie di sport e politica,Rudi Ghedini
Beiträge zur Theorie der Sportspiele,"Dieter Augustin, Helga Letzelter, Manfred Letzelter, Ronald Burger"
"Sport, Integration, Europa",Elke Grimminger
Hochleistungssport in Russland,Helmut Digel
Sportstadt Fulda,"Heinz Gellings, Michael Schwab"
Vom Schï¿½tzengraben auf den grï¿½nen Rasen,Peter Tauber
Sports et société en Corse des années 1860 à 1945,Didier Rey
Les valeurs de l'olympisme,Michaël Attali
Sportdiktatur,Matthias Marschik
Sedona Hikes,"Richard K. Mangum, Sherry G. Mangum"
Court sense,"Selleck, George A."
Sport Yiśraʻel,Nehemiah Ben-Avraham
Albom ha-sporṭ ha-Yiśreʾeli,Nehemiah Ben-Avraham
Pegiʻot bi-sporṭ,Uri Baharav
Sifrut ha-sporṭ be-Erets-Yiśraʾel,Lipa Leṿitan
Bibliyografyah le-toldot ha-sporṭ be-Erets-Yiśraʾel,Lipa Levitan
Kokhve ha-sporṭ ha-Yiśreʾeli,Mosheh Zuckerman
ha-Ḥinukh ha-gufani ṿeha-sporṭ be-ʾErets Yiśraʾel ʻad milḥemet ha-ʻolam ha-rishonah,Uriel Simri
ha- Ḥinukh ha-gufani ṿeha-sporṭ be-ʼErets Yiśraʼel ba-shanim 1917-1927,Uriel Simri
Mi u-mah ba-sporṭ,Israel Paz
Ḥagigot Reḥovot,Uriel Simri
Sheloshim shenot sporṭ be-Yiśraʾel,Uriel Simri
Road to the NHL,Phil Croucher
The sporting Scots of nineteenth-century Canada,Gerald Redmond
Sport en socialisme,Hans Dona
Der Sport im Kreuzfeuer der Kritik,Hajo Bernett
Snowboarding,Sean Finnigan
"Proceedings, fourth Canadian Symposium on the History of Sport and Physical Education, University of British Columbia, Vancouver, B.C., June 24th to 26th, 1979",Canadian Symposium on the History of Sport and Physical Education Vancouver 1979
Vietnamese traditional physical culture in folk art,Quốc Vượng Trần
Társasjáték és szórakozás a régi Európában,"Endrei, Walter."
Olympia och Valhalla,Henrik Sandblad
Sports and law,Herb Appenzeller
Joggers' jargon and the slowing of ageing,William L Redpath
Saturday afternoon fever,Brian Stoddart
Sot͡siologii͡a sporta SShA na sluzhbe kapitalizma,A. V. Serebri͡akov
Et tu seras champion,Roland Passevant
Sports law,George W. Schubert
Sport v Království českém,Václav Pacina
"Zeitgenössische Sportphilosophie als ""kritische Sporttheorie"" der ""Neuen Linken""",Kerstin Kirsch
Eléments de sociologie du sport,Pierre Parlebas
"Sport, culture, society","Commonwealth and International Conference on Sport, Physical Education, Dance, Recreation, and Health (8th 1986 Glasgow, Scotland)"
"A review and annotated bibliography of local and overseas literature relevant to research on the ""sport/alcohol industry sponsorship/media"" system and the effects on consumption",Eleanor Rimoldi
The Corps roots the loudest,"Davis, Thomas W."
Norsk idretts historie,Finn Olstad
Introduction à l'histoire des sports au Québec,Donald Guay
Sport und Spiel im Alten Ägypten,Wolfgang Decker
Leben als Herausforderung,Liselott Diem
Verbände im Sport,Joachim Winkler
Volontaire,Emile-René Guéguen
Opção desporto,Olímpio Coelho
Arbeiterkultur und Arbeitersport,Fachtagung der DVS-Sektion Sportgeschichte (9th 1985 Gustav-Heinemann-Akademie der Friedrich-Ebert-Stiftung)
Contribution of sociology to the study of sport,Kalevi Heinilä
Birgerlekher un arbeṭer-sporṭ,H. Wilczyʹnski
Selbstbeherrschte Körper,"Thomas Alkemeyer, Wolfgang Dreßen"
Playing at monarchy,Corry Cropper
"1975 42nd Annual Armenian Annual Olympic Games Armenian Youth Federation of America , Farmington Harrison High School, Farmington, Michigan",Armenian Youth Federation
Farewell to sport,Paul Gallico
"Zábava a slavnosti staré Prahy, od konce 18. do počátku 20. století",Zdeněk Míka
Sport in Innsbruck bis 1960,Anneliese Gidl
L'épreuve de la masculinité,Simon Louis Lajeunesse
Il podio celeste,Pietro Angelini
"Sport, média a mýty",Jan Děkanovský
Kataloog,"Edgar Spriit, Rein Lauks"
Sport-Ethnie-Nation,Diethelm Blecking
Sport und Gesundheit in der Lebensspanne,"Michaela Knoll, Alexander Woll"
Talent identification and development,"Fisher, Richard Prof. Dr"
SportStadtKultur,Germany) Sportwissenschaftlicher Hochschultag (18th 2007 Hamburg
המחוזיאדה ה־12,Histadrut ha-ʻovdim ha-kelalit ha-ḥadashah. ʻAmutah li-sporṭ bi-meḳomot ha-ʻavodah be-merḥav Yerushalayim
Mass gatherings and public health,Agis D. Tsouros
Die strafrechtliche Behandlung von Sportverletzungen,Günther Mahling
Sporṭ bi-Yerushalayim 761 - 2001,Jerusalem. Rashut ha-sporṭ ha-ʻironit
Sport and Liberation in South Africa,Cornelius C. Thomas
الرياضة في التراث العربي,Zuhayr Aḥmad Qaysī
al-Ḥarakah al-Ūlimbīyah fī al-ʻIrāq,Ḍiyāʼ Munshiʼ
Olympien und Hadrianeen im antiken Ephesos,Manfred Lämmer
Inside the ropes,Zachary Michael Jack
Sports Illustrated,Walter Iooss
Just for sport,William Ransom Wood
What it means to be a Jayhawk,Jeff Bolig
In the footsteps of champions,Debby Schriver
Cultural sport psychology,"Robert J. Schinke, Stephanie J. Hanrahan"
Buoyant nationalism,Ian Warren
中国体育百年图志,"Runbo Li, Yi Feng, Jianzhong Feng"
The best I could be,Michael Phelps
"Sport, beer, and gender","Lawrence A. Wenner, Steven J. Jackson"
المواجهات العامة للقانون الرياضي الدولي الخاص,"Aḥmad, Muḥammad Sulaymān al-Duktūr"
Van Dale atletiek- en turnwoordenboek,Jan Luitzen
Mikres athlētikes histories,Makēs Diogos
"Making histories, making memories",Rob Hess
阿拉善盟体育志,Alashan Meng wen hua ti yu chu
Living out of bounds,Steven J. Overman
Aborigines in sport,Colin Martin Tatz
Crowd violence at Australian sport,
"Sport, power and society in New Zealand",John Nauright
"Football, crowds and cultures",Ian Warren
コリアンスポーツ〈克日〉戦争,Hiroshi Ōshima
"Sports, Culture and the Modern State","Hart Cantelon, Richard Gruneau"
Körpererziehung bei Goethe,Carl Diem
Elysian fields,"Daly, John A."
ha-Kadur-yaʻaf,Uri Ofeḳ
Forschungsgegenstand Sport,Hans-Joachim Menzel
Lo sport nella giurisprudenza,Vittorio Frattarolo
Sports et jeux populaires en Namurois,
Sport psychology international,"Hermann Rieder, Michel Bouet"
Bibliographie zum Sportrecht,Josef Schwarz
"Proceedings, 5th Canadian Symposium on the History of Sport and Physical Education, University of Toronto, Toronto, Canada, August 26-29, 1982",Canadian Symposium on the History of Sport and Physical Education (5th 1982 University of Toronto)
Dokumente zum Aufbau des deutschen Sports,Carl-Diem-Institut
La responsabilidad civil en el deporte y en el espectáculo deportivo,Carlos Mario Bosso
Tratado de derecho deportivo,José Atilio Milanta
Delitos contra el deporte,Paraguay
"Phoenician sport, its influence on the origin of the Olympic games",Labib Boutros
Challenging the men,K. F. Dyer
The barracker's bible,Jack Hibberd
Oh!Lympia,Ewald Lienen
Sports behind the Iron Curtain,Simon Freeman
Entstehung und Inhalt der drei Pläne für deutsche Kampfspiele bzw. ein deutsches Nationalfest in den Jahren 1895 bis 1897/98,Eerke U. Hamer
Sport und Geschlecht,
Der Sport im alten Rom,Gerhard Lukas
Duaḥ ha-Kenes ha-artsi ha-rishon li-psikhologyah ule-sotsyologyah shel ha-sporṭ ṿeha-ḥinukh ha-gufani (April 1982),Kenes ha-artsi li-psikhologyah ule-sotsyologyah shel ha-sporṭ ṿeha-ḥinukh ha-gufani (1st 1982 Mekhon Ṿingaiṭ le-ḥinukh gufani)
Mitḳene ḥinukh gufani u-sporṭ be-vate ha-sefer,Yosef Abiram
The role of sport in the Soviet type of society,Paavo Seppänen
Newton at the bat,"Eric W. Schrier, William F. Allman"
Australians at the Olympics,Gary Lester
"Sport, Kultur, Gesellschaft",Zbigniew Krawczyk
"Leistungsmotivation, Angst und Geschlecht",Matthias Schmole
Torts and sports,Raymond L. Yasser
Sport inside out,"David L. Vanderwerken, Spencer K. Wertz"
Sports and the law,Dittakavi Nagasankara Rao
A History of the County of Sussex: Volume VI Part III,T.P. Hudson
The Olympic crisis,John M. Hoberman
Ideário e diário,Manuel Sérgio
Podlog,V. V. Vasilʹev
"Sport, expérience corporelle et science de l'homme",Jean-Jacques Barreau
Labor relations in professional sports,Robert C. Berry
Government and Sport,"Johnson, Arthur T., James H. Frey"
Yahadut ha-sheririm,"Uri Ram, Rachel Arbel"
Sport als Arbeit,Harm Peter Westermann
"Ernest Hemingway: The Angler As Artist (American University Studies IV : English Language and Literature, Vol. 26)",Gregory S. Sojka
Proceedings of the IX International HISPA Congress,Portugal) International Congress on the History of Sport and Physical Education (9th 1981 Lisbon
"Class, race, and sport in South Africa's political economy",Grant Jarvie
"Encyclopedia of Physical Education, Fitness, and Sports",G. Allan Volume Stull
Sports and social values,Robert L. Simon
Les jeux athlétiques dans la civilisation étrusque (Bibliothèque des écoles françaises d'Athènes et de Rome) (French Edition),Jean-Paul Thuillier
Classificazione decimale universale,Istituto di studi sulla ricerca e documentazione scientifica (Italy)
Sportrecht,Urs Scherrer
90 Jahre Arbeitersport,Freundeskreis Ehemaliger Arbeitersportler (Germany). Bundestreffen
Psychologische Diagnostik,Kongress für Angewandte Psychologie (12th 1983 Universität Düsseldorf)
Grenzen der Vereinsautonomie im deutschen Sportverbandswesen,Wolfgang Baecker
Der finnische Arbeitersport,Willibert Strunz
To play the game,J. Bowyer Bell
Sportpsychologie,Dorothee Alfermann
Vintage Carbery,Carbery
The law of public leisure services,"Scott, Michael LL. M."
Counseling and psychological services for college student-athletes,Edward F. Etzel
Adventures in sport,Louis J. Persky
Complex Sports Biodynamics With Practical Applications In Tennis,Tijana T. Ivancevic
Quantifizierung sportlicher Bewegungsabläufe,Markus Buchner
"Zum Verständnis von Körper, Bewegung und Sport in Christentum, Islam und Buddhismus",Dagmar Dahl
Sport et politique en Méditerranée,"Christophe Chiclet, Kolë Gjeloshaj"
The Sports Museum of Finland,Suomen urheilumuseo
Le sport et ses valeurs,Michaël Attali
"Esporte, poder e relações internacionais",Douglas Wanderley de Vasconcellos
Vom Strand zum Green,"Lars Nuschke, Christian Becker"
Les médecins et le dopage sportif,Julie Samuël
Sociologie du sport,Fabien Ohl
Les sports dans le devenir des sociétés,Jacques Demorgon
Kratkii russko-anglo-evreĭski (ivrit) slovarʹ na sportivnui͡u tematiku,"Rufin Prokupet͡s, Boris Markovskiĭ, Vladimir Boĭko"
Geschichte des Sports in Friedrichshafen,Thomas Melzer
Übungsleiter und Trainer als Werte(ver)mittler,Eike Emrich
"Béisbol, petróleo y dependencia",José Cheo González
Clear skies for Beijing Olympics?,Gang Chen
China's measured media liberalization,Liang Fook Lye
Europese spelregels voor sport,An Vermeersch
Seventh Maccabiah guide,M. Triwaks
乐至县文化体育志 (1985-2005),Lezhi Xian (China). Wen hua ti yu ju
Sport en Nord,"Christian Dorvillé, Corinne Delmas"
L'homme en mouvement,"Luc Robène, Yvon Léziart"
Basketball belles,Sue Macy
Sport populaire de Seine-et-Oise,Tony Froissart
"Sport en recht, buiten rechte of buiten spel?",Jonge Balie Congres (2008)
The heroes have gone,Jim W. Corder
Guide professionnel du sport au Maroc,
Vorwärts,Hanns Leske
Verbotene Methode -- Erhöhung des Sauerstofftransfers,Germany) Dopingkleinkonferenz (2007 Dresden
Macht der Sport Kriege überflüssig?,Thomas Kassler
Sport & Medien,Daniel Beck
Mookie,Mookie Wilson
Outdoor sports and pastimes,Union Pacific Railroad Company.
"Sport im Kolonialismus, Kolonialismus im Sport",Peter Rummelt
Injuries to the throwing arm,James R. Andrews
Sport and social theory,Andrew W. Miracle
The Tel Hai fund for sports and physical training of the jewish youth,
Sport psychology,"Robert J. Rotella, Ann S. Reilly"
Bewegungskultur und Freizeit,Herbert Haag
The Elite athlete,
Biofeedback and sports science,"Jack H. Sandweiss, Steven L. Wolf"
Tam pomni͡a︡t o nas,A. Avdeev
Leibesübungen und Sport der Germanen,Berno Wischmann
Rechtsfragen des organisierten Sports unter besonderer Berücksichtigung des Einzelarbeitsvertrages,Thomas Sutter
Die achte Kunst,Hans Lenk
Strasti za Banderoi︠u︡,Tarik Youssef Cyril Amar
Power play,"Geoffrey Lawrence, Rowe, David"
Nés pour courir,Marianne Amar
A historical overview of the United States Olympic Committee,National Collegiate Athletic Association. International Relations Committee
Drugs & performance in sports,
"Sport, Eros, Tod",Gerd Hortleder
Sport und Religion,"Paul Jakobi, Heinz-Egon Rösch"
L' activité sportive dans les balances de la justice,François Alaphilippe
Le sport system,Michel Hourcade
"Dictionary of sport terms special publication for the 12th Maccabiah, Tammuz, 5745--July, 1985",
Flanken und Strafstösse,Hans Blickensdörfer
Yadʻan sporṭ 1982,Uriel Simri
Recreational safety,Jay Sanford Shivers
Die Erstarrung des Sports in der Soziologie,Reinhard Bodo Leusing
Asif sheni,David Eldar
Geschichte des Sports,Hanns Glöckle
Sportgeschichte: Traditionspflege und Wertewandel : Festschrift zum 75. Geburtstag von Prof. Dr. Wilhelm Henze (Schriftenreihe des Niedersächsischen ... Sportgeschichte Hoya e.V) (German Edition),"Wolfgang Buss, Arnd Krüger"
The language of sport,Tim Considine
"Football at the University of Richmond, 1878-1948","Bailey, John Wendell"
"Cultural dimensions of play, games, and sport",Bernard Mergen
Images of sport in early Canada =,Nancy J. Dunbar
Sport zwischen Eigenständigkeit und Fremdbestimmung,"Hajo Bernett, Giselher Spitzer, Dieter Schmidt"
Passió i mite de l'esport,Joaquim Molas
Sports in the courts,
Ultimate Baseball Activity Book,Kurt Taylor
The struggle that must be,"Edwards, Harry"
Social psychology in athletics,Bryant J. Cratty
Biosocial aspects of sport,Bruce Tulloh
Le sport et la société canadienne au XIXe siècle,Donald Guay
Power training for sport,Al Murray
"Hounds in the morning : sundry sports of merry England : selections from the Sporting magazine, 1792-1836",Carl B. Cone
Running for Jesus,Madeline Manning Jackson
"Sports, games, and play",Jeffrey H. Goldstein
Sports and psychology,"Ryan, Frank"
Sport in contemporary society,D. Stanley Eitzen
Sports injuries,Paul F. Vinger
"Sports in American culture, 1980",
Victorian and Edwardian field sports from old photographs,J. N. P. Watson
I ludi a Roma,Emanuele Castorina
Desporto em democracia,Manuel Sérgio
Sportsmen and gamesmen,John Dizikes
Die Schrittmacher,Beat Brechbühl
The care and feeding of athletes,George V. Mann
The Soviet road to Olympus,N. N. Schneidman
New legal challenges in the sports industries,"Robert C. Berry, Glenn M. Wong"
Der Lizenzspielervertrag in der Nationalliga des Schweizerischen Fussballverbandes,Eugen Mätzler
La Naissance du mouvement sportif associatif en France,
"Sport, leisure, and social relations","Horne, John, David Jary, Alan Tomlinson"
75 godini DFS Levski-Spartak,Natalii︠a︡ Petrova
Les sports et jeux d'exercice dans l'ancienne France,"Jusserand, J. J."
Handlexikon Sportwissenschaft,Hans Eberspächer
La psychologie du sport de haut niveau,Raymond Thomas
A study of physical culture,Mao Zedong
Optimal strategies in sports,"Shaul P. Ladany, Robert Engel Machol"
Internationaler Kongress die Freizeitgestaltung in der industriellen Gesellschaft,International Congress: Leisure Activities in the Industrial Society Brussels 1973.
Winning through cooperation,Terry Orlick
The fit athlete,Roy J. Shephard
Webster's sports dictionary.,Merriam-Webster
Jock culture U.S.A.,Neil David Isaacs
The big red machine,Yuri Brokhin
The beauty of sport,Benjamin Lowe
Probleme des inneren Lehnguts,Notburga Bäcker
Sport in Australia,Trevor D. Jaques
Uma Aventura no Estádio,"Ana Maria Magalhães, Isabel Alçada"
Sport & entertainment in Australia,R. J. Unstead
The rich who own sports,Don Kowet
Quellentexte zu Sport und Körperkultur im alten Ägypten (German Edition),Wolfgang Decker
Sport in Britain,Harold Arthur Harris
Saga of American sport,John A. Lucas
USSR-USA sports encounters,Mikhail Lukashev
The psychic side of sports,"Murphy, Michael"
History of physical education and sport,Earle F. Zeigler
Essai de doctrine du sport,France. Commission de la doctrine du sport.
Shaw's champions,Benny Green
"Leistung, Spannung, Geschwindigkeit",Henning Eichberg
Sport under Communism,"Riordan, James"
Sport history,"Douglas A. Noverr, Lawrence E. Ziewacz"
Días geniales o lúdicros,"Caro, Rodrigo"
"Wesley Paul, marathon runner",Julianna A. Fogel
"Sport, a prison of measured time",Jean-Marie Brohm
Sport in der nachindustriellen Gesellschaft,Gerd Hortleder
Juegos y deportes vascos,"Aguirre, Rafael"
Choosing sides,Cary Goodman
"Sport, Profit, Politik",Klaus Waller
Sportmagazine ... ding-dong!,Piet Theys
Ukraine and the XVI Olympic Games,"Ukrainian World Committee for Sport Affairs, Washington, D.C."
"Classification. Class G. Geography, maps, anthropology, recreation",Library of Congress. Subject Cataloging Division.
Nutrition and athletic performance,Ellington Darden
"L' arcimatto, seguito da La bocca del leone e Don Lisander Manzoni",Gianni Brera
"Index to outdoor sports, games, and activities",Pearl Turner
Sport and social systems,John W. Loy
Sport psychology,William F. Straub
Sozialphilosophie des Leistungshandelns,Hans Lenk
Sport in history,"Richard I. Cashman, Michael McKernan"
SportDirector Series Package,"James L. Kestner, John R. Johnson, Tim F. Flannery, Mike Swank, John R. Olson"
"America's sporting heritage, 1850-1950",John Rickards Betts
The Rule book,Diagram Group
Standard Nomenclature of Athletic Injuries,Rachun
Anästhesiologische Besonderheiten bei Patienten im höheren Lebensalter und bei Leistungssportlern,Symposium Anästhesie bei Extremen Leistungsklassen Berlin 1973.
New encyclopedia of sports,Ralph Hickok
200 years of sport in America,Wells Twombly
Sport in ancient Egypt,A. D. Touny
Les sports à St-Stanislas,Janine Trépanier-Massicotte
Sport in the USSR,"Tarasov, Nikolaĭ."
The Oxford companion to world sports and games,John Arlott
Die Sprache des Sports,"Schneider, Peter"
Sport als Sozialisationsinstanz traditionneller Geschlechtsrollen,Walter Brehm
Social problems in athletics,
Soziologie in der DDR,Dieter Voigt
Theagenes,Johann Heinrich Krause
Sport und Politik,Arnd Krüger
Team dynamics,Hans Lenk
Persuasion of My Days: An Anecdotal Memoir,H.A. Dorfman
Politik und Turnen,Hans-Georg John
Leistungssport und Gesellschaftssystem,Frank R. Pfetsch
Materialien zur Soziologie des Sportvereins,Hans Lenk
"Sportunterricht, Freizeit- und Spitzensport",Herbert Heckers
Sport und Industriegeselleschaft,"Krockow, Christian Graf von"
Die gesellschaftlich-historischen Grundlagen des bürgerlichen Sports,Andrzej Wohl
Neue Psychoanalyse und intensive Psychotherapie,Josef Rattner
Sport et personnalité,Edgar Thill
Fans! How we go crazy over sports,"Roberts, Michael"
Remembering their glory,James V. Young
Vergesellschaftung des Sports,Herbert Maier
Women and sport,Carole A. Oglesby
"They call me ""The Big E""",Elvin Hayes
Social aspects of sports,Eldon E. Snyder
Stadion pełen wspomnień,Bogda Madej
Kritik der Sportsoziologie,Wilhelm Hopf
A history of Australian sport,Reet Howell
"Frauen im Sport, gleichberechtigt?","Klein, Michael"
Ancient Jewish culture and its emphasis on physical activity,Carol Ann Hofmeister
Mudville's revenge,Ted Vincent
"Sport, Gesellschaft, Politik","Krockow, Christian Graf von"
Health maintenance through physical conditioning,Robert C. Cantu
Soviet sport,Sergeĭ Grigorʹevich Popov
Using sports and physical education to strengthen reading skills,Lance M. Gentile
How we play the game,Richard Lipsky
Sports,Calvin Blickle
The Longevity of athletes,Anthony P. Polednak
Injuries in Sport,David Sutherland Muckle
Sport in the market?,"Sloane, Peter J."
Sociology of sport,Harry Edwards
The business of sports,William P. Lineberry
Der Sport bei den Völkern der Alten Welt,Ingomar Weiler
The female athlete,"International Congress on Women and Sport (1980 Rome, Italy)"
The man in the crowd,"Cohen, Stanley"
Laurel & thorn,Robert J. Higgs
Corpus de inscripciones deportivas de la España romana,Pablo Piernavieja Rozitis
Hexen,Joseph Grant Bell
Hexen,Joseph Grant Bell
Bolʹshai︠a︡ ėstafeta,
Sportivnai︠a︡ rabotosposobnostʹ,
Fizicheskoe vospitanie i sport studentov,
Ėstafeta,
"Edinai︠a︡ vsesoi︠u︡znai︠a︡ sportivnai︠a︡ klassifikat︠s︡ii︠a︡, 1985-1988",
Biologicheskoe obosnovanie fizicheskogo vospitanii︠a︡ i sportivnoĭ tekhniki uchashchikhsi︠a︡,
Osnovy sportivnogo masterstva,
Sport uchashcheĭsi︠a︡ molodezhi,
Sportyvni vysoty Ukraïny,
Körper- und Einbildungskraft,
Fizkulʹtura i sport Belarusi,
Sport i religioznye organizat︠s︡ii,
How they reached the top,
Belorusskie olimpiĭt︠s︡y,
Selbstbeherrschte Körper,
"Klinicheskie, matematicheskie i inzhenernye problemy sportivnoĭ medit︠s︡iny",
Biological and pedagogical problems of physical education and sport,
Materialy nauchno-metodicheskoĭ konferent︠s︡ii prepodavateleĭ Litovskogo gosudarstvennogo instituta fizicheskoĭ kulʹtury,
Haltung und Bewegung beim Menschen,
Psikhofiziologicheskie osobennosti uchebnoĭ i sportivnoĭ dei︠a︡telʹnosti,
"Su ""Dinamo"" emblema",
Sports in Soviet Latvia,
Hexen,Joseph Grant Bell
Tony Hawk's Pro Skater 2,Richie Plantain
Tony Hawk's Pro Skater 2,Richie Plantain
WWF Attitude,BradyGames
Le Robert des sports,Georges Petiot
Better Sailing,"Bob Fisher, Ted Hood"
Boxing contests in territories,United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on the Judiciary
New encyclopedia of sports,Ralph Hickok
Authorizing amateur boxing in the District of Columbia,United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on the District of Columbia
"Billiard and pool tables in the District of Columbia, etc",United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on the District of Columbia
Athletic field and gymnasium for Howard University,United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on the District of Columbia
Exchange of land for Turkey Thicket Recreation Center in the District of Columbia,United States. Congress. Senate. Committee on the District of Columbia
Sports injuries,Lars Peterson
Ready 2 Rumble Boxing,Doug Perry
Formação e desenvolvimento de pessoal em lazer e esporte,"Seminário de Políticas Públicas de Esporte e Lazer (2nd 2002 Porto Alegre, Brazil)"
Knockout Kings 2000,Keith M. Kolmos
"Legal issues in sport, pe, and recreation",Hazel J. Hartley
Purnell's encyclopedia of sport,Norman S. Barrett
Rare and rugged sports,Albert Orbaan
Memorandum für die Entwicklung des Sports in Venezuela =,Liselott Diem
"Sport, identity, and ethnicity",Jeremy MacClancy
Sport,Heiner Geissler
Idrottskamrater minns,
Careers in sports,Valerie Menard
Sport psychology international,"Hermann Rieder, Michel Bouet"
Les métamorphoses du sport du XXe au XXIe siècle,Charles-Louis Foulon
WCW Nitro,Anthony Pena
Spine in sports,Ted A. Lennard
Zhongguo ti yu bai ke quan shu =,
Philosophy of sport,Mark Holowchak
Le Dirigeant sportif bénévole,Eric Bournazel
Sport and corporate nationalisms,"Michael L. Silk, Andrews, David L., Cheryl L. Cole"
All sports alphabetical price guide,"Krause Publications, Inc"
"Sports, jeunesses et logiques d'insertion",Bertrand Sachs
Pour un humanisme du sport,Pierre de Coubertin
Manuel du sportif blessé,Lars Peterson
Manuel du sportif blessé,Lars Peterson
Emanzipation im Sport?,
Mwy o chwarae teg,Curriculum Council for Wales
Health maintenance through physical conditioning,Robert C. Cantu
Listos!,
"Corps, espaces et pratiques sportives",
"Horsehide, pigskin, oval tracks and apple pie",
La couverture médicale des compétitions sportives,Guy Azémar
The arena of masculinity,Brian Pronger
